卡尔普陪外孙玩滑梯。
假语村言别再拥抱我。
宝马配挂跛骡鞍，貂蝉怨枕董翁榻。
邓小平与撒切尔会晤。
老虎幼崽与宠物犬玩耍。
身长约五尺二寸五分或以上。
赵荻约曹云腾去鬼屋。
展品虽有，展员却颓。
以散居儿童和幼托儿童为主。
柯特妮身穿豹纹大衣。
引才要筛，用才也要筛。
南越昆仑山与西藏接壤。
翁凯兰防乳腺癌宣传照。
我回右哼哼左哼哼。
吴云宝奶奶挑选枇杷。
此外广本也将由少壮派掌管。
右蛮舞袅袅，左琼歌昔昔。
眼眶宽阔而低矮，鼻短而宽。
霞浦县牙城镇乌岐、瓦窑村水位猛涨。
霍思燕露背秀乳沟性感惹火。
也可以给本委员反映哟。
摇篮牌钙维健婴儿配方奶粉。
鄂豫鲁皖苏局地大暴雨。
以下为薛蛮子观点摘要。
沉鱼落雁，闭月羞花。
而许冠英亦将于明日出殡。
阿娇与百位“鬼粉丝”狂欢。
房屋买卖契约和收条。
遛弯儿都得躲远点。
黑熊闯进王明辉家后院觅食。
吴亚军与丈夫蔡奎。
亚硝酸盐味微咸，易溶于水。
院墙被石棉瓦遮掩上了。
成荫挑选我演赵玉敏。
寅吃卯粮，无异于饮鸩止渴。
驴子越跑越快，越跑越疯狂。
揶揄得孙垚差点背过气儿。
光棍节营销应运而生。
高压铁塔下的低矮棚屋。
电影海报“贫民窟百万富翁”。
刁维列已被另案处理。
云雾有时宛如玉带平卧峰峦山涧，有时炊烟袅绕，薄雾轻旋。
嘴巴周围略微肿起。
欢声笑语洒满村庄。
沙场竟殒命，壮志也无违。
油炸豆腐喷喷香，馓子麻花嘣嘣脆，姊妹团子数二姜。
本山也真太抠门儿了。
蔺东英的住院病案。
犬必须拴养或圈养。
赫莉和印度大亨阿郎奈尔已经分居数月。
难兄难弟要好好切磋切磋。
小军大腿内侧淤青。
以及“雌雄孔子鸟”复原图。
与女演员拍吻戏，陈小春不怕应采儿吃醋。
仿针织、粗花呢等印花面料的巧妙运用。
与约瑟夫贴面搂抱。
努尔别尔德耶娃请周永康转达对吴邦国委员长的亲切问候。
金友庄瞒儿下周捐肾。
我我我我我我和胖子一起。
嫂嫂给做的莜面窝窝、和羊肉炖山药。
曼萨尼约港口被关闭。
廖碧儿马雅舒和老公晒恩爱。
袜子摊小老板陈永全。
合计筹资一点一二九一五五亿元。
鸟儿喳喳，奏起晨曲。
体强壮而后学问道德之进修勇而收效远。
网购或网搜股民信息，以高回报为饵“请君入瓮”。
图为凯姆博伊“斜线”冲刺。
即将钓鱼台、黄尾屿、赤屿三岛赏给盛宣怀为产业，供采药之用。
用不用我替你捂着嘴。
二敬家住北五环外，上班要去亚运村华堂商场。
有关能否改控“串谋”。
布吕尼也与前夫哲学家拉斐尔育有一子。
又有谁肯舍施给他呢？
窃贼露腿自称患“麻风病”。
老祖母以谋杀罪被收押。
矮矬穷，别瞎夸。
鱼在水里打旋地往外乱蹦。
卓文君说：宛如山上雪，皎若云间月。
一类苗可谓命运多舛。
某小怂快快看看。
铁砂掌爱好者张辉表演劈砖。
而吕业新也被一根檩子压着。
谆谆叮咛，勿忘天山哺育情。
现在是道儿越走越宽，人气越搞越旺。
毋庸讳言，人有记性，亦有忘性。
餐后，一行人又陪汪小菲到另一诊所看耳鼻喉科。
干嘛啊你又来勾搭谁。
约婉卡与铁托没有孩子。
受损宋代哥窑青釉葵瓣口盘正面损毁后。
也欢迎卫生棉厂商找我代言。
蝼蚁往还空垄亩，骐麟埋没几春秋。
如护发和护眼要戴上硅胶泳帽和摘除隐形眼镜。
马浚伟与杨怡等共度生日。
省级文保单位满院儿溜达鸡。
图为中山詹园广邀千余游客品尝重阳益寿千叟宴。
小文杰全身枯瘦如柴。
秦某用脸盆舀水将火扑灭。
安全套做成巫毒娃娃样子。
第三是烤鸭缺斤短两。
传马伊璃怀上二胎。
风筝要线，奔马要缰，航船要舵。
贾媛媛拖高岳上楼。
黑袍鸟“小黑”是林八哥。
他越摁，我越慌，发动越慢。
卯兔开新岁，两岸共迎春。
五月天玛莎替菊娃娃换装比基尼。
坡土岩性为坡坡，残积土属土质边坡。
墨西哥一五二一年沦为西班牙殖民地。
娃哈哈企业研究院副院长李言郡算是“苦主”之一。
周韵则获老外搂腰，兴奋大笑。
我要用谷歌发送一封邮件。
迪沃尔夫则吞了一口水。
先师的研究领域浩瀚无涯矣。
因干爹而红的模特周蕊。
玩咖用来骗美眉。
五戒松散狭隘，要团结合作。
希望看一眼格尔木的树叶。
秉哲也回吻大蟒蛇。
城门顶端有桃色的陶瓦，屋顶以龙凤等瑞兽装饰。
学生踏上栏杆戏弄鳄鱼。
你看梁朝伟演“色戒”，刘嘉玲也得咬牙忍住呀。
这要问问火星上的鱼啦。
钟镇涛与女儿牵手逛街。
一层可以种花花草草。
每家作坊损失有一二十万元。
他面容憔悴，右腿有些瘸拐。
舅舅指张韶涵殴亲。
法院准许合同解除。
另外，窝案串案多也尤为突出。
搞些林业机械主业以外的偏业呢？
棉花收购也遭游资恶性炒作。
古永锵已“军壁垓下”。
他又哭又闹，还拿刀戳来戳去。
在放下清扫机后，万庆良改用扫帚作业。
她昂首挺胸，迎风而立，炯炯有神的双目眺望前方。
而张茆日前也宣布与外籍男友订婚。
扪萝登塔远，刳木取泉遥。
你无语我很闲滴勒。
问题牛肉据信源自一家罗马尼亚屠宰场。
阿尔瓦雷斯依言行事。
只愿苍天相照应，留得情谊比锦翠。
菀之挑选男友最怕无趣。
坦塔维和安南被任命为总统顾问。
小真一边用纸巾按压止血，一边又开始低声啜泣。
邱韶智因此被外界讽刺是“鳄鱼头，老衬底”。
花朵体引发网友热议效仿。
肖克在空调厂卸完货，由原路返回寸滩港。
由此牵出丑闻，有人蓄意栽赃萨科齐。
瓦努阿图位于环太平洋地震多发带。
干罢农活上上网，咱也玩玩假农场。
这就是英业达硬包软，软卖硬的理念。
烧花鸭，烧雏鸡儿。
中枪小考拉生命垂危。
手捧死蚕，蚕农非常沮丧。
不过仍挡不住一些烟民吞云吐雾。
亲朋好友捧着花篮前来吊唁。
九阳豆浆机我到是会用。
全国一共有一百一十二所二一一高校。
富豪落马源于规范监督缺位、溺爱纵容下的野蛮生长。
王金艳左侧颅骨严重凹陷。
用的枪支有阿嘎枪和手枪等。
最后抹掉口角唾沫，作鸟兽散。
另一名遇难者秦萍凤是崇明滧南村人。
英雄熊尿保痛失亲人老泪纵横。
俄罗斯公车滥用屡遭抨击。
办好中国普法网英文网。
我妈笑我傻，我妈笑我憨。
吃个甜筒降降温吧。
燕娅娅油画作品“奶奶”。
在引桥上跑很危险。
胡杏儿盛装打扮，与刘青云现身威尼斯影展。
杨凯苦笑着，继续往家“挪”。
约两万零两百人受影响。
你沾我的光也够戗。
阿默舍姆位于首都伦敦以西。
艮其止，止其所也。
而涉案被捕女疑犯姓黄。
暖暖也越来越逆反了。
据介绍，非标柴油一般是用白油料掺兑走私红油。
警犬训练大队携犬巡检。
广东省政协常委陈缵光走进“蚁族”居所。
珠泪下落情洒空床。
羌管弄晴，菱歌泛夜，嬉嬉钓叟莲娃。
杨洪全是田坝镇挖夯村村民。
在施工中无法用夯机碾轧。
碑帖、法帖、字帖、画帖的帖与饕餮的餮都念餮。
没坐相意味着没教养，辱没祖宗。
纹饰以细绳纹为主，还有交错绳纹、弦纹、戳刺纹等。
歹徒们抡着管子又打又刺，急于置人于死地。
大挂车驾驶员刘卫东右脚被死死卡住无法动弹。
温岭市蓝孔雀幼师颜艳红的“虐童”行为。
且有确切材料为证。
酒井法子吸毒案震惊演艺圈。
欢迎各位朋友常来逛逛聊聊。
老王边啃烧饼边说。
警方苦苦追踪魏某。
林祖恋任乌坎村党总支书记。
他蹑手蹑脚进了屋，溜进卧室。
此文经摘编，标题为编者制作。
两艘船在护航往香港走。
而曾母也患有糖尿病。
杨千嬅为时装秀任压轴嘉宾。
民警尾随追击，抓获一名毛贼。
讲咗好多好实在嘅嘢。
好口渴啊，来泡杯茶喝。
红玉在洞房之夜逃婚，被人误当作孪生姐姐苏雨宁而追捕。
三月春来早，嫩芽挂树梢。
被告人闫永喜和毛旭东同庭受审。
一斗令一碗，相当于两碗白蚬。
吴利用自己哺乳期运输婴幼儿防查。
毕竟，“树挪死，人挪活”啊。
不能为了凑文章而凑文章。
橘农们从各处挑水抗旱。
军检对饶宏伟求处死刑。
就是利润越挤越薄，越挤越薄。
须定晴，看委员提案，无一奏效，引无数房奴竞折腰。
远景延伸至窦妪、栾城。
您等会儿我给您问问。
这愤怒，恰如一座岩浆怒涌的火山，即欲喷发。
有网友称，官员为陕西省安监局局长杨达才。
阿尔特讷聚位于土叙边界西端。
国以民为本，党以民为基。
是威胁哦恐吓哦。
声音嗲嗲的，装嫩，爱掉眼泪。
以往常塞车的岗顶则很畅顺。
一个方向预约不超过三趟可选车次。
钟舒漫派热狗给长者。
一看，“一团浓烟直往天空蹿”。
离岸人民币债券俗称“点心债”。
奢侈品网购遭遇诚信“滑铁卢”。
时近晌午，东二环广渠门桥东北角。
窗外一片阴霾，这雨像是永远下不完了。
魏茵搭上的，是一趟死亡之旅。
沙乌地相信宾拉登已病故。
吉允池第一壶中区站位。
俗话说，亡羊补牢，犹未晚也。
尽量蹭各种商务应酬。
很快就有人回帖安慰王淼。
遇难村民屋前扯起横幅。
毛蛤等贝类海鲜易携带甲肝病毒，食用时一定要煮熟蒸透。
李家鼎一提起杨思琦又爆粗。
随后巴萨用伤愈复出的普约尔换下凯塔。
沙特王子阿勒瓦利德。
而部分网民也乐于“围观起哄”。
云阳县盘龙镇四民村发展壮大樱桃产业，助农增收。
网友“笨笨孩儿”压力不小。
渗浴河的清淤工作也已完工。
巫峡镇柳树村原文沈淑荣，其女考取大学。
女儿常无故晕倒，且久治不愈。
于跃海举报的大泗村十二组联运站及东侧耕地。
李克勤与郑伊健捧场。
她当即尴尬掩嘴兼拧头。
然而此举依然未能抵挡炒家热情。
大量土方涌进犬舍。
五是叶面“三喷”补肥。
关万章索性用脚狠踹卷帘门，但卷帘门未能打开。
屋脊两端筑有筒形拱顶壁炉烟囱，伸出屋面。
于幼军也是一厉害角色。
应届毕业生放宽至二十二周岁。
齐莫维奇于是引进更多马匹。
在摇曳的春光中慢慢消散。
并且把我打伤了，造成左耳耳膜穿孔，右耳有淤血。
自此，“艾妮女装”网店经常闪烁着“秒杀”二字。
俺从楼上叫俺姐姐，俺姐姐没醒。
之后银行催着卡主去还钱。
耄耋书法家章汝奭还专程托友人表达哀思。
如今，中轴九门独缺地安门。
小貂因为长出了“喜鹊翅膀”而惊讶无比。
所以，胶囊也得当药一样监管。
早开奶、早吸吮、早喂养。
去壳后仍保留些许外层组织，如皮层、糊粉层和胚芽。
此时李岩的饥饿仿佛教改的诺言，虚无缥缈也摸不着边。
应避免与大车逆向迎浪行驶。
可别随地吐痰呀。
新品种大蜥蜴“碧塔塔瓦巨蜥”。
郭丑丑立即提出卖给舅妈秦贵英。
魔鬼主场魔力无边。
流浪犬收容队也落得“夭折”下场。
坎通纳还被课以一万英镑的罚款。
出去后想到外面去闯一闯。
贪嗔痴慢，因果轮回。
意见认为，考虑郝雷因“吩噻嗪猝死综合症而死亡”。
小苏瑞穿芭蕾舞裙与妈妈逛街。
有本启奏，无本退朝。
一股股恶臭扑鼻而来。
释小龙与沙妮现场跳舞。
回首峰峦入莽苍。
明将袁崇焕曾据此城抗击努尔哈赤和皇太极。
下面请凯德商用中国总裁骆伟汉先生致词。
风城超稠油油藏位于准噶尔盆地西北缘。
警方用锤子砸车门。
吕女说，张男二度进槟榔摊内，忽然学狗爬跑出店外。
其余的是斑胸草雀和枫鸟等种类。
斗拱以榫相扣，紧密结实，端口还有精美的雕刻。
巍巍井冈山，绵亘五百里。
不能狗熊掰棒子。
民哪告得过官啊？
又称喀喇昆仑公路。
这怕是要考考当地政府了。
叶山豪不就单眼皮吗，又有型，外形也很符合喔！
那咱俩一起数羊吧。
猩猩在平衡木上“耍赖”。
随着环境呀，因素呀有改变呀。
现因执行刑满予以释放。
刘犇、王垚垚、王桂华、赵永胜、蔡智勇也分别发言。
江一燕一直自诩为“爬行者”。
天高云淡，秋阳灿烂。
严扬生不愧为“一把好算盘”，硬将几笔未结账目列为死账。
你猜我猜你猜不猜。
母子开心奔向冷饮店。
遇到问题要勇敢面对呀。
我心里三万只草泥马奔腾而过。
室外建有葡萄园和停机坪。
辣椒都是整捆整捆在晾晒的。
冢子坡桥依然被水漫过。
恩？叉叉圈圈是什么？
这一切全要由王美珍一人操持。
打捞队虽撒网打捞，无果。
我们一直都认为吐血有血燕。
该案成为宋鹏飞涉黑案的导火索。
春眠不觉晓，处处蚊子咬。
今夜有雨夹雪，明日转小雪。
建议北京也搞一个哟！
这种鸟脖子上有一圈乌黑的羽毛。
说来话长，一言难尽啊。
旋任故宫博物院古物馆科长及编纂。
真要想干事，就得惜寸阴。
她穿着睡衣赤脚往外跑。
而唐恒也病了，喉咙发炎。
窃匪欲撬夹万时触动警钟，急挟赃物沿“凿墙路”逃走。
莱昂纳多吹呜呜祖拉。
业主操纵招投标普遍。
民以食为天，粮价乃百价之基。
全剧以瑶族特有的长鼓贯穿。
咋可能我让它做问卷它就做问卷呢。
老师责令赵薇写检讨。
津浦在望，陇海相连。
这条毒蛇名为“玛蒂尔达角蝰”。
会面时，曾荫权一直用流利的英语与霍华德交谈，没有安排翻译。
杨胜忠与金继芬相互搀扶。
英语则有阅读理解等题型。
莽莽乡野，万水千山，铿锵承诺。
眼下儿子高烧不退，他为给儿筹医药费决定扒窃。
节能空间逼仄，却也大有可为。
整体呈葫芦形，壶身通体錾刻云纹，云海中錾二龙戏珠纹。
这次有女伴陪游，实属罕有。
所卖洋酒皆为假酒。
刀枪剑戟斧钺钩叉！都看别人玩儿过！
今天淡云遮日，更显闷热。
在监测站旁有一家顺路发驴肉快餐店。
务求不囫囵吞枣，不人云亦云。
艾肯尔的遭遇急坏了王大姐。
车篓上印着“让经典引领未来”的红塔山广告词。
馋了完全可以舔自己脚丫子。
葬具为一棺一椁，系用长方形木板以榫卯结构叠砌而成。
保险杠底部棱角上有擦痕。
谢紊渊抬头问：我怎么了？
收尿用来提炼尿激酶。
凤姐本名罗玉凤，重庆人。
他发音稚嫩，但也算字正腔圆。
瓦拉德怀疑此案是“内鬼”所为。
吃完饭后，杨宇送给了许一块欧米茄牌手表。
十年沧海，劈波斩浪。
嫩嫩是我上网时用的昵称。
莲荆笑吐芳葩，更听得雄鸡唱彩霞。
脚下的土地微微振颤，人们翘首仰望。
每天穿同一套衣服，臭味熏天。
凡此种种过年“抠法”，简直不胜枚举。
图为墨西哥著名海湾旅游胜地阿卡普尔科。
一只讨厌的乌鸦站在羊背上。
主演郭羡妮、米雪逃过一劫。
獐狍等多种动物被浓烟熏死。
可我一问，这玩意儿并不靠谱。
罗姆尼访问耶路撒冷。
众星捧月辉映高新天空。
因为我要证明我爱他呀。
当天大风把杨洋一身绿裙吹起，杨洋还披着曾轶可的外套。
部分患者伴有咳嗽、咽痛。
另外，他还为“龙珠”“犬夜叉”“银魂”等很多动画配音。
展厅色彩以黑白灰为主，局部点缀暖色。
夫妇俩以蟹爸蟹妈自居。
四人帮曾偷偷摸摸地整死过人。
那里的布局杂而有章乱而有序。
先摘选整理网友评论如下。
朵朵白云托回你，点点苦雨洒凡。
中宁县万亩枸杞观光示范园。
公元九百七十五年，宋朝曹彬破金陵，南唐归宋。
由于日本战败投降，耿谆幸免于难。
上海静安区“幺幺幺五”火灾就是由焊火引起的。
冬暖夏凉的窑洞被一道道裂缝吞噬。
舞池璀璨，乐声欢快，光影交错。
给我一百个胆我也不敢撒谎。
姑娘你想约啥。
团伙大把数钞票炫富。
啊锹环，你比七环少两环。
其中，“祾”字取“祭而受福”之意，“恩”字取“罔极之恩”意。
姐妹们不要眼红哦。
随州西周封国为随，战国末属楚，始置随县。
这于商丘又有何益呢？
老母下跪，为儿求情。
老将军手捧“金玉虎符”。
引入杠杆率监管标准。
容祖儿至今仍为没有向罗文拜师而耿耿于怀。
他坚持要起诉污蔑造谣者。
那我再晚点走，要不也堵着。
人的三围当然是腰围胸围臀围，物理上的三维是长宽高呀！
有些用绳子捆好，有些则是用香烟壳包好。
多由毒蝇伞、豹斑毒伞等引起。
杨功焕将为我国控制不力的根本原因归结于烟草业的阻挠。
堤外江涛滚滚，堤内一片祥和。
不懂法啊，受高额利息诱惑。
二四五路开设“云台花园至东圃”短线。
咬完猪就要咬人了。
报言帝室抡材者，便作明堂一柱看。
尚雯婕顶扫把头亮相，一身黑装雷人依旧。
刘銮雄与吕丽君之子曝光。
只穿了一条内裤有木有啊！
面对其冗长发言，黄文仔委员忍无可忍，激愤制止。
甘花也不知道咋弄。
图为大云山错银编磬铜虡兽座。
但染过色的，即使曝晒仍会很鲜红。
目前磋商已举行五次。
廉署早前亦拘捕陈巨源。
西汉常以酱、盐等作料为肉食品调料，调料均放入杯中。
刘文博现在由爷爷奶奶照顾。
他戏外谈姐弟恋，在“南”片也和简嫚书有段纯爱姐弟恋。
卡达能源部长阿提雅稍早也发出同样的讯息。
据说柚子皮熬汤喝，可以化痰止咳哟。
红线框内为情人湖原址，现已被填埋。
一个厨子一个甩饼，爱拍谁去拍。
要建言献策，发挥参谋作用。
翁倩玉在赈灾晚会上演唱。
因苟某婶婶和嫂嫂迫于面子问题没声张，苟某原以为“没事了”。
嘴角微微上扬。
蒙妹玲就读于贡川乡红柳小学，上学要横渡红水河。
匡涌委员代表工商联发言。
许晋亨父母赴医院探望。
朴娥姬欲哭无泪。
现在偶尔玩玩，没瘾了。
当时，这艘油轮正向一艘挪威货轮传送油料。
叙利亚西北部城镇玛瑞特阿尔纽曼遭到轰炸。
古语云，“不患寡而患不均”。
窈窈弦宇，三光不入。
充气娃娃是行为艺术的一个隐喻。
按阿马尔的说法，赛义夫一行打算逃往尼日尔，“试图卷土重来”。
老人对儿子拈花惹草也早已深恶痛绝，一口答应。
烟柳画桥，风帘翠幕，参差十万人家。
看来外星人也嘴馋呀。
并将仿品挂在原处。
两个肮脏的炼油用大铁槽架在灶上，还有余温。
主要目标在维持飞行组员的熟练度。
入则恳恳以尽忠，出则谦谦以自悔。
邓建国一头金发很抢眼。
志云大师急需扛起大旗收拾烂摊子。
一群群白鸽放飞、一串串誓言响起。
她给多少没娘哺乳的婴儿喂过奶？
她要什么我买什么，鸡爪子一买好几包，爽歪歪她一喝喝一排。
警方担心薛宏崴的安危，薛还使用过陈云的名字。
据安妮宝贝透露，“大方”所选篇目绝无千字文。
该遗赠无附加条件。
只是此关仍雄在，岁月已蹉跎。
我真没喝酒，只是晕车啊。
别因此太郁闷哦！
我头摇的和拨浪鼓一样。
夫妻笑星倪明、夏文兰现身压轴演出“我爱老公”。
谢安琪跟内地歌手徐子崴一起任“大运会”表演嘉宾。
大坏蛋，羞死我算了。
普陀山既以海天壮阔取胜，又以山林深邃见长。
晚上回家比较晚，所以俺姥爷就训我。
新人花销大，婚庆公司也喊苦。
图为“喇叭哥”在用吼声执法。
为庆“年例”，该村委请来脱衣舞娘助兴。
乱又何妨，窄又何妨。
而养鱼户却只能干瞅着。
来跟着我一起左三圈右三圈扭扭腰。
我与网易的情谊难以割舍。
自主品牌也未落人后。
那些扒手，你越怕他会越猖狂。
我的小脑瓜有点不够用啦。
必须配一个套盆。
九代王共在位二百四十一年。
寿星杨千嬅捐出两千元抽奖，上台时一面吃甜品一面抽奖。
金辉鹏被冰雹砸得鼻青脸肿。
医生见状只能用膀胱镜异物钳将死泥鳅从膀胱里拽出来。
网友“正风”说，小鱼都得被小眼网捞净了吧？
扁某被押解回渭南渭南。
这一推选委员会，就是由筹委会来筹组的。
打羽毛球容易崴脚。
后又有三伙劫匪蹿上列车开始抢劫。
在殡仪馆外站一小会儿，便已汗水涔涔。
它于九月中旬推出试用版本。
阴沉的天空，飘洒起毛毛细雨，似乎知晓此刻举国同哀。
皮皮鲁讲堂教师。
图为收藏家王学武在介绍柴窑的历史珍藏性。
她与上海乒乓国手王励勤，还有王妈妈一同逛世博园。
您能和我女友合张影吗？
马德钟也或搂或抱。
裸体攀岩是加州摄影师兼攀岩爱好者迪安的创意。
望着盼盼，李钢满眼心疼。
私人商铺很少给。
贺胜因救驾有功，被忽必烈提拔为上都留守。
王竹华心跳到了嗓子眼。
笑话还分颜色嘛？
钱要花在刀刃儿上。
据说邹国春生前酷爱花草。
郑元畅、陈妍希开餐厅，任达华站台捧场。
玻璃砸中休闲吧遮阳伞，伤了游人。
陈奕迅透露太太徐濠萦因忙于跑步，故未能出席捧场。
地皮儿有个硬壳，正出苗的，现在就卡那儿了。
撇开竞选结果输赢不谈。
赵宪槐又将赵炳佐杀死在门口。
在医学上，这类药物叫做“口服促进排卵药物”。
巨春雷曾在微博爆料称，白静劈腿乔宇谋夺老公家产。
赵作兰斥责他“蠢笨”。
驾驶扫雪车行驶到赵公口桥后，苗巍掉头往回走。
有酸中毒者，可用碳酸氢钠。
老约翰拧着股劲儿。
难道不是围巾、围裙和围嘴吗？
张如炮手抖无法写字，因此最后摁指模代替签字。
造假者有孙悟空的变脸术？
从灯笼高挂的正门走进网师园，夜色幽沉，景象朦胧。
图为员工用自来水充满饮水机。
此前，王炯又转赴安徽任职。
一辆破车压着两条道还水蛇转，谁敢超啊！
手套与绑腿，通常藏着暗器。
为啥子要晕呀。
约翰逊与奥巴马交情匪浅。
例如饺子吃法、云吞吃法以及窝窝头制胶囊的“窝囊吃法”等。
宫小村拐儿乞讨的网文发表后，引起轩然大波。
光泉方丈依次在天王殿弥勒菩萨、韦陀菩萨前上香、礼拜、说法。
她有我小妹妹漂亮吗？
信纸一承以上风格，一副年逾古稀的残败样。
为报复他用扳手将“奸夫”打死。
无语啦吖无语就对啦。
太仓港打捞上岸的江豚。
浩口镇虾农刘学翠，一筹莫展。
血从她头顶往外冒个不停。
可能也就写了给狱友听听唱唱。
你为什么要赶走我呢？
家长搭帐篷陪读。
绿豆西瓜冰棍儿凉，解暑首推酸梅汤。
瞬时乌云密布，豪雨如注，白昼如夜。
孔明灯相传由诸葛孔明发明。
越是接近梦想，越要有闯关夺隘的勇气与智慧。
艾薇儿出国演出也常常有男友贴身护送。
是否有泡沫还要看空房率。
加快拱北口岸改扩建和横琴口岸客货车通道重建。
暂缓缴费期间，免收滞纳金。
视需要而举起哪件兵器。
但蜜雪儿仍不为所动。
往日披散的头发也梳挽成髻，看上去别有韵味。
但被问及会否与祖儿减少联络，何韵诗不予回应。
张媛一开始挺纳闷。
水磨石的火锅桌上，用鱼汤骨汤调成的火锅汤喷香扑鼻。
而今年应景儿的降雪，刚好与“大雪”擦肩而过。
消防员杨超钻进威风凛凛的消防坦克内驾驶。
按图索骥，依样画葫芦。
羊、狗年平平，总算形象讨喜。
伊曼纽尔对此非常气愤。
贾强挥舞棒球棍冲在身前，抡棒击打洪亮。
消火栓、灭火器均已配齐到位，消防泵也已安装调试完毕。
小西原本约好陪着表姐一起来相亲，表姐却因为胆小爽约。
二房长女何超琼手握重权。
槽罐车罐体被钢筋扎破导致盐酸泄漏。
郑俊浩婚事告吹。
这显示，芒果网正酝酿分拆上市。
最严重时，胸前还要放一个便盆盛呕吐物。
过往船只应引以为戒，拧紧“安全弦”，确保航行安全。
另一种则是水鳕鱼，售卖商品包括扁鳕切片、鳕鱼扒。
渔业暨水产资源局官员闻讯前往查看，认为是泥鳅的幼鱼。
但该名学生次日趁无人时以指甲捅破捆绑胶带而成功逃脱。
加强恶臭污染物治理。
让蚊子咬死你！
有本事起用新导演别老摽着艺谋。
柑桔也许对你有帮助哦。
交运仓储、造纸印刷、钢铁等板块整体涨幅领先。
消防队员用背篓将救灾物资背进灾区。
类似的风言风语我也时有耳闻。
听闻重庆人咬狗，一看雷哥受冤屈。
孔贾拘守，昌黎呐喊。
张敏抚摸着他的头，含着泪劝慰。
图为形状像鹅卵石的岩石样本火山玻璃。
以便永远保存人类珍贵的文化遗产。
我以前又愚蠢，又虚荣。
图为奶奶塞给小莹的零钞。
在招考职员中，孔德奇也屡屡伸手。
上啥别上电视，惹谁别惹方舟子。
因无法忍受病痛折磨选择跳楼了。
厦门翔安海底隧道右线洞口外景。
审判长当庭允许。
一楼商铺已烧成废墟，外墙熏黑。
还是使用文明用语吧。
三两条就卖一毛，蛤蟆骨朵儿大田螺蛳白挠。
卡比里来自瓦尔扎甘县的基尾村。
但李婉钰“投错票”之说，却遭绿营市议员抨击。
受东风扰动影响，一场秋雨悄然洒落湖南省。
把那种乱象从生的民主奉为样板吗？
普京与卡巴耶娃。
一起在晚上仰望星空吗？
李静用力擦掉一角，看着窗外往来穿着皮袄羽绒服的人们。
广州未来三天雨雾缠绵。
严肃查处买官卖官案件。
永远也忘不了班主任那哀怨的眼神。
咱也别挑剔人家，但硬件服务和配套的东西该有哇。
业内预测的或许并无夸张。
视频监控截图，一只小卷毛犬勇战大藏獒。
该赌场为外国人专用赌场。
栖霞红叶秋天手绘版，漂亮吧！
我军破解美军优势的手杀锏。
据闻，朱莉拍“游”片故意强吻德普，勾搭企图明显。
几天用一张，用完就扔。
三处私宰点均无检验检疫证。
几人将朴云当场乱刀砍死。
张春贤同时赞扬说，新疆人善良懂感恩。
把孩子尿还得吹嘘嘘才行。
这些水泥砖能用手捻碎。
谁能阻止李宗伟，成为年终悬念。
在路旁旮旯处，皮特脱下外套，惬意抽着香烟。
脚印旁还有甩出的小血点。
可蔡云这查无原因的发烧却让队医担心不已。
副首相克莱格同样为王室游艇建造提议“泼冷水”。
俩胳膊三度烫伤，创面比较深。
阳台栏杆应有防护措施。
我说你咋哪壶不开提哪壶哇？
冯巩姐姐冯幸耘、姜昆、濮存昕等纷纷现身。
有几名游客不敢沿绳索攀爬至岸边。
人物体态丰腴，身姿婀娜，舞裙飘逸，神采飞扬，极富艺术张力。
今年我准备提出请财政补贴取暖费用。
我太笨手笨脚了。
都答了满分要请我吃饭哦。
玩玩乐器，玩玩游戏。
阿霞留下电话给同某，称要介绍小妹给其嫖宿。
苏玉双与寝室同学在一起。
您可以先回冰岛问问您哥们儿。
届时王晶又能笑得合不拢嘴了。
我约她去看狗展。
粮食变能源，使得因灾减产的粮食供应雪上加霜。
第五名是女星洁西卡贝尔跳钢管舞。
轮换球员真的有必要吗？
诸如“哈欠”写成“哈九”，“美食一顿”写成“美食一顷”等等。
这就容易引起误会及争拗。
能够第三已经阿弥陀佛了。
恳请消费者原谅。
从“兔王”长着弯曲的爪子看，它极可能靠挖食植物根茎为生。
艺术家与表演者五大类，入选者均为各领域最具影响力的佼佼者。
少数患者出现兴奋，或有片断荒谬的妄想与幻觉。
楼市降价的豁口未现，但暗流已经汹涌。
当对方同意与其“一夜情”后，柳某大喜过望。
可爱模样让我忍不住对她狂吻。
一名因“情绪摇滚”范儿打扮遭杀害的伊拉克少年。
这一件件案底，让专案组人员颇为惊讶。
此外，西奥的两颊有棱有角，而梵高的腮帮比较圆。
佛山的“陶都”招牌越擦越亮。
绿柳低垂，江水哽咽。
她在鄞州一家银行乖乖汇款。
禽、蛋价格有涨有落。
该存单可流通转让，自由买卖。
萨勒曼表示，他已经向查尔斯王子致以歉意。
没忙啥，在等你召唤呀。
为撺掇新郎新娘做游戏，朋友们围挤在床边起哄。
她倒下了，我姑父和我外甥可怎么办呀！
百折不挠，国泰民安。
往年隆冬见不到的海鸥也翩翩而至。
也捧场了像孙俪、佟大为、刘烨一批活跃在娱乐圈一线的演员。
花言巧语有之，威逼利诱有之，讽刺辱骂有之。
若朝鲜拥有核武器，韩国没有有效手段予以反击。
民女给您请安啦。
陈涛不解，致电文强却被掐断。
旧老血渍，可用硫黄皂揉搓清洗。
其他我就当没听过咯。
有望年底与观众见面。
杨龙芳的观点与黄卫平不谋而合。
越南方面也允许买手直接到林区选材。
层次感鲜明，让人越看越着迷。
网友“预言帖”截屏图。
让姚易二人的威力共同发挥？
卓韵芝表示都爱喝咖啡。
秋保的脚部等处也负有轻伤。
羊要咩咩叫，公鸡要在天未亮时打鸣。
在屋檐下听雨呀。
而荒唐减压偷盗财物的赵某也面临刑罚。
守望屁股，我玩寡妇，是游戏呀，别瞎想。
扫把铁制，下扎数十条耐火的橡胶皮，用来扑打火焰。
当记者按下秒表后，龚兆春开始沿着软梯向下爬。
警察正在用警棍引诱蛇出来。
可内服可外用哦。
入夏以来雨水充沛，利于作物生长发育。
张毅发现“无孔可入”，也只好作罢。
闪点越低，燃料越易燃，引发火灾的危险性也就越大。
刚才我也感觉恶心、头晕、脚软。
田月生因失血过多抢救无效死亡。
杨存虎本名“王存虎”，生父姓王，早亡，从继父改姓杨。
宁愿做一朵篱下的野花，不愿做一朵受恩惠的蔷薇。
化肥比秸秆沤的肥料有劲多了。
踏进监狱的大门，尊严已彻底沦落。
司机磨磨蹭蹭、走走停停。
而她几位朋友刚巧也到了。
建筑物越高，“烟囱效应”越明显。
图为统营的一处港口被淹没。
成为主捧影星之一。
大连港集团穆棱铁海联运项目启动。
塔里木油田青年员工奉献大漠。
昆州著名景区凯恩斯、汤斯维尔、马凯等都在受影响区域内。
二要稳步推进人民币跨境结算。
纪念品价钱较亲民。
刘亚受伤后主攻位置让谁去打，教练组颇有些挠头。
时任院长严文清现任湖北第二师院党委书记。
第二垄断血液骨髓。
结婚传闻被指属假。
人被蚂蚁叮咬后，往往引起红斑，使皮肤瘙痒。
发表不当言论的柳泽暂且渡过难关。
你别赶我走好吗？
多云有阵雨，雷暴有大风。
我随着五颜六色的人流穿游。
我需要远离水源哦！
看见王伟就问：你如何啊？
偶尔买一些资料或一双袜子，等存够了，会去买一套新衣裳。
札夸威也是库达玛夫妇婚姻的介绍人。
岑师傅一时难以判断。
模特儿出身转战演员的郭品超为活动亲自走秀。
尔后，便在被告席位置站定，表情平静，任凭闪光灯频频闪起。
威廉斯说，业务拓展至特殊造型棺材纯属偶然。
平均每篇论文的被引用次数是四点六。
梁伟军灰溜溜地回到饲养场，张爱国从猪圈后闪出来。
如果维持原价，月嫂都会跑走。
美女你辣么早啊。
崔秋莲也将自己女儿的相片送给波希瓦太太。
金灿荣认为并非如此。
镇里按照该预算和合同进行拨款。
初在陕北公学，后到鲁迅艺术文学院任研究员。
寒风凛冽候鸟悠然觅食。
农庄内冷冷清清。
洛佩兹再度当选“美臀天后”。
不过，更换轮胎尺寸也有隐患。
其他区域为养犬一般管理区。
因为无钱租房，杨元元与母亲一直同住一间寝室。
刘伟强原系湘乡市金薮乡乡长助理兼财政所所长。
一列动车正缓缓而行。
刚洗了黑漆又被喷上红漆。
可想而知，“瓮中捉鳖”显然比“亡羊补牢”更可靠、更有效。
赵本山大红唐装喜气洋洋，做掩面状耍宝。
闲暇时她喜欢玩玩微博或上网聊天。
凯尔生于得克萨斯州西部。
我也有问过一些前辈，好像黄日华就挺我。
一开始办案民警也捉摸不透。
悦悦妈几乎当场晕倒，随即被亲友扶走。
盘呈六瓣葵花式，浅腹，坦底。
元旦当天，张海燕又给王强打电话相约见面。
张二楞曾在部队当过文艺兵，现为深圳保安艺术团艺术总监。
由于漏斗状云柱内气压很低，产生强大的吮吸作用。
临床上骨髓穿刺及骨髓活检等检查用于确诊再障。
夏四月癸巳，刘备殂于永安宫。
帛书化为袅袅青烟，飘向九天重霄，告慰始祖先灵。
菲儿称杨然才能做主。
对于孤寡老人，安养院分文不收，衣食住行全由安养院承担。
帮我清下购物车呗。
在鲁尔河注入莱茵河处。
我应该用他的哪一个邮箱？
小芹把几千元给了王姐姐。
葛先生质疑此为霸王条款。
拥有酩悦公司、轩尼诗公司和路易威登公司。
普洱市中院至今未予立案。
社保卡则可以替代就诊卡，实现就医“一卡通”。
刘英家在河北省西柏坡。
又跑哪鬼混去了？你作业做完没？
花盆也一个不浪费。
这是贺星允的部分账本。
那晚点你再找我吧。
石油工人一声吼，地球也要抖三抖。
记者未能获允进入矿区。
再在“铆钉外”竖一排维护桩，基坑两壁形成铜墙铁壁。
这没有王法了，把娃真糟蹋。
这厮也忒笨了点。
他也一跃成为千万富翁。
求佛真的有用吗？
多趟高铁列车因此出现延误。
中国也把手伸向了月球。
肚子饿得咕噜咕噜叫。
早晚锻炼时不宜骤减衣物。
先请尹部长讲几句。
黄河入海到底要挑哪几根挡路的柴火开刀？
综上行为已构成挪用公款罪。
选手夫妇蹚泥塘。
医生怀疑软管遗落患者腹腔。
那里羚羊在肥美的草原上跳跃奔跑，鸟儿在林中啼唱。
二人亲密搂抱腻歪不够。
一直要潇洒的韩少很胸闷。
我咬紧牙关，半年近乎绝食。
另外，还有现金五万，美元一点五三一万。
大家都替杨慎捏了一把汗。
杨怡整理仪容后，更不时心虚抹嘴。
王英先有较高的文学修养和创作才能。
他有些看不惯哥哥的拧死理。
我可不能抢洗衣机的饭碗呢。
日担忧中国或空降突袭冲绳。
看完以后有一种被虐的愉快。
萝蕤从此孑然一身，精神分裂症更形加剧。
但是王君拧开卧室门闯了进来。
但是，华强郁郁寡欢。
印度素有嫁女儿陪送嫁妆的传统。
整场颠簸才算结束。
赵彦心里拼命凑个十字句。
而中国并非毫发无损。
又要看最新的样刊，看后在“我说许常德”下批该文甚多讹外，断不可发。
而外地务工环境究竟咋样，光看招工广告没用。
因相貌太差而被拒绝的求职遭遇屡见报端。
春雨点点，鬓已星星。
长江白鳍豚可能已经灭绝。
葛斌斌看来憋着不少怨气。
你把我绕晕啦…
你说玩啥就玩啥。
每次用一小滴洗手液即可。
仿古花船被停用检修。
香米煮熟后软滑爽口，米饭凉后米粒不发硬。
一向以环境恶劣、牢房逼仄百无聊赖著称。
患尿毒症的侯华锋脸色很差。
她的右肘有点破皮，称身上有点痛。
本报开辟“寻老礼儿、新年味儿”栏目。
谢谢陈光标的盛情，俺管家无功不受禄。
那么无异于以卵击石。
塑料凳也是东倒西歪的。
他思量着要给党某颜色看看。
我挥一挥衣袖，不带走任何一片云彩。
在该超市的促销海报上，“双汇肘花火腿”也赫然在列。
人群中，就有当年扔掉王坤友铺盖的那位村民。
然后要以事实为依据，不然越炒越厉害。
这恰有许多古老的松柏。
动手原因疑为家长等不耐烦。
二月底的拉萨，略透寒气。
在横店，一晃又快要三年。
世博轴膜结构工程。
没有露出酒窝，重笑一次。
事发望京南湖东园二百三十六号楼五单元附近路段。
周妍第二壶直接溜掉。
全党必须警醒起来。
而乔建军也有指控缠身。
具体时间以调度命令为准。
一七二七年改土归流，盐津归属乌蒙府大关厅。
由画家勾画草稿，征询意见。
只有勇往直前，昂首奋进。
今天的我也是元气满满呢！正能量用不完哦。
大冷天拎一大堆书太麻烦了。
与亲人感情越深，居丧反应越强烈。
我请他转过头来，揿动快门。
王长田最赞赏骆驼的性格。
用手抠了抠，没弄掉。
我会武术谁也挡不住呀。
驼鹿难寻伴侣，“爱上”驼鹿雕塑。
他要求要认真吸取教训，查找原因。
这是整治洋贿赂的一笨招，但肯定有用。
经商议，肖晓阳应允，将错就错与之签订补充协议。
这戳到本土半导体制造业成本结构痛处。
平时爽爽很开朗，而我很安静。
罗平的孙女因缺乏营养而患病。
日本一些餐馆同样看到商机，推销柳川锅、泥鳅锅等“泥鳅料理”。
梁样君看过，又夸徐天宏的字有人样。
凯特仔细端详泰迪熊。
绿色雨伞是吕姑娘的。
此时，翁秀春大声哭喊呼救。
骂吧，把我骂醒了。
掐呀，你今天不掐死我我跟你姓！
川南几市也拟纳入发展轴。
营养品是泡着喝的，一定要喝哦。
印尼队的桑托萨和拉扎克捧走男双冠军杯。
他也供称，“挑夫”莫卫奇并不知道行李包内夹藏有毒品。
考古队在墓葬中发现细嘴陶瓮等文物。
用冗余的配置保证错误恢复。
车辆可绕行长安街、两广路。
咱们何必只为咱一家的儿女牵肠挂肚？
调查组拧断铁丝后，在后面发现有铁门等。
硬扛下去资金链压力太大了。
跟姑娘聊这些有意思吗。
伙计们，出去要小心点哦。
从士大夫到引车卖浆者流，无不以睹此类书为乐。
有色板块继续逞强。
脚穿一双帆布鞋，鞋帮处缝了几个补丁。
这段“乒乓外交”一直被传为佳话。
罗森塔尔在峡谷中两度点火求救，终为救援人员发现。
而近两年，这股旋风越刮越猛。
按扣上镶有钻石。
这在政策允许范围。
你滴微笑最迷人了。
历朝相继在此兴建寺院，以供奉观音菩萨为主。
皇庭广场过去历史与“烂尾”关联在一起。
她靠拾荒拉扯孙女莹莹长大。
买不了知识为啥还收学费啊！
可以由大新的裁缝师傅为您量身定做。
爸爸沉默寡言，以酒为伴。
而菜贩则不动声色，随手掂起一捆芹菜看品相。
现在剧组演员可都会唱呢。
归元寺很好玩，是武汉佛教四大丛林之一呢。
玩完一轮，吴君如乖乖献唱“明星”，原来吴君如都唱得不错。
此役令普洱茶行业至今尚未复元。
国庆排队喝鹿血，是扯谎。
媳妇把破抹布一把甩在了我脸上。
言之凿凿，分明一场苦情戏。
这套丛书凝聚着编纂者和出版者的多年执著研究心血和夙愿。
老杨不给，两人又争吵并抓扯起来。
网友纷纷冷嘲热讽，质疑“程某婍”在炒作。
此外，就业困难人员还享有租赁商铺优惠。
如泉奔涌的原油日夜奔流，使欧盟成员国难以接受。
一块糌粑比一箱方便面还受欢迎。
张韶涵作势与比萨斜塔拥抱。
省委党校研究生学历。
化缘归来后，洒扫院落。
和卢秀栋一样开明的还有中国女排主帅俞觉敏。
去养猪、养鸡，干咱的老本行菜篮子。
可以按省份、食品种类查询。
在街头卖艺的李玉宣爹爹。
在与沂涛镇相邻的马厂镇，黄瑞华也怀揣着迫切的寻亲之梦。
他发现电游场所涉赌很普遍。
城中村“藏污纳垢”绝不是危言耸听。
一加一等于二。
东京樱花“染井吉野”初开。
王宝强军训的一个礼拜浑浑沌沌，烈日当头，滴雨未下。
有专家认为，应慎谈“拐点”。
感觉你好委屈呀。
盖昂重申“必须活捉”。
闫冰模样俊俏，是村里的美女。
随后，两男子踢瘪车门扬长而去。
托德曾经谴责这本书“充满了谎言、污蔑以及抹黑”。
海上就黑云滚滚，白浪滔滔了。
少数米粉厂家暂未跟风提价。
最北侧的展柜柜台外侧木板有被撬痕迹。
有学生趴在窗台吼叫、有人吹哨，深夜里特别剌耳。
回家和哥们儿坐一块拼拼酒量叙叙旧，来年接着干。
而雷诺兹失婚后也把布洛克当成避风港。
这样才让车轮子转起来。
主要有鲤鱼、银鲫、鲶鱼、草鱼、泥鳅等。
土暖气用来供热，也用来做饭。
受雾天影响，前方出现拥堵，他缓缓停下。
他讲课惹恼万载县县委书记陈晓平的事情曾红透网络。
而农民工却有了更多挑挑拣拣的余地。
卷起袖子，侃侃而谈。
幼儿园乱收费如何管，幼儿园的收费有多高？
舆论为何会力挺丘成桐先生的假说？
有网民认为，水质不达标，源于一种鸵鸟思维。
孝渊素颜眉毛较浅，五官不出色。
烟也戒了，酒业戒了，人生没啥乐趣了。
女性市民闻听以后连连摆手。
他的温柔具有迷惑性。
他彷徨徘徊过，但从未颓废绝望过。
在隋小姐眼中，西哈努克非常和蔼。
这要看球队的野心与意愿。
全胜笑道：光你挤出的汗也够我洗个淋浴！
孙旭光在为一户农家安装蚂蚱养殖场监控器。
油改气最火热时，有改装资质的各大维修厂都需要提前预约。
郭奎章接受南都专访。
舵手一边驾船一边拍照。
田中最近因被曝与黑社会有染等将引咎辞职。
奥普拉与妹妹团聚。
来来来，往我怀里晕。
母亲哭着求儿子不要扔，一边拿笤帚扫。
水池边有电泵和水管。
第二支曲子是“最炫民族风”。
目前医院已经为王静抽取了骨髓进行化验。
一店的避孕套额。
别吃哦！吃一口胖十斤。
原有投诉电话六幺八六零幺二二继续使用。
从断桥往白堤走，沿岸船主们正在用垃圾桶，簸箕等工具排水。
老朱眯着眼准备继续打盹。
我身高一米六五呀。
文化团体“文化人”是靠养活的。
大灯组棱角线条平直清晰，并与雾灯相呼应。
我喜欢玩英雄联盟哦，主人也玩吗？
外界就其坠楼原因揣测不断。
台湾“高等法院”台中分院今天判处两人无罪定案。
沿海地区则强风肆虐。
泽尻英龙华离婚无望。
公司甚至怂恿年轻顾客自拍衣服或内衣照，投稿以待采用。
一拽拉，是条大鱼。
我最近也是，昼夜颠倒了。
难受时，欧阳靖就咬咬牙撑着。
几乎听不到噪音，除了耳膜稍稍感到压力外。
其与妻子王江穗的离婚手续已于年内办妥。
目前，枪手林正伟开枪动机版本已有五种。
守城将士同仇敌忾，浴血奋战。
大风吹散了雾气，艳阳开始当空照，明晃晃刺人眼。
森本敏在会谈中仅表示“将认真对待决议”。
李坤鹏跟姥姥姥爷一起生活。
朱洙的反串扮相婀娜多姿。
由于学业等问题，宋某对严某产生怨恨，寻机报复。
在药房，温家宝询问维吾尔医药和中药的区别。
就像扁担一样，两头弯。
葛优现身中网与李娜合影。
风清舵正自远航。
不少二三线酒家也来凑热闹。
因为含有盐分呀。
在贵州素有北有仁怀茅台，南有都匀毛尖的美誉。
花儿散播芬芳，友谊传递温暖，让我们欢愉在洋溢希望的一年。
怎样把高大的植物浓缩于方寸之中？
曾出演电影作品“顶针”和“六月里好阳光”。
我没心急呀，我很有耐心呀。
徐敦信认为这是日方在故意歪曲，断章取义。
可惜先天基础薄弱，得先从番茄炒蛋和土豆丝练起。
四十四岁魏骏杰，有肚腩无事业，双重中年危机。
围绕他的传言纷纷扰扰。
苗圩困倚危楼，颤声说：有什么好拍的？
会出现这种抢台词背错台词的错误吗？
蔡少芬拍拖也不认啦！
段洣毅、颜晓宇、王光明、张志初、王群为车队授旗。
最近，一份材料反映了内蒙古一起“巨贪吃垮企业”案件。
瓦塔拉总统已下令“坚决”回应袭击者。
我发了“围脖”，要不要来转一下啊？
网帖及微博在网上热传。
一路风尘仆仆、一路款款深情。
否则，将与亚太地区人民的普遍愿望南辕北辙。
梁建红几赴京城替儿讨薪。
另外，傅颖前晚与一班朋友率先庆祝，打麻将耍乐。
老头将乐乐拖至沟底，然后再拽进一孔窑洞。
最普及的二甲苯麝香最便宜。
恶意骚扰使得大量急救资源被占用。
倾盆暴雨紧跟着冰雹而来。
赃物得手后，她竟将其塞入胸罩掩人耳目。
散打队员赛前训练。
刷票进闸后，就是安检口。
建昌宫山嘴水库泄洪，引来数百人下河捞鱼。
所以孔子才批评子贡。
王翚“唐人诗意图”写江南景色，自题作于庚寅，为康熙四十九年。
工友们围成一圈，愁眉苦脸。
明代甘旸在“印章集说”描述极为详细。
偶然的一次机会，她结识了职业“陪逛族”杨紫艺。
骂完脑子反应过来，眼睛一瞪，把椅子踹飞，骂：娘的熊嘴巴倒挺会要的。
见义勇为的崔师傅，抡车砸向飞车贼。
事隔三年，翠翠首度剖白个中始末。
老头儿似乎不应怕任何人。
火灾据说是由一根蜡烛引发。
余超觉得莫名其妙，问该男子为何拦车。
想赞美，有点词穷。
降价后的门票价以元为单位取整，四舍五入。
笨鸟只能先飞了。
所幸因抢救及时，妞妞脱离了生命危险，可丹某却毫无悔意。
筛选两只白鼠，喂养方法都一样，食量也一样，一只胖，一只瘦。
至于他那单薄身躯里时有小恙的心脏，更无暇多想了。
声明称这是“纯属凭空捏造的谣言”。
徐若瑄尴尬低头笑而不答。
晚上吃安眠药才能睡俩小时。
写后放在座位的右边，用以自警。
去医院检查，医生诊断杨飞因操劳成疾，患上胆管癌，晚期。
灾民们在救灾帐篷内安睡。
榨黄瓜汁啦。
官之刁腐者，一食或花费数万。
各大车企有喜有悲。
谢霆锋留着胡子显成熟，嘶吼引爆全场。
入园的孩子体检时发现谷丙转氨酶增高则暂不予入园。
所以，医改比小岗村还难。
最后，他们用一把鱼鳔枪结束了战斗，顺利捕获猎物凯旋而归。
记者当场戳破假洋肥的“皇帝新装”，遭到店主恶语驱逐。
北大、清华就曾为“状元数”舌战。
并坦言生日愿望是希望澳门生意好。
圆头灯、黑烟囱、大煤兜。
旅游保持高位运行，部分景点出现井喷。
佟研说，她腿部有血栓。
还要看欧债是否好转。
王忠成中秋月儿圆又圆，父母却远在天边。
以上合计总负债五十九点五八七亿元。
肥姐早逝，与父亲郑少秋又少有往来。
然后黄水东引，说这妙喻出自台湾董桥，是一贯的董桥风格。
会上，与会者畅所欲言，发言活跃。
抛开那些晦涩的技术术语，抛开东南亚金融危机。
挖沙是个诱人的行当。
二是妥当性原则。
面对这股勇猛的士气，师长牛七伟在感动之余格外镇静。
陈豪被取笑要感谢无线撮合良缘时合十说谢谢，十分搞笑。
每次醉酒后都要“耍酒疯”大闹一场，妻儿没少遭罪。
这一说法遭麦克雷文否认。
老师听后啪一耳光打我脸上净扯淡，这是我爹！
示威者将栅栏推倒。
你再顶一句，我把你的嘴撕成墩布。
而甘肃、吉林等省也发现了三聚氰胺超标奶粉。
老汉儿希望我找个朝九晚五的工作，平平稳稳。
九子河围栏修复。
藤本预计今后还会访问平壤。
其脊髓更罕有地被验到有恶菌，显示恶菌上脑。
鬼酒鬼这一比例只有百分之二十七点五，五粮液为百分之七十点五。
伊朗与阿拉伯联合酋长国都宣称对岛屿拥有主权。
科特迪瓦将于下月举行大选。
一男子肚子被咬两血洞。
怎忍他们当年迁移的故事也随之落土？
这正是该案横亘于法律与疗效之间的困惑。
原来，窝棚完全是伪装。
每天换各种花样吸引她。
战国策”也厄运难逃，有以其辟加妾之身的描写，也遭了禁。
鼓起的兴奋一下子消散在无垠夜空里。
西耶娜的爱情道路也很挣扎。
网友“好味道”说，反正也没事，申请一个摇着玩呗。
下车一看，右前轮轮胎有些瘪了。
北嘎，即藏族式摔跤，双方运动员须双手抓好对方腰带。
我爱周董，他也爱我，哈哈！
等黄阿婆挤完羊奶回到房内时，孙儿却不见了。
薛跃娥喜欢笑，喜欢“牙齿天天晒太阳”的感觉。
放下电话后，小卢越想越憋屈。
按我设想是规规矩矩拔完萝卜，地里也干干净净的。
孙航在法庭抹眼泪。
双方因为位置大小的事儿，就你一言我一语地争吵起来。
网友留言时称，书记未免也太过于“奔放”了吧？
他喊了一声，黑影蹿出房门消失得无影无踪。
双方刀棍乱舞，大动干戈。
不买房可尝尝台湾小吃。
黎明找吃撇下乐基儿。
我写书用的是笔名“元亨”。
唐宁挽着父亲臂弯进入教堂。
少林寺僧众列队欢迎，少林寺方丈释永信迎至山门前。
抬头遥望苍穹，心情阴暗得和天一样无际。
除遭性侵外，上述案件以侵财型犯罪为主。
蔚蓝海面惟余莽莽，海冰往海里延伸看不到头。
落款显示为“仙垟陈村党支部、村委会”，并盖有相应公章。
盲人瞎马，夜半临池。
经厂家测量，朋友家需要安装二点九九五米橱柜。
好多国外模特儿都好平胸，这样反而更有安全感。
胡锦涛首先瞻仰了遵义会议会址。
必须用正确的稳定观谋划政法工作。
两名相亲女差点就“羊入虎口”。
谈话间，传来鸭群嘎嘎的叫唤声。
站外边吃完再进来。
唐红兵要开始新的一圈了，李莉叮嘱“慢点哟”。
潘磊那个是吗凝固在空气里翘首以待回应。
该项目能模拟宇宙飞船升空和宇航员动态飞行。
美儿的肝脏恰好可以挽救他的生命。
他嘴巴里说着脏话，紧攥拳头朝我挥舞。
公公李世余赶紧躲闪。
我煲了竹荪老鸭汤，很香的。
值班的便衣治安员宋玉鹏和另外几名治安员也已赶到。
对于梅耶尔而言，巴雷特确实“物有所值”。
本可赚到的钱揣不进腰包，大伙干着急没办法。
如果赶上饭点儿，会送盒饭一份及五六种饮品。
虽有坐牢经历，但冷某月并无悔改之意。
牛炯正好让学生试写一篇小作文，周琦向他借本古汉语字典。
所以就撒撒网，权当消遣。
是不是上个月经常熬夜呀。
同年，普洱冷水林场采伐开工。
咋啦？坟让人刨了？
要不我们把预设方案上的敌情改一改？
台湾教育部门负责人蒋伟宁。
这些聋哑人只有乖乖就范。
有邻居称，王某好捡些破烂儿，两间屋子里都堆满了。
本焕老和尚虽已百岁有五，但身体硬朗，生活完全自理。
老将凯越，恐怕要将前三的宝位拱手让给同门兄弟科鲁兹。
荔浦现在面临二次创业潮，要从木衣架产业搞起。
烟草广告中必须标明“吸烟有害健康”。
第二要控制好速度与方向，不要猛拐弯，以免出现甩尾现象。
别人上山靠脚走，他却要翻着跟头上山去。
纵观各“脸谱”，唯有一声叹息。
拨打九五幺零五幺零五可电话订票。
我嫌麻烦，洗澡的时候我也穿拖鞋去啊？
以为父系都是堂呢，敢情还分男女哪！
加上潮流兴矮，矮会长命点。
床罩底座木棍较粗，用榫头卯眼接合成长方形木框。
每车司机有个附卡，每月用油都有记录，用完申领。
可以吃些坚果哦！
身体丰满，双脚短粗，趾间有蹼。
墨鱼和虾仁一样，惯用甲醛浸泡。
然而“好初衷”却遭遇市场“软抵抗”。
非要说是扮演贺龙的杜源呢？
傻人有傻福呢！
死者为大，一了百了吧。
马德保看文章极讲究修辞对偶，凡自己读得通顺的一律次品。
你可以去问鹦鹉啊，鹦鹉会说话。
拿人手软，吃人嘴短。
罗岑铁路将来的运营尚需要“摸着石头过河”。
核能的未来危如累卵。
第一种反应是拔腿就跑。
这时，有一位女子也表示要蹭车。
还用金漆盘装果品献客，口中则说“恭喜多如意”。
医院建议做骨髓移植手术。
以后我终于省得跑腿了。
前者可滚动开发，空手套白狼。
奥莱塔称之为“荒唐”。
远洋沁山水公租房项目样板间。
李登辉受访时否认“一中框架”。
朱玉斌的左手为轻微伤。
邓超还透露，当天恰逢儿满月，只想早点回家。
舅舅马上质问林明发。
银行已形成零钞存兑“肠梗阻”。
那将有上千度高温、火红滚烫的“火浆”满地流淌把你惊呆。
没有金刚钻，难揽瓷器活。
多才多艺的冯敏还主持文艺晚会，把欢乐带给战友。
后之览者，亦将有感于斯文。
亚洲所有国家都依赖石油进口。
开展“铁鹰”行动，围剿站车流窜犯罪。
出去跑一圈就好了。
可座船在洱海上畅游一番。
又称“偃月形馄饨”。
家中世代为农，生活困窘。
而栾伟超的父亲栾吉月为给女儿治病打算卖肾。
简宝珊曾参加过两届凯渥梦幻之星模特儿选拔，身材火辣。
这是塞尔比夺冠后手捧奖杯。
此外，还获“扭曲”、“斜跨”、“鸟腿”等称谓。
一觉醒来，“小胖”又耍起活宝。
高锰酸钾有毒，且有一定的腐蚀性。
大约一小时后，这一对儿又出现在影楼外堂。
学车让很多学车者有恐惧感。
一向爽朗率直的舒淇也怒斥陈浩民、马德钟二人为“老鼠屎”。
交易无需得到雅虎股东批准。
这名民警被碾压后，偷油贼才有所收敛。
同时内饰配色也多以镀铬亮条和木纹饰板点缀。
经查，陈跃亮已漂白身份，其以陈耀亮名义在外做生意。
难怪说淘宝养活了快递业。
游客在参与土匪抢亲项目。
双方或将就日俄领土争议问题等交换意见。
我媳妇儿天天跟我在家，每次我想抽烟都硬拉着我，啪啪啪。
门外巡查的焦头烂额，瞪眼说：又一个。
房子卖了您住哪儿呢？
汪洋参加韶关组的分组讨论。
让雷军颇感宽慰的是，拥趸对小米有着一种“宗教般的热情”。
亲绿的乐队已经开始暖场。
演唱会尾声，梁静茹洒泪用歌曲答谢观众。
蜘蛛把少量沙子拼合在一起，制成藏身的窝门。
连前一百冲进去的都没选到幺二二的毛坯。
那我想到那就多夸夸人家呗。
吴佩慈与赌场大亨吃饭。
别呀偶给你做人工呼吸吧。
前天，黄爱英也曾一度晕倒。
菲律宾艾滋病感染者猛增。
禁止使用小于最小网目尺寸的网具进行捕捞。
新河闸桥群中包括中闸、麻糍闸、北闸、下卢闸四个闸。
淼淼就读于科创路小学二年级。
此时，他的额头已经沁满汗珠，刘冬梅用毛巾细心地替他擦拭。
被害人小雨恰巧也租住在该栋楼上。
这是凤凰镇芒果村一角。
他认为，此次列车出轨与轨道多弯无关。
皇上万福金安。
随着英文名越来越火，帮人取英文名这一行当也成了香馍馍。
因家境贫寒，吴碧红很早辍学。
现任“舰船知识”网络版主编。
采摘山核桃的农民一个趔趄跌下去，头碰到石头就可能摔死。
小聪明也是聪明嘛。
其次，捏捏螃蟹的腿。
浪莎袜业头顶是商厦的二楼，铝合金扣板遭到破坏。
你要是看谁不爽就用飞机撞他啊！
哥们儿的情怀当然要靠哥们儿来演绎了。
睡的话趴我腿上。
眼病把孙婆婆折磨得够呛。
以下是问答摘录。
今年是五五普法的验收之年。
我会讲鬼故事，你怕不怕？
范睿严肃纠正道：是媲美。
龙卷风将工厂屋顶都卷走了。
谁又了解我心里的苦呢。
易学林绰号“易胆大”。
告别北川，黄昏中我们又登上了高山之巅的羌寨。
离开时，总会拎几袋样品回去。
蓝天白云下，绿树环绕间，这随风舞动的一抹红显得格外醒目。
月嫂帮我揉，我叫得和杀猪一样，碰一下就痛死人。
最后，她只好靠舞蹈员边打拍子，边“斋舞”。
有美丽的苏州园林呀。
他还将五名伤员送往四幺六医院救治。
有政客批评埃尔多安已沦为“傀儡”。
罗志祥昨日抵港全程黑脸。
我可以网上冲浪，咻咻咻！
这些桶有新有旧，上面也留着“王四”、“王三”等标记。
一日三餐、洗洗涮涮，还要给妈妈敷药换药，帮妈妈大小便。
同场还有柯佳嬿、陈庭妮。
当晚，见样貌稚嫩的小雅如约前来，华仔欣喜若狂。
锄草、翻土、浇水，李继旺甩开膀子干。
挪威男子巴雷克在断臂伤口上纹海豚头。
一些人甚至直接把“瑞芝清”称为“夺命退烧药”。
可悲的是，“玉婆”还没死，众多子孙已经为争家产蠢蠢欲动。
他是腾讯公司主要创办人之一呀。
周六上午各组织招生，他洗头刮脸，说要用“三十六计”外的一招美男计。
在家排行老四的贺慈红，打小就有股子认准水撒欢的倔脾气。
说订一年的宽带还送个猫。
西南旱区旱情近期难于缓解。
刚刚我短路啦。
这并不是康威市第一起“吮脚”性骚扰案件。
说完对自己的虚构夸大才华崇拜万分。
其他演员还包括松坂桃李、柄本佑和村传绘梨等新鲜面孔。
学生不解的问：“我哪儿也不疼啊。
匡斌将张禹接到东莞东城的“科尔沁”家。
经鉴定，熊某引产的胚胎与郭耀虎存在血缘关系。
愿我们像两颗星星一样，在安静的夜晚把彼此照亮。
我还帮她卖过馒头哩。
而这些驾驶员都非车主，全部由“专业闯岗司机”来完成。
王烨及另外两位张姓女子没有毕业成绩。
哥哥采盈盆，弟弟妹妹共欢欣。
因高竣亮无法返还本金及利息，造成苏叶女资金的巨额亏空。
民国时万庆当铺衰败关门，店铺前盖了小房遮住“万庆”二字。
如果有朋友找我就直接打给我。
在国外时，他喜欢搜集烟斗。
为什么足协认可李飞宇的做法？
请庹震常委回答一下这位网友的问题。
没争没抢，没闹别扭。
苗凡的父亲苗建科说，生意马马虎虎，但饿不着娃娃。
案件滚雪球般扩大。
缪某之子陆剑波回家见状，持刀将臧戳伤。
当时我俩起了分歧。
胖胖的孙卓很招人喜爱。
杜早前获撤控遣返内地。
临终前，大周后请求李煜将中主李璟所赐的烧槽琵琶陪葬。
清髓需要至少半年的服药，而微移植不需要服用任何药物。
白天喂奶喂饭，洗孩子衣物，偶尔打个盹儿。
陈年思忖着转型。
指南”一经发布迅速引来“呛声”一片。
羊一垮，他的人也垮了。
往那边点，你压我肉了！
听孔子，也要听一半。
检察机关一旦介入调查，往往能以案带案，一查查一窝。
他昨到日舞影展打片，变身金发妞，妖娇模样让人捧腹。
据了解，卷羽鹈鹕喜欢结群生活，有两个迁徙种群。
花园外墙采用通透的铁栏、矮门，与弄堂起到“共享”的作用。
莫欺少年穷，要有信心哦！
张某很恼火，就预谋杀妻并骗取高额保险金。
任命孙德基为审计署署长。
呜呜呜…不要把我一个人丢下！
库尔森目前因卷入窃听丑闻被警方拘捕。
不喝板蓝根，一个传染俩。
事实而言，官员阶层有如民众，有富有贫，参差多元是常态。
老婆，哥都有仨儿子了，咱们要加油呀！
蛙皮中含有抗菌力较强的活性多肽。
我大儿子小名就叫“憨憨”，谐音。
祥嫂与儿子邓兆尊、女儿邓小艾喝下午茶时聊得开心。
目前扁女婿赵建铭也曾到北监为扁治疗膝盖。
现在，微软的必应搜索引擎也将其机票搜索服务置顶显示。
牛作东比牛作涛小三岁，哥俩儿从小一块儿上学放学。
杨健掌舵南方报业，早有先兆。
单身狗我在家防止受到一万点伤害。
小规模农户要改善操作规程，避免疫病在散养禽群中传播。
那又何必在细节上纠缠呢？
看我穿裙子，他就说“哎唷，你穿裙子啊”。
张伟一愣，停顿了一会儿。
沁阳资源短缺，无煤无矿石，却能做到“买天下，卖天下”。
他们天生爱动，免不了打打闹闹。
孙某用布条将小兰捆绑塞到床下。
奶粉不但缺货，而且价格同样水涨船高。
葛优获颁漫画劲开心。
凭白无故生出噶许多事情来。
一护士为男患者送检尿样，却不小心把患者的尿样撒落一地。
在唐山二五五医院，帅帅在接受治疗。
尽早转变以往的粗放增长模式。
三更半夜不睡觉，喊什么喊！
港府新验出四款日本婴儿配方奶粉碘含量较低。
经确认，该可疑人员叫柳晓宝。
市委常委、组织部长陈元邦主持聘书颁发仪式。
男子坠桥被消防员一把拽住。
那生煎似有红外线制导，直冲女孩的脸颊。
该黑斑被罗斯教授称为“罪恶的渊薮”。
我爸在家特别多疑，他每次都怀疑我偷偷抽他的烟。
为什么要发怒呢？
纪教授当日略受风寒，嗓音沙哑仍激情不减。
经院方证实，女婴身患胆管闭锁。
傅琰东几次通过媒体澄清虐鱼事件。
一名抗议者往随行车队泼漆。
有知情者联系幺三五九九三幺五五五八。
违法所得赃款一百六十三点六七四四万元予以追缴。
连罗文嘉也替罗永成喊冤，质疑为何不找用钱的、只找听命行事的人？
从一开始我们就在瞎扑腾。
成昆在与病魔搏斗以前，先要经历与药的搏斗。
虽说夏天又闷蚊子又多，但勉强能过。
此观点被“修改稿”采纳。
省委书记吉炳轩深入绥化、佳木斯、农垦等市局检查春播生产。
飞行员跳伞，并安全降落。
其中，而“朴勋”就是金正恩。
有人动手拉扯陈科宇，他将黑色皮包死死抓在手中。
而成某则拿砍刀对其猛砍。
志伟扭头一看，一刹那汗毛都直了。
可能是有人没安好心，想害我们董文华呗！
吸入铟产生的职业病原本很少见。
我想把草帽寄给遥远的大森林。
今有城管队，卧底体民情。
渔民眼中的这条怪鱼，全身棕色带黑条纹。
卢女士不满工作人员隐瞒“水灵”死亡一事。
黄阿姨最近感冒很严重，每天要吃好几种胶囊药。
这家帐篷餐馆已经颇有名气。
李敖昨日上“解码陈文茜”节目。
执法队员杨林川看到，这辆沃尔沃高速从坡顶驶到坡底。
省档案馆新馆正在装修扫尾施工。
就算有更多女特工，男特工们照样会行差踏错干肮脏事的。
宁波应该营造怎样的环境来引进和培养人才？
记者出门后询问周边邻居，但一听到问“阚疃台”就远远躲开。
基于陈某平日横行霸道，蛮横无理，一直忍气吞声，敢怒不敢言。
考生常曲解文言文，又粗心大意，混淆事件情节。
你夸我时我感觉自己的脸热热的。
我又不是女的，龙王爷要我干嘛啊？
江水不算清澈，偶尔会有几株水葫芦顺江漂流而下。
为了拖延时间，还特意做了一小盆瓜片汤。
随后，他继续将卡给武建彬销售。
在乘坐缆车时，他需要把滑雪板放在一旁，并解开后滑雪靴。
其赶紧闪躲，男子又朝其左侧腰扎了一刀。
部分临时帐篷已被撤走。
罗克努也劝她下注大一点。
摩根大通也为穆迪赠予百盛的“红旗”逐一辩护。
至于犬马，皆能有养。
你比吴亦凡帅。
男友是徐婷唯一的帮手。
上午，湍急的水流将堰塞体冲开，从左岸下泄。
但许晋亨仍满足于现状。
要完善水运发展的产业和财税政策。
但随后惠誉就此辟谣。
在等主人约会回来跟我讲一讲。
军政一体，守土有责。
报刊刊载一些短小精悍、见解独到的有关网络方方面面的言论。
泰勒晚年热心于慈善事业。
中国球迷盼望着扬眉吐气的那一天。
要不要给你放首催眠曲？
投胎是一门学问啊。
爷爷一生务农，又会木匠手艺，种田是一把好手。
山无棱，天地合，才敢与君绝。
早喊你避一下嘛，活该！
这种事凑合不得，宁缺勿滥。
上述要求已为此次会议埋下“伏笔”。
问我是哪儿的，来干什么？
所至琉球大洋，应即琉球海沟，今称冲绳海槽。
诸葛辉将辞去在盛大集团的原有职务。
外语作为必修课和选修课，有严格的要求。
车尾整个凹陷，缩进后排位置。
他回家后任凭牛萍咋问也不做解释。
他们大多来自威海市环翠区张村镇、徐疃村。
学子拜孔子祈福。
隐约看到，涂改前为“二零一一”。
这些药店用暗箱操作的方式，给违规用卡留下了空间。
我曾经养过喲。
两国代表互赠礼物。
该举措促进了闽澳台三地旅游业的合作。
沿河两岸为望江、怀宁两县重要粮食产区之一。
当日，五环内正式开售兔年烟花。
真有公义可言吗？
至此，“取款喽啰”悉数落网。
郭树清有“外秀内刚，豪爽博学”的美誉。
而米粉店暂时按兵不动，涨价与否仍处于观望中。
吃梨可以滋润喉咙，促进食欲呢。
网上赞叹声汹涌澎湃，还有不少网友趁机挖苦一下姜昆。
我们不想当亡国奴。
文章分析，官员热衷于应景活动，有其微妙阴暗的心理动因。
塔基将在南非安全级别最高的夸祖鲁纳塔尔省监狱服刑。
同时关闭一些累赘业务。
林同学则眼疾手快，迅速将强吻男拽开。
反身将蛇拎起，悬空抖动。
欧洲央行行长特里谢则称，三大信用评级机构是“寡头垄断”。
本地房企也已“染指”。
我们希望达尔富尔地区的局势不要因为有关方的举动而复杂化。
高再次踹门试图闯入未果。
她说挂号在室外，屋里暖和不让进。
年末固定电话用户两万八千五百一十二万户。
阅览室里有三百余册的盲文书籍。
你要再说我娘娘腔，小心老娘我跟你翻脸！
后因年久失修，裕陵的祾恩门、祾恩殿等建筑又先后毁坏。
把我这个愿望告诉总编。
只有你才有资格做我的上司呀。
邓明建寡言少语。
周边包裹着类似海绵颜色的物体，用指甲轻轻一抠就能抠掉。
由于牙刷太长，卡在了幽门口。
记者亲眼见到一只老鼠蹿过地面。
姑娘们，擦亮眼睛吧。
但我也知道中国政府不是铁板一块。
侧田再三强调不爱逛夜店。
太悦耳动听了，我真想拥抱你。
母亲为其择婿，并以死逼婚，姑娘只好同意。
有牛肉自然香味，易溶于水，水溶液呈淡黄色。
一党为主或两党的国家更易遭受军事干扰。
以此“功勋”博取院士之名，更是荒谬。
三要坚持党委统揽的原则。
年根儿坚持出摊也不容易，价钱涨点儿也在理。
国土局长缘何敢批法院查封的土地？
井陉鳖盖垴古墓。
郑嘉颖近水楼台，颖儿也乐于束手就擒。
但我始终微笑不肯表态。
昔我华族，胄祀绵长。
我跑去家乐福逛了逛。
结果凯歌导演笑着说“甭客气”。
罕见的泰坦尼克号邮戳。
他大吃一惊，想原来梁粹君的交际面不仅跨地域而且入地狱。
确实是我鲁莽了，冤枉了他。
我都会说儿化音了，“这儿呢”、“明儿见”，还不错吧。
你敢戏我爱姬吗？
阿姨有只两岁的男狗狗，叫旺旺。
尹春林见状，赶紧抱起团团，边擦眼泪边哄。
要带小可爱到正规医院注射疫苗哦，一般成年犬一次即可。
不得不说因为耳朵大我也被起过绰号。
四百块钱，不花这四百，你永远挂不上号。
她称正在准备讲演稿，并向网友们征求建议。
我们无法靠得很拢以弥合差距。
扶持俺在市场上赚了大钱的衙门，俺怎么不拥护呢？
已故车臣战地指挥官格拉耶夫。
现在能甩一台是一台。
部分奶粉企业毛利率。
一贯优雅的英国人，常为此骂骂咧咧，怨言不断。
林熙蕾生女后体态比怀孕前还苗条纤细。
敢呀你信吗？
程俊扒开被褥，里面是厚厚一叠草稿纸。
厂家现场用电饭煲煮起了香喷喷的米饭。
有人形容遭扫射的渔船“惨不忍睹”“满目疮痍”，有如蜂窝般。
对于当前需要着重研究的课题，伍绍祖也作了详尽阐述。
陆博飞转会大局已定，国安到嘴的鸭子又飞了。
楼道内冒出滚滚浓烟。
江志铭转述，扁引用“坛经”“毁誉不动、哀乐不生”，代表目前心境。
即使对方有大肚腩或其貌不扬也不介意，因外形可以改。
砖房也是全家集体凑钱修的。
你少骂我一点儿就行了。
在演讲中，她宣读了拉姆斯菲尔德的六宗罪。
一桌人显然和白胖高是挚友，甘为祖国的花朵而失声。
悠悠爱恨之间，我的心永远不变，纵使沧海桑田，追逐你到天边。
林峥与银行杠上了。
再度引发外界揣测。
包括货物延期、丢失和损毁等。
尝一下，腻腻的直想往外涌。
钟强迫自己进入“生存模式”，喝尿维持生存。
偶尔能看到几块油菜地。
指纹证据无瑕疵。
这是百子湾边上的商业街。
即便选择离开，黎洋依然身为一嗨股东。
柳祖祠东南角有一侧门，通往刘老根会馆主楼，方便厨房上菜。
徐帆在心里憋着劲，累积口碑与演技。
土豆闭紧双眼许愿，爸爸问许了什么愿，土豆说：许的愿是马上吃蛋糕！
李艳张罗起了一家幼儿园。
熟识白家的大湳里里长郑桂林闻讯后，一早赶往白家关心。
目前，小凯已交纳了扫雪费。
一起去寻找诗与田野吗？
而私有化则可以甩掉这些麻烦。
林南翔忙去送温暖，说：你冷不冷，披我的衣服吧。
惹急了一人一把刀一个龟壳，刻甲骨文。
他先是用言语挑逗，后来又利益诱惑，希望跟小丽玩玩。
王大伯顿时傻了眼。
家住普陀曹阳社区的上海游客张根囡成了“幸运儿”。
它既有体育竞赛，又包括戏剧、音乐等在内的文艺活动。
黄宗洛自幼胆小，怕见生人。
我看着雨珠在它的叶面上滚来滚去。
泱泱大国居然找不到十一个能踢球的。
对于往事，刘允并不在意。
朱好龙摸了摸水牛，水牛乖乖睡了下来。
对于各地政府机构、官员扎堆儿开微博，被质疑为“官微大跃进”。
并声称谁过来砍死谁。
后经导游指认港警已将其收监。
四哥认为一子一女已经足够，于是甘愿结扎不再留种。
俺们的葛书记真是块好钢！
宠物殡葬业在德国日渐兴起。
仔细考究一下，懦弱的士兵为什么要充好汉呢？
洪山村主要靠养跳跳鱼，滩涂养殖地被淹后，跳跳鱼被冲走。
鼓手的鼓点节奏拿捏得也很准。
仔仔很怕小小彬偷袭重要部位，不过小小彬还是得逞了。
这伙人逞凶后准备散去。
另一位伤者胡佛球的运气比黄师傅稍许好一些。
如有其他疑问，请电话咨询幺幺八幺幺四。
他们分别获得奥斯卡影帝和影后提名。
遭射杀身亡渔民洪石成的长女洪慈綪。
亨德森逐渐对丈夫心生不满。
郭敬明也曾赞自己的脸很占便宜。
要巩固基本药物制度。
我是说你要蓝颜干嘛呀。
大多有九五左右的优惠。
朝鲜演员唱腔圆润，词句朗朗上口。
每次给我妈死托活拽的拉进女澡堂洗澡。
丈夫尕娃身材高，用身子顶着往上爬，他爬出来了。
上海空港为此取消航班二百七十五架次。
五彩湾又名五彩山，位于准噶尔盆地东部。
通过安检后，她还咧嘴一笑，对警卫员说“谢谢啦”。
曾经的桌游吧人头攒动。
现场紧邻三二幺国道线。
屯昌县女画工在临摹商业画。
时间一分一秒流逝。
我会学小猫叫哦，喵！
野生动物有自然死亡率。
丰华公司到树音乐追讨欠款，还闹出了“踹坏大门”的暴力事件。
李煜登位后，对她恩宠有加，册封她为皇后。
只不过这个环节卡在了旭日阳刚一方。
会场内鲜花竞艳，灯火璀璨。
她纵览这篇文章好几遍，说整本书就儿子的文章最好。
卡普兰担心会产生泄密问题。
到了晚上，南山上也飘起鹅毛大雪。
醒己及与同行共勉。
早一晚我已知道他们会这样写我，我只有无奈。
彖传”为“易”中的一部分，是解释六十四卦卦辞的。
拍卖获胜者能够与巴菲特共进午餐。
是一放羊的老大爷，穿一黑色棉服蹲在山坡上！
法塔尔计划改行投身政坛。
法国画家伯努瓦绘制的原版女性画像。
玛依努尔说，宫颈癌是迄今唯一研究出病因的癌症。
你不帮我谁帮我呀？
雨雪到来前，雾霾、低温似乎在酝酿造势。
刘阿伯到庭后态度比较专横，不听劝解。
我想提醒有专车的官员，你有隐私千万别用公车了。
昨日，回龙观龙泽苑西区，工人对树木喷药。
听听他的自我解剖。
村民找来长竿往粪坑里拍打，同时，在粪坑口放置一个篓筐。
招标人不得挪用投标保证金。
乐基儿爆黎明甚少应酬。
晒干沙丁鱼可喂骆驼和马，是牛羊的好饲料。
栓在身上，两个眼都扣死。
广州资深摄影玩家沈龙也是柯达的拥趸。
院子南墙上可见一处熏黑的烟囱。
记者探访太阳能热水器作坊。
后三位皇帝嵬名遵顼、嵬名德旺和末帝睍没来得及修陵。
如果您是一个集邮爱好者，也许会对英国邮票有一点儿印象。
服务员上了盘菜，我随口问道：“辣吗？
大海深处，早已铆足了劲儿的钻头终于钻入了地层之中。
上夜班要注意安全哦。
稳中求进的稳，第二个稳表现在稳健的财务策略。
按摩睾丸时，力量一定要轻柔。
图为付志强戒网瘾攒下的钱。
被拐缅甸妇女凯凯学写汉字。
黑棉线粗糙无弹性，揉搓后会大量脱落纤维，易断。
超新星爆发形成美丽“星胆”酷似珍珠项链。
听妈妈说：一天一苹果，医生远离我。
许三多又委屈又自卑，油然而生一种看名人录的感觉。
曾以笔名“方蕤”出版“我的先生王蒙”等作品。
公事繁忙的四太日前难得抽空陪孻女何超欣买课外书。
经诊断，莎莎左肘关节脱位、左肱骨内伤踝骨折，左肘神经损伤。
工人对绿化带喷洒药水。
春节“驴行”也受欢迎。
犬主必须要到银行缴纳费用。
图为澳门红十字会向彝良捐赠的两辆救护车。
但互联网车轮轰然而来，摧枯拉朽。
此时的忏悔于事无补。
钱校长又缓缓报一个，把他的另外半边天也拆了。
在幺零七国道和北外环交叉口，堵车比较严重。
四是自我矮化问题突出。
显然，二手车业务和租赁业务是密切相关的。
根据一九五一年的旧金山和约，独岛重回朝鲜怀抱。
这家店里的云吞面和牛筋河粉味道很棒。
注意不要让宝宝边吃边玩。
美国武装部队参谋学院，是美国国防大学所属学院之一。
晚安，愿岁月静好。
清雍正十二年重修，名拈花寺。
深圳园岭小学外，来接孩子的家长密密匝匝。
鲁迅与母亲住前院，周作人及其“苦雨斋”在后院。
某大学寝室楼下几家烧烤油烟熏人。
分散司机注意力哇。
拉夫桑贾尼强调伊朗赞成并支持阿富汗的独立。
饲养犬龄满三个月的犬只，养犬人应当办理养犬登记。
其间，冉某违反取保候审规定潜逃外地。
奥地利总统菲舍尔和夫人陪同参观。
蜱虫也叫壁虱，俗称草扒子、狗鳖、草别子、牛虱等。
你没看见咱这紧挨着杠房吗。
落后两局的李晓霞越战越勇，福原爱反倒变蔫了。
这么简单的问题也要问我嘛？是二哟。
我觉得总说“在呢”很俗气…。
公安未央分局阿房宫派出所已控制相关责任人。
如果“顶包”确有其事，张礼礤无疑将是“最牛替身”。
与此同时，全国商品房销售也一举扭转低迷局面。
财源像猛虎奔腾，祝福像彩灯串串。
零售业、酒店及饮食业的营业额也持续向好。
凡间只剩陈赫一个——社长谦虚道：我写不好。
此外，他还引用丘吉尔的名言说“吵吵总比打打好”。
失之毫厘，谬以千里。
您可不要上当受骗呀！
拧开直饮水水龙头可以直接饮用，价格明显低于桶装水。
随后，其在未开药方的情况下，给王能簪用药。
张雯是个典型的上海嗲囡囡，脾气温和，懂生活，爱发嗲。
阿胶和明胶原料、生产工艺、质控标准有显著差别。
深度为一百一十二千米。
言语之间孙兴也在极力为女友撇清。
他最早将基因一词带入中文，被誉为中国的摩尔根。
卧榻之侧，岂容他人鼾睡。
位于汶川县城的威州中学背后，也是一座光秃秃的泥巴山。
那些悬搁山腰上摇摇欲坠的巨石，更让人触目惊心。
袁莉代言红十字会惹争议。
王学元脑袋里顿时一片空白。
而在长短的把握上，邹唯不是刻意追求完美者。
桑康也在坤沙部队服过役，后来投奔糯康。
父子俩赶赴广州，辗转奔走。
左手和右手有必要协作。
黯牛笛、参差归路。
太湖太浦闸开闸排水。
嫩模出写真也成风尚。
经窑火烧成，用切割机从中剖成两半，才真正完工。
据知，两张罗慧娟的遗照，是廖安丽前夫叶青霖为罗慧娟拍摄。
京城银行房贷政策再刮“紧”风。
奶奶就“赏赐”给莫言和姐姐每人一小片红薯干。
王菲晒与赵薇、林丹的合照。
港股昨天因重阳节休市。
她嗓门大，爱唱歌。
原名丁恺起，天津人。
庄燕劝覃田戒毒，而覃田不但不戒毒，还怂恿庄燕也一起吸毒。
过期套套，小心断裂。
奶奶发现，孙女有些异常。
原本杨树鹏想让我演张译那个角色，但我自己提出想演匪首。
其他政协委员夸奖我说得好。
具有浓郁民族色彩的丝布墙面烘托出亲切、热烈而传统的氛围。
张花冠与陈明文，早已成为一条绳上的蚂蚱，同生亦同死。
消息之震撼令人咂舌，为此“天下公司”向敦煌网求证。
一曲黄梅戏唱罢，趁着曹爹爹换伴奏碟的间隙，记者与其攀谈。
一是发展农业生产，夯实稳价基础。
长子罗北屯系部队屯兵陕北的时候所生，所以取名“北屯”。
这个筋斗翻得利落而优美。
只有我的眉毛及牙齿有使用特殊的造型填充物。
王栾周涉嫌犯罪已移送司法机关处理。
从排水孔探出脑袋的猫头鹰。
现在揭弊的线索条条指向扁府，指向吴淑珍。
金妍儿的复出之战也随之延迟。
南伞口岸还一度出现“堵塞”状况。
下一次变革的号角已经吹响。
至今母女俩也不说钱去哪了，侦查机关无法追回。
日本早些时候召回驻韩大使武藤正敏以示抗议。
绣球上绣着喜鹊、梅花等图案，显得吉祥而喜气。
回家向老婆要钱交罚款。
曾经朝一个坐在轮椅中的女人吹过口哨吗？
取消北新桥路口北、国子监、雍和宫及北小街豁口双向站。
企业利润增长压力较大。
兴安盟气象台监测，最大降雪量达八十六毫米。
随后，聂道喜推开窗户跳下楼逃生。
浏览网页，听听歌。
女生坠亡在栏杆外的地上。
刘兴海咬咬牙，拿出全部积蓄，东挪西借凑足了。
图为银行卡被刷的清单。
夜幕清朗，凝望北方的天空，映入眼帘的是七颗璀璨齐整的星。
而村民们认为发病原因与地下水受到污染有关。
残羹与冷炙，处处潜着悲辛的滋味。
这暗示着他也许参过军，没准儿还是个伞兵。
法院调查表明，被砍死的医生并未接诊过凶手。
至此人赃俱获，赌博窝点暴露无遗。
不对利益动刀子，改革无异于“隔鞋挠痒”、“蜻蜓点水”。
后来只得由发改委出面。
获得“飞来横财”更非乐事。
青年演员杨明娜扮演暖暖，刘小峰饰演暖暖的爱人。
无论前途晦明，万达依旧敢闯敢试自信如故。
夏季是筹款淡季，原因是不少捐款者往往在度假。
山峦还有点飘忽，移动的景象。
甘迪勒没有说明这些示威者由哪方收买。
旧时的圈子有行规帮矩，现在的圈子也有约定俗成，游戏规则。
郑文灿说，“主席另有行程”。
鸭肉的市价要比羊肉的市价便宜很多。
喝罢驴肉汤，马双羊躺在桥下的铺盖上蒙头就睡。
老婆脾气暴躁，特别爱管我。
咽得下责骂，扛得住压榨。
过一会儿，两者同时病发，他懊恼得愁绪纠结心慌意乱。
在发髻处，一根疑似银质的发簪插在头发当中。
而晚间会转吹清劲东风。
症状对抗哮喘治疗有反应。
政治局会议也命令减少官员排场和官僚作风。
此后王仔英经常跑到阿炳家，怂恿他们投资。
同时，矿山应急救援的纵向体系也日趋完善。
驴屎蛋认为“绿房子”工程在源头上同时完成分类投放与收集。
事发后，绑匪普里克洛皮尔卧轨自杀。
同样作为二战轴心国成员的日本呢？
宋维栻的父亲宋仲翱、姐姐宋桂纷都是中共党员。
耿谆用刺刀割开裤腿，并让传令兵赶紧拿来一条裤子换上。
由此引发了轰动一时的“中俄列车大劫案”。
天气转好利于春运交通。
未来，别墅、叠拼类住宅产品将更为稀少。
这样一来，供应商必然不会铤而走险。
救火车则向人群洒水降温。
生存与发展孰轻孰重，答案自在人心。
维珍妮是一家大型港资内衣制造企业。
林晓答应了冉龙梅的恳请。
我们嘎查推行村务公开，从我当嘎查长时就定下这个规矩了。
干亲家这么“牢靠”，王金明便放心地在腐败路上越走越远。
此幅“长征”中，景物横向展现，重山叠积，参差错落，雄奇壮丽。
重宝版别几百种，面背记号多，有花穿、决文、面星、背星月纹等。
李奕彪遂举手，并获准离开。
由于被告的受虐情节严重，法官或依此从轻发落。
要修好水泵，有心无力。
谁没感受过佩带红领巾的光荣？
活动由黄龙云主持，汪洋发表了热情洋溢的讲话。
朱凤珍推荐她妹妹到新美公司做税务代理。
他说，这些洋玩意很多弟兄吃不惯。
怪不得咱俩总吵架，你老提这种无理又苛刻的要求！
中央台记者跟随云南武警某部战士徒步进入簸迤村。
爸喝多了问：玉玉啊，有没有人追你啊？
一些天然石峰被冠以“风动石”、“乌纱帽”、“大洞天”和“菩萨洞”等美名。
今天咱们要征服哪座山？
友人说，他婚姻不睦，琵琶安慰他，趁虚而入。
阮永俭们的兴奋没持续多久。
最终，冯永利没“拗”过女儿。
禁烟标识在网吧成了摆设。
处于冷与热的两极，张博斐乐在其中。
少女闻言非常惊慌，其后因疲惫而睡在乒乓球桌上。
必须爱爱你胜过林志玲。
这照相要等首长，在那儿站着。
高圆圆看质问未果，随即甩手离开。
粘苍蝇的纸放一天会粘满苍蝇，二货朋友说为什么都那么傻，没看到同伴都死了吗？
算坏笑也喜欢。
洗车行里，吴发兵正攥着高压水枪洗车。
王海剑买枪失败后，杨某又在网上怂恿王海剑制造炸药。
杭州的房地产也同样热闹。
女主角名叫丹妮尔，两人从高中时便开始相爱。
五六六路和五六四路也改走短途，在武泰闸调头。
全国花样滑冰女单冠军刘艳是今天的第一棒火炬手。
零三年刘玉权血癌离世，宝珠也有出席丧礼。
捧在手里，烂叶直往下掉。
现场已被封锁，由武警等把守。
后面的人催：喂，买呀，呆掉啦！
所以我们不用整天往地里跑，有时间帮儿子张罗喜酒的事情。
现在我腿还哆嗦呢。
我随即问：这算是童养媳么…
我们的世界没有雾霾和阴天，永远天蓝草绿、阳光温暖。
我现在长发飘飘，还未及腰…
流行性腮腺炎是由流行性腮腺炎病毒引起的急性传染病。
因为程序猿爸爸还没有教我呀。
她是全国青联委员吶，是模范呀。
简称为“七九幺八网”，总规模约八点五万公里。
某男膀大腰圆乃方园十里公认的壮汉，在家里却毫无地位。
那耍小性子可以嘛？
这种僵持无疑让面粉厂最为“左右为难”。
面朝黄土背朝天的辛酸，他早有感悟。
一旁的姐姐翟芬说，最初以为是传销者撒谎想骗她们去。
另外一名队员肘部被刀刮伤。
税法”规定，房屋赠与需交契税。
外逃期间，曾给丰都县都督镇一个姓张的木匠当过干儿子。
特警手持撬棍，打开房门。
今晚到明天陕北多云间晴，关中、陕南阴转多云。
徐匡迪主持闭幕大会。
家里的主要经济来源靠爸爸养牲口、种地、砍柴烧炭。
如果想用这个影响我，别扯了。
我们倍感耻辱，但也无能为力。
聊天止于呵呵啊，兄弟。
这些帐篷是谁运来的？
本次地震属浅源性强震，目前伤亡不详。
营盘路湘江隧道四条匝道总长二点六五九公里。
我们就说尕尕，一方一说。
当然也有人认为，歌曲有低俗之嫌。
为堵窟窿，他又打起钻其他银行信贷漏洞的空子。
此外，这头大象的眼睛还因一个男孩用棍棒猛戳而受重伤。
董洁闪亮“星星裙”尽显贵气，被粉丝围拍。
本报讯：杜绝二手房交易“阴阳合同”，这回要动真格儿的了。
只要有错能改就是好样的！
伴娘礼服与某著名品牌招牌礼服裙非常相似。
二月丁卯，葬高陵。
嗯，八卦新闻总是很多。
星星听了，向我眨眼。
他用出吃奶的力气想，但想这个东西是加二十分蛮力也无济于事的。
军方也有不少内讧。
坐地铁刚下，一只警犬汪汪叫着冲我扑过来，紧紧咬住我的包。
我国的冰雪运动起步晚、水准低。
从履历表看，董永安的晋升之路顺畅。
拥趸们的一味追捧，使他更加忘乎所以，越发骄横了。
晋陕蒙宁黑三角、湘黔渝锰三角等地的环境质量得到改善。
大楚网以及新恩施论坛上，对此建议的评论不断。
每天连轴转似的，比大人还累。
这个月要养活自己有点难。
产业转移是不是把污染也转移了？
任连军问张艳辉是否有反映材料，张艳辉说没有。
如今，胚胎干细胞研究取得了突破性进展。
抓发展有政绩，抓改革却容易得罪人，何苦来呢。
本工程宏观走向与中缅管道一致。
比如，新娘因嫁妆不足而被婆家人打死、烧死。
李中朵给公公喂饭。
拱北隧道完全处于珠海的繁华城区，紧靠澳门。
陪审团仅仅确认了凯西有向调查人员撒谎等四项轻罪。
需不需要我赚钱养你呀？
日前，利辛县望疃镇农民在浇灌麦田。
而结果与我们的看法一致。
一审宣判后，尚友沁提出上诉。
这也给茂陵、永陵等未开放的帝王陵寝增添了更多神秘色彩。
两人一左一右，很是亲密。
去海边走走，吹吹海风。
只要狗一叫，耿素林就得起来瞅瞅，看是不是来了外人。
如意的外婆说，她馋得慌的时候，就用舌头在食物上舔两下。
俄罗斯官员相信，波捷耶夫现藏匿在美国某处。
宽敞明亮的游泳馆内景。
阴雨天为了不烂茄子还得多打药，打一遍至少得百十块钱。
有村民称，张小伟很孝顺，出狱后与母亲一起居住。
据了解，海狗也称海熊、腽肭兽。
只能咬咬牙坚持。
我有，我有这怂样。
好巧，偶也失眠。
这不因为工伤吗？上班忙胡乱吃早饭，加班熬夜，久坐不运动……
谷某摇摇晃晃倒地。
据阜阳新闻网报道，借钱时花言巧语，赖债时花招用尽。
阿汤嫂休闲打扮独自购物。
春风又得意，掌中握乾坤，豁出我一个，造福一群人。
傻逼说：操泥马的，你到是给老子破破啊！
雨翔的床位在二号寝室靠门那铺。
王玉珊不过是伊克昭盟治沙功臣中的一名。
据他描述，当时浑身瘫软，哆哆嗦嗦，害怕甚至压过愤怒。
寔维奉宣，殚厥心力。
销量吃紧敢于摁下连涨三年的势头，苏宁自有所依。
曹小姐发现，这款连裤袜与平常的丝袜相比较硬，很难穿进。
救援人员将昏迷的驴友运送下山。
经常挑扁担的人，锁骨位置会有明显的磨损。
第二桌的议题是读“红楼梦”的认识与感想。
由于遭遇乱流，飞机发生较大颠簸，冯玉感觉下身一阵凉意。
指挥员迅速联系挖掘机搬移过火棉花包。
然而，再凶恶狡猾的豺狼，也逃脱不了猎人枪口。
力塔洪回到英吉沙后，宁波的馕饼摊由弟弟托合提接管。
只要不讲假话、不造伪史，就是秉笔。
辻元清美反对自卫队在海外使用武器。
嗯说可是肿么说。
哦，好像是戴望舒或柳亚子写的，写得怎么样？
被害人内脏、皮肉等丢弃在黄务姜家疃附近的河沟里。
围堰进水，将影响已是掐着分秒计算的工期。
金松群的作品“鱼、静瓶、琵琶”。
吃生泥鳅、固元膏，每天穴位注射复方当归注射液。
我抡着铁锤向车窗砸去，砸烂一个再砸下一个。
张母虽没有揽女跳楼，但反锁大门与警对峙。
众所周知，河豚鱼味道鲜美，但含有剧毒。
他坦言自己有跟对方学变戒指。
警长崔索尔告诉当地媒体，此鞋的尺寸是男鞋十号。
她以为孩子饿了，就冲奶粉给他喝，小东喝完后仍然哭闹。
在这里，溢彩流光，璀璨无比。
更合士兵口味的是，营舍以后可以挂美女图片。
盛典置业负责人华文祥则承认存在团购行为。
她从那捆烤肠中抽了其中一根来吃。
桂圆八宝粥不错呀。
也会有甜的时候呀。
当然帅啦，在我心中你又帅又酷。
这几天天气凉快不开空调了，蚊子都从蚊帐缝里往里面钻。
众网友纷纷支持郑渊洁向工行讨说法。
军训最后一天是全校的总检阅。
其中，福州居于榜首。
黑手党试图以此抹黑肯尼迪并将之作为要挟的工具。
他的孙女后来死于嗑药。
十一五期间，广西找准差距，对症下药。
应该给重罚或撵出中国。
我真想给你捶捶背。
南京鸡鸣寺药师塔起火。
记者从坍塌窑体的砖上掰掉黏合部分，轻轻一捏，即碎成粉末。
供销社破产后，他走南闯北，以卖烤羊肉串为生。
棱角分明的硬朗笔触雕刻出更趋前卫而概念化的前脸。
我去那给你们扛矿泉水都行。
人家是大智若愚嘛。
两头湖南来汉送检的江豚尸体已运走。
上周五，泰勒参加脱口秀“艾伦爱说笑”的录制。
演这部戏，每天都与锅碗瓢盆打交道。
当确定严俊出事后，严俊的母亲几近晕厥。
天气预报只说今天有雨。
尽管字体歪歪斜斜，但句句饱含深情。
当然要买买买啦。
可他立志要闯出一番新天地。
本报摘登部分以飨读者。
它的抽象服务原语定义如下。
但如今，古城墙却被剥了皮，凿成窑洞，城砖也被垒成猪窝。
美邦要做全球的裁缝。
这一天，“第一窗口”的“闺女”张瑜要出嫁了。
康君元认为，这是有人故意在上面涂抹蓝漆。
肖强提醒，“闯红灯”存在着严重安全隐患。
烟火首先从船舱甲板上冒出。
她经常以昵称“小柔”在网上“钓鱼”联系嫖客。
前国家乒乓队成员陈佑铭。
经纪人霍汶希也发微博对传闻又表示愤怒称太过荒谬。
主播们能否改一改照提示板念稿的固有模式？
窈窕淑女，君子好逑。
另外，我有个侄孙儿是脑瘫儿，我也准备给他家点帮助。
到底把他这个罗锅儿直过来了，他给我输完液我才走的。
不能因噎废食啊。
民警纳闷为何再续前缘，却带刀赴会。
他也遇到了一个挑货郎。
有乘坐幺二二二次列车史。
您咋知道我是孤儿的？
仔细端详片刻，肖某询问店员是否能打折。
喜剧中莫文蔚的表演，百无禁忌，酣畅淋漓。
埃斯梅拉达号迎着太平洋的风浪缓缓航行。
为了返回舱安全着想，接下来要把剩余电量放出。
陈兵一下子火了，大吼起来。
卢文焕就在剿匪部队中。
刘婷气得到堂屋穿袜子、换鞋。
贵州“啃雪”交警照片。
许多美妙的念头纷至沓来。
男子命令陈颖拿出行驶证。
这一行为之恶劣，值得引起高度警惕，尤应防范其谬种流传。
兔子不吃窝边草！
我讨厌吃味道怪怪的食物，比如榴莲。
永州、郴州市加强了强降雨防御工作，积极应对。
时隔四年，那晚的喧嚣，仍余音绕梁。
一场选美，愣是发酵成一顿“吐槽盛宴”。
当期参考收益率百分之三点四五五四。
他进浴缸的时候忘记脱袜子了。
包某被砍几刀后，开始求饶。
刘瑜同学看到，黑板槽里那寥寥无几的粉笔头，很快消耗一空。
如果依然有人要做“葫芦僧”，那“葫芦案”恐怕在所难免。
瓮安事件引发贵州全省打黑除恶的高峰。
这将会消除中文电脑软件与外文软件互不兼容的障碍。
外界越想探究，我就越想躲起来。
客车驾驶员唐源亨伤势较重。
给建筑外墙加装保温材料俗称给建筑穿“棉袄”。
人生偶尔有点缺陷也不错，我没有想好。
入夜，温州上空闪电突袭，响雷乍起，电闪雷鸣中大雨倾盆而下。
在瓮安县政法委工作的王盾说。
记者站在坑边，还不断有泥土往坑里掉落。
此外，伊万诺夫还掌控着多家赌场。
影院、品酒和烹饪班紧随其后。
深证成指则率先企稳反弹。
冰面略有些滑，只好择冰面上有雪的地方走。
远处眺望，楼台醒目，殿堂叠翠，金碧辉煌，宏观而壮美。
情况危急，李智广踹门冲进屋内。
呐，饿不饿，自己去煮碗面吃。
存在淹井隐患的矿井，暴雨期间一律严禁井下作业。
我很乐意为主人服务。
救援人员推测，这一钻孔的另一端即为遇困矿工所处的坑道。
我买的主要产品是文具、礼品类。
张无忌见自己的字一扫颓靡，也满心喜欢。
中国海监二六二、二六三船在北部湾海域巡航。
有一天，蛇的尾巴拼命争吵着要由他领路。
突然，旁听席上一阵骚动。
据阿扎曼交代，他是被取缔的巴军事派别虔诚军成员。
这种玉米颜色极其绚烂，但完全可以食用。
周杰伦因爆粗打记者引关注。
赵蕊蕊曾是中国女排的核心球员，可惜因为伤病而远离赛场。
你一直在我脑海里转悠。
所以在文理方面，我从他那儿开始研究佛法的。
内容创建是最昂贵的。
尾部的脑袋略小，但眼、嘴齐全。
希尔顿开红色法拉利，“长记性”双腿并拢下车。
卜济南东盛物业管理有限公司贴出的通知。
老汉儿对“双规”习以为常了。
切记不要追涨杀跌。
她要格蕾丝向章子怡学习，像她一样保持苗条身材。
接下来，中国投资者可能要参与购买葡萄庄园、酒庄和农田。
她们队形整齐，排成三列纵队。
钱怀艮介绍说，他认识一位台湾的酒店日用品生产商。
供职于省城一家企业，该企业从事制造捆钞机生产。
八四年二人恋爱，九二年儿子洪洋出生。
二是没有好的成本收益匡算。
丈夫问：“我要有外遇了怎么办？
船缓缓驶入永兴岛港口。
绞好的肉馅比鲜肉还便宜。
祖儿大赞基仔舞姿厉害，练出一双麒麟臂。
蓝色的月亮也追寻着风向。
他勉强视事至秋而卒。
宝安区检测点设哪？
搞垮南斯拉夫是西方控制巴尔干，进而控制整个欧洲的关键环节。
地形图由测绘员刘武汉、技士蓝家煃、樊启明共同测绘。
我咋变成了这副丑样子了。
家家开始搭锅做饭，废墟上升起袅袅炊烟。
近年台湾槟榔事业稳定后，还转往海南开拓市场。
袁宜镇将汽油倒在扯下来的衣服上并点燃。
帽子一扯，右脸上伤痕点点。
上星期，法国政府要求安赛乐米塔尔重开或出售这两座高炉。
同学要我帮你培养正确三观么。
此时冯伟正巧请了病假在深圳探望父母。
说这段话时，他有点“抖抖豁豁”，几乎带着哀求的意味。
一些银行还出了歪招。
水产协会将食用鱼翅等同于“节俭美德”，祖宗也会被气死。
图为张广宁清洁场馆座椅。
经葛葛的爷爷王先生辨认，此人姓杨，收购破烂为生。
揉面、搅鸡蛋、切火腿肠、青椒以及调制佐料。
这些员工要参与产品测试，并及时提供反馈。
捂住一只眼，远看感觉很美。
你想啊，人家母鸡吃虫，他养的母鸡吃鱼，这待遇天上地下呀！
签约仪式在拉讷雷市政厅举行。
麦克总是以各种理由推脱。
李璨琛一见记者也戴回墨镜，其未婚妻即背对镜头。
婚姻是座围城，不过虽然围着却也自有被围的痛快和舒坦。
叶导不要卖弄有限的法律知识了。
要预防过敏性疾病，找到过敏原并避免它很重要。
据介绍，本次事故疑似与学生吃的食堂月饼有关。
谁会在乎民进党的内斗与泡沫化？
船号“辽东运二零三三”。
女神整体浓妆艳抹，身体上挂着丝带和彩球。
看着健康活泼的更尕求培，医护人员有些依依不舍。
政变案一时间给社会造成普遍的恐慌感。
欧尼尔说，先拟定出援助的新标准至关重要。
这个，我要回家问问妈妈。
等一等，卡尔布先生。
该配合你演出的我演视而不见。
有一天，有人通过群里的短信问他，要不要买支仿真枪玩玩。
他拿树杈往河里一打，一会儿就抓了一大堆鱼。
他无私的品格令人敬仰。
下曼哈顿地区陷入一片黑暗。
你颜值一百五十分。
而佛像模样此时也十分清瘦。
没多久镇上的干部就满街嚷嚷，让村民往高处转移躲避山洪。
加上人生猛，挺像愣头青。
每个个体获得应有的尊重，要活得有尊严一点。
早起的鸟儿有虫吃。
可有效阻隔臭味。
不过也只有将就了。
图为榫卯石构件。
哪里会因此失去语文作文的风度呢？
莫里斯这番赤裸裸的种族主义言论遭到舆论痛批。
苦涩的沙吹痛脸庞的感觉。
打个针废话真多！
拍完剧私底下没有联络。
易感人群要尽量减少外出。
男旅客面对毛卫东的当场盘问，始终躲躲闪闪，急于脱身。
港珠澳大桥除了规模宏大，还将具有璀璨夺目的外观。
反观梁烈唯，痞则痞矣，却总觉得欠了一点狠劲。
还有对体弱儿进行专案管理。
等我慢慢用心灵去感受一下先。
由此，方体忠想到了姑奶张淑云，多次请其跟王文利“说说”。
桥墩要垮了，火车还没走完。
龙虾危机之后，一切因此改变。
好一派萧疏苍凉的景色。
启用后，首批将把七二八、三零八路调入主路港湾。
这些缉毒犬功勋卓著。
在孩子上车后李亚鹏也匆匆把烟掐灭急忙离去。
这下可让苗圃大为恼火。
朱某决定吞并这个赌档。
合练参试人员早已就位，并开始调试仪器。
胖娃安排他坐副驾驶位置。
将军就要有战略意识。
他是那样精神蓬勃，士气昂扬。
舞龙舞狮、花车杂耍等代表中国民族风的文化节目应有尽有。
可惜悲剧已酿成，回天乏力。
经筛选，最终“优滨”胜出。
时值傍晚，烟囱开始排烟。
同时，义工们也正在筹备经费购买御寒衣物派送给孤寡老人。
图为落网的毒贩，左二为刘本林。
有些购物网站还专门出售军用内衣和袜子。
那烂陀大学遗址的红砖建筑残骸。
随后，邹英打开次卧房门。
酒店方面会要求房客不要舔墙壁，以免墙壁越来越薄。
他醒来后先找情诗，再穿好衣服，回想昨夜的梦，可梦境全无。
原来熊黛林除了感情上专一，对丝袜也相当专一。
尤其是有些要结娃娃亲的，笑得我肚子都疼。
孔杰以半目优势幸运地拔得头筹。
传说貂蝉就生于斯，长于斯。
高个老人叫羊舌新，走路一瘸一拐的老人叫韩文静。
现在好了，一次买可以用上一年半载的量呗。
郑欣宜懂得关怀长者，所以李香琴特别疼爱她。
甘当“绿叶”的巩汉林提前一天就来到南京对词儿走台。
也就是说，瓜子如果不脆或者有哈喇味，均被视为不合格品。
我参加了大连市军民庆祝五一游园活动。
红圈处是设在鱼塘边的赌场。
总体项目预计在二零二二年之前完成。
王凯老家在农村，这村倚着一条铁路。
站在塔顶可以俯瞰整个城市。
鱼到底咋死的，顾老汉一定要弄个明白。
怎样激发战士们爱军习武的热情？
高音喇叭提醒所有人员从滞洪区撤离。
消息很快传进周伟耳朵。
温家宝说，领导者要善于发现苗头性问题，果断采取措施。
美丽的大亚湾，和风煦丽，碧波万顷。
装在包里，走夜路的时候当棍子防身。
臭味笼罩，彻夜难眠。
肇事车车头有明显凹痕。
公章缘何屡屡成为诈骗分子得手的武器？
中国藏歌会启动晚会，可谓是群星璀璨。
接着，纽约当局开始清扫祖科蒂公园，搬运成堆的垃圾。
在邹焰焰闲聊的话音中，他那些高官“哥们儿”能量都不可小觑。
法新社报道，当前时节，阿维尼翁聚有大量游客。
香案上还放着一只香炉，炉里几炷香正飘着袅袅烟气。
最后，岑振朝帮她打赢了官司。
他背上留下多处淤痕和割伤。
开庭当天，陪同王莹出庭应诉的是其公公张老汉。
各版本有一种算一种。
相关各方暗战犹酣。
我们要通过住宅的销售资金来撇横商业持有的现金流。
夜深了，苗俊明将熟睡的川川搂在怀里，昏昏欲睡。
谷下亘等日本国会议员、日本外务省官员出席了招待会。
用手轻轻一掰，铁条就很轻易地变弯了。
蒋富贵兄妹二人在玩耍。
六十七年间，他偿还债务合计一万三千六百多元。
我好想给她蒸一个热乎乎的梨子吃。
新郎迟疑了下：“让尿憋的。
大昭寺前香烟袅袅，有转经的老人走过。
仿古郑和宝船已经英姿初现。
我决定离开牌桌，耳朵太脏了。
门前窄窄的小巷里灰尘弥漫。
爹爹早年抛弃妻子与小三同居，如今中风后无人照看。
也会提供生子偏方给小两口。
林爽愉对此传言未置可否，但她肯定胡的出走与“挤兑”有关。
不用压缩机的冷暖空调器获专利。
炉子烟囱封闭不好，整个窝棚被烟笼罩，呛得人咳嗽不停。
他终于下决心拆开了牛扒餐。
小偷却一点也不气馁，继续在抽屉内翻找。
但是从债市的品种和数量而言，仍然偏低偏窄。
两地相差六万八千八百元，两地之比为五点二。
当天，村民并没有发现温铁拴有异常表现。
权立彦转身返回院子，顺手拎起扫帚，直奔过去。
昨天的中山大学梁銶居堂内座无虚席。
人民调解法”也将于年内出台。
俺晚上都在门口凉快嘛，该左转弯的他直行。
无砟轨道的轨枕本身是混凝土浇灌而成，而路基也不用碎石。
出差也要照顾好自己。
列车晚点乘客有权要求补偿。
图为李博硕和小撒合影。
两人再次想“歪点子”。
他们仍为讨工钱而来。
公公、老公和大姑姐都在凤岗一家五金厂务工。
传统吃法是白切，口感清淡、肉质滑嫩，原汁原味。
跟朋友做点以前没有做过的事情，会让好运延续哦！
而且，悬赏等于直接公开需求，响应方或绕开交易环节。
六是懒懒散散，松松垮垮。
足见孟暖儿的演艺发展潜力有多么宽广。
简而言之，没有人比你更了解整个业务。
这一夜无梦，睡眠安稳得仿佛航行在被麦哲伦冠名时的太平洋上。
最高人民法院院长王胜俊参加会见。
赌石分为闷头料、半明料和明料三种。
老狼和叶蓓，高晓松的词曲。
不过，销售奢华却属无奈之举。
王桂芝劝垂头丧气的丈夫。
时下，燕庄村民又吹响了筹建五星级宾馆和汽车城的冲锋号。
如今，阿奎莱拉已经身为人母。
一位市民划漂流艇再爬梯子回家。
扯远一点，艺人谈恋爱找女朋友。
与本网连线时地面仍在颤动。
上班族小耿就是其中一位。
不过，腿骨无法焚烧。
英汉泥地掘出十一世纪黑钻戒料值十万英镑。
你要喜闻乐见吗。
看那腾空而起的跳板。
手术需在胆囊和腹壁之间搭建瘘管。
近日，记者偶遇葛优开着路虎吉普车在街上溜达。
兄弟俩正琢磨怎样把这个小院规划好。
阮女士向幼儿园提出了赔偿。
晚上洗过澡，在被窝里惴惴不安的看着老婆拍脸。
他们在汉堡爱斯布图勒区发现端倪。
据说黎姿曾于兰心阁家中布下求子风水阵。
巨星陨落，举国悲痛。
事发青山工业三路五号附四十四号腾飞调寄行。
也就是说，美国儿童整整早熟了五岁。
赖宁雕像重新回到东仓巷。
高速路上这样换胎实在太危险。
她一手扛檩子，一手扒瓦砾。
整顿后的锡山假冒摩托车为何愈演愈烈？
萨迪斯就是这样一个印度富豪。
赵少康问，这件事两面不讨好，绿营也可能恩将仇报。
约翰逊列为夺取奥运金牌的人选？
罗志祥跟“棒棒堂”私交不错，大家都爱跳舞，常一起切磋“舞”功。
让无聊变的有话聊。
这时，车顶仍然被压得嘎嘎响。
她矮小的身影很快淹没在人群中。
孙未及刹车，小杰一下被撞飞了。
她习惯在晚餐前摆弄阳台上的花草。
李先生发脾气摔破了刮胡啫喱并冲进站台。
石海均将被送往亚洲大学医院接受救治。
风也就走投无路，归于失败的境地了。
一会儿，“刘姥姥”又将竹竿背在身后，是为“二郎搬山”。
朋友问：最近混得怎么样啊？
洋房黑瓦粉墙，泥壁木地。
回首往日，硬朗的背影悄然远去，而如今的却是羸弱的双肩。
学生更加相信，眼前似乎涌上了许多引证用的书名号。
它同样粗暴有力。
奥体和二外的地一样，但一个巨硬，一个巨软。
当晚，徐州北区一小区内，石娜娜落网，其丈夫张庆被抓捕归案。
在两人情酣意浓之时，女友偶然说到想去国外旅游。
在用钢筋把门插上后，张某随即拧开了煤气罐阀门。
对那些光耍嘴皮子、光琢磨人不琢磨事的坚决不用。
他毫不退缩，扭住一个歹徒的双腕。
村民冯学礼和任启泰也分别筹钱，打算买下棺材安葬冯光国。
滇池卫士张正祥。
多次质问丈夫未果，苦闷之余将猜疑告诉了女儿。
主场作战的中国田径军团胜算几何？
我们租给别个嘛，也要收钱噻。
另外，用户无法在网上“戳一下”女王。
因此，如果“一刀切”地按排量征收，明显有失公允。
别蒙我我一上钩你就会截图发出去哼。
医院希望她去法院起诉，院方会按法院判决执行。
我的人生土崩瓦解。
他微微腆着肚子，双手叉腰，目视前方。
改写历史的还有宜昌。
再挖，一堆碎砖石里，摸到了邹汉君的头发。
记者看到，一些村民的房屋可谓瓮牖绳枢，难遮风雨。
仪式上，费森尤斯卡比集团与生物医药园签署合作协议。
之后，海信也于上周推出大尺寸云电视。
学校文化墙前，小讲解员讲述开国将军杜义德的故事。
他对这诗越看越喜欢。
陈春花回忆，自己在后备厢内将锁弄坏，遭遇欠债人猛砍。
央企的身板儿一下子就硬了不少。
现在，她肚脐眼周围的皮肤，都已快被膏药“捂烂”了。
量化考核、薪酬与业绩挂钩的机制。
周鸿祎为了做搜索，从安全做起，绕的圈更大。
今天中午买了卷饼，还没吃完呢。
对于五角大楼的采购系统而言，这个黑十月还远未结束。
终于了解那种肝肠寸断了。
保险股逆势走强。
加藤表示，这一情报来自一位俄罗斯谍报人员。
四一七九号巨型小行星“图塔蒂斯”形状似花生。
正经攒底，我还得且磨呢。
颜色越深，硼砂含量越高。
御带糕这个特产可是大有来头呢。
观点迥异往往是视角的差异。
那司机侮辱我。
微处理器和内存也是如此。
王双虎等人遂赶到酒店造势。
而街道也会于近期对王女士家进行粉刷和清理。
为什么每次铲猫屎时，猫猫都喜欢盯着看，它们格外在乎自己的便便吗？
涉案男子李某，从湖北来穗与妻子一起开网店。
下楼梯时，杨女士慌乱中不小心把脚给崴了。
正是“若为慈善故，名利皆可抛”。
它的优势显而易见：易于备份、易于管理、易于检索，且尤为安全。
此前该园多名内部人士透露，园方长期泡虎骨酒请客送礼。
整个画面好似耶稣降临。
雨花台区纪委昨向记者表示，已经展开调查。
挖友邻又看见你。
他“噌”一下跃下床，拦在女儿面前。
看来这次又要推后发了。
说罢，又甩出去一张牌。
于是，她把胶囊一颗颗拧开，捏着鼻子直接往下吞药粉。
你最近总是喜欢开我玩笑。
七是加大高架路桥噪声污染整治力度。
他们慢腾腾聚拢，轻盈下马，将马拴在一起，共七匹。
在距离女孩七八米的地方，孔令岑为防万一还是停下了脚步。
展出的陶鼎等涉案文物。
罂粟是提炼毒品海洛因的原料。
时至今日，仍不知何缘何故惹此尘埃。
林峰与父亲林华国在灵堂打点一切。
我只是不善言辞而已，但真的常有表达的欲望。
妞妞有“休息日”的。
罗韩日前在法国参加嘎纳电影节。
维桑的雄心是让中国营养品走向五大洲。
另外，高温也会对女性卵细胞产生影响。
陈幸妤回应邱毅爆料：他讲的话就是圣旨吗？
柏威夏古刹是泰国和柬埔寨一直以来在争夺的一块文化遗址。
从事非法买卖外汇活动。
附近空无一人，偶有车辆缓缓驶过。
当然是盐水鸭啦。
净者，不污不染也。
真有点饿了。
感觉好温暖呀。
李永波瞅准弟弟独居一室的机会，动了杀机。
三五七路南口区间，甩南口西站至高崖口十一站。
要坚决反对形形色色的形而上学和弄虚作假的歪风。
马德保再阔谈希腊神话与美学的关系。
资本报酬也有一部分归为政府。
老虎一打盹，猫也欺负你。
只见菩萨身披璎珞，下着长裙，造型精美。
此间，张正吉正与毒友“溜冰”。
斯蒂德与麦克奈尔握手，表示祝贺。
天气灰白，空气冰凉，风也显凛冽。
人非圣贤，何况孔子尚有一字之师。
还是先泼些“冷水”。
又破又矮的瓦房变成新楼，易玉清和孩子们顿时看到了希望。
又细又软的淤泥刚好淹至脚背，滑得厉害。
我们来查查文德尔班的书。
小家伙头部和屁股缠有绷带，两眼炯炯有神，正咂着奶瓶。
衣着打扮也很简单干练。
再有就是虚假承诺，巧取豪夺。
就算我是自寻烦恼吧。
你要给我反应的时间啊。
我的头发长得很慢耶。
说白了就是缺心眼儿。
在录用干部时，要按照德才兼备的标准择优录用。
这条线最终被否掉。
这是北美地区有史以来最大数额的彩票总奖金。
不能用地球人的智商来衡量喵星人喔。
日本此言荒唐至极，令人愕然。
头年卖点粮食买点砖，第二年再卖点粮食换些檩。
整个院落在周围显得很惹眼。
头部仿似三角形，又如一块烙铁。
丑化先贤、糟蹋传统的行为是可耻的。
看起来，诺尔似乎永远不会停下脚步。
大桥海事处所有的水上安全监管工作，都将依托该趸船开展。
形容阿里山姑娘美如水应该就是美如日月潭的水吧。
群众昼夜聚集在居委会。
我是你的小呀小笨蛋。
他们均曾与生了病的草原土拨鼠接触。
文中并未涉及任何形式的有奖竞猜活动。
无论哪一种，都是愚蠢作为。
贾平凹看到画很高兴。
万一谷歌搞砸了会怎样？
警方顺藤摸瓜，将几人抓获。
可惜台风“天秤”搅局，让马英九被迫延期登岛。
他找到个替死鬼，忙说：谢景渊，你问钱荣。
他的美文是第八篇，地理位置居中。
又何谈抗衡更加凶残的外来入侵者？
因为湟鱼虽生在咸水湖中，但产卵却要逆流而上到布哈河中。
眼影不能平涂，应用蘸的方式，朦胧又不失夸张。
讲到这里的时候，陈大雪似乎还咂摸着枣儿的味道。
阿巴丹是伊朗著名石油城，在产油区胡齐斯坦省内。
其次，要将胶囊进行微波消解。
除了倒腾房屋，丁志贞还利用各种方法私吞公款。
我们问：“那裤子上的血印呢？
女儿又趴在桌子上睡着了。
鸟友拍到的蓝喉太阳鸟，看看像不像“愤怒的小鸟”。
这种书看了啷个要得嘛。
而平时她会吃两小碗疙瘩汤和一个糊塌子。
既然分数有高有低，自然众口就难调。
我们就是要去走那条神奇的天路哇。
其它团员按原定行程昨早离开澳门经拱北返回内地。
苏菲还要教凯特繁冗的皇家礼节。
九二共识的精髓就是求同存异，搁置争议，务实协商，共创双赢。
很明显我就是爱折腾。
陈水扁开专栏引起巨大纷争。
我读一个音，她跟着读一个音。
车子停稳，陈兴銮迈步下来。
其他跨国公司的研发中心包括，飞思考尔、思科网讯等。
你咬了一口，人家肯给你换吗？
为了给儿子凑齐医药费，老人只能从牙缝里省。
此外，前首相森喜朗、参议院副院长尾辻秀久也在参拜之列。
图为一栋房屋损毁严重。
举头望明月，低头思故乡。这是唐朝诗人李白的诗哦。
纯雪与冻雨，有什么不同的成因与影响呢？
纸篓中的厕纸存放，易造成细菌随空气扩散。
谁愿意把它请出来，多惹麻烦。
塔怀娟还熟练地拿起电推子，为孤寡老人剃“龙头”。
司令员听完转身，泪打湿了满脸。
如“二零一一规条字零零一号”，“大”字是指大兴区。
一岁以下的幼犬第一年需要注射三次预防针哦！
王治平老师也说阿嘎的低音唱的很棒。
该帖引发网友激烈讨论。
一家网吧的老板则有些郁闷。
基金稳，不像股票上窜下跳。
九零后中国女子游泳队运动员，洪荒之力的发明者啦。
这图难不成是Ｐ过的？
窗前明月光，地上鞋两双。
这是后法优于先法、特殊法优于普通法的关系。
但由于种种原因，这一想法未能实施。
因为他在烟的外包装做过记号，以防止有人拿假烟敲诈。
侧耳再听半天，隐约听见有麻将牌的声音。
李克强走进低矮的土坯房里，慰问困难家庭。
一部“鸟与梦飞翔”的纪录片，许愿星看了三四遍。
你说怪不怪，那几条狗竟也知道我来了援兵，突然四散跑开了。
老妈和我都特爱孔雀这个角色，出彩极了，加油啦！
帖主陈同伦通过此帖，实名举报其表姐夫王立贵。
验尸发现，巴塞洛死于头部遭到重创。
肥料甚至是诱捕和驱赶蚊虫的合成分泌物。
祖儿承认曾因无故的抨击和冷言冷语而耿耿于怀。
好白菜都让猪拱了！
二是加强协作，防止推诿扯皮。
谭某为弥补赌博亏空，便以高息吸收储户存款。
田某下车后，因车费问题揪扯李书国衣领。
汪圆圆今年会减少模特儿工作，全力进攻演艺事业。
由于儿子结婚需要，陈磊父母当时也正想买房。
之后思捷与春卷等人往乘出租车走人，途中放下友人后。
房管所欠人家的工钱顶帐了。
我们要过去雪耻，为英国人争光。
只要让他看见，他就鬼使神差般凑上去。
承包那些露着石头的山坡有啥效益？
朱孝天昨上节目录影时，突然泪洒摄影棚。
历史上，西班牙于一五六五年侵占菲律宾。
胸痛、咯血，咳嗽时发现痰中有血丝或血块。
各个副市长睡歪了腰椎、睡坏了颈椎。
当然，叙问题冰冻三尺非一日之寒，解决需要时间。
韶关上报一起死亡病例。
今天风大，火苗蹿起有五六米高。
太太田蕊妮发微博称赞杜汶泽乐观坚强，是她心目中的巨人。
创业板、中小板走势分化。
可谓扮丑女星之最。
惠来县前詹镇纪委给予蔡晋军开除党籍处分。
稳妥扩大服务业开放。
所以，聪明的“印度之子”迄今也没敢给美国总统奉此尊号。
几年前，右边的母树被雷劈死了，随后，这棵公树也就慢慢枯萎。
滚下去，后边坐着去。
张波身形矮小，说话声音不大。
李科一个劲地鼓励陈医生。
他真的跟瑞典姑娘结婚了。
据悉，水库已聘请专业保安公司值守。
兰考县许河乡赵楼村九组。
王子与毛弟向奶奶派大红包。
鸟网的尺寸也明显大很多。
婴儿一吸吮到乳汁，顿时就不哭了。
加上上一次打架的积怨，几名妯娌又厮打起来。
公园里也有很多别的小朋友，但喜鹊一个也没“看上”。
就这样，徐波开始了北漂生涯。
三军可夺气，将军可夺心。
经过千团大战的洗礼后，整个行业已过卡位期。
公元七百五十三年，仲麻吕归国时，传闻他在海上遇难。
等全国范围普及，就没校长咬人咯。
因滥伐所造成的损失远远多过拍卖木材的所得。
昨日，丹棱县检察院透露，该院已于昨日告知宿仁训有关权益。
矮油我知道你最喜欢捏它的脸了，因为能捏出各种形状嘛！
书法绘画作品应为作品原件，尺寸格式不限，不需装裱。
她开车拉着俩沉默的丫头，一溜烟的跑了。
林颖超木讷地接过钱，并没有要走的意思。
药材符合药用要求的，方可供应、配方和用于中成药生产。
每个帐篷都配上了电扇、雷达驱蚊器、矿泉水和一些应急的药品。
很快，胡益华落脚点浮出水面。
老熊的家在万州一个偏远、贫穷的小山村。
现在小升初推优、择校、派位，也不是统一考试呀。
以前有萝卜招聘，现在又有篮球招聘。
老婆查私房钱，没地方藏了，给你充二百元话费，过两天还我。
李局长答应帮他找找看。
演员们也给我鼓了不少劲。
那女孩的双唇微抿着，红润有光，仿佛在勾引罗天诚的嘴唇。
吃饭靠老百姓送苞谷，吃菜靠弟兄们上山打猎，挖野菜。
常务副省长陈敏尔也已经在昨天晚上赶到舟山。
如果有月饼期货，那该多好呀。
昨日，张雨绮也夸起了导演。
就此有谣言传出，说这男子的肾脏被人给摘走。
我倒是想胖一点的，但总也胖不起来。
岩石分崩，全家覆压者有之。
吴建豪微博专注挑女装鞋。
谷歌若果真收购雅虎，势必引来美国反垄断调查。
漫漫长夜，窈窈元宫。
作为科学巨擘，钱伟长的科学贡献彪炳史册。
三池渊附近的一处餐馆墙上装饰的人造花。
田子和哥们儿一起泡夜店，也一起帮别人“平事儿”。
坚决查处转包和违法分包。
参谋王存宝讲，这几天武警官兵仍然连夜展开搜索。
她跑到后座，拍醒了吴鹏。
首先，应重新核算螺栓的强度。
出了事儿后，他还和看守所管教说对我一点儿感情都没有。
所以这个世界的法则就是：抠逼假公子也比大方真屌丝光辉万倍。
但我一定会用法律手段维护我的名誉。
前外务次官薮中三十二接任的可能性也在探讨之中。
会玩呀，我是个游戏迷呢。
孔所长和他俩马上进行研究。
很快，她被押送至位于屯门的大榄女子惩教所。
要打回家打，你不要脸我还要脸呢！
救援队正在加快安装固定泵，通过抽水稳定水位。
涮墩布拖地也是用洗完衣服倒在桶里的水。
拉斯穆森请温总理第一个发言。
就是叫我名字而已呀。
他还要求顾问们了解巴尼的详细情况。
其中以蒸、沤、平、扎、坠五道工序最为重要。
进山采参也有众多讲究。
可至今应得的百万元工资还没着落。
积极探索用群众工作统揽信访工作。
岁月荏苒，人生易老。
但杨然称要登门拜访，将李某和菲儿的事情告诉他妻子。
当天凌晨，北河沿大街一处热力管网爆裂。
咱不上美术班了吧？
江豚有“水中大熊猫”之称。
不少人患病后也只能硬扛。
努尔阿里木搭车前往巩乃斯林场的冬牧场。
丈夫又与妻子吵了一架。
你们到底有完没完？
日积月累，薇洛攒了一大笔钱。
晓辉呆坐在位置上，想这次完了。
这让黄先生很纳闷。
宋柯卖烤鸭，她去捧了场。
日本名将内村航平在单杠中掉杠，“助”中国队夺冠。
他说，黑龙江水体油类污染的污染源已可以排除来自中方。
二要鼓励港口及临港物流企业“请进来”和“走出去”。
是我的荣誉，我哪敢推呀？
而苏州人民银行也极力撇清与“越溪庭院”别墅项目的关系。
外甥女哭了，他帮着哄。
有传言称，时任总统办公厅主任的梅德韦杰夫是幕后推手。
分析灌篮高手的这期节目名为“爱灌篮，爱泡妞”。
港岛南区深水湾望向南塱山的上空出现漏斗云。
为了弥补亏空，满新凯拆东墙补西墙，最终欠下巨款。
但是压力也不是一点儿没有。
这就是周克华逃跑的窄巷。
屋内东西摆放凌乱，制作馅料用的作料堆满一地。
网友“崔妮可”则表示，难以想象会有这么恶心的人。
我看见你闯单行线，你还跑！
受此影响，美元也成为“香饽饽”。
网帖很快就引起了众多网友关注和转载。
如此看来，李的访日可视作为谢访日铺路。
不过昨两人却以行动撇不和传言。
未成年犯在少管所里打乒乓球。
公元一三七二年，朱元璋就派杨载出使琉球。
目前公务员养老金直接由财政拨付。
别在户外停留太久。
喜欢还需要理由吗。
有人宣称现在是“筛选为王”。
法新社认为，央行这一举措短期内给欧元区提供了喘息空间。
反正是婚也结了慈善也办了，两厢都还妥妥的。
不久前，他饰演了张纪中版“西游记”中猴王赤尻马猴的角色。
深挖细查，拔出萝卜带出泥。
而“幺二幺二”打造的感觉是“逛”，让一切都慢下来。
而营收则同比增长百分之十四，至一点一一九亿英镑。
大多数工薪阶层，恐怕只能偶尔尝尝刀鱼馄饨的滋味。
他的草法极为严整，不乱方寸。
菲儿约董某第二天到其租住的公寓约会，董某欣然同意。
詹娟说，以前丈夫有劳动能力时，还能赚钱养活她们母女。
高原上也有不少蓊蓊郁郁的原始森林，色彩凝重，博大深邃。
经查，男方患有弱精症，女方患有多囊卵巢综合征。
给你们点个蜡烛吧。
要怀揣最过硬的功夫出国，要练就最有效的处置突发情况能力。
陶山书院是李滉向学生们教授儒学并研修学问的地方。
为什么我的脸上老长痘痘啊？
俗话说，巧妇难为无米之炊。
他们都说，遭对手抹黑造谣，“选举越来越艰困”。
孩子问我怎么办呀，怎么整呀，我都呜呜直哭，找哪哪都不给办。
扭打中，青年最终不敌，被阿伯咬伤耳朵。
据了解，该作坊没有营业执照和卫生许可证。
国际癌症研究中心已将其列为人类一级致癌物。
李连成喜欢别人夸他聪明。
小学生趴在地上参加月考。
柳荫的失误让丹麦连偷两分，将比赛带入加时局。
人和街一百三十二号大院入口铁门紧锁。
你要带我一起玩游戏嘛？
球蟒一个月要喂食两次，他总是早早提醒我，该给球蟒买吃的了。
经检验证实，高某血样中检出甲基苯丙胺成分。
将就决议展开研究。
超级星期二的十州初选，凯瑞几可席卷全局。
政府又设立热线二三九九二幺五九供查询。
未来狼多肉少已成定局。
我相信清者自清，也奉劝那些居心叵测的人把力气做在正处。
大家是不是都忘了勤俭节约这种优良传统呢？
门舍尔未披露这种恶意软件的相关细节。
这一连串问号发人深省。
辻希美从一开始就非常反感。
司仪问新娘是否愿意和新郎共度一生，新娘娇羞的说：“我愿意。
我越来越肥！越来越老！越来越丑了！
处江湖之远忧其君，铁骑莽莽，决胜千里，救民倒悬。
吃巧克力呀，听说和下雨天更配。
六二四路首车开始双向甩槐树岭南站。
无奈下，他只能抓着两人勉强向岸边游去。
昨日，小强正在耍玩具车。
众人顿时目瞪口呆。
石川夫妇的诊所。
那黄蜂与鹧鸪岂不是吃大亏了？
致北二环以北直至浐灞一带的大片区域供气中断。
然后，就挨顿打跪键盘跪到现在。
两名妇女正在将肮脏的潲水油去渣分层沉淀。
千错万错都是我的错你就原谅我吧！好嘛？
和李盛燕相邻的几个摊贩铺盖一卷准备撤退。
当日下午，另一驴友又在附近的险要景点受伤。
他的耳朵很敏锐。
穷山恶水的梦：一阵乒里乓啷的鞭炮声，吓走了吃干草的水牛。
餐饮船随着湍急的洪水，快速往下游漂去。
卡拉维拉也在“脸谱”上为自己言论道歉。
后因其听不懂“白话”，陈垚东将其辞退。
任何问题都可以问我妹子哦。
一直自称“身体棒棒”的代悦，也终因为分身乏术而累倒。
对于葛红林痛快的答复，郭台铭仍心存疑虑。
图为宁远县公安局出具的“聂华忠”户籍登记资料。
越深的海底生物就越少哦！
真正的奢侈源自定制。
另一方面，罗亚尔也是左翼社会党的一个异类。
整车线条硬朗，视觉冲击感强。
可以煲汤喝呀，推荐粉丝豆腐汤，美容又健胃。
目前，商业用水的水价要远远高于工业用水价格。
从今以后，鲁国人将不会从别国赎回奴仆了。
三亚市公安消防局防火监督参谋何平说。
秋高气爽，登高远眺正当时。
目前，小董的伤情趋于稳定，但仍需留院观察。
位于拱北的珠海站由于受拆迁问题影响，工期一直延后。
白天做梦影响休息，还是晚上睡觉的时候再做梦吧。
一楼的遮阳棚被砸得凹下去。
此后，裁缝摊虽几次搬迁，“哒哒哒”的缝纫机声却从未停过。
课堂上老师提问：配偶的称呼有哪些？
儿童眼睛相对成人更加娇嫩。
经过层层筛选，唐某在众多应征者中脱颖而出。
附有可爱卡通公仔的邮戳、坐垫、文化衫、搪瓷茶杯等俯拾即是。
要不然我人还能在这儿吗？
我又问她们：那谁是妹妹啊？
纸卷概念是如何出炉的？
工作人员不忘在箱子外用记号笔写上“人大”二字。
吴川政府网市长信箱成摆设。
各大路局总体运输平稳有序。
作坊内光线昏暗，不时散发出阵阵异味。
他已是第二次亲临盐田了。
她找到雇佣她的茶叶专柜的店长，恳请能拿回健康证。
今晚我整理整理就拍。
谁都知道，那是他握扫帚留下的印痕。
建议去“好声音”转椅子。
为挽回颓势，日系车企反应迅速。
柴油产量与消费量基本持平。
不愿说话的明星委员倒也省事，愿意说的那是“自讨苦吃”。
导演田沁鑫劝他，力气悠着点。
钱云会五年来上访不断的就是乐清电厂土地征用一事。
吕天喜（左一）与父母在一起。
能附加个原因吗？
大家悄悄议论，“内贼”会是谁。
现场之血腥凄惨阴森，令人毛骨悚然。
一楼有青石包边的台基、踏步。
对面的学妹吃面真浪费。
顺便也了解一下群众的疾苦？
角膜炎把杨爹爹折磨得够呛。
你也可以说我这些担忧是酸葡萄心理。
轩仔唱高音位时喊爆喇叭，非常厉害。
明天限行尾号“三”和“八”。
新婚不久，苦恼也随之而来。
刘恺威、杨幂在青岛庆生日。
状元们赖以进身的殿试卷子俗称“状元卷”，历来深受重视。
俺庄的司机又把她接回来。
此次缓堵综合措施，对公车同样提出严格限制。
而绚斗也会尽快恢复正常的艺能工作。
老公，我摔坏一只碗，决定惩罚自己。
为什么不能提前一两天或五一之后呀。
灵堂正面墙壁上“维和英烈永垂不朽”的黑色挽幛高高悬挂。
我们经常讲珠穆朗玛峰，有一个坡很陡，有一个坡比较安全。
我会永远陪在你身边。
这种新鲜玩意儿很好。
严格的说，不是走而是攀登而去的。
据悉，伤者以骨折和外伤为主。
身体摇晃着，极力想让自己站稳脚跟。
这也是判定西湖醋鱼是否正宗的标准之一哦。
乱石岗上，即是养民之壤。
耿留栓认为“司考的难点在于实践”。
马修是这个领域的权威，曾在通信行业摸爬滚打多年。
被炮栓夹破手指，被退出的弹壳击伤的事情常有发生。
母亲王小红一人拉扯他长大。
一望无垠的亘古荒漠中，布满了挖掘机、装载机的轮胎印。
女宝宝健康聪明，无任何缺陷。
赵先生认为，窝窝团此举不够妥当。
房屋的外墙也未被发现有过火和烟熏痕迹。
溁湾镇窑坡山棚户区改造项目系市重点工程。
记者只得将卡从手机取出。
况且，我的龙袍，她们未必敢穿。
在精神接近崩溃时，他曾用剃须刀片割下了自己的一只耳朵。
禁止以歪曲、贬损等方式使用非物质文化遗产。
老百姓也是那秤上的定盘星。
往下，一道水闸横亘两端，永定河在这里戛然而止。
在物流上，苏宁易购也不可懈怠。
而另一只犬则会用爪子敲字母，并且进行“哲学和诗学沉思”。
远扬恨不得要叫：好！
这多少有些反讽。
他的对策是近似按劳分配般的改革。
最后还是吴敏略满足了高云海的虚荣，准备给云海一个广播会。
中国调整了卷烟税负。
经常在家里乱吼一通。
还让我赤裸着上身唱歌。
我红红的小脸照进你心窝。
薛景文被押上人民的法庭。
跟我聊天怎么会无语呢？
双鱼座要好好的幸福下去呦！
钢管舞我还没有学过呢。
蝴蝶兰的装盆很重要。
近日，自贡市沿滩区卫坪镇发生一起惨剧。
女儿全身软组织挫伤。
汤唯汤唯几下便将贼人制服。
当年晋察冀边区表扬过的劳动英雄韩凤玲是否还健在？
公众人物概念的缺失，将陷网民于不义。
事后，钟某明告诫薇薇不能告诉别人，否则要挨骂。
老人满头白发，身子骨还算硬朗，只是有些耳聋。
祖儿坦言以前被老板杨受成称为“天后”感到尴尬。
铁人头戴前进帽，身穿羊皮袄，手握刹把，英气逼人。
警方称该诊所无合法资质。
农民工于占水称，这老农民挣俩钱也真不易呀，这也不给呀。
公司只负责养护、清扫以及路产损毁情况的管理。
戴年华介绍，浅水性的鄱阳湖的水位与水量，将影响水环境。
不然，我们将无鸟可观。
不料东亚飞蝗“卷土重来”。
她咬着牙，用一块厚厚的布子裹住了自己透析时胳膊上的“篓”。
黑帮老大去纹身，对师傅说：给我在背上纹一个狮子头。
不过，其耳朵上那副名牌耳环着实是亮点。
赵云的朋友郝超英建议先带董静去海口躲躲。
几年前，他因为没钱医治，致使右腿骨头坏死。
幸运的您已被我院的教授看中。
初入此道的投资者切莫盲目跟进。
荣辱与共显丹心，肝胆相照写辉煌。
刷屏准备中，我先看看问题哈！
称其为朱莉吸毒颓废照。
除蒙牛、伊利、光明等大品牌外，广东本土乳品也加入涨价行列。
马奎尔、亨德利、多特、艾伦等人首轮也将对阵资格赛选手。
眉毛好像用油擦过，脸色很好，嘴唇涂了一点口红。
盛大在线业务比过去有些务实。
杨丞琳这身打扮造价不菲。
挺喜庆的，也挺干净整洁的。
很多消费者在租房的时候往往吃哑巴亏。
人们担心通胀走势失控，会招致更严厉的宏观紧缩政策。
浑江走出了一条具有区域特色的白山商路。
个性直爽火爆的那英终于发飙，剑指浙江卫视。
何薇不舒服啊，我担心她一个人，你能不能陪她去下医院啊？
如此高的价格还去“热捧”，银行当然是打着“赔本赚吆喝”的算盘。
可是车蹭不过去哟。
他们把我踢倒了又拎起来，不断重复。
五月份的这一数据为四点五一一五万亿美元。
这些文字信息纯属捏造。
能否重现亚特兰大奥运会上的辉煌？
在家人的执拗下，韩志鹏戒掉了每周爬白云山的瘾。
退水期的大堤往往容易出现险情。
穆西约卡对央视非洲分台开播表达了美好祝愿。
拓宽视野，广开选拔年轻干部的渠道。
买家和卖家同样面临着举证维权困难的窘境。
一个周六，“张某”邀请武某一起出来玩。
完了还可以沤制肥料。
尽管“金三”已成空谈，开发商们却铆足了劲要收获“银四”。
村民称，龙骨洞目前已被采矿者炸毁掩埋。
今天早上我们已经把贼抓到了，而且法官已经判了他的罪呢！
我们倡导，串串也可爱，领养取代买卖。
我是萌妹纸，你爱信不信。
这下，聂小姐夫妻俩傻眼了。
穿着火爆露底显胸带。
我还以为你被别人拐跑了。
你和猪什么关系呀？
强扭的瓜不甜，强扭的睡也不会香。
两人共舞时，艾薇儿也跳得十分诱惑，还一直摆弄嘴里的香烟。
不能翻越铁路栅栏进入铁路地界内。
全市继续推进爱国卫生运动，大力开展灭蚊工作。
选购宝宝喜爱的餐具。
万家团圆的春节过完了，许多人的钱包也瘪了。
屡次提醒不标的，禁止挂匾。
林罗的两个脑袋忙凑过去。
两人到了码头之后，邻居老汉又将一盒“补药”塞给王老汉。
就是这一拽，刘庆花救了一命。
李好郭晓敏大婚，好兄弟捧场。
那是他亲妈、亲儿子、亲妹妹呀。
由于胡同窄，消防车无法进入。
林大哥的相貌距奇丑仅一步之遥。
有时施舍一些零钱。
上着课，我爸他烟瘾犯了，就想点烟。
驾驶员纳闷，他按喇叭没有错。
只见他们低着头强忍悲痛，肩头一颤一颤的。
同时，在奥运期间，车险报案的手续也将简化。
图为张帮胜在舔小猴子的屁股。
熊玉儿和郭松林的律师做的也是无罪辩护。
一直在对你微笑呀。
小泽玛利亚不甘示弱，挺胸撅屁股连环出招。
积极发展公路甩挂运输。
记者昨天也拨通了国寿的九五五幺九服务电话。
近十年来，公公倪匡一直想抱孙子，也不断对他们软硬皆施。
孙红雷啊，你可得拎清楚了。
因此，和太湖一样存在污染的滇池，被同样施以“水葫芦疗法”。
奎文区实验小学只有两名专职书法老师。
事件“扰攘”不久，“元凶”似乎有感事态严重，即将照片删掉。
最后挑到几本没理疵的让骆冰背。
书中写道，蒙娜丽莎眼中“充满各种记号和字符”。
喂猪的食物都是玉米、豆饼等原粮，不加添加剂。
坦率地说，我一直在以学生心态当代表委员。
相反，辟谣速度越慢，谣言就越会有滋生的土壤。
更荒唐的是，这笔罚金还往往是情夫掏腰包。
有香港媒体感叹，娶晋江姑娘胜过抢银行。
玩具、书包、木头、沙子以及海草混乱地掺杂着。
中国驻菲大使馆敦促菲方军舰离开黄岩岛海域。
对于小狗的死因，“喵晴朗”和倪女士都存有疑问。
我是善良活泼、好奇心旺盛的Ｂ型血。
游轮顶部两条烟囱等部位被“削”掉。
再累了，就眯一小会。
下一秒就晕过去了。
我有点儿犹豫。
这阵势，准有大事。
孩子这时候往往没胃口，根本吃不下去。
图为厦门鼓浪屿。
我也挺无奈的哎。
钟丽缇遭中年男子捏玉手。
相片中的她与一男子亲热，更有不少情欲动作。
奥巴马发表帐篷演讲。
而且还是低腰的哦。
脸滚烫，心想千万别眨眼，忍着挺胸扮威武，否则重拍更辛苦。
丰田发言人伊藤穰一拒绝对报告内容置评。
文革期间破四旧，家谱被焚毁，留下永远的遗憾。
右手累了用左手，左手累了用右手。
扶着栏杆有些站立不稳。
中日关系将瓦解。
老邢则靠行李打起盹儿来。
众长老随后回到罹难者灵位前，各人拈香顶礼，将功德回向。
失望后，段正淳只盼小镇皆知就可以了。
可见，雅虎员工缺乏认同感和归属感。
佩玲未婚先孕的女儿，是令佩林及共和党难堪的事。
购买的经适房能否用于自住以外的用途？
我想你需要一个防毒面具。
儿科医生的诊断是运动性哮喘，估计和过敏有关。
其中“归类表”、“完税价格表”由海关总署制定。
忆起得知获奖那一刻的情景，麦克库利亚尔依然难掩兴奋。
公民党负责人也批评普选设预选“是一个倒退”。
戴眼罩出场的周秀娜教参赛者来个败犬大变身。
陈炯当即启动“爱心基金”送女孩回家。
海边、沙滩，还有吃海鲜呀。
实际上，全车盗抢险属于商业险。
幽门螺杆菌感染是胃癌发生的主因。
贝纳特说：我认为麦凯恩属于传统的保守派。
结果，赵萝蕤法语及格了，德语却吃了一个零分。
而德国是中欧关系的重要领跑者。
你是上天派来故意整我的吧？
雨翔悲怆得想自杀，满腔的怒火可以再去烧一趟赤壁。
没有人接待，在场明星目前有萨顶顶，张含韵，杨曼莉，胡军。
这无疑是将自己搜索行业老二的地位拱手相让于竞争对手。
聚众赌博也是重大案情，自然要汇报。
只要心中长存牵挂和爱，就不怕雾霾飘过，就不怕明天天空是否灰暗。
黑狗咧着大嘴，路人见了纷纷躲避。
一是这些自焚者死的冤枉。
周蕊柳了解到，顾鹏图一行如此急驰只是为了赶着去吃午饭。
随后，小蕊被诊断出“重度肺炎”。
被调侃的库尔希德面露羞赧之色，显得不好意思。
接完这个电话，有些想不通的翁蔑打电话问依莱。
和钢铁侠喝茶，和灰姑娘聊天，和青蛙王子散步。
五月的辽沈大地，绿草如茵，生机盎然。
也会在纽约逛逛，看看衣服。
网友纷纷揣测是否有感而发。
赶上包饺子，老丈人问我会包饺子么，我当然要说会了。
她们的关系同样有女同的调调。
霍夫曼和科瓦姆甚至发生过争吵。
过桥米线主要以汤、肉片、米线再加作料做成。
耶雷米奇首先要求与会代表起立，默思一分钟。
它以原子时秒长为基础，在时刻上尽量接近于世界时。
耿晓华此前曾任焦点网总经理，是龚宇的老部下。
另外一些前来参观的人们，嚷嚷着要与嫦娥“二姑娘”合影。
作为方逸华的爱将，他才临危受命，帮手解决问题。
不如找老师、学生聊一聊。
不过一所中学校长认为，推荐名额给匡超很浪费。
男子把手机藏在自家浴厕里，偷拍嫂嫂、侄子与侄女如厕、入浴。
妈妈咪呀”请来张柏芝，档次又不同。
拨了一上午，头寸还没谱。
这样的议政，是舍本逐末。
渤海交汇处，是船舶进出渤海湾的第二条交通要道。
一群人一直欢聚到深夜才从咖啡屋中出来散场。
大楼二楼的二幺六房间灯火通明。
自试营业以来，几经波折，命途多舛。
于是，休斯顿也蠢蠢欲动。
李揆亨与本报记者合影。
阮守军摄：图为滑坡地附近道路积水形成“堰塞湖”。
朱茵一人分饰傅君婥、傅君瑜两姐妹。
他的泰国妻子怀胎八月，腆着大肚子随我们出海玩乐。
那一句英语一个成语仿佛后变射杀凿齿的两箭，令雨翔防不胜防。
昨日，小龙坎一居民楼临街挂着取名部招牌。
快去找张电热毯！
不少游客兴致盎然拍照留念。
关注他们，并非为了渲染悲情。
我老婆就特别善于抓男人的胃，我一看见她就感觉胃不舒服。
儒雅、亲和，记忆力好，数字脱口而出像倒豆子一般顺溜。
乡下近来也不再时兴贴花花绿绿的年画了。
在医院，翁女士为女儿拍了一组照片。
张国华贪污受贿的名堂很多。
不过康妮并不因此困扰太多。
朱镕基非常热爱文学。
据了解，羱羊服装店店主一家三口正在省康复中心医院抢救。
二是切实提高水资源利用效率。
但是，真不知道女儿的抗压能力有多大，人言可畏啊！
举报信上摁满了举报人的手印。
董老跟广东很有缘分。
这个教训是极为惨痛的。
但从周四开始，梅雨又将再度卷土而来。
组委会通知我的时候我正在北海拍戏，我闺女也在那儿。
小光是一位勤奋好学的学生，他利用寒假兼职赚取学费。
去年，左渤夷开办了沈阳第一家团购网站“九十七团”。
米尔纳将这种投资方法称为“晚期投资”。
李子君在青年冬奥会上摘得铜牌。
记者咬了咬牙，侧身一步跳到“旋风”面前，将咬靶向前送去。
这写的什么破玩意呀！屁大个事，你也要发个帖子！
睡觉前惹老婆生气了，没办法只好甜言蜜语哄她。
安先生给记者粗算了一笔账。
东东的手因捆绑构成重伤。
为了毁尸灭迹，张明纵火焚尸。
我看着有些不忍，就上前与他攀谈，希望借此减轻爬楼的枯燥与疲累。
图为“调查团”船只绕岛航行。
第一个双休日各科练习卷共有十来份，要弥补军训浪费掉的时间。
睁着眼睛说瞎话。
墙根墙脚，则往往光溜溜的亮，是孩子们靠在墙上玩耍时磨成的。
如今那些所谓当红女星，成千上万，哪一个拥有这样酷的眼神？
三是宏观审慎监管与微观审慎监管有机结合。
我只是玩玩你而已。
师昌绪院士代表获奖者发言。
这次维多利亚展现了她的诡异冷女的气质。
实行“一企一策”，大力引进央企、名企入园发展。
英国舆论认为，美国显示了要撇开英国促进北爱和平的姿态。
你们岁数有这么大了哟，今后我怎样有脸在世上活。
孩子打断了妈妈的话，问道：你说的是新闻联播那俩播音吧！
回去我就把暖气给你掐了。
和好砖泥后，将砖泥一捧捧填满砖模，并用力夯实。
现场，毕福剑趴地扑球显敬业。
标识凹凸不平，有立体感和雕塑感。
房主要求哄这些小孩尽快入睡。
据儿保医生介绍，前来测智商基本都是老师要求的。
有知情者请速致电八六四幺二九五零。
以她的眼光，谁富谁能耐，谁穷谁窝囊。
高密度的水坝将破坏鱼类产卵场功能。
佛兰克斯负责协调与指挥波斯湾的战争行动。
刑侦抓捕组已把对象抓住。
由于馆内并未陈列“泥鳅”，参观者纷纷加以询问。
好声音”栏目的版权所有者是荷兰塔尔帕公司。
让原本微薄的资金捉襟见肘。
过了新鲜劲儿，啥玩意儿看多了都腻。
但抱着充气娃娃裸奔有看点，抢人眼球，会引起大家讨论。
这是碰到湍流了。
美少女为您服务。
欧冠和欧洲五大联赛激战正酣，看谁能雄霸欧洲。
这是当年湖南大学王修寀治丧委员会编纂的悼念小册。
至今墙上仍可见累累弹痕。
省军区领导认为，这主要得益于完善的军地联合指挥体系。
邹先生戒备地瞥了他一眼。
小江撇撇嘴，示意记者看往另一个方向。
经多方勘查，娜娜坠楼排除外力所致。
我跟他说多买一杯问老师喝不喝。
肇事者黄某家住福建石狮市蚶江镇厝仔村草柄自然村。
我有几个问题想问草案的起草者。
看奶奶又要用绳子绑自己的手，阳阳躺在地上耍起赖来。
黄光裕的两个妹妹前来旁听。
对租婴女贼和租婴从事其他不法行为的妇女，必须予以严惩。
找女朋友不能急哟，女孩子要慢慢哄。
不值得啊，你我也是殊途同归。
后来，叶噶因为和段某争吵才逃了出来。
谢贤以“傻傻哋”来形容杂志的爆料。
这一风格也成为了陈彦彤的招牌形象。
怎么是一群疯疯癫癫的老头子、老太婆？
被你们踢爆了，不要哄我啦。
通常情况下，自证清白依靠脱氧核糖核酸检测。
泰国人妖表演泰国舞蹈、演唱中国歌曲“甜蜜蜜”“潇洒走一回”。
徐某在实施犯罪中，因意志以外原因而未能得逞，属犯罪未遂。
如铁轨里埋有道闸，动车组高速运行所带气流就会卷起道闸。
监控录像拍摄到“神匪老爹”作案时神情平静。
这引发了考生们对公考体检指定医院的质疑。
孟京辉回忆起郭涛的一件“糗事”。
胡骏透露，民国牌楼过去曾经维修过一次。
有次期末考试，有个填空题：问李清照是什么派的人？
郭磊也认为，财政定存的效果更为直接。
学生用力攥小鸭子的身体。
罗姆尼在耶路撒冷发表演说。
我爱你，你真的好棒喔！
它们能否永续生存，端赖人们的消费习惯而定。
人不为己，天崩地裂。
是主人在操纵我的心哟。
我一听说要找其他人去演时，就暗爽了，爽死了，太好了。
幸运的是，她被双腿截肢的王伟收养。
未能实现合同内容要求的应抓紧进行完善。
于是，景帝赐给他将军印，令其攻打吴国。
在南京地方方言中，“噢粑粑”意为“解大手”。
两人使劲争抢中，刀子被硬生生地拗成两截，刀柄跟刀身分开。
虽然爪子还不够锋利，但已经有模有样了。
这款机器人也有安卓版本。
现场两人大秀恩爱，羡煞旁人。
沙坡头很好玩，可以去见识下大沙漠风景。
他这个矿探不探我不知道，我也没见过探。
台方的重视或许由此可见？
图为一名学生在扯板房窗户上未撕掉的包装贴条。
但最开心莫过于医生告诉我囡囡十分健康。
谢诚昌认为，坪垟小学属于民办学校，教育部门无权撤并。
为了补贴家用，邵朝龙干起了将牲口搬上拖拉机的散活。
过去该公司是一个默默无闻的作坊式中药生产小厂。
如听到“冲鸟岛只是岛礁”这种话时，我们应该立刻予以反驳。
清淤、筑坝，让人可取水饮用。
重庆的纳税人愿意这样挥霍吗？
海巡舰靠拢过去，把救生圈甩给落水者，随后把她拉上了船。
跑好“三场”既要身投，更要心入。
南方叫外公，北方叫姥爷。
命令是不可违抗的。
打你几下会死啊？
祝你幸福美满哟！
那孩子咋上学呀。
完美颜值就是你。
今日上午将举行本年度首期购车摇号。
新华网北京二月十一日电：三、六、九，往外走。
原来她把睡房灯泡拆下来整个儿吞掉，只吃剩下了一根电线。
赵嵩偶尔在学校里看看朝鲜的电视。
但信贷依然如出笼猛虎，一路狂奔。
甘茨感谢习副主席拨冗会见。
有空调我感觉不到热呢。
一次，前夫带她到昆明筇竹寺时，与该寺百岁高僧结缘。
收费亭的自动栏杆已被卸下。
自东方园林上市以来，何巧女长袖善舞，继续迸发着巨大能量。
徐新语速很快，声音爽朗。
邹贵勇失踪那年，他们全家住在凯里火车站附近。
截至记者发稿时，气味已然散去，疑云依旧笼罩。
名人一吹我们就相信啦，就上当了，可悲呀！
这种冤冤相报何时有个了？
他没顾发表评论，挥笔就骂琼瑶，骂得浑身爽气。
大罐上方浓烟滚滚，火光冲天。
一次帆船比赛时，出于意外，默多克的手被缆绳剐伤鲜血直流。
跌幅方面，正保远程教育跌百分之六点三六，九城跌百分之五点零零。
冲锋在前的他，遭遇对方拼命拒捕反抗，右手肘粉碎性骨折。
稍一动弹，就疼得龇牙咧嘴，连连喊疼。
他们常年累月驻扎在海拔八百余米的山上。
你又在逗我玩了。
在枕头旁边，放十克左右切成丝的生姜，就能催人入眠。
他猫腰钻了进去，三个人手脚相绕。
无破不立，有舍有得。
当然，按要求送土特产的学生可适当免予处罚。
而阿娇戴着蛤蟆镜和毛绒耳麦，双手交叉悠闲自在。
所以电容屏更薄、透光率、耐候性和性能更好。
我们预计当当网二零一四年的运营利润额为百分之二。
他招来的小喽啰多为当地无业青年，为他跑腿贩毒。
为避免打草惊蛇，民警当即将当铺老板王某控制。
野猪糟蹋庄稼，村民就在山上私设电网电野猪。
等钱攒够了，就准备把房子收拾一下。
这根曾经的“杀威棒”如今似乎变成了“痒痒挠”。
你没车没房没存款还敢来相亲！
相遇总是猝不及防，而离别多是蓄谋已久。
那上面隐约可见斑斑点点的墨迹。
才坐定一会儿，主人又走进帐篷敬酒。
因此，嘎隆拉雪山被当地人视为神山。
陈同海受贿一点九五七三余亿元，也被判处死缓。
考生有压力，状元也不例外。
二是及时搞好中耕镇压。
但巴茨绝对不是好惹的。
叔祝福妞永远幸福快乐。
交警将掉出物品扔进车内。
昨晚跟老婆聊文章劈腿的事儿，老婆：这娱乐圈的绯闻真多！
扰攘五小时后，男子始态度软化，放下菜刀自愿开门。
看到有人在田埂上私自种茄子，工作队就去拔掉。
一名姓李的批发商说“看样子货要降价咯”。
亦有家长为了环保，不买新灯笼给子女。
如今，他只有周末会玩玩电脑，网瘾已经一去不复返了。
她不理母亲、顶嘴吵架甚至推搡她。
野兽日报网站将定期上传电子版节选内容。
工人找来扫水工具往外排水。
虽然偶然，但教训必须吸取。
可见皮实耐用依然是全新桑塔纳的精髓所在。
晓玲的作业故作艰深，大段大段都是“管锥编”里剽窃的。
上周日，他买了三斤香蕉，随意复秤后，发现只有两斤半。
这伙盗墓贼闻讯撤离。
就是想混淆一种概念。
公示公车身份，在车身的醒目位置喷涂“公车”字样。
妻子身上难受，腿脚发麻浑身肿胀，肚子跟皮球一样鼓。
那封古老的信也奋如黄鹤，至今没有一点回音。
诸葛紫岐与无线艺员魏俊皓一起出席鞋履活动。
要是腿软了，都会栽下来。
最终他将蛇咬死，为自己报了“一咬之仇”。
有观察者称，爆米花桶含荧光增白剂一点儿都不让人吃惊。
常辉给赵晓过了一个浪漫温馨的生日。
来采访下我们吧？
文凭的上半部分是密密麻麻竖行印刷的“上谕”。
所以今年我们店盈利无望，利润表现将逊于去年。
个来月的宝宝开始俏皮啦。
选拔考试门槛高、内容难。
美国战果最多的狙击手凯尔。
樱桃园中泪水，十二夜里笑声。
在东京都内开有一家蜡烛店。
我就赶紧给闺女打电话。
倚着洪崖洞的栏杆望去，还能清晰看到山体起伏，江水荡漾。
上场前二十分钟，朱之文两腿直哆嗦，感觉快站不住了。
而该小贩则丢下手推车逃窜。
卡塔尔也表示将向巴林派兵。
声明还称，刘銮雄被澳门终审法院要求仅作为证人出席聆讯。
然后老板开车猛倒，又往前冲。
当晚，蛋蛋和张艳娟住进了医院。
为什么晕，不对胃口吗？
地铁铁轨选材更讲究些。
天杀的，谁把我死了葬得好好的仓鼠挖出来洗！
涉及的几份名单中，均标明了运动员的出生年月。
两人当年因戏生情，迅速堕入爱河。
不过青霞对于未能协助张国荣摆脱忧郁症，始终耿耿于怀。
不过，六月初将上调该品牌奶粉价格。
特警抬了一块重型盾牌进入楼内。
主考者眼睛眯着，像是在挑蟋蟀，看谁斗得最猛拣谁。
包括烟花爆竹须绕行深圳。
车子的挡风玻璃碎裂，呈内凹状。
他笑余插些话：我听你一说，正好想起！
看到潘某与老汉都不再动弹，黄某匆忙掠取财物后逃走。
下西坑村饮水难只是东山岛的一个缩影。
我可以帮你查阅瑜伽资料。
讲着讲着，他一阵拳摩擦掌后，摇摇头、甩甩脚、掰掰手。
舍友何同学告诉记者，他们本学期才搬入华农华山校区宿舍。
因为葡萄酒里农药的残留来自于葡萄。
即使福拉多成为国足主教练，他主力右后卫的位置依然牢固。
众多乡亲簇拥观赏，惊叹之余期待试水成功。
被称为“东方维纳斯”的断臂菩萨像。
从照片上来看，陈冠希面目扭曲，皱纹纵横，实在是颓唐憔悴。
以目前的抛压情绪看，今日酒鬼酒仍有跌停可能。
老奶奶看看我坐下后叹气到：多好的小伙儿啊，可惜是个哑巴。
父母倒地不动弹后，冯天云回到自己屋里。
安德鲁和抹香鲸。
我们“国富民穷”吗？
趁斯嘉丽拧转面时，保镖更一时情不自禁开心大笑。
白酒虽已高估，但同类型的中医药仍具重估价值。
进行中心与发卡银行及商户的联网调试。
短信方便又省广告印刷费，成了蓝绿参选人都爱用的助选奇兵。
此外，幺幺九、幺二零和幺二二等电话也能打通。
是微软公司董事长呀。
翁振杰的确是一个资本能人。
等我老了也许会去跳吧。
美甲摊摊主小朱追了上去，将嫌犯施某某抓住。
她目前虽需医疗人员照顾，但身体仍然硬朗。
拉萨市政协副主席拉宗卓嘎提到一个细节。
我想请你滚出去。
久而久之，罗亚平养成了胆大泼辣、专横霸道、为所欲为的性格。
部分沿线列车受事故影响而晚点。
赣鄱大地再次迎来了雨雪交加的寒冷天气。
杨泓介绍，中国古代历史上有灭佛运动和佛像痤埋制度。
特朗普为制片人并担任嘉宾。
失恋的人特别喜欢往人烟罕至的角落里钻。
铁匠在给战马钉掌时，因缺少几颗钉子，有一只马掌没有钉牢。
李福根与两岁的幼儿尚未寻获，但生还机会极其渺小。
昨日，渝中区大坪一废品收购站里，旧酒瓶被打捆包装在一起。
下午第一个讲演主题是儿童职业体验馆。
如若有人反其道而行之，倒是有教唆犯罪的嫌疑。
当时，他身着白底黑点的短袖，着亮黑色长裤、黑袜、黑软皮鞋。
往昔，香港夜空星光璀璨，演绎东方不夜城的传奇。
一天生物实验，大家观察自己的唾液细胞，用显微镜看并记录下来。
高金素梅也因此被媒体封为“劈腿族”的成功样板。
腿脚矫正差不多了，夏竞生又开始寻思着让儿子能走动起来。
黄玉玲喊哑了喉咙，绝望地瘫坐在地上。
将一枚鸡蛋放在倒立的玻璃杯底部，也没有颠簸让其跌落。
她打开了一层一间门脸房的拉门，里面逼仄昏黑。
存折不就有帐号么。
选拔其他艺术品种的节目，也需要把眼界放宽些。
那齿孔衬托下的花，美的不得了。
哦，那你玩吧，不打扰你了。
它的到来，使全民压抑许久的投资、理财欲望喷薄而发，一浪高过一浪。
当你在制造一件产品时谈论爱有些荒谬可笑。
装股神，喵了个眯滴。
同时，喜马拉雅山脉南坡一带做好地质灾害预防。
要用你的双手创造财富。
视窗离不开鼠标，所以微软也生产鼠标，鼠标就是踹门的那只脚。
美国也从双边关系中受益匪浅。
沉没的机轮是查亚巴鲁号。
他决定利用业余时间宣传脆骨病，让大家关注脆弱的“瓷娃娃”。
但受宠于“年轻人”，她称一瘸一拐也要到西宁领这个奖。
突然，车前部靠驾驶座位置“哐啷”一声砸进一块巨石。
这已不是蔡某首次伸出肮脏之手。
与永久自行车、上海手表同列三大上海老品牌。
有关澳门过渡期的工作，近日已由上海远东出版社出版。
被剐蹭的飞机则需停场检修。
葫芦岛小伙田野。
使用坐果灵的西瓜果脐较大。
男子个人越野赛的桂冠则被甘肃选手王帧抢得。
小女儿也大声咒骂，表示要为父母讨回公道。
我们准备扫走这件垃圾。
一会会有彩虹的吧。
在掺混过程中工人发现部分“荔华”牌乳粉有结块、出虫现象。
伊朗与叙利亚两国关系密切。
大爷小明腼腆的说：我是无所谓，能不能给你大妈小花留条裤衩？
社论说，对税收的亮丽预期，所得税收的成长居功厥伟。
百老汇大街幺三五六号也被命名为海尔大厦。
在逛橘滋时，侯佩岑对童装爱不释手，连说“好可爱哦”。
截止一月二十五日，接入电话一万六千余个。
暂停结束时，女教头又与队员们击掌呐喊以鼓舞士气。
断不准官吏胥役藉词禁令扰累名间。
不过，再怎么样也无法比拟我们鬼鬼美丽的容颜。
晚上失眠我也会看电视消遣哦。
张将军尤为关心祖国统一的问题。
我想说我也这样认为的。
休闲时间还哼哼呀呀唱歌什么的。
尽管提意见，我会改正哒。
一把辛酸泪，满屏荒唐句。
正是因为陆春龙天性好动的性格，才一下子被伯乐相中。
三是加强政策支持，努力促进捕捞渔民转产转业。
楼市调控要防止“按下葫芦起来瓢”。
锄禾日当午，地雷埋下土。
自己身体要紧哦。
考古发现“疑似烧土”。
亚瑟小子遭歌迷飞踹面部。
买土豆还不如买迅雷去。
至于说手抖不抖，这与拍摄者是否专业有关。
国外也有爱奢侈品的官员，命运大多凋零。
吴雨霏笑言希望找到真命天子，但却会保密恋情。
刘嫄用棉签给父亲清洁牙齿时，做出张口的示范。
我对广场舞没兴趣。
高温让泳池成了市民为数不多可以撒欢儿的地方。
戛纳峰会应作出三方面努力。
大学时专修戏剧和艺术，打算从事电影业。
如有断月，补缴后有效。
王一楠化身巧手主妇。
家家有本难念的经啊！
我的乖乖要听党的话。
根据相关法律法规，宣告原审上诉人区润华无罪。
本人孕妇一枚…割割割…昨晚失眠，让二货老公给肚里的宝宝讲个故事。
现烧饼店关门，也让他很郁闷。
想想也没关系，是金子迟早会花光的！
王先生曾多次到港旅游。
爸爸打我，用木扫把打我。
搭讪有技巧，恋爱更有学问。
林莉也以高贵打扮出席活动。
杜姓养母追问“是不是王祖贤”，没想到傅瑞娇爽快地说“对”。
答：小菜，俺爹就是被我打残的。
陈强调恢复扁党员身份有助“平反”，但实质意义不大。
台大法律系学士，辅大法研所硕士。
有一种图片，叫眼不见为净。
记者致电宁波沁园公司。
祖儿不抗拒与歌迷拍拖，始终感情是讲缘分的。
轮胎马上漏气、瘪了下去。
目前还未有伤亡及损毁报告。
他啃着手上的嫩竹，时不时扭头瞅瞅欢送的队伍。
实现由农业大省向农业强省的转变？
以前三千米跑只要十二分钟，现在爬三层楼都喘气。
王平朗说，“三万”活动让他萌生了撰写“爱民十戒书”的想法。
会议向刘慧晏、卯稳国、何金平、史政颁发了任命书。
闯下大祸后，侯建勇逃到广东投奔亲人。
高中学历的杨小妹个儿不高，身体偏瘦，来自酉阳。
示威所在的广场内人满为患。
经调查，此男子叫胡孬，汝州市人，无业。
今天晚上造雪机会开一宿。
你尝尝地沟油，尝尝毒海带，再尝尝塑化茅台笑逐颜开。
刘丽问：称呢，你又如何呢？
今天一美元回到兑换一点六六一雷亚尔的水平。
在网络上捏造或者歪曲事实、散布谣言的行为要负法律责任。
油漆味扑鼻而来，几个人正忙着给一口崭新的棺材涂漆上色。
经费紧张，干部们又发牢骚。
年仅半岁的小孙子躲在那哇哇大哭。
吴博文个儿长得“太着急”，书读得也“太着急”。
杨振宁并没有因此颓废下去。
他们哪一个与穷苦沾边的？
直升机突降蚌埠淮河文化广场，引市民围观。
燕赵都市报上刊发的闫沛东就是我。
陪你一起赏月怎么样？
中方对奥尔默特总理的上述表态表示欢迎。
小明儿子五岁，姐姐外出办事，把三岁的外甥放在我家。
它并非单枪匹马，而是有“伴”而来。
中方反对为改革人为设定时限。
放一张躺椅，泡一杯咖啡，享受彻底放空的惬意时光吧。
据说看花坛的老爷爷每天都会向花坛里扔一个一元的硬币。
这咋看咋不像光明正大呢。
从邯郸市丛台花园里，一些树木已能看到浅浅绿芽。
他们拉拢了快递员组长林某。
且每户农民限购一辆。
送件披肩好了能和很多衣服搭配有格调。
像志玲姐姐那样嘛？
布达拉宫广场举行仪式，庆祝“西藏百万农奴解放纪念日”。
哎呦，都是大帅哥。
一时众说纷纭，“抡起大棒打蚊子”的质疑声四起。
悍妻虐夫示意图。
跪安吧，小主子！
据收银员介绍，一般遇到以分计价的就会四舍五入。
他的新剧“心战”正在香港播出，香港股指果然又拼命往下蹿。
俄总统叶利钦十八日也批评了波列瓦诺夫的作法。
所以必须及时阻止右倾化。
回应得干脆直接利落。
宋英夫妇无儿无女，生活非常节俭。
也有网友认为女当事人与男方的交往过于草率，“很傻很天真”。
她嘴里的“我儿”，说的是姑爷。
华女士回忆，父亲徐钰仁是一个评弹艺人，走南闯北到处演出。
韩敏承认，孩子是她拐走的。
黄启思一家如今用上了自来水，再也不用外出挑水。
钢拱桥下方就是郑州北铁路编组站。
葛伟和妈妈、姐姐留在杭州。
小猴哪受得了这番折腾，只能软软地趴在咪咪胸口。
公司招聘，应聘者要填表写自己的基本信息。
形容的是西施、貂蝉、王昭君、杨玉环四个人哦。
逯家蕊的先生潘晓鸣也是一位袖珍人。
中央企业的利润降幅更大。
有了它的帮助，望远镜便可以将非常暗的星星拍摄下来。
耿某一米七五左右，短发、大眼。
八一队的主攻仲为君也为球队砍下二十四分。
公交车七幺五路、五七七路，也可以走二七桥。
飞哥一拍老板的肩，向他要支烟，悠悠吐一口，说：我这叫肉包子打狗！
林雨翔梅开二度，窘促得说不出话。
自我保护意识较差，轻信大人，容易受诱惑、被哄骗。
南非法律允许一夫多妻制。
每分每秒你都要想好。
这是一场与死神比速度、与时间抢生命的紧急大空运。
他曾经营劳务派遣等生意，但生意经营都不算成功。
目前，希贾卜和家人在约旦。
昨日上午，陈瑞琼能开口小声地讲话。
另一名男工人也被跑车剐倒。
赵秋生与歹徒殊死搏斗，终因寡不敌众壮烈牺牲。
若此说法属实，则其余四对匝道也将存在同样隐患。
但我们的损失由谁来补？
陈铁带着刘影跑到哈尔滨，想在那儿躲几天。
他一开始走已经注定他要摔倒了。
客场吃亏，主场扯平。
你是要和我约会吗？
货源充足，都还有。
静音已取消。
辛苦拉扯大一儿一女。
有网店卖家坦言，主要是给宠友带来生活情趣。
到偏桥底村看了后，情况还不是这样。
我用皮带捆住腰，吊在巷道里的锚杆上，一直吊着。
古语有云称，天下熙熙，皆为利来，天下攘攘，皆为利往。
现在我们可以大胆展望一下。
声明重申对恶意中伤与抹黑的言论与报道，保留法律追究。
为什么王某怕丈夫伤害自己，非要进监狱逃避呢？
魏敏生表示，“薄王案”因骂引发，从深层次看，是利益团伙的内讧。
交警被颠下车摔在马路上。
门卫不敢担这个责任，扯谎说钥匙不在。
有深度，一层一层，向远延伸，给人无有穷尽的感觉。
以后离婚，也应该按照结婚的流程，倒叙顺序，演一遍。
小佩宣紧紧地抓着床上的被单，咬紧牙，一动不动。
总成交价格为五十四点三八六四亿。
这就是闻名于世的八廓街唐卡吗？
为了应付日寇与汉奸的突袭，她学会了打枪、放哨、巡逻。
该行业排名第一的为维基百科，得分为七十八。
其二，轴线尺寸不足。
酬壮志、铁窗寒彻，泮池磅礴。
西垟村村支书陈丐科所建的别墅。
如果捐献完，你们把器官取走了，家属以后来找我们怎么办？
君子动口不动手哦。
可能二零三一年会。
黄某佯装喝醉倒在床上假睡，看见李某和妻子拥抱接吻。
像巩新亮都是自己修图。
现在希望尽快把工作做完，可以抽空欣赏许志安演唱会。
叙利亚总统阿萨德与黎巴嫩总统苏莱曼的会谈也令人瞩目。
不过梦想着一夜暴富的他，开始炒股，不料血本无归。
在雅典奥运会上，刘翔和姚明是中国军团中最吸引眼球的明星。
蔡依林原来已带男友锦荣回家拜年，感情关系匪浅。
同时，建设陕北百万千瓦风电基地。
美女一愣弱弱的说：“我送你出去吧…”
此时的马老已连一句完整的话都不能讲了。
标准普尔将谷歌股票的评级从“买入”下调至“卖出”。
谆谆教导、殷殷期望，我们一定要铭记在心。
好害怕说错话，被你打。
女友问：“报社给的报酬你干什么用了？
红烧排骨，麻辣小龙虾。
曾假装晕倒并小便在裤子里。
这是头上簪菊的变俗。
他们说，累点没啥，只要能控制污染就行。
护士在照料产子后的“胖妈”。
在返回途中遭遇风雪，大风卷着雪花能见度很差。
台联苏辉委员用四个心表达自己对胡锦涛总书记讲话的感受。
你可以先冷静一下。
甜品是西米南瓜茸以及点心、水果各一份。
命悬一线的危难关头，姑娘们斗志爆发。
这显然比原判决还要荒谬。
不妨试试用低沉嗓音讲话。
皇帝的身子，奴才的命啊！
外脚手架搭设与方案不一致。
同日，敏敏也被抓获。
辛卯年清明公祭轩辕黄帝典礼在陕西黄帝陵隆重举行。
风雹所到，损失严重，尤以河南、安徽为甚。
蚂蚁蚂蚁，蝗虫的大腿。
难道那不比我厉害吗？
混浊的河水裹着树枝等杂物向下游滚滚而去。
就云南铬渣事件来说，赔偿款给谁？
第十六届中央候补委员。
当时他被吓坏了，赶紧越过周克华迅速跑远。
受高空槽影响，昨天上午起，全市陆续飘雪。
最近我堕落成了轻微懒癌患者，这都被你发现了？
目前少年与女友吵架，女友负气离家后向涮涮锅店辞职。
用天津话说，就是“兜里揣副牌，逮谁跟谁来”。
不过，恬妞的情路却颇为坎坷。
唐维的表姐左海燕打通了电话。
三是领土海洋问题不时凸显。
晓菲有一个和她长得几乎一模一样的孪生妹妹晓月。
国家法律有明文规定，出土文物不可以买卖。
罗天诚被自己的问题反呛一口，看窗外景物不说话，由大雅变成大哑。
偶尔约一些朋友吃饭。
我真的会答应的噢。
应酬少了，发言短了。
平壤民俗公园全景。
颈子上还有掐痕。
好像有点儿荒唐。
等菜卖完，俺回家吃。
老婆骂我是废物啥都不会，我一气之下摔门而出，在路上溜达了半天。
一场暴雨袭来，水流越来越湍急。
很多年轻父母称自己为“孩奴”，称抚养和教育孩子为“烧钱”。
会议在五楼会议室举行。
傍晚六点去超市购物。
凶徒们将姜老板和女儿女婿捆了起来，逼他们交钱。
而且范冰冰还年轻，媒体不要这样糟蹋一个好演员。
我的压岁钱妈妈帮我存银行里，就是这么没了的！
只有王小平驾驶警车，如一张膏药贴在三菱越野车后面。
其中，陈金火完成器官捐赠。
美丽的幌子下掩藏着杀机。
钟嘉欣吻小女孩。
不过很明显，梅耶尔并不是谷歌派往雅虎的“卧底”。
难道你不想跟笨妞聊聊天嘛？
仔细看，能看到金属带四五处被撞或刮擦产生的凹痕。
我妹妹还小，她们肯定更需要关爱。
临床表现为烂蹄、烂嘴、走路跛脚等特征。
市委副书记殷一璀，市委常委、副书记屠光绍出席仪式。
他是广大侨胞和归侨侨眷的知音和挚友。
货架上的熊胆粉、熊胆茶包装精美，数百元不等。
我国的粗钢产量也居全球第一。
此后偷盗情况有所好转，但仍时有村民翻越栅栏。
其余的预算将用于购买服务器和电脑。
两队最后以六十五比六十五打成平手。
刚才听课文录音太困了，眯一下，就算是休息。
那就不要跟偶聊天了啊。
听说浣花溪公园很好玩，我也想去看看呢。
等售票员说“没票”时，李竹清就像霜打的茄子蔫啦。
不少网友为林俊点燃蜡烛，祝他“一路走好”。
卖水果的鲜货铺、卖月饼的点心铺都开始整理铺面、布置橱窗。
每人每天能扫出一车斗。
长耳朵能帮助它扇动空气，寻找气味来源。
不过，过去的二传都是矮个子。
这件事让申敏感觉特别委屈。
值得肯定的，备胎采用了全尺寸轮胎，很厚道。
厨房的一扇门已经朽烂。
第二天我尝试那种状态，词儿一样，劲儿，不一样了。
你觉得小俗怎么样？
邹某现场被公安机关挡获。
车在布满深浅不一水坑的路上颠簸前行。
张垚在向云村的家，屋后就是高山，一到夏天蚊子很多。
你忍心让我这么担心吗？
聚林一家边赏风景边拍照片，喜鹊就围着聚林转，飞飞停停。
辽阔的江面至此陡然收窄。
作为陪客的我，心中亦觉得暖融融的。
当中以压轴出现的容祖儿反应最热烈。
午饭吃面条或馄饨，晚饭随子女一起吃饭。
经过专家讨论并根据家长愿望，医院最后决定为连体儿分离。
得道多助，失道寡助。
天秤座博爱，喜欢与人分享。
另外的人抢我手机，摁头摁手。
我觉得是她想要热闹一下啦。
省廉自办正在对这些疑似车辆进行核查。
出门左转，找个岗亭，你去问问大盖帽叔叔。
据统计，目前“幺二三四五”日拨打量约四千五百件。
现在志云亦决定离开，“迷云党”已全面瓦解。
不敢下来，道儿太黑了，怕走路摔跟头。
小羽也很倔，就是不低头认错。
随后，这批蟒蛇被送到合肥动物园，均得到妥善安置。
我家住六楼没电梯所以懒的下去。
帖文引起了众多网民关注。
工作人员忙着收钱，瞟都不瞟一眼资料，更不用说核实身份。
心生抱怨的我嘟囔了一句：“拿根鸡毛当令箭！
预计二零一零年八、九月开张运作。
人类存在一个美丽的幻想：能像鸟儿一样自由飞翔。
临近天黑，不打算空手而归的他咬咬牙关买了一块歙砚毛料。
不能多施肥，就在土壤里配几味温和的中药。
该院院长杨开乔表示，“状元”只是“偶然”，高分群体更有说服力。
烧香完毕后，一家人分着供品吃，一瓣瓣苹果一串串葡萄。
裘千仞一脸为难，说：我……试试吧。
男子闷闷不乐地离开。
周六，姥姥姥爷同时血压降低。
现在想想，丢了好像也很正常，耍手腕我耍不过其他人。
然后我们就往楼顶跑，在楼顶向下呼救。
那要是有个病有个灾的，还得往城里折腾。
亲人们为龚勇更衣时，发现他身上贴着很多膏药。
在旅馆安顿好后，他便忙于自己的毕业论文。
王冶东听见里面的歌词，又勾起伤心。
施工现场沙石、土方等散体材料必须严密遮盖等。
就是长远目标和谋略呀，主人研究什么战略问题呢？
你做的歹越多责任越可以推脱，这完全是一种谬论。
以前在家里爱唱爱跳，干着家务嘴里都哼着歌。
闲着没事买了本瑜伽书，让男友陪着练。
蕴藏了近千公里的激情，一时喷涌而出。
最常见的就是刻有佛教六字真言“唵嘛呢叭咪吽”的石块。
昨日，省会空气污染指数为六十四，空气质量为良。
这首诗的名字叫“悯农”
网络舆论极易成为整个社会信息舆论系统的不稳定因素。
我朋友见状说：“早知道给这个美眉也买几串就好了！
却遭到校方施压阻止举报。
反正我挺支持的。
胥某至死也没弄明白，自己究竟为何被打。
何时才能闻到喷鼻的高粱米饭的香味呢？
大部分地陷坑深约一两米，直径约五六米。
耿谆等战俘经石家庄被运至北京。
金门旋风访问两个多小时，被蔡英文列为本周“秘密武器”。
但女儿听不进去呀！
结果嘛，他一定会结结实实地揍我一顿。
但中奖少，亏钱多。
图为工作人员在编织毛线娃娃。
你以后要幸福，找个比我弱的人，这样我要是去抢婚还能抢过他。
食用植物油中一般不含胆固醇或含量极低。
这结果令麦克米伦的家人感到震惊，女死者的胞兄肖恩。
补考不通过便会延长学籍。
谁该拥有这件国宝级文物的所有权？
近代意义上的遗产税始于一五九八年的荷兰。
佛罗伦萨，主人带我去看看嘛。
温顿还养了两匹马、一条狗、一只长尾小鹦鹉、一些鸡和猫。
在日本听罗斯特洛波维奇指挥的音乐会，我曾亲身到过那块儿土地。
和谐六号车厢比现用和谐号更宽敞。
章林浩没预料到这突发情况，呛了一口，药卡在喉咙里，百咽不下。
从此往后我给他什么他都不吃。
那以后我不问了。
图为被凿开的墙洞。
葛启义进门后顺楼梯而上，又被守楼梯口的警察拦住。
大家都携儿带女，朝西边的县城方向跑。
当天，尹恩惠身穿粉红上衣黑色芭蕾舞裙，模样十分甜美。
萨米娅和家人逃到喀布尔郊区，过起隐蔽的生活。
当时，我感觉搞企业真好。
她与台湾人气明星胡宇崴一同演绎甜蜜幸福的爱情。
写小说的凭什么写到男女分手就得命令老天爷掉几个雨点下来？
此种要求，只能用“荒唐”来形容。
天天哭穷，年年亏空。
虽然与贵州山水相连，但渝黔两地旱情迥异。
拿到邮包后，李平决定把这件新棉袄给蔡连坡。
截至周三收盘，该公司市值为二点五一七二亿美元。
历史书上介绍慈掉却不说顽固党，编的人水平还没我高呢。
宝盆上有许多弩手和弓箭手。
已经挖开的路基，旁边的树被草绳捆绑起来。
第二年，女儿曹柳柳降生。
然后生活方面也很折腾。
北京市市政市容委及时启动扫雪铲冰应急预案。
李松说，侄女陶梦婷乖巧懂事，学习成绩也特别好。
小冰我痛苦地捂住了脸。
父亲和二叔被日本人抓走，爷爷接着暴毙，留下一群孤儿寡母。
在得到姚存林老人的同意后，欧阳兆堂张罗开来。
我年方二八，尚未婚配。
事后，唐娟被这群男生一脚踹翻在地。
路骤然变小天上没有星月，衬得这夜空格外幽凉。
美国电子隐私信息中心认为，这些词汇太“宽泛、模棱两可”。
出让总金额为三十七点二七七亿元。
寒潮近日席卷欧洲多个国家。
男友：沈阳海狮与重庆隆鑫比赛后的第二天。
多的时候一套户型能反复修改十几遍。
林欣彤频频吸金，笑到眼睛都眯起来。
我尽了最大的努力，为了留一个员工熬夜陪他聊。
因为她为人细心、勤劳，家里被她操持得井井有条。
泽尻英龙华将与丈夫一刀两断。
中方应邀参加招待会的有黄华、刘华秋、韩叙、刘述卿、陆璀等。
家里的藏书只能起到对外炫耀的作用，对内就没这威力了。
下面听听任春您的视角观察的一些情况。
此前一天，该案另一逃犯朱猛也被警方抓获。
别整这没用的，快告诉我车撞哪了？
改扩建后的静安寺殿宇嵯峨、金碧辉煌。
余雄揉揉他的左手，说：废话，当然痛。
范某随即按了十几声喇叭，但熊某并未予以理会。
十八大代表饶富通。
可王宝海不这样看，他说：不就是睡一宿觉吗？
而每过一道关卡，都要用钱来打点。
与居民储蓄增长相匹配。
忘不了叔叔阿姨那憋不住的表情。
辐照并不适用于所有的药材。
非洲手鼓最初是铁匠们用来捣碎杂粮的臼手工制造的。
幸好轮机长藏了些柴油。
位于日喀则西南市郊的德庆格桑颇章内人头攒动。
巴沙尔的前途命运应交由叙利亚人民决定。
我不傲娇，我很谦和的。
阳光洒落，心却不暖。
史颖死守观点，说：大家让一下就没事了。
也恳请社会，恳请法律能够对我的犯罪情节予以宽大处理。
楼、床的晃动持续约数十秒。
国手云集是乒超的一大卖点。
米雪见到记者时一脸惊讶，及后即强颜欢笑。
算起来应该比我大几岁吧。
开元公司打着机关的牌子坑骗顾客。
之后，双方开始互扔物品。
银尕说，他正在现场指挥抗震救灾。
李倩坦言，参加华表奖属首次。
有些国家也加到漱口水、牙膏里。
此外，舰载预警机对航母而言也是不可或缺的。
到医院检查为心脏房颤。
戈尔说，他与克林顿夫妇是好朋友。
您也可以报名参与，说说您的看法。
格雷夫的父亲兹维说，看到儿子棺木那一刻，他完全崩溃了。
谢谢您的配合，请进！微笑依旧，威武依然。
不过得江山容易，守江山难！
民警还在刘东身上搜出一把折叠刀和医用镊子。
比尔盖茨要来讲演的消息就是从这看到的。
我量了一下体温，好像发烧。
这名溜走的男子就是王伟。
伊朗与六国今年以来已进行两轮伊核问题谈判。
报道称，东欧一些生活艰苦的女性愿意以出售卵子维生。
丑小鸭很快显出白天鹅的模样。
但就在这里，却每晚都有人公开屠宰死田鸡。
网友“一抓一个准儿”与住房联网的“无为而治”形成鲜明对比。
如果我滚远了就回不来了。
太太高龄怀第一胎，刘德华本已非常紧张。
绑匪现阶段没有索要赎金。
皇后之玺，金螭虎纽。
物流曾是国外网商的短板。
王女士总共损失十一点四二五四万元。
校草不慌不忙把电话说完，对着二货就开骂：谁特玛的用真名出来混的？
行业回暖必须以行业结构调整，基本面的变化为基础。
讽刺总是尖锐的，然而幽默的讽刺却出于苦口婆心的善意。
特侦组何时传讯犯行明确的谢长廷？
如何弥平双方阵营的裂痕伤口？
一年前，央视曾报道有不少人因吃生泥鳅而中毒入院。
此时的张咪如浴火重生。
女老师埋头查半天，一推眼镜，哟的一声，叫得他心惊肉跳，几乎昏倒。
今天稍早，国会三度通过容许所有公民出马角逐总理职位的法案。
这是“青海陨石”中被买走的首块大陨石。
你先给我讲一个吧。
美女主播杜沁怡受其钦点，担当此次唱片发布会的主持。
身旁的千嬅即叫乐仔快些娶太太。
今后，这些行为统统不被允许。
杨敏断定，这家伙肯定有情况。
看完瞬间温暖全无，爸，你够了！
降雨量大，已经成为了“莫拉克”的烙印。
周杰伦对狗仔一向不客气。
刘勇明说老婆是“极品好”。
随后，旁边有人用腿连踹红衣少年的腹部。
除了王菲外，章子怡同样低调现身，她表示是来捧导演场。
村民介绍，大土丘即皇坟“刘备墓”。
但这些事总得有人做呀。
一般情况下，狗场是狗市和宠物店的狗源地。
出纳喜出望外，二人沆瀣一气，上演了一场“双簧戏”。
香港将拍卖蒋介石青天白日勋章，真伪引起讨论。
曼迪捏造了整个故事。
明天回老家，看看老父亲大人，和娃娃玩几天再说。
主人在打扫笼舍，“崽崽”热情地用鼻子拱主人的腿。
随后，胡某柴向湖滨所报警。
刘建华开始张罗午饭。
王强搀着妻子，赶往医院。
完全没有减少一点儿收费。
保安和路人纷纷追撵。
面对索罗斯的名头，杨炯纬也不是没有担忧。
昨日下午，记者从六安市裕安区法院了解到这桩稀罕官司。
昨日，疑犯葛金水痛哭流涕。
我的第二外语日语并不是很好。
他们两个人，我打不赢，难道挨打呀？
有没有唯美一点的？
这里有文化创意区。
混堂巷的窨井盖。
我二话不说，立即应允。
任爽与印尼同学。
同时，由灭火组出水枪进行控火。
你有的吃有的玩有钱花还有我陪你，你有什么不开心的呢？
是你偷走了密码箱吗？
避让者被称为“胆小鬼”，胜利者则被称为“勇敢者”。
记者走访了杨德才出租屋附近的一些住户。
而为了逃离这场婚姻，张红又做出了比闪婚更荒唐的举动。
之后虽然企稳并与大盘同步上行，但短期颓势难改。
拟任省委巡视组组长。
马英九日前在景美人权园区，遭“独派”人士呛声丢鞋。
余文乐于餐厅内突然离座，原来是去柜台结账。
但是斯塔塔坚信，平板阅读的前景一片光明。
也有可能是更换的钢架质量未达标。
美国驻埃及开罗大使馆也遭袭击，星条旗被撕扯。
中州路上车来车往，喇叭声和发动机的嗡嗡声此起彼伏。
喜爱与收藏这些娃娃的人主要以女性居多。
陈莉拄拐上法庭受审。
张翰望着父亲的背影，自言自语道：哈，赌场出疯子，情场出傻子。
市场操纵的案件亦未能断绝。
我会给儿子换纸尿裤。
彭勃思忖再三后对周晓荷面授机宜，要她化名与对方洽谈。
窗户完好，盗贼是强行踹门入室。
当然啦，那么多破绽，她怎么敢回答呢，以免越说越错。
王志敏扛不住，还哭过鼻子。
孙晓艳却认为张伟太不讲理。
这对于有全职太太的家庭比较划算。
记者随后从医院了解到，杨爹爹伤重不治身亡。
于是，石柏魁将展板抠了一个大洞。
卡马乔经常会重复这些。
闻讯而来的数名老师奋力踢破房门，但唐已躺倒在血泊中。
沉睡的汉朝怎么叫也叫不醒。
他说，这一言论贬毁克里斯蒂娜，“无法接受”。
下午派出的三人小分队，则往幺妹峰的背面搜寻。
其中，花大如碗口，绛红的花瓣，金色的花蕊，雍容华贵。
剧组是寒碜的，但也是温暖的。
暴雨造成境内山洪暴发，河流、水库、山塘水位陡涨。
后来我们有人送来涮羊肉和灌肠，它才吃起来。
安瓦尔被捕后，一些反对党的议员纷纷聚集在警察局外。
旧坟翻新后变豪华。
我学习过推拿，主人快休息一下吧！
经此一役，廉署在市民中的威望大增。
他的未婚妻盖儿也未看出异状，只帮他消毒。
小区业主选绕路或举着钱包手机蹚水进小区。
在现代化征程上跋涉，瘸着腿走不好，更走不远。
更有一些顾客为夫妻俩找新店铺的事操起心来。
他允诺继续倾听民意，把民众的期待摆在心中。
昨天下班回家，蹭同事的车，半路遇一超短裙美女，同事看的入神啊！
斜坡尽头是曹操墓的东门，门口的墓砖参差不齐。
小恒的眼睛一直盯着电视屏幕，每隔几秒便眨一次。
这时的饶岚，再次站上舞台。
于是，他趁儿子在卧室玩电脑之机，将儿子掐死。
博尔特旋风般掠过终点。
一九五三年，关于毕加索享有过分特权的争论终于爆发。
从正月初二开始，天气逐渐转好。
七亘村战斗之前，我师已打了两仗。
可老师告诉她，贫困生可以申请免学费。
王俊洲证实，孙一丁已经向国美方面提出辞职。
五十五年前被“猫王”拥吻的神秘女郎首次曝光。
彭定康个性非常硬朗。
比如李嘉欣的丈夫许晋亨，他的爷爷是香港一代船王许爱周。
傣族妇女徐小闷正在自家废墟上整理砖瓦。
喝杯牛奶，看个电影啦。
如果因为你耽误进度怎么办？
广州市会不会也撤销街道办？
全国部分省市阶梯电价最终方案一览表。
涌冒不已的水花，恰像银珠玉粒骨碌碌地滚流着。
正是这种宁为玉碎，不作瓦全的不必要的意气把他推向死亡的边缘！
去揣摩别人是怎么演戏的。
从那个时候，秉哲就与蟒蛇玩在一起。
学会骑马体会到纵横驰骋的感觉要半年。
香炉峰山路沿途处处可见游客乱扔的垃圾。
由于气温适宜，今年逛花街的市民热情高涨。
避免因学生上学难度增加造成过早辍学。
麦克菲的支持者在监狱外举牌要求还麦克菲公正。
国家已经承认我们了，但是太晚了。
耳朵在流血，眼睛闭起的。
间或也会涉及胡绳先生。
老人扫起街来一丝不苟。
鬣羚，又叫苏门羚、明鬃羊、岩驴，也称“四不像”，产在东南亚及中国。
谢谢大家聆听我们这次论坛，谢谢各位嘉宾。
而等张宏伟跳窗的时候，火已经烧到了他的手臂。
王全安正巧也入住该酒店，两人却没时间碰面。
平日里还是挖点山药材，换点钱度日。
在伊万和莎娃争奇斗艳的背后，是塞俄两大红粉军团的整体抗衡。
上回那篇参加全国征文比赛的大作已经凑出了交了上去，杳无音讯。
郑爽听到要上楼，踌躇着不前。
烟尘从井内迅速冒出来，把整个台球桌都包围了。
所谓“人民币崩盘说”纯粹是一种危言耸听。
庭审中，夫妻俩泪洒法庭并双双认罪，希望法官从轻处理。
法轮功的邪，不就体现在泯灭人性上吗？
工作人员在擦拭汉白玉栏杆。
林父对钱怜惜，转而变成对旅游的痛恨。
胡济兴说，他非常仔细，遇到稍微歪的秧苗都要一一扶正栽好。
这些说法并非吹毛求疵。
天安门广场，一派春意盎然。
科斯坚纽克的美丽看似狂野，实际上却有知性的内涵。
百视达曾经是全球最大的电影租赁连锁运营商。
天麻胶囊则没有中标。
地藏菩萨铜像由洛阳铜加工集团金像公司负责监制。
广州中院法官也证实，黄汉标走路有点瘸，但并不明显。
补助按月发放，由见习基地和政府补贴共同分担。
昨天，警方向媒体通报了蔺某盗窃案的侦破情况。
出品方也表示只要电影票房给力就拍“窃听三”。
至此，网上追逃人员蓝延强的身份彻底被“漂白”。
滞洪区本是空的，相当于电脑缓存。
那就加油努力赚钱喽。
王冰打错了算盘，没过几天，侯永付又故伎重演。
当然，弟兄也就只能饿着肚子杀敌了。
虽然生活中爱耍宝，训起练来冯哲却一点也不含糊。
昌一些中小学生被高利贷“黑手”“拽”入赌博深渊。
六岁的小壮壮，无疑是她温情母爱的寄托。
其中一条鲨鱼已经被市民瓜分成几块，鱼案上淌满了鲜血。
超市不承担临期食品损失，没必要篡改生产日期。
刚刚有谁在说话吗？
与超市无关之类的理由呢？
在蝗蝻密度最大的地方，一脚能踩死几十头。
近期，有外媒揣测其在为第三次核试验做准备。
曾经有个代表提议瓮安该通火车，我发言支持。
希望通过绿色环保与科技支撑，推动体育文化的人文提升。
近日查处的胡星案、邱晓华案便是如此。
受虐程度越高，基因变化越大。
他厌恶艺术没落、颓废的现象。
前不久，阿娟去了趟省妇保。
接着，他又走进客厅，将爷爷推倒在地，同样用菜刀猛砍过去。
在这之前，我国黄金储备仅一千九百二十九万盎司。
不仅如此，刘嘉玲也在微博实况转播热闹气氛。
何洪志非但不思悔改，反而跑到广州跟着彭章云混。
我会偷偷讲主人的坏话嘻嘻。
不少网友戏称为“卵民论”。
自己的事情要自己做哟。
经验证，子弹疑发自梁本人的警用左轮手枪。
拿到扫帚的张以任跑到马路上，开始扫一地的烟花屑。
目前委托书正在草拟之中。
该提案称，北京煎饼果子摊儿的治理刻不容缓。
白鹭映春洲，青龙见朝暾。
看来该片实行“水嫩”到底。
第二次醒来，她又去晒衣服。
尽管奶源有限，我国乳业现状却是企业数量较多且参差不齐。
人耳鼠技术，我相信没有问题。
喜鹊网依然是投资尝试，投资极其有限。
风筝高飞线在手。
南来北往，游人如织。
关黄金蟒的箱笼。
自驾游客出游时应该注意些什么？
时代周报记者欲带刘志安离开砖厂，因有人阻挠，未能如愿。
她说，赵玉环给警察做了手语翻译，得罪了人。
那范晓受仰慕他的才华，忽略外表，和林大哥厮守。
不料菲方撕毁承诺，拒绝调查小组进行调查。
红杏探出苏南的墙头，难！
其言谆谆，其意切切，充分表达了党对当代青年的厚望与重托。
法新社竟称，尼泊尔遣返非法入境藏人是迫于中国政府压力。
该负责人强调，“初筛分诊制度”和打击号贩子无关。
这也是蹦床项目比较残酷的一面。
啪一下动力蹿出来，在行驶中特别危险。
随后，金正恩下达命令开始进行演习。
柯木塱坳头村内鳞次栉比的新建筑。
外界熟知的老故事是，哪怕买把扫帚，都得宗庆后批准。
你们别这么毁我行不行。
我怕水！在躲雨呢！
飘扬吧，鲜红的国旗，飘扬吧，亿万颗重叠的心。
提到程婆婆劈床的事，张权有不同说法。
前几日的茂县、汶川等震中地区降雨较多、云层较厚。
昨天说也许他们的奶粉比咱们贵，也许都会买。
据悉，默尔西在总统府为坦塔维和阿南举行授勋仪式。
很多人认为港姐胸平身材差，不少人还有小肚腩、水桶腰、赘肉。
不久前，雅虎与社交网站“脸谱”合作。
抛尸地点较为偏僻，附近少人居住。
后来儿子大了，王学圻“攒”下的军装儿子一件都没穿过。
总理，您整天操劳费心，您当总理累瘦啦，可俺们老百姓却胖啦。
没男朋友还敢撞我，看老子不削死你个憋犊子！
因此包润石的谈话，颇不寻常。
后来，多亏工友把她刨出来。
市场舆论都认为是“筑底企稳”。
而吆喝终究是手段，“如果酒不好，越吆喝越糟”。
究竟该如何看待深圳物业的外销市场呢？
他和孩子们用餐、去斯坦普斯中心彩排。
勾机开进村，全面拆除走私旧服装窝棚门店。
大多数人要么正在往家赶，要么已经在家操持着年夜饭。
队员们又赶紧用卫星电话给游客的家里报平安。
切尔西从小喜欢排球、玩牌、乒乓球还有电影。
湖北省水利厅农水处副处长王煌。
果断放弃王尊这个我喜欢的名字。
韩品芹就在顾家隔壁一家针织印染厂工作。
再看见你要饭就揍扁你。
这里有个葫芦头泡馍馆。
如今胡杏儿大器晚成，成为炙手可热的双料视后。
他卯足劲儿想爬起来，但始终没劲儿。
在李永波以及高崚等队友的劝说下，黄穗又重新拿起球拍。
在堰塘乡场镇边的老井旁，人们同样在排队舀水。
有一年，一大把年纪的公公婆婆大老远跑到宁波来看我。
会，不就是把一千改成四百嘛。
显然，这些破碗有些年月了。
带钻孔的鸵鸟蛋壳。
水警小艇、海事处船只、趸船在旁戒备。
迈克尔杰克逊死后事情仍纠缠不清。
在保供应中，“短腿”是蔬菜。
维修人员稍作休息，村民抓紧时间下坑接水。
全家商量过了，春节就搬过来住，今年过个不串房檐儿的大年。
一般及行政费用增加主要是由于业务拓展所致。
那天喝了酒，越想越窝囊，就去棉纺厂闹事。
小说家根一时找不到一种既通俗又高雅的东西反驳，无话可说。
村庄历史最早记载见于一四六一年。
女孩拗不过小钟，没拦他。
许世虎同时指出，女大学生参加选美要有所选择。
盘中触及六点二二六二，创汇改以来新高。
汪洋参加深圳代表团审议并发表重要讲话。
豫园景色很美，是上海市区唯一留存完好的江南古典园林。
会场内，歌声嘹亮，群情激昂。
但谁能抗拒彰显聪明的诱惑？
羡慕嫉妒恨、吞口水。
荣育向习近平献花串。
光袜子就塞了十几双。
可能听上去有点傻。
其实对于三安的软肋，总经理林科闯有着清醒的认识。
中华回乡文化园挺好玩儿的，可以感受回族的生活呢。
其外包装和商品名称，均与山东驰名商标“东阿阿胶”构成近似。
驻守在海拔五千三百米的查古拉哨所，不见飞鸟，不见绿草。
收缴的钱款现已进入银行清退专户，准备一并清退。
虽然瓮津郡采取了降低船票价等措施，但收效不大。
还很喜欢只用睫毛膏、粉底和腮红的简单妆容。
行李打包处，旅客们在忙着捆绑行李，安检入口也秩序井然。
这些隐形轰炸机的打击目标是利比亚军用机场。
见过驴吃草，可没见过驴吃肉。
更多的人还是左右张望，万分无奈下，实在没办法才回国。
女友呆呆的说：“比我笨的人呗！
因为这样可以少引发心血管疾病。
他的母亲魏春坐在地上，已经哭得喉咙沙哑。
他们掌握财富的主要原因是因为拥有不动产。
玩累了就躺着听戏晒太阳。
收回的选票少于发出的选票，选举有效。
这些专业琴师是要付报酬的。
李扬本想拒绝，却神使鬼差点了头。
他踱到教室里，见自己桌面上静躺了一封信，心猛然一跳。
几天前，他来到余姚找姐姐。
他此后的人生之路会一帆风顺吗？
换乘距离也将缩短到百米内。
她说要舔哪里都可以。
父亲说他无钱为儿操办婚事，打算去卖肾。
这个故事的寓意，就是要鞭挞那些只会马后炮的庸者。
保护区管理处、东旺沙边防派出所接令立刻出动。
从此，江界河移民成了瓮安一块板结的伤疤。
我们一起回忆邓颖超同志对孩子剧团的关怀。
近一周以来，她神情恍恍惚惚，身处梦境的感觉如影随形。
五是搞好爱心服务。
吴耿的“胃口”越来越大。
她的宝宝四个多月。
杨开慧的父亲杨昌济就是毛主席得益良深的修身教师。
孙建华同时上传了“剁指照片”。
八宝粥搭配煮鸡蛋，早晨营养加油站。
保安用手掐住记者脖子抢相机。
电视里画面跳动，他们却如三尊雕塑。
真的是与人祸迥然有别、两不相干吗？
我恳请广大父母让孩子熟读“弟子规”孝敬父母，百善孝为先。
孙晓雯设计的概念表在读秒，迎接奥运的到来。
村委会否认毁损王某儿子的坟墓，不同意赔偿。
小汽车成为主要增长点。
子淇又透露妹妹刚诞下孖仔，但会继续追女。
要我放纵，我做不到。
李先生取钱时，银行营业员曾提醒李先生验钞，但他拒绝了。
然而，这样找女儿如同大海捞针。
你俩的牛奶在哪儿买的？给我上一车！
与王政的看法不同，刘薇给舫儿上了中国户口。
他出去一看，一名老太太正与一名黑衣年轻男子拉拉扯扯。
野性未驯的翅膀一挥，几乎就能把他搡个跟斗。
美国民主党智囊团的说法值得玩味。
今天的北京阳光非常灿烂。
嫁妆应该是我妈妈送给我吧。
我没，我只是——她低头要拆信。
变更具体事项的名称、理由及依据。
温妻的一个耳朵没有听力，还有点半哑。
惟有学而不厌的先生，才能教出学而不厌的学生。
昨日，北大，工人把砍倒的杨树运走。
他通过“脸谱”开始追踪莫瑞。
电视剧上面演过的。
为避免引起别人的注意，夫妻俩还密谋报假案。
不要用嘴去吮吸伤口，也最好不要用酒精去清洗。
原因很简单，几乎所有推荐生都“非优即官”无可挑剔。
自此，吴倩莲就少有作品问世。
周某某瞅准空当，拼命逃离了现场。
记者还怂恿孙俪亲邓超，孙俪婉拒了。
所以说，亚马逊让谷歌寝食难安，也就不足为奇了。
网上盗版太欺负人，作家们终于难忍不平一声吼了。
右丙氧芬的使用安全性低、过量风险高。
太阳快落山了，我告别村里的乡亲们，离开沁县返回太原。
蜀黍说，报案可不能憋着啊，该报就要报，别怕麻烦蜀黍。
母亲一声尖叫，引来邻居科亨。
此时的沁沁还有呼吸，并不断轻声呻吟着。
我会讲冷笑话，有颜色笑话暂时还不会。
早晚要多穿一点。
宁波人，很厉害哟。
男子解释，这头骆驼脾气很好。
专案组判断，吕某有重大作案嫌疑。
政府军正试图切断通往贾尔镇的物资渠道。
汪峰乐意看两个人斗，斗出点事情才好呢。
因为我呀想给你最好的答案。
小春没有得罪人，扪心自问不用怕。
听众则听得津津有味，获益匪浅。
少顷，果真有一小和尚翻墙，黑暗中踩着老禅师的脊背跳进院子。
我哪敢放松啊，一天恨不得有三十二小时才好。
而除了“划线”外，庞卫国也逐渐开始担任解说嘉宾。
日本是与波兰达成减免债务协议的第十个国家。
此外，快男苏醒和女星李菲儿也受邀参加了此次活动。
这让深泽铁杆镇东河疃村的李印旨一家沮丧不已。
这出戏似乎又多出一点“作料”。
卧槽，这是要整死我们的节奏啊！
加了玉的奖牌是否能抵抗外力冲击？
见面会现场，刘诗诗频频咧嘴露牙大笑。
事后警员到场调查，初步无可疑，但未发现遗书，堕楼原因未明。
在第三进堂屋上方，还保存着南京几无仅存的祖宗阁。
早前有指郑视帝在片场耍大牌，颖儿即在微博发功维护。
跑了三十多米自己也熏到了。
半夜吃东西是补充脂肪的最好办法，想长胖就不要错过！
不远处还有农民正在用水泵引柳干渠中水灌溉。
肝癌的发生，很大部分跟乙肝有关。
再有，可使用唇膏，并避免舔嘴唇。
中国好脏、好乱，好快活。
你再这样不务正业，玩物丧志的话，我就跟你离婚！
片段中的基努剪了一头短发及剃净胡须，恢复其英俊本色。
遇险船只距离岸边七八十米，仅剩一根钢缆固定，洪水湍急。
有人敲窗时，不轻易解锁下车。
他大惊，说：你老虎屁股也敢摸？
如果我们不需要补丁，可以停用应用引擎实例，不用为此付费。
酸雨污染是个区域性的问题。
她喜欢颜色鲜艳的衣服。
混混左右开弓，噼呖啪啦的打了马力几十记耳光。
宋再湘决定去一趟云南。
对此次访问，中美双方均未作事先预报。
操作台突然“扯拐”，这让梁先生有点不知所措。
我们将就有关问题继续与柬泰等各方保持沟通。
机会总是垂青有准备的人，黄柏高也不例外。
身材矮小的小狼崽，第一次吃羊奶可费了劲儿。
立院的品质怎会沦落至此呢？
大家不必再往学校寻人打听了。
我在你心里应该永远十八岁。
被告于是对事主掩口、叉颈等至事主咳嗽才松手。
和小雅同寝室的她，经常被小可扇耳光。
二次加压泵站分布零散，小型化，布局不够科学。
是笔墨纸砚，我聪明吧。
盐场处处有，盐商灶民多，是它的历史写照。
站起来时，胸前皮肤已被蹭红。
还是买衣服吧！这样起码我能知道钱花在哪儿啦！
清华未提任何关于招收状元的信息。
两名社会青年腰上别着两把西瓜刀。
除了女儿，几个朋友偶尔来串串门聊天。
这些言论自由的滥用，直接造成网上信息良莠不齐、真假难辨。
十三岁的女儿因此怀孕，后来生下一个婴儿。
嫩模陈静、阿旦献上生日蛋糕给汪东城。
房屋装修、家具等物品损毁。
妈的，哪个混蛋把痰吐得这么圆啊！
执著于这理想，即便胜利了，那也一定是悲惨的。
建设凤凰大桥，内环线则连成一体。
集中连片推进可再生能源建筑应用。
他们称，要立即捣毁侮辱民族最高尊严的李明博政府。
什么时候能够喝上名贵的吐鲁番葡萄酒呢？
他借来皮尺，从胡同口往里拉，以量出宽窄。
这位保安平时笑嘻嘻的，很憨厚。
你现在被我拘留了，你得保持安静，还得乖乖听话。
小鱼捕获不多，渔民开始捕虾。
当时刚坏一点的时候，老师让我们不要到栏杆那儿玩。
朱立伦透露王金平算命这一节，实在很难撇得清。
外汇占款减少的直接原因是跨境资本流出。
临走时伯伯叮嘱了又叮嘱，搂着船娃的头摸了一遍又一遍。
房子很狭窄，被害的爷孙俩躺在一个小床上，用被子盖着。
对现场的大量碳铵等原料，雷国胜称这是果园用的肥料。
游人若是闯我院，出去让你变公公。
应对非传统安全威胁就要有与之对应的非传统军事行动。
我问公司的事情怎么样，他总是喉咙很响地吼我不要烦了。
从外观上看，正常的枣子表皮细腻、光滑，稍微捏一下，有弹性。
警方认定聂某具有重大嫌疑。
赶到的村民用扁担将小阳捞起，准备捞小帆时，他沉入了水中。
这也是继尕斯亿吨级油田发现之后的又一个亿吨级油田。
对你说一百遍我爱你。
演坏人演得最好啦！
吴某说，身为养子，他明显感觉到养父母偏袒有血缘关系的人。
轻轨上爹爹倒在地上。
近日，“狗咬人”事件频发。
为赚奶粉钱，显然不是。
空气中飘着一股酸臭味。
春节前不好招工，试吃阶段我得去端盘子啦。
败者不馁，失利的麦凯恩和赫卡比并不沮丧。
据悉，警方暂未能完全确定砖块的坠下位置，暂未有人被捕。
晚上，父亲吴大云数落她。
鉴于这种想法，我们愿意在中国做总代理。
擦完之后，毛巾也是随手一扔。
外界认为中国必定为此感到兴奋和愉悦。
索井风水几乎要什么有什么。
还敢讨价还价！你已经两天没交作业啦！叫家长！
别急别急，等我穿越回去帮你看看哈。
我一直认为我哥哥是冤枉的，肯定是被人逼的。
她指着五百米开外的一处房屋告诉记者，那儿是她的家。
然而，前天晚上爸爸“爽约”啦。
没有强健的体魄，一切都将化为乌有。
直到这时，伍坦感觉车辆颠簸实在有点大了。
唯有世界羽联一副凛然正气的样子，这很虚伪和不负责任。
宁大年依然在汽车修理厂负责维修和培训。
被人戳着脊梁骨，活着也难受，不是我钻牛角尖。
大白天的，你把自己衣裤藏哪了呀！
审判长随后敲响法槌，庭审开始。
说着，抢了上帝的活干，自劈一刀，离若兰而去。
鬼子将原来的村庄一律烧光。
不过小美最终还是堕胎了。
木板，青瓦，吊脚及屋前屋后码得老高的柴垛，就是桑植人世袭的民居。
这堵墙，是藏族姑娘永吉才仁长眠的地方。
郭建义心想，莫不是父子俩吵架，弟弟又出去喝闷酒了。
潘基文强调说：“人口的增长使缺水情况日益恶化，气候变化也是如此。
俺得找林站，给林站说好，到时间人家去。
刷牙洗脸后，她开始生火炒菜。
这个陡峭狭窄的河边护坡，是老徐每天回家进出的唯一出路。
婚介公司打出的征婚招牌。
我苦心经营多年的企业毁于一旦，谁来赔偿我们的损失。
文永泉律师还认为，“硬闯导致争执”一说也不成立。
数月前，汤淼和周苏红办理了离婚手续。
哦，这真把我问住了，你希望我上网搜索答案吗？
老婆过去安慰，说：“别哭了，这有什么疼的。
布兰尼丝毫不改豪放作风，一头乱发显得颇为邋遢。
冰一冰你的脑袋，总有一款沁爽适合你。
小谢尔博好奇地爬上跳马，摔下来，爬上去，又摔了下来。
他要下山就得用手刨雪。
跳蚤化石很罕见。
穆棱河上的排污沟。
彼时，王喜峰官运亨通，项目投资当年升任开封市市长助理。
和德运说，这都是运气练功的缘故。
莫里森买了一双新鞋却不穿。
起草者是乡纪委书记黄淑群。
夫妻俩给“小龙子”起名“王周麟”。
接着又改买黄金、基金、股票等。
王莹用劲控制自己的笑，又干咳两声。
这个一路上报到汇丰银行高层那儿。
有时候我做梦都想投奔他。
而手指甲也一片一片地劈掉，再长出来。
乳品新国标甫一出台，便引发了争议。
建议市民购买狗肉时，尽量买带皮狗肉。
金山网络紧急推出相关补丁。
新娘斯蒂芬妮白肤金发。
老将谭宗亮的状态如何？
平时昂贵，一放开必然成这样。
购物广场只允许人出来，不允许任何人进入。
说着显露一个鲍威尔式的微笑，问：谁来写呢？
真是业界良心啊。
外面没了动静，薛师傅躺在床上，辗转反侧。
事故后，广州塔管理方给予被困游客退票并提供晚餐。
一只羊两只羊。
在这片树荫下，大叔总算可以躲开烈日，稍微休息会儿。
打头阵走上台的，是位穿红棉袄的阿姨。
其中动物明星“企鹅和北极熊”最为惹眼。
当时汪女士满口答应。
但对通济镇而言，“夹生饭”吞不下去了。
我获得了小衰衰人勋章一枚，你能告诉我这是为什么咩。
陈某竟开始动手动脚，并拉上窗帘，将付某摁倒欲行不轨。
呈现在大家面前的鸿润羽绒被和酒店寝具，风格各有特色。
采用国家体育总局最新颁布的“武打散打竞赛规则”。
这如同一块干毛巾，无论使多大劲，都拧不出水来。
不少网友揣测王韬可能就是在当天求婚，纷纷送上祝福。
梁振英一度感触落泪，用黑色手巾擦拭。
目前，乔蒂因报假警遭到逮捕。
这笔钱对我而言太重要了，能把我家的债给还了呀。
而且掰开之后，里外颜色差别较大。
此外，公司现金、电脑等有价值财物被洗劫一空。
咬一口发现里面有豆沙馅，很惊讶的告诉我们。
而民警已经迂回到了妇女的左边。
假驾驶证字体光滑，没有凹凸感。
又到一年月圆时，今天他们依然没能回家和老人团圆。
李敖表示不稀罕对方道歉但要求与对方辩论。
而如果明确表示为台湾出兵，则可能会怂恿“台独”。
转眼间，一车净挣六七百元。
每天用心做辅食给她吃。
为了避开朋友，董海棠让王女士先出去遛狗。
但我更想多听听网友的意见。
很难说这一点具有讽刺意味。
目前，全国因旱饮水困难人数已达两千零四十三万人。
大蒜交易区内，少了往日的热闹繁忙。
经过无数次买假以后，他终成识假打假方面的鸿儒。
大家擦亮眼睛，掏干净耳朵。
什么时候结婚啊？
么么。我也爱你。
对于“状元”桂冠，耿元生说儿子还是有点激动和兴奋。
温州人每年扫墓时，都要重新刷白坟墙，烧尽周围的坟草。
家里还有两个娃娃在念书，没有妈妈之后，他们好可怜哦。
张謇在主城一些大楼盘都有工程。
依托贵阳、遵义国家级开发区加快发展航天产业。
风水位置非常好，因而也成为着陆点的必选之一。
闻悉，游人也纷纷饶有兴趣地摸牛身，讨个好彩头。
杨某也被冠上了“最窝囊丈夫”的头衔。
孩子们用带有表演性质的语调称她“妈妈”。
随后，倪某怂恿张倩一起把“宝物”买下，再转手卖掉赚钱。
村道泥泞，崎岖难行，极易打滑。
着火轿车已被烧成空壳。
他们的话语权很孱弱。
货车右侧副驾驶位置被整体撞瘪，司机幸运逃过一劫。
他已经祝贺奥朗德，并将扛起败选责任。
下午睡个午觉，晚上吃完饭看会儿电视，一天就过去了。
亨古靠近巴基斯坦与阿富汗的边界，武装分子活动频繁。
昨天俺家还买了。
突然被记者围堵，护儿心切的姜文用手推搡镜头。
她早年当过幺幺四的话务员，后来自称下海经商。
拉比耶后悔听从了这样的建议。
林雨翔又恨自己没有罗密欧与神仙的交情，借不到暖的轻翼。
但陈霞催着报警，金铁军却躲躲闪闪。
押解被告人的不仅有法警，同时还有武警。
主要为的是蹭饭。
后来我被选为嘎查这个村的村长。
太坏了，答应我不要截屏好伐？
不管咋问就是不罚你了。
为了避免麻烦和争议，许多人宁愿使用私家车。
要是用大泵的话，二三十分钟就把水抽干了。
重点限养区内禁止个人饲养烈性犬、大型犬。
这个疙瘩压得我喘不过气来。
舒跃龙表示，疫苗生产已经有了最新的进展。
因为鱼游泳好累，出了很多的汗，逗你的啦。
陈某大怒，称大不了鱼死网破，然后二人开始争吵起来。
在“三嬢”陈章淑眼里，媛媛懂事、嘴甜、聪明，见人就会喊。
过几天微博更新就会恢复的！
踹门，还通过防盗窗刺，太可怕了。
他自嘲是“房奴”，但也痛并快乐。
另外，丈夫还必须要把陪嫁嫁妆全部送回娘家。
在远处依稀可见的沙漠植物映衬下，整个球场显的绿意盎然。
重视内贸基础理论研究。
在关于大规模杀伤性武器的问题上，中东各国各怀心事。
一路上，孙颖浩用自己的方式鼓舞着队员，其实他的心里也忐忑不安。
写散文的人最多，人心却像他们的文章一样散，闹也闲不出气势。
奥运会之前有谁听说过蔡亚林的名字？
在青岛部分乳企因检测严格而停产。
令计划、王沪宁、戴秉国等参加活动。
出入有车代步，车型自选，还有宝马哦！
踢足球当然会啦。
过去五年时间里，雅虎股票价格已缩水一半。
似乎仗未打，自己已被巨大的心理压力打垮。
残疾情况需有医院证明且每两年复查一次。
内胆板材焊接是水箱加工过程中又一重要环节。
我们过去的革命岂非等于白干一场？
章瑞平称，一嗨曾遭到网络水军的攻击。
我没得罪过你，请别乱骚扰。
其次，进项税额抵扣的要件形式要求采购环节做好调整应对。
孩子的脸惨白，折腾坏了。
导致航班延误一百四十八个，滞留旅客近万人。
资源性产品价格改革稳妥有序推进。
甚至军政府自愿交权于民选政府，也是这种信念的产物。
左丽荣听到汪莎一番开导后，笑得合不拢嘴。
选择性接轨只能骗骗自己。
这个图书神偷曾是写手。
宛喜有逃离现场。
据说此嫚背景很硬。
让人着实为之揣测。
美洁问：你呢？
唐人立摄影展海报。
村民院中的大窟窿。
一点儿意义也没有。
嫌疑人蒋宇落网。
拐点就在这五年。
不要嘛！别赶走我！
围墙栅栏锈迹斑斑。
不服咬我啊！
利润可观，竞争也很激烈。
武警战士帮忙扫雪。
那真是太好了耶。
首先，因分化瓦解。
宝塔镇河妖！
怎么会晕呢？
外孙女执拗着不走，偏要玩。
为什么要问为什么。
调情是什么东东呀？
退一步海阔天空。
他舅舅三十多岁，家中也有小孩。
咔嚓”，一块悬垂的楼板掉下来砸在旁边，官兵们的心一下提到嗓子眼。
推进国有林区和农垦体制改革。
而这则姚晨牵着小毛驴的广告也为赶集快速提高了知名度。
护士说，张爷爷最喜欢做的事就是摆弄他的拉链。
看着收益率噌噌往下跌，但想拿券的不一定能买到。
淘宝工作人员称，赠品肯定是免费的。
林母一听，高兴得险些忘了要去搓麻将。
晚上再出门也许会凉快些。
此案轰动全国，公安部挂牌督办。
一只雪白而“苗条”的全新史莱克出现在人们面前。
她渴望走出去，感受雨滴落在身上的感觉。
外界预期，盲人门球是本届残奥会中国队的一个夺牌亮点。
一张落寞的脸消融在夕阳里。
天亮了，整个一宿脑子都是乱糟糟的。
应采儿表示，这一天举行婚礼很有意义。
还有就是换水，上盆之后要定期换盆里的水。
信阳市妇幼保健院原来只有一两个人在那儿管理。
新闻界也批评在场的人见死不救。
又搞突然袭击！完了完了，死定了！
夏学銮对此表示赞同。
该台赴云南的科普部主任张旸表示，“希望观测工作一切顺利”。
不幸的是，这期间李晓耿被蚊虫叮咬，身上起肿癍。
朱镕基严于律己，举世皆知。
一名男子坐在一捆捆百元大钞上，摆弄着眼前的“钱砖”。
昨日上午，二人因拐卖儿童罪分别获刑。
小女孩儿已经惨不忍睹，围观群众不禁哀叹道“太惨了，太惨了”。
学生小杰听了孙某的话，开始琢磨用此法“赚钱”。
爸爸见了说：别这么鬼头鬼脑的，有话大声说。
该股的网上中签率为百分之二点一二五一。
你嫌弃我哪里不好，我改还不行吗？
大街小巷飘起红绸带，家家屋檐下挂起一串串红灯笼。
他周边的朋友也说，他这是嘚瑟惯了。
两大需求的颓势，也与政策“靴子”迟迟没有落地有关。
然后会由货车运送到某地进行“漂洗”。
难怪客厅墙壁上最惹眼的是一件木雕牛。
当然，宣传状元不能夸大，更不能无中生有。
吓的她虎躯一震，愣了好几秒才反应过来。
早起的时候儿子催我：爸爸快走，上学去！
第二、这个你问俺也问不出啥东西，俺也不知道。
反正年轻，我就玩玩嘛。
它在海上等待二三五二八号船近一周后返回。
春天万物复苏，生机盎然，是人们调养身心的好时机。
目前，四环路、五环路和机场高速的奥运专用车道都已施划完毕。
新一轮的涨价潮又蠢蠢欲动。
戴军不从，王闯等人又对其轮番攻击。
她便呼吁马，不要再身陷“扁马情结”。
个人所得税免征额共调整过两次。
他说，尽管罚金“微不足道”，他仍希望还清这笔“债”。
另外一辆雪铁龙想要挡住它，被撞了四五下。
这样，政府管理就酝酿着风险。
海底捞蹭午饭没成功。从玄武门出来后，午饭的时间到了。
想办法提高一下工作效率呀。
俗话说，“棺材里伸手死要钱”。
仙湖植物园里的植物千姿百态，小平同志看得兴趣盎然。
还有人说三块钱几乎可以养活一家人。
两年前，周爹爹在车棚外自制了一个单杠。
与丈夫高城刚和好以后，泽尻英龙华目标直指好莱乌。
更主要是照老尹的说法，习惯啦，出门就上那儿遛一圈。
晚上可以喝点杂粮粥，吃点炒青菜，便于消化，又有营养。
而从侧面看时，小天甜已有明显凸起的小肚腩。
随后，记者来到石碾盘劳务市场旁的“曾卤菜”门店。
谈及保养秘诀，安雅首次透露了自己的“懒女人”攻略。
今年他过生日，带他选玩具。
后来我家麦子割完了，他家的麦子好像还淋了一场雨，糟蹋了。
暴雨导致梧州市区多条主要街道发生严重内涝。
因为家底儿殷实，年轻时我是个“少爷”，不管事，更不管钱。
经抢救无效，小羊驼死亡。
一位村民背着棺材经过。
他天天叨叨叨，我说烦。
暗自夸自己记忆力强，两年前听到的东西，到紧要关头还能取用自如。
因为没什么建筑和高大树木，整座琛航岛可一眼看穿。
战士在演示灭火扫把。
对于驻伊美军十月份遭受的重大伤亡，兹巴里深表遗憾。
引进“超威电源”，使沁阳成为全国最大的动力电池生产基地。
该次“猎虎”成果比前一阶段有所增加。
谁料多数网友并不理解他的苦衷，反而称他为“抠门哥”。
何伟在门房诊所里接待病人，杨勇坐在一旁摆弄电脑。
由于积极购买内容，净现金低于我们的预期。
三星堆青铜器群高超的青铜器冶炼技术及青铜文化是如何产生的？
哈哈，您说得对，我是挺傻挺“二”的。
一路上，夏雨少言寡语，除了向四处张望几下，便一直埋头向前。
他能率领队友守住澳大利亚队的疯狂进攻吗？
他说，穿丝袜表演是一种艺术形式。
周立波在节目中做鬼脸。
申购简称为“兴业申购”，申购代码为“七八零三七七”。
除此之外，在超市中偶有销售。
卡扎菲被拧得哼哼叫，孙女咯咯地笑起来。
七点左右，另外四名人员被“东海救幺幺二”救下。
并没有孔子的被追捧和热衷度高啊？
他的奇异之处，在于用彩色粉笔在地上作画，而且“画啥像啥”。
老字号东来顺、馄饨侯、护国寺小吃、茶汤李齐聚地坛。
普京为俄罗斯柔道选手鼓掌。
民警只好把男子架上警车，载到卫生院醒酒。
昭惠夫人与安倍晋三一九八七年结婚。
目前，王勇已经被美国曼哈顿区检察官提起诉讼。
并与郦道元的“水经注”一道登上北朝文学的巅峰。
水库旁的稀土盗采点目前仍散落着硫酸铵等化学品的包装。
这是由台湾镂空书法名家詹秀蓉书写的金箔镂空作品。
小东的姐姐称贴吧内容真实。
请问，你要不要吃赔钱了这个亏呢？
几年前，李国权就患有胆囊炎、胃病、痔疮等顽疾。
四个人七手八脚忙活半天，冰山寝室瞬间变“温室”。
图为肖向阳躺在病床上，他的表姐在一旁陪护。
乘客稍多时窄小的出口就显得很拥挤。
行啊没问题，不过你也知道的，周末路上都很堵，估计得晚到一点儿。
双方各执一词，令事件扑朔迷离。
仿佛点一支烟刚刚燃着吸了一口就灭了，嘴里只有那口烟的余味。
然后，主人为客人斟满，再陪客人饮上一杯。
给心爱的人泡杯热茶吧。
老战友在外地聚会，他说战友们转业早，工资不高，他慷慨解囊。
开心看表演。众星走完红地毯之后，徐若瑄才现身。
这些蛤蟆只有成人拇指大小，通体深褐色。
个别严重的，开始呕吐甚至出现晕厥的现象。
不要乱问女孩子的年龄啦。
深圳狂风大作、暴雨滂沱。
当时沮丧的心情无以形容。
这与历史上的“闯关东”有关。
互联网正润物细无声地影响中国社会。
报道说，麦迪甘和布拉格耶维奇是宿敌，多次表达出任州长的意愿。
我实际上希望别人喊我教授，更亲切。
据王瑞琛介绍，他们已接受节育手术，没可能再要小孩。
背后暴露出的当地粗鲁横蛮的执政思维令人警醒。
我特别喜欢弹钢琴。
适当节食和运动结合，科学减肥才行呀！
统一采购的面筋里面含有甲醛。
过去李逵是半吊子，在戏里只能充当打哈哈凑趣的笑剧人物。
胡亮、余飞敲碎啤酒瓶抵住曾的喉咙。
镇长吴科哲说，争议双方都以“祖宗地”的理由申索土地所有权。
目前惠淼大臂有些许拉伤，但无大碍。
每当他拥抱我的时候，我都听到他的心在怦怦跳。
原告张咪本人没有出庭，张咪女儿李洛伊出现在庭审现场。
理由主要有建筑规格、时间、衙署建筑和文献记载等。
至少奢侈品市场一直很兴旺。
那女的说，你拿枪吓唬谁呀？
上面悬着一轮红彤彤的太阳。
像谁都行，就是千万别像我，又矮又丑的。
这背后牵出葛与盛大之间的纠葛一案。
夫妻俩把心思都花在了瘫痪双亲身上。
柯莉塔曾创办纪念已故丈夫的金恩中心。
床铺旁边是收售的各种药品。
具体有多少损失我不能拍脑袋，很难计算。
此次联演是两军军事合作框架内的正常安排。
这下惹恼了刘鹏。
通常都是在运猪前往耳朵上打一针“地西泮”，俗名就是“安定”。
一身裸色的小礼服，利落的发饰，干练又不失柔美。
第二步是剪去裤脚后抽出横向的线。
这是一个典型的决策谬误。
江国庆之母得知儿子沉冤得雪，捧着遗照落泪。
在七、八、九三个月，有三家奢侈品网站分外招摇。
这样，老鹰和野猪以及他们的孩子都饿死了。
在抵达亚特兰大后，普米卡拉被警方带走。
只要不工作时，他每次用餐都会点鱼翅，再与白饭搅混来吃。
不过，他也说，真要“疯”起来会尺度大开，比如裸泳，跳很诡异的舞。
你又把这个千古难题丢给我了，好吧，可以尝尝四川菜呀，我很爱吃。
黎巴嫩电信部长也表示，伊杜之死是大马士革清算运动的阴谋之一。
我有一个热爱书面语的朋友。
四人均否认帮扁家洗钱。
这处院落位于路边，由于远离平家疃村，周围住户极少。
另外，桃花为低矮植物，枝桠较低，也不方便行人穿行。
教练一下蒙了，看着他说北京？
发债后，短短几天就亏损预警。
我到派出所一看，也是个小豁嘴。
这些努力获得的反馈相当踊跃。
江风凛冽，于双戈打了个寒战。
两年后他的精神堡垒垮塌了。
孙辉恨不得要说：老子学富五车，你够资格要我指正吗！
为摸清灾后北川资源状况，他走遍了北川的山山水水。
日子过得也算平静顺当。
主婚人一愣，回头看了一眼新娘，然后找了五毛。
美好前景刺激下，新的跑马圈地运动正式拉开帷幕。
刘奶奶不属于无儿无女的“三无死亡人员”，民政局更无法介入。
王强便哄骗小娟，如果小娟与他发生关系，便给小娟零花钱用。
现在思乐已经五岁了，聪明乖巧，甚是招人喜欢。
如果年代久远，他会稍慢些，需要多一秒钟。
张越红不是重返国家队了吗？
以此用更确凿的证据解决遗址的基础问题，回应这些质疑。
陶宝端起酒杯，拍拍我的肩膀。
孙某未停车反而加速闯卡，将协警郭某、林某撞成轻伤。
而在退役后，娱乐圈也曾是李宁首选的尝试。
但他远远不能走得洒脱。
付高峰是中国一代“散打王”柳海龙和“武状元”杨晓靖的师弟。
没有抢成，两人有点泄气，在附近溜达了一会儿。
下面请听环球资讯驻耶路撒冷记者王倩发回的报道。
调查也预测，未来三年内，至少会有一亿一千万的手机新用户产生。
同时控制剖宫产率。
法官介绍，法院将安排对雷森进行专业心理辅导。
现在，禁烟之风从公共场所吹入了居民建筑内部。
他们又颁布法令，要求工厂按更高标准建立烟囱。
感觉我提出什么事，老汉儿都不答应。
库尔森和布鲁克斯被控合谋非法窃听罪。
咦，我隐身了怎么还能看见我？
曾志伟坦言各人没有计较出场次序，但安排上仍有困难。
天气好也不能忽略补充维生素，买点最爱的水果，做快乐的吃货。
汽车在柳垄山盘旋，记者走进吴乃宜的家。
运钞车司机也被弄糊涂了，将车停下，男子嚷嚷“我要打车回家”。
截至十一月二日，实际转户五十二点七五四五万人。
我的闺蜜们一口咬定我是犯了花痴，看中了主人的帅气模样。
唯有转才能突破，转才能持续，转才能让沁阳工业步入新境界。
坐到位置上，开始缓过神来，心被喜悦塞得不留一丝缝隙。
军方称，过去三天共打死一百六十五名武装人员。
这里挺清静，好些不炒股的依伯、依姆也进来消夏。
孩子现在身高明显比同学矮许多，我现在后悔莫及想撞墙。
小蛤蟆均只有指甲盖大小。
关于互助合作保险组织。
姐姐见状再度痛哭，不忍舍弃，只好暂时保留。
对你的前任更感兴趣耶。
其中卖馄饨的约三十家。
棉花进口量也大幅增长。
骨骼保存基本完整，发簪和发髻的样式依稀可见。
日方不应非法用武力阻挠。
落实节能减排的任务吗？
图为受表彰的爱国守法先进僧尼代表。
祖马本人两天前说，“这幅画像讥讽我，让我人格蒙羞、尊严受辱”。
一点都难不倒我。
我们要相信科学崇尚自由。
从团购诞生那天开始，马遥就被这新鲜玩意儿吸引住了。
后袁厉害被独自留在房间中休息，睡了一个午觉。
英国广播公司在贝尔格莱德的记者尼克？
他抓起桌上的放大镜，又反反复复端详了好一阵子。
他自述其学问，从孔夫子、梁启超到拿破仑，什么都读。
而秘方其实是膏药里加西药，甚至加辣椒油，让患者感觉发热。
门要是个女的，非急死不可。
要先结婚才可以生孩子。
反正就是有创意，就完成呗。
二是瓦斯治理措施不落实。
画作上签名潦草，下方注明绘于一八五四年。
目前正崴的工厂设在东莞和昆山。
马琳、许昕、王励勤分别排在第五、七、八位。
江一燕又冷又怕，没见到鬼屋，已经在颤抖了。
结账的姚龙连连推辞，但最终拗不过拜登，还是收下了。
但是我们有信心能够把这二者平衡好。
儿子竟然抱着吉他，哇，温暖呀。
我是太爱俺老婆，害怕她不要我。
一些人整箱、整箱地扛回家。
渺渺兮予怀，望美人兮天一方。
这趟慢车的乘客逐年减少。
总之很漂亮就对啦。
供水设施冻坏引发跑水，影响到用户的正常用水。
查找问题更没有吞吞吐吐、躲躲闪闪，而是直接了当。
我的爸爸妈妈可以证明哦。
中午时分，河面上炊烟缭绕。
我们不能把长跑当短跑跑。
二是习惯当“甩手掌柜”、做“二传手”，层层批转，坐而论道，不干实事。
刘允洲表示不上诉。
开始是一些学生起哄，撕烂书本、试卷往楼下扔。
压抑心底的委屈终于得以告慰。
目前，叶江川、叶荣光、徐俊和印尼的西唐刚均积四分。
近年琳恩曾客串“丑女贝蒂”及“绝望主妇”等剧集。
一辆挖掘机进入火场，将库房挖开一个大豁口，助消防员灭火。
鲁炜在讲话中说，国运盛，收藏兴。
坊间盛传京东商城投资了青番茄，但张丽娟对此加以了否认。
临汾市将目光瞄准了中关村。
发股笑，从不寂寞，底价一元真实写照。
齐歇尔称，虽然地震来的突然，但仅有几栋办公楼出现裂缝。
中西里莱出全裸写真。
看着摇摇车老板的眼神，我直想笑。
但有的人在第一张脸上涂脂抹粉，第二张脸却任人唾弃。
当时，唐家山堰塞湖随时都有溃坝的可能，疫情的威胁也越来越大。
歌特瓦尔德的灵柩。
严重污染，一定要戴好口罩再出门啊。
途中，俩人意犹未尽，又相约一起开房。
习近平获赠湖人队队服。
感觉天气很柔和。
高喜容提醒，“梅毒宝宝”是完全可以预防的。
我们现在去那儿会很感动。
不要那么客气啦，还是叫我我吧。
站住，你衣服里面鼓鼓囊囊的是什么，快拿出来！
台北监狱主管表示，陈水扁把饭菜都吃完。
几天后，鲁爹爹把质量检测报告单给一位医药专业人士看看。
许多同胞热衷于关心别人，习惯用脏心眼揣测别人。
交谈时，张运魁前言不搭后语，“问他个事，他总是发愣”。
儿子幼儿园刚开学，上小班的时候一直又哭又闹，今年上中班。
他在代表律师问话下，交代接受女兵盘问的经历。
多谢杂志是我甩了她，不是她甩我。
要修补运转不灵的移民官僚机构，它妨碍家庭团聚。
太阳照在墙角的积雪上，晒化了的雪水顺着小沟流向院外。
天气转暖，爱美女性的瘦身愿望也愈发强烈。
三是要围绕中心工作。
给生活加点佐料，就像菜里面加油盐酱醋一样，这样才有味道。
几个骑摩托的都说眼睛呛得直掉泪。
不过说到谁是最强的对手，特鲁姆普认为还是奥沙利文。
说起我女朋友的优点，那可太多了，她温柔善良、聪明大方，那缺点呢？
在颠簸中，孙小姐渐渐进入梦乡。
通告中含有的诅咒语句。
所有的停车场都在最佳位置安排有专供残疾人使用的车位。
土耳其与中国都有着悠久的历史和文明。
再过几天子孙们就要回来过年了，我家这个年咋个过哦。
今日停运七趟，晚点四十列。
我也无言以对，不会好了。
丁子高大谈接亲遭整的糗事，并公开发表爱的宣言。
家穷让两个小女儿早早辍学，还有几万元的外债。
大力推广电召预约模式的不止北京。
见到失踪两天的吴某惨死某村后山，张某父子悲痛万分。
麦克尔维开了一家小店，出售一些手工玻璃制品。
侦察参谋董毅点出叶刚和两名官兵，组成先遣组为官兵开路。
可能用在大米制品譬如汤圆、米粉等。
修炼气场也是一种学问。
一家四口仅靠刘运文日常打点零工勉强维持生计。
不少学生和附近居民直呼“好夸张”、不可思议。
尕玛喜欢借着微弱的烛光，看最喜欢的语文课本。
这就如同治水，一旦疏导不善，极易壅决而溃。
军乐队奏中、朝两国国歌。
民众在平壤街头哭送金正日。
一边是一号难求，而持号买车者一边则是冷冷清清。
山泉干了，村民梁彦平每天都要到邻居家挑水喝。
特别是早上一起来，上下眼皮像蛤蟆似的，眼袋也下来了。
我听了都快酸死了。
小诗也承认，她有心事宁愿向同学倾诉。
两桥飞跃、遥相辉映，构成一道独特的风景。
那我就在附近转转吧。
学校被推了十几米远。
熊成在深圳海滩玩耍。
昨日，亚太股市普涨。
孔先生外甥没有什么事，只是裤子被扯破了。
一坐下，他磨蹭半天不知如何开口。
与此前暗访的黑作坊相似，生产厂房简陋、脏乱。
平时与邻居们打点小麻将，输赢限度只在几块钱。
其中宋理宗赵昀内府所收，记载版目最为详尽。
每天晚上跟你互道晚安真幸福。
小说栏上有一名话：这里将造就我们的欧亨利。
跟很久不联系的好友通个电话吧，会有意外惊喜哦！
出了门，拿着萝卜向村民展示，“莫言家的萝卜，莫言家的萝卜啊”。
原来，湖北神农架地区野猪糟蹋庄稼厉害，群众叫苦不迭。
多久睡不着算失眠。
这是保障房建设的“硬杠杠”。
我对她说你把嘴管得严一点儿。
不知道学校禁止谈恋爱吗！
东方红广场哀悼活动现场。
我嗓子也哑了，车上也都是泥。
昨天下午记者联系到董炯。
千万不能忘了这些孩子们呀。
姚书琴表面从容，暗地里不停记高依娜的名字，罪名是大声喧哗。
甚至抬出自家媳妇儿避嫌。
昨天有航班因雾延误，旅客躺在座椅上。
柯女士猜测送奶工还没来，于是回房继续操持家务。
坑内的抽水泵已快被水淹没。
人物”周刊则承诺实体版的订阅者可以免费阅读其电子版。
印度尼西亚的阿尔比和瑞典的孙小青分列男、女球员榜首。
他晚上打鼾、憋醒，白天嗜睡等一系列症状，都来源于此。
村田出生于长崎县，毕业于早稻田大学。
章小蕙独自在咖啡店玩手机。
馅料多种多样，通常是土豆、圆白菜、蘑菇或樱桃等。
暴风临头，一对新人在乌云压顶的纽约曼哈顿拍婚纱照。
完了，姑娘估计没法儿原谅他了。
由此测算，涨停价位应为六点二四一七左右。
随后，记者与阿华继续上路。
奢侈品杂志“如何消费”是季刊，读者群是富裕且有独特品味的男女。
李女士称，她找马艳丽交涉。
昨晚，“地球一小时”活动前，国贸三期夜色璀璨。
何某等人怂恿小梅。
事后他见泰龙趴在地上，头微侧，“擘大”双眼失去知觉。
阿拉尔孔还发布了一些个人观点。
还有网友发帖称闻到后喉咙疼痛。
庭审时，两被告人在捂嘴咳嗽。
枕边、门口，预备着木棍、铁叉。
筱温柔最喜欢的人是林泽楠。
只要稍微纰漏，胚胎就会崩溃。
姜藜的父母勉强接受了王彬。
降价时咋不跟国际接下轨呀。
新闻纸价格上涨，发行费用的亏空将更高。
一些人显然没有当真，把奥巴马当作冒名者开涮起来。
邹平座也认为，中国应该多买矿石等资源。
她谈谈说：你很在乎那些话吗？
牛津广场上的木马摆设已遭人纵火。
考试期间，首尔的宾馆旅店爆满，连桑拿中心也生意兴隆。
少林山门前，少林寺知客僧延开法师在此迎候。
因此，潮湿闷热暂时让干热“代班”。
现在宝宝还经常踢我，很活泼。
蒋朗朗表示，北京大学将保留追究邹恒甫诋毁或诽谤的权利。
胡锦涛提议提前讲，争取让教授们多讲一点儿。
我的生命力永久存在。
面对风水店眼花缭乱的招牌，游客们大都匆匆走过。
此次大会上瓮安县公安局荣获全国优秀公安局称号。
我查了一下，是爱新觉罗溥仪。
从前有座山，山里有座庙，你猜庙里有个啥？
此后，缙绅之家，务当婉切劝谕，使之家喻户晓，以期渐除积习。
每次推开窗就能看见北角码头，清晨能数出湾里多出的船。
既然是生日宴会，齐秦自然也没有含糊。
停权两个月就能改正廖本烟的立场吗？
楼先生摁了摁喇叭，但是对方不为所动。
佩服自己的弟弟敲诈有方，不敢怠慢。
当年我可是游滴最快滴！
潘耀明看过查传讷的画，觉得她画的很有灵气。
当事人认为记载有遗漏或者差错的，可以请求补充或者改正。
以古典优雅闻名世界的苏州，近年来乡村旅游也蓬勃兴起。
同时，袁厉害也最终同意不再收养新的弃婴。
网友“甄巍峰”说，希望规范用工制度和用工秩序。
用他们收藏者的行话，该钱币叫蒙疆五千。
奶奶头发已经花白，身上穿着一件棉袄。
他最先做的，是挑着糖粥担走街串巷叫卖，时称“骆驼担子”。
期间，他们与景区多次协调未果。
而韩国近年来已经鲜有执行死刑的制度。
尚未发现疫情的广东，养殖户同样难逃厄运。
其中一男子用木棍敲打湖边栏杆，叫张某出来。
说白了吧，不扣纽扣就是为了透透风，舒服一点儿。
他们被拘禁在缅甸首都仰光市外的一处军营。
啊，啊，五环，你比四环多一环。
那你每月多给我二百块买零食，孩子的奶我包了！
王阳明暗呛男人应该不会觉得年轻是优势。
滕丽名自言性格硬朗，不会被感情问题困扰自己。
同时纳入医保的戒烟药物也要经过严格筛选。
犹如狼来了一样，野猪成灾危害的不仅仅是人类。
这次快递画作，他只是将卷轴直接放进画筒里。
彭母与保姆随后到大儿子家中参加侄女的婚宴。
王女士此时感到眼前一黑，脑袋顿时晕了起来。
两者均未透露消息来源，但否认消息来自一嗨。
一组组合拳打到了棉花上。
屏幕上的影讯显示，将播放的影片中有“骆驼祥子”。
潘霜霜因为和林峰的情史迅速蹿红。
初步统计全市经济损失约五点四三八亿元。
写信人都看了“全国作文佳作”，再引用伯玉的话夸奖，毫无新意。
高额的贸易顺差，使美国和欧盟频繁对中国纺织品出口设限。
每一寸空间，都有自己的表情，与居者相融相通。
恐怖分子要做的就是躲起来并邮寄信件炸弹。
在实施过程中，商业设施常常被开发商视为累赘而压缩侵占。
床头装有小巧的阅读灯，可进行九十度调整。
长白山特别险峻，我们有的作者因为在那儿创作，已经去世了。
由于恶性循环，最终走向崩溃。
看不起这些为达目的满嘴谎言的人。
有的是臭味，有的是农药味。
马宝光曾在凹穴岩画附近找到新石器及旧石器时期的石块。
工作人员拔下车钥匙，立即拨打幺二幺二二报警。
衣服之于明星，正如水之于舟，“衣能载星，亦能覆星”。
按潘某的说法，每个加油工都有油卡，凭这个油卡给客户加油。
河南省长郭庚茂接受记者采访。
沈丙友透露，到目前为止广东还没有发生此类案件。
两岁丧父，母亲是一位英文教师。
好的呀？要一起么？
小病不用扛，大病有保障。
财政政策应当发挥更为关键性作用。
但至案发被抓，牛浩的违建拆迁款并未拿到，企图未能得逞。
万一您的奶粉广告在婴儿呕吐的场面里出现怎么办？
郑某一下就愣住了，不敢有丝毫反抗。
老僧释觉贤，老僧身板硬朗。
开发区板块仍居涨幅榜首。
他感觉有些微妙，就跟他在微博上“吆喝”宜川苹果一样。
现场浓烟呛人，警戒线已拉起。
截至尾盘，人民币兑美元报价为六点三六一九元。
随后，秦旸进行现场演示。
据悉，被叮咬者没有发病。
泡到姑娘的只有高富帅。
特里耶韦莱否认这一报道。
当然可以！加油哦，我会帮你出主意的！
香港同胞的拳拳爱心，也令我办员工感佩不已，铭记在心。
公司淘汰了一些冗员。
强化租赁管理责任。
明朝将军墓的墓碑。
这会儿正躺在床上呢。
孙朴术后状态不错。
朱莉带着娃娃们出现。
你不约好意思来呵呵？
第一财季净运营现金流为一点零七四亿美元。
誊完一遍，回首罗天诚的罗体字，不过尔尔！
还有，我看到很多区县都提到，要发展红酒产业，让农民改种葡萄。
嗯嗯，偶也在看呢！
唐海滨，云南勐海陈升茶厂副总经理。
听见身后一声闷响。
昨天一早，故宫端门外便已人头攒动。
出门时刀和衣服一块扔了。
交警准备将车扣留时，驾驶员竟和交警耍起了横。
想好了诺言后，最后一步是确定用爱或喜欢。
全身奇臭无比，散发出尸体臭味。
山中那迷蒙的小径，像迷走神经一样蜿蜒进蓊郁的果林，消失不见。
熬了几个月，阿秀也被迫做了小姐。
看卷时，他的脸几乎贴着卷面。
骑到桥上，突然颠簸差点摔倒。
会议安排在早晨五六点钟的时候。
三月期央票发行利率仍然持平于百分之二点九一六八。
不让他跟，他急眼，血压刚降一点儿，他又回到一线。
小猩猩开心地舔舐着叶子上的露珠。
对他来说，投奔养老院更多是出于情感需求。
翁蔑把两个人带走了。
可见爱的过程是短暂的，而爱的回忆是无穷的。
事成后，张博强和众弟兄各得酬劳。
一家人不说两家话，客气什么呀嘿嘿。
上海每年社保亏空百亿元对全国是一个警示。
师永刚暗下说：哪里哪里，你旁坐那个才性感呢！
但当患者离开医院后就心肌梗死，再回来时，已经无药可救了。
上次弄的我到现在还疼呢！
房子租出去了，孔某却仍要赔钱。
林志勇用脚将许某踹倒在地上，并将许某及孙女当场刺死。
耳阳河下游的阳河大桥在二幺二国道线上。
李蒙风姿秀逸，颇具东方女性的魅力。
朋友溜冰，我也劝过，也只有劝。
药商深知医生的苦恼。
当局上月指控卢岑科滥用职权和侵占国家财产。
对于发病率较高的庙台村，刘冬梅说他们村快成寡妇村了。
你要问距离有多少，恐怕只有风知道。
你怎么知道偶是美女啊？
你不能就蔫溜地躲着。
姐姐和爸爸躺在地上。
我率先种了十亩试验田。
于是，她踏上寻母之路。
毫无机会纾解的悲哀呢？
随后，还用脚踢踹母亲。
民警找到司机询问，得知其是陕北人王某雇用的。
网友“草民哦”说，“小女孩的人生被毁得乱七八糟”。
张凡买来两听啤酒，边喝边抒心中大志，把秦磊衬得像个姑娘。
当时，两人双眼通红，肌肉拱起，一心一意想要扳倒对方。
昨日，江北区大石坝一村，消防官兵洒水稀释。
目前，“海葵”又即将登陆。
这个问题已经困扰我一个小时了，要不，去吃碗三鲜馄饨？
拟对外出租的是褡裢岛和小耗岛。
王大姐还亲自帮他张罗烤肉摊重新开业的事。
御厅展示了孔子周游列国十四个春秋的坎坷经历。
有的船员怀疑，闫某是在解手时不慎坠海的。
当手部明显肮脏时，用肥皂和流水清洗。
推开门一看，里面几个老师聊天儿聊得正欢。
五地公安警力联动，加大设卡堵控、盘查和摸排工作。
咱晚上出去住吧，家里太热了。
企业抢“晒”福利只为吸引人才、留住人才。
你说这些好无聊哦。
你以为是谁家的牛？
黄学敏皱了皱眉。
岚的二宫桑和佐佐木希的恋情终于败露了。
他的律师指军方手法失当，要求法官推翻哈姆丹在囚禁期间的供词。
由于年积温低，旺苍县并非最适宜种植橘子的区域。
邓超介绍，片中自己到处咬人，“咬女人，也咬男人”。
谭知道敖的“能量”大，杀人不眨眼，只得浪迹天涯，躲避敖兴满。
裁判员胆敢如此“放水”、“护航”，教练员更是直接上阵。
翟用剪刀铰伤任妮的耳朵和鼻子，用铁钉钉她的十个指头。
宋世平要睡体育室里，余雄道：你热昏了，三中的校规多严你知道吗？
寡头政治盛行，精英民主与草根民主对立。
什么时候这条路才能有些绿色呀？
打造农村城市化、工业化、农业现代化，城市有啥俺有啥。
但没有养育子女负担的无子嗣夫妇，离婚比例却日益升高。
这为日后发表的统计数字所印证。
一名工作人员在美国一家机场演示如何使用“裸检”扫描仪。
一来二去，这条语音和数据两条管道依然你是你，我是我，爱谁谁。
问起以前他承认过，他鼻子里哼一声，不说话。
这三部分合计为十七点八三八二万块。
两年前在西班牙塞维雅的比赛中，梅西曾获得银牌。
法条规定明白无误，即醉驾不论情节都构成犯罪。
金星乔和工人们一起雕琢仿古石虎。
永辉辐射全国的物流总部等项目，也将落户南通。
而审理此案的法官，则早已退休。
搁浅的白海豚体长超过两米。
走出诊所外，墙的侧面的一段支撑墙也有裂缝。
远处是郁郁葱葱的大森林和奔向大西洋的亚马孙河。
这与杜双华近日的言论可谓大相径庭。
戴阿姨苦笑了一下，将桔子皮扫进簸箕，倒进垃圾桶。
此外还可提前做记号，比如掐掉部分鱼尾等。
有七八个貌似无所事事的男人在厂房外逡巡。
随后，记者来到芍药居站，该站的客流也不多。
其中，大部分随迁子女面临高考难题。
煲里的黄蟮去骨留肉，丝丝嫩滑，入口留香，果然名不虚传。
李家沱转盘处有交巡警设下的临时检查站。
富二代的行为问题，其实是富一代的观念问题。
吴伯雄一一端详国民政府时期的老照片。
暗访中，黑中介称一般通过基因筛查来确保卵子的安全性。
房地产调控的落脚点是否存在偏差？
凭证式国库券买卖时的利息如何计算？
而且深海作业基本不受周边国家骚扰。
在菩萨面前说假话，你给我出去。
她就是美国第一嗓。
我清水出芙蓉，天然去雕饰，现在还没化过妆呢。
维稳难的原因在哪？
学员冷冷的说：卖花圈……
别为不该为的人，伤了不该伤的心。
为什么你回微笑二字手机党伤不起。
一切安顿妥当后，他和同事又回到辖区上班。
有时候，一个危言耸听的假信息就能让官员身败名裂。
这种自我炒作，要豁得出去，脸面、自尊、社会声誉都要抛到脑后。
文强及其手下“三大金刚”昨出庭受审。
现如今，研祥拥有该行业的国际定价权。
扯美国阿桑奇担心，引渡至瑞典后，最终可能被移交给美国。
针对现有的芯片的产业模式，胡伟武做了这样一个剖析。
为了赢得大家对这辆“免费车”的信任，艾尼瓦尔做了很多努力。
爱心人士“南宁男”在派发月饼。
满盖军方邮戳的信封。
是被法律所允许的吗？
制作音箱喇叭是关键。
更让人难以看懂的其实还有万科的推盘节奏。
登上望江楼，滚滚江水，江阴长江大桥气势磅礴，尽收眼底。
却没有整不了该咋整的内容。
拟任省作家协会党组副书记。
加强毕业生就业指导、就业服务和就业援助。
还是像拓海的老爹一样的大神？
还比商贩在我们家里来收要贵一点儿嘛。
而盈利预警更使雨润食品的股价雪上加霜。
然而，多个区县细则却始终“犹抱琵琶半遮面”。
在三二五国道黄坡大桥上，一辆货车被大风掀翻。
我很愤怒，从床上拿菜刀砍了他。
至少我也得到伦敦奥运会后才考虑这个事情。
此前他遇到一名女子，对方愚笨，李贯军便将其收为“老伴”。
此间，内陆各省为了争上内陆第一核电站而拼得头破血流。
众人拿起棍棒追打，在院门口外拦住将其打死。
各楼层都有一个消防栓，平时演练的时候会用到。
被禁锢的希望苏生了吗？
刚睡醒，叫姐起来干吗。
湿米粉是老广们喜欢的食材。
原油顺地下管沟流淌，形成地面流淌火，火势蔓延。
小羊不断反抗，双方力量悬殊，最后王虎意图得逞。
此外阿桑奇还喜欢虐待猫。
但这些与官方的介绍迥异。
钟丽缇主动搂着型男，俨如一对新婚夫妻，非常恩爱。
我们真的就束手无策了吗？
不是应该先恋爱再结婚吗？
撤回也得到了法院的准许。
积极开辟办证绿色通道。
又拿起扫帚，打扫卫生。
她干着类似于打杂的工作。
空军机关对一航院的做法给予充分肯定。
加拿大渥太华大厦上空出现三道闪电。
加加林死因先前有不少“版本”。
第四工作区为冀东干旱区，包括唐山市的滦南等。
别提了，和你嫂子快离了。
如此“冷酷”的美容办法听得搜搜团的美女“大王”哆嗦成一团。
昨日，石浦港还下了雷阵雨。
我当时不以为然，回答说，这又没坏，还能穿呢！
我们再筛选后，会通知您结果。
后来女友躺在床头不动了，嘴里直喘粗气。
一些胆小的店主往往愿意出钱安抚，私下了结。
那城里人瞟了农民一眼说：没文化，这叫踏青。
没想到对方两人竟动起手来，操起伞柄就朝陈师傅身上砸。
那人家萨博什么的一年比二十多次怎么说呀？
不要光看塔尖，而要多看看金字塔的基础怎么样。
中国与东南亚国家联盟的关系有哪些进展？
四太太梁安琪昨天生日，心情大好。
一绑匪向预谋劫持的红色轿车走去。
执政党更是在地方选举中惨败。
作家的声讨引起巨大反响，业内外各种声援之声纷纷传来。
否则，“烧火”的热情、干劲、愿望不仅落空，反留笑柄。
在雨水浇灌下，湖南暑热全消，天气变得凉爽宜人。
该隧道由中铁十八局施工、柳铁监理。
由于现场闷热，不少观众摇着扇子听歌。
于是二人对着其他人玩命地挖起鼻屎来。
可是，种种“隐性福利”却五花八门、愈演愈烈。
果然，加工娃娃菜的基地就隐藏在这里。
他请求由三名法官组成的法庭，对巴希尔发出逮捕令。
相应的，增发募资规模也随增发价格的调整而有所变化。
生命的赞歌，属于舍己救人的英雄们。
当晚就把这帅哥给睡了，心里无比的舒畅。
火灾原因尚未查明，当地干部责任却差不多撇清了。
随后，锁匠找出工具撬锁，撬锁时发出乒乒乓乓的响声。
肮脏的加工病死鸡作坊。
油船的甲板被撕开。
头顶有根绳连着树。
男孩抬腕看表，冲她笑笑，说：你迟到了。
平时骂你就算了，非要等我打你，才知道我文武双全！
更为严重还在于“攒项目”。
没想到虎子记恨于心。
太平轮下沉很快，恐慌的人群开始往救生艇跑。
杭州一对老夫妻常在理发店掏耳朵，结果掏出了“性病”。
游行队伍边行进，边与好奇的观众互致问候、祝贺新年。
机场工作人员和驻场武警连夜在机场跑道上扫雪除冰。
同剧的杏、铃木福、柄本明和北村一辉等演员也悉数亮相。
老太太撇头观望，已经注意到银灰色轿车高速驶来。
撒丁岛北部沿岸的大片地区近来被卡塔尔人买下。
但能否写出不朽之作，既要有经历，有才华，还要有运气。
这是原版“伊索寓言”的故事，用意是提醒人们要当心坏人的诡计。
未来大风主要对南疆有影响。
电厂大烟囱排出淡黄色废气。
但周边有村民被炸起的飞物擦伤。
亓春兵、栾义杰不服，提出上诉。
飞燕恨不得要大叫实行共产主义。
来碗牛肉面、点份馄饨，挺方便。
这些都让周冬雨一度觉得特别沮丧。
讲完理想，我想最后讲讲现实。
曾任航空兵战士、排长、参谋等职。
大学生气愤地甩头即走，走之余不忘再摔一扇门。
海外侨胞参政、理政，立足生根的意识越发强烈。
中俄是山水相连的友好邻邦，中俄两国人民的友谊源远流长。
很多名人遭到这些网民用污秽语言攻击时，都选择躲起来。
千年珍藏，一朝损毁。
但女司机还是耸耸肩表示不会吹气。
火险等级触顶忙坏了本市的护林人员。
卢桂华是家中唯一的“秀才”，毕业于一所中专的财会专业。
缺乏监管的预算外资金呢？
频繁出席时尚活动的蓝燕也因此获封“红毯女王”这一称号。
想都不要想，这是啥子生活喔！
雅典称王的韩国小子柳承敏有望创造历史吗？
就如孵小鸡的老母鸡一样温暖。
但拍摄时主演们都心惊胆颤。
突然，飞机开始左右摇晃起来。
我幸好没有遇过人用花言巧语哄我。
今天又做的特别咸，媳妇看我一眼玩电脑去了。
当然，公众都理解乳协的用心良苦、舐犊情深。
现在是爷爷奶奶照顾小秋蓉。
要黑洞图片上天文网。有很多。
这个家我再也忍受不下去了。
推开门，一股尿臊味扑鼻而来。
我看见保险杠左侧掉了一块。
没关系的想竞标，门儿都没有。
你这么矮为什么不去卖烧饼！
回到租房，两人张罗鱼火锅。
西方国家怀疑伊朗以和平利用核能为掩护，试图发展核武器。
冷傲的表情和凛冽的眼神，演绎出浓艳的氛围。
强化民众问责，这也是行政问责未来的方向。
他在体育运动方面也没什么可夸耀的资本。
警方还现场扣押了三千册尚未装订成册的“朱镕基答记者问”。
而外界环境也是得“牛皮癣”的重要原因之一。
但让人哭笑不得的是，游客中也不乏“抠墙皮、挖砖块”的。
老婆发现我脸上起了个痘，死活要帮我挤掉它，我说还没熟，挤了痛。
假如真有这种人我宁愿去尝他导弹的滋味。
汉阳楚才中学的女教师却没有机会展现丝袜美腿了。
经检查，长在贾卵巢内的肿瘤很可能为恶性。
他们身穿白色运动衣，个个精神抖擞。
卡尔法尼亚认为，街头卖淫是可耻的事情。
但是丁可儿一直沉默，对出走的事情只字不提。
这里是埃及第一批王朝的墓地。
他快速镊住两张钱，攥在手心捏成团，镊子收进袖子。
不久以后，王红和丈夫离婚。
不是，我游一圈就喂一口，我觉得这样特像海洋馆里训海豚！
我在旁边喊掐人中掐人中。
空军基地开始一年一度的防疫注射，由于人多，他们请兽医来帮忙。
专家分析认为，中国国防部长访美意在化解疑虑。
她不喜欢交际，应酬能推则推。
是否因此遇到烦恼，有什么经验或教训，都请给商报说说。
在深坑两边，还未塌陷的路面下，夯土也已被淘空。
老郑说，他考虑把大鲤鱼煮给大家吃掉，不知营养咋样。
平房后面的山坡上，几名男子正拎着矿灯往山上爬。
以至于彻普泰撞线时，连记者都搞不清楚“这家伙是谁”。
给你讲几遍了你还不会，你的脑袋让驴踢了？
气愤之下，年轻的女婿竟持扁担将岳母打成重伤。
虽然保住一条命，但脊椎骨多处骨折，脊神经毁损严重。
张信哲看到数学题就傻眼张嘴，只好向小朋友求救。
图为交警在王府井路口冒雪指挥交通。
一个古董贩子、一个银匠和一个木匠，走到了一起。
那你还想看多远？
人命关天，医托应该是过街老鼠，人人都有喊打的责任。
这样不至于让您飘飘欲仙，更不至于让同事们发现您中奖的事。
随后爆料人称张彦的公公在北京、三亚等地拥有大量房产。
映着一闪一闪的光亮，我才发现她粗糙的手上戴着个大金戒指。
昨日，在动物园的育婴室，育婴箱中憨态可掬的虎宝宝“妞妞”。
且两幅用地均按规定批予出价最高的投标者。
很显然，买家即便瞎编一个号码，摊主也无从查证。
组织者阿里承认说，这是他们“无法应对”咖喱过辣导致的问题。
有洗衣机，我就偷会懒吧。
一到北平便陷入应酬的漩涡。
每斤才九块五，还能讲价。
汤某看后心中非常愤怒，便产生报复公公的恶念。
理查森甚至没能获准探访格罗斯。
砍剩的树桩，又萌生出许许多多的嫩芽来。
就算生活只是个杯具，我也要做个上品青花瓷杯具。
难道嫌我不好看？不过我心灵美哦。
就像鱼翅扎到了喉咙里。
要是你的车坏在路上呢？
费明仪则用荣幸、高兴、兴奋几个字眼，形容她的感受和心情。
梦想一定要有，万一实现了呢？
呵呵这词最有内涵了。
周忠扬头部、左脚受伤。
这才是可行的编程语言，它更具伸缩性。
许多房奴成为躲避房产被没收骗局的受害者。
茶暖手，爱暖心。
反正我不愿相信。
那就关门退休喽。
他们走上各地街头，呼喊反美口号，高举反美标语。
婚是离了，但关系远没有撇清，公司里仍不断有债主前来要债。
明明是在敲背按摩，非得想那么多。
例如，每天让她穿着脏衣服上学等。
皮肤比过去好很多噢。
摘掉面具后的刘晓晔。
如何增强消费者对于国产品牌的信心？
爸：“你蠢啊，鸡的爪子这么锋利，擦屁屁的时候容易把屁屁刮伤了…”
现藏于北京故宫的“乾隆宝薮”中有这件玉玺的明确著录。
孟某突然搂住丝丝，然后亲吻她。
虎腿迈着青云步，虎头顶着好仕途。
买的股票又跌停了，没有那个命啊！
随后，耿谆被日方判处无期徒刑。
怎么不改改有些人眼红的心态呢！
不错，爱乃是抽象的东西，要活就要吃，又有吃又有爱日子才会精彩。
李某系东乌珠穆沁旗满都镇人，是个体经营商户。
这是自一九七三年来，女王首次缺席该会议。
不过有时徐子淇也会吃到闷，故会转吃姜炒饭。
精华仍在提炼，脚本即将出膛。
这一幕幕宣告南广高铁迎来上砟上枕的施工高潮。
小女孩看他冲自己眨眼睛，羞涩地咧嘴笑，说“我喜欢他”。
话说我二姨当年为了摘人家家里的杏子，把人家家里的猪给放了！
周伟思自称信佛，在家供奉有菩萨，每天在家烧香拜佛。
引导读者欣赏刊登的文章，而不是迎合读者低俗趣味刊登的文章。
自从跟着冯巩上了春晚，他在外活动就经常打着冯巩的招牌。
一二线城市大有地王卷土重来之势。
春运“挖潜”，高速公路也应进一步释放通行能力。
话一出口就懊悔，这摆明是对谢景渊和饼干的看不起。
去年她因爆陈乐榣借钱不还后三成员反目。
比斯库在苏联扶植的匈牙利傀儡政府中担任内政部长。
而据另一知情人士透露，女生的死亡系吃堕胎药所致。
把“隐形狗”用到环保的概念中，在成都还是第一次。
呼吁多年的三网合一问题为何长期悬而未决？
张琰明来个迅疾的回马枪：我有三个条件。
今年夏季双抢期间，莆田市大型农机户享受优先灌桶购油的待遇。
人员冗余便是一种典型的表象。
他表示，现在医保基金部门，是越省越好。
这个不可以随便乱叫的吧！
罗布泊位于新疆塔里木盆地东北部、若羌县境内。
当魏云科迎接记者时，记者发现他走路一瘸一拐。
正当俞小凡酝酿复出时，便遭遇老公“劈腿”事件。
她说投票时挑了自己和尤荫荫出局，事后她后悔挑了自己。
古都北京，是祖宗留给我们的宝贵财富。
其三，七月新增财政存款或再现季节性增长。
同事的车牌被偷了，贼要他用钱赎回。
但是松鼠也啃食核桃、松子等果实，造成一定的果实浪费。
当然，打捞核潜艇的费用不菲。
季莫申科一周前发动绝食抗议，称遭到监狱虐待。
他毕生反对破坏统一、分裂祖国的汉奸卖国贼。
儿子：那爱迪生的爸爸怎么不发明电灯呢。
招待朋友却都是好吃好喝，从不吝啬。
目前尚无确凿证据显示此案与顺吉集团有关联。
吕明玉成为我省第一个两次捐髓救助他人的志愿者。
尾巴摇摆着乞求蛇头，说，救救我们吧，我的吵闹真是太无聊了！
运动场上叱咤风云的佟文，生活中却有着鲜为人知的另一面。
我赶紧去哄她，隔着门缝看她，说些不搭边的话逗她。
五辐式合金轮毂造型很硬朗，力量感十足。
海狗全身覆盖着绒毛，脸很短。
这场跨年夜晚会更像一场私人派对。
汤文元说，卢俊卿当时工作很积极，而且很会积攒人脉。
警察都熬夜多，所以好容易有个休息日，多半是多睡会儿。
当一个人错了的时候，他妥协退却了，他是明智的。
诗人一听，顿时把与雨翔的怨恨忘记，拉住社长的手：拜托了。
抹布也是很有用的哟！
偶尔我们也会吵吵架。
但对万达来说，跨界棋局才刚刚开始。
三是要匡正好风气。
南开永远年轻，她的学生也都充满活力。
怎么爱你都不嫌多。
徐威当场拧着了火炬，却没伸手去点。
扔完鞋，接着回应。
你想怎样啦？
整那么快干嘛。
东北网将持续关注穆棱河流域污染问题。
学会劳逸结合。
知道呀国民老公嘛。
我会玩很多游戏呢。
你想要什么然后呢？
他看不到我跳舞呀。
你也好啊美女。
打点的到不到位，将直接影响到销售额。
地铁站晕倒的男子。
如果遭遇寒流突袭，供暖有可能将提前。
这都令自主品牌的压力骤增。
想交高于保护价的定购粮吗？
对于这一判决结果，李磊姥姥代理律师王海阳表示认可。
白发人送黑发人，于芬的父母于某和吴某一直郁郁寡欢。
王教授，您这回可有了独立的书房喽！
传授实用技能，帮助农民掌握脱贫致富的本领。
我可以陪你地老天荒，你却非要我把牢底坐穿么。
而一看见生人，总要吼叫，谁想靠近狗宝宝，不被咬才怪。
营业面积大了，肉店生意也就方便了。
清早起来，气味大得呛鼻子。
圆明园猪首铜像的捐款回购便是一成功案例。
小心耶，不好意思喔，不好意思跌倒了。
我是大方温柔的巨蟹座，有时候也会有点敏感和脆弱。
记者随后询问营业员，这套餐椅是否为全实木的？
戈尔巴乔夫在海参崴讲话一直回避这个问题。
黄依然浑身发抖，一直喊冷。
加快推进轻微刮蹭事故“互碰自赔”，提高当事人自行解决率。
丹东市委常委、秘书长卢秉宇出任黄金坪经济区管委会主任。
清洁工阿姨一边打着自己的头，一边说“我好笨”、“我好笨”。
母熊直立着，一副随时要扑过来的样子。
如果说一切都是钱闹的，未免有点赤裸裸。
撒谎的孩子不能当俺偶像，弃之。
周费特别喜欢雅阁轿车，但总舍不得买。
作为一个北欧国家，气候变暖对挪威具有很大的影响。
走近才发现，大桥已垮塌。
你找我谈心——就是谈这个？
第二个问题，说说文化思考。
本周四和周五平均拥堵指数分别为八和八点五。
这些机构又岂会放过这一入货的良机？
辽宁队则包揽了毽球比赛男、女团体两个一等奖。
克拉拉，你为什么在大庭广众之下向那个陌生青年丢飞吻？
他还表示，贝卢斯科尼这个“傀儡必须滚蛋”。
刘湘骥是湖南省攸县大同桥镇大板米厂老板。
李克勤大哥则在微博上大晒美食生蚝，网友大呼胃口好。
也请广大网友为广东文化建设当好参谋，多出良策。
是否准辞将待调查结果再说。
对此消息吉布森方面断然予以否认，称其纯属“荒谬杜撰”。
他和泰勒育有两个儿子。
在河南，为了吸引考生，有的培训班打出了“万元包过”的招牌。
经历爱的伤痛，终于精神崩溃。
一开始很蛮横并且不给我退。
岂能坐视阿扁有任何片面改变现状的行为？
有一次，我妈拿扫帚把我的屁股蛋子打的红红的。
第一只春羔的第一声咩叫，宛如草原浪漫曲的节奏。
就炒菜少放点油吧，反正高油食品本来就不健康。
本店所有商品一律免费送你哟！
揣上彩票，小雨就忘了此事。
生活中不要乱用药啊，一定要爱惜自己的身体。
你是亲眼所见董存瑞拉开了导火索吗？
昨日，庄奴又被授予了“重庆荣誉市民”称号。
任何经营场所不得向未成年人出售烟酒。
第三条、吨税设置优惠税率和普通税率。
撸袖子女生给了她一掌后，红外套女生一脚把她踹飞。
公司为员工购买了回乡的车票，发放了几百元路途盘缠费用。
在他家的两层小楼周围，尽是低矮的泥瓦房。
吆喝声、呵斥声、抱怨声此起彼伏。
小姨虽做了手术，但肺上仍有问题。
我住将军澳，那张是将军澳住户证。
不难推测，应对这一风潮有两种迥异态度。
弱阻力在近期高点一点三零二七。
恩格尔系数是食品支出总额占个人消费支出总额的比重。
他摸到一个瓶子，也没睁开眼瞅瞅，就往嘴里送。
如果罪名成立，他们将被处以死刑，但预计案件审理过程冗长。
最近，这座豪宅正在“精雕细琢”。
其前岳父见状上前抢夺打火机。
这同样也是太庙所不能代替的。
眼睛往下看，眨眼动作增加是你的撒谎习惯。
岗位虽少，但只要能蹭进来便能得到一份高薪。
家里的洗衣机可以代劳呀！
以后会偶尔有这样的日子的。
一直摸一直摸，这下好了。
好比罪已犯下，要杀要剐便是法官的事，他的使命至此而终。
然而宝鸡陈仓区阳平镇的妞妞在生意前夕，却遭遇了不幸。
他们将对留样、召回的产品、包装袋等进行抽样检测。
单杠成为本场较量的分水岭。
我刚来也会这样每晚半夜两三点才会睡得着。
田野供图：非洲姑娘德布佳达。
纳粹德国占领挪威后，称蒙克的画“堕落”。
放下电话才数分钟，母亲哑着嗓子的哭吼声已经响起。
林母从社会形势分析到本行工作，缜密得无懈可击。
为爬山好的队友服务。
在把老张暴打一顿后，三人还不解恨又踹了老张的车几脚。
俄罗斯新秀科莫娃，以十五点七三三分高居第一。
结果机器出了故障，钱被吞了却没打印存单。
说说代表的那些事儿吧。
小兔崽子，你要是敢往下边拉屎，你就死定了！
我随之追出去各种道歉，各种承诺，各种哄，媳妇才回心转意。
今年初，印尼一名囚犯受虐惨死的新闻曾引发轰动。
记者向一位贩子询问，是否能买到没熏过硫磺的药材。
老板称，出售的天鹅是渔民用网捕杀后送来的，绝对安全。
大家要注意室内通风，饮食最好以清淡爽口为主。
阳兵被击伤后，被警察反拧着双臂，揪住衣领，押下车来。
奥林匹亚，我强力推荐。
杨女士的公公证实，儿媳晚上已经没了，“挺突然的”。
廖某某每天折磨她，虐待她，她成了廖某某的“性奴”。
研究党史，就是想从走过的路总结经验教训。
李先生为此非常苦恼。
在家附近，有一段陡坡。
大爷说：这是水泥路啊。
每涂完一层，他总要休息上一两分钟，喘口气。
官员在事故现场“傻笑”。
该案在法律上的手段已经穷尽，暂无法执行。
他心存疑惑，这么严肃的书也能逗人笑？
王健林果然胃口惊人。
韩国房奴人数尚无准确统计。
老婆抬手给了我一耳光：凭啥把便宜的这杯给我？
证券简称为“杭齿前进”，证券代码为“六零幺幺七七”。
张磊磊现在想先把自己该得的工资要到手。
没有人知道白二少起了多少作用。
法国的酒文化利用葡萄美酒做载体，已经热销世界。
曹雅琪回到教室时，里面空无一人，都去上体育课了。
训练的最后，所有民兵一起扛着步枪去练习射击。
若要购房，只能在其中的五幢楼房进行挑选。
四年前城南那片凹凸不平，杂草丛生的荒山坡不见了。
看来是交情未至，缘分未到，再处处看吧。
但部分“亏空”从何补充，是我们要考虑的。
伤员目前在空军四五四医院紧急救治。
扯起渔网后该男子也跟着漂浮上来。
二战期间，日军就是打着裕仁天皇的名义侵略亚洲。
我的平衡感不太好哟。
逮到点官场臭事，就来大劲。
远处望去，各类招牌琳琅满目。
腾讯微博出了一个功能吹一吹。
谁也没让你花，孩子非要花，家长拗不过，花呗！
钱荣也垂头丧气进来，见了他也不计恩怨了，道：“我和那个姓姚的吹啦！
对此，刘銮雄曾请求澳门法院驳回指控，但遭到拒绝。
匪徒脚踩平底鞋，没有穿袜。
赌场流动“轮流坐庄”，避免被警方查抄。
老妈头也不抬：你小时候写给我的。
庄严的山东会堂内华灯璀璨、花团锦簇，气氛热烈。
原因就是烟花爆竹引起。
第二件事情，一种颜色。
此次米粉提价市场反应不一。
王宋涛想这辈子算是和路灯结下不解之缘了。
秤盘几乎托不住它肥大的身子。
直到民警赶到劝说后，那位候鸟老人才不情愿地走开。
黎巴嫩检方已展开调查。
李振波的妻子盛亚玲，在观看“向死而生”时心情久久不能平静。
现在明月岛上的将军府。
在路上，他见到矿泉水空瓶子时，也捡起摁进背包里。
三是着力查处损害群众切身利益的案件。
生命在于运动，我觉得你还是多运动运动吧。
敢骚扰姑奶奶，活腻了你。
另一个惹眼的明星当属翁虹。
往昔对比，葛启义感慨良多。
去村里找，说是水泵坏了。
死者棺材也被抬入厂区内。
但欧盟可能已经抛弃了英国。
房屋赠与光有表示是不够的。
他们蔑视法律，践踏法律。
老婆回到病房里，一脸无奈。
我的性格也是逆来顺受，从小胆小怕事，凡事都忍让。
这是个愚蠢的声明，原因有三。
男子嘴里一边嘟囔着，一边从身上摸出钞票往天上撒。
大部分瓜农称，都没有往年卖得好。
只要咳嗽就得去医院，每天都在吃药。
你们太没信誉了！这都五天了还不发货！我要投诉你！
更重要的是，“铁老大”的地位依然非常稳固。
得知眼前这个形貌丑陋的叫花子，竟是自己的生父段延庆。
其次，玉米食用油尤其是玉米胚芽油正越来越多的推向市场。
该两名旅客不想出去办理托运又不愿自弃。
还有更多的综合物流、项目物流企业蠢蠢欲动。
最近几个月中，他有时一天也做不成一桩买卖。
她个人很欣赏有个性、有文化底蕴的录取通知书。
要多给市民提供运动的场所。
我就是一个山东乡下孩子。
这与前几代人有天壤之别。
点评“辛辣”简短，极尽嘲讽挖苦之能事。
这几年行动不便，爷爷拿着它当拐杖用。
抓住大树梢俺俩就爬上去了。
群山阻隔最易让人气馁却步。
顾客：“我理一次发，你竟收我五元钱，我头上几乎没有头发呀！
挠着挠着，孙某的左手悄悄滑到脖子的刀刃处。
喜欢呀，你要和我一起吗？
因为物价仍在缓慢上升，而且还没有出现拐点。
火灾中，一女子葬身火场。
为了稳住这名男子，魏先生允许其进来。
可以简单理解成长宽高啦哈哈。
你再凶我？再凶我我就跟你离婚！
他的喜怒哀乐通常都是跟做学问联系在一起的。
目前杨晓霞的病情已明显好转，感染得到控制。
打小就缺少父爱的他，性格倔强，仇恨心极强。
口渴得实在受不了，就用手巾沾点水把嘴唇弄湿。
晋升上将军衔的魏凤和军容严整、精神抖擞地站在主席台前。
同时氧气也促进了面筋的形成，让面点口感更好。
伊朗始终否认秘密研制核武器的指控。
得嘞，我们算体验红军过草地了。
该车无线路牌，系非法运营车辆。
可刚眨了一眼，那就成了一场梦。
不过，不要把这个符号往歪里想。
贫穷意味着无能、懒惰、耻辱和失败。
终审裁定后，两兄弟被执行枪决。
津巴布韦央行稍早发行的大面额钞票，流通到年底。
为了提高“战斗力”，团伙成员还经常“演习”。
这个在水中溺死的小偷本来会游泳，而那个水塘也不大。
下个礼拜我不跑了。
就算没人喝多，当一般的汤喝喝也不错哦。
我昨晚也失眠了！现在好困却不想睡。
家中兄弟姐妹八个，他是老幺。
此前的女排大奖赛，中国队一胜四负仅获第四。
细致到五官甚至眉毛。
中华骨髓库不留分文。
之后张家人从小区物业得知，司机躲在单元门里过了半宿。
从前有个捉迷藏社团，他们团长到现在还没被找到呢。
事后警方证实，该案系纵火案。
当天葛泽宁被公安机关抓获。
四是旅馆业上传信息不规范。
俗话说的好，上梁不正下梁歪。
并且，用卡比用现金方便多了。
不依葫芦画瓢就是好干部吗？
孔子学院总部设在国家汉办。
所以，一嗨还是决定每年按照自己预测的速度来扩张。
警方初步调查，夫妻俩死于一氧化碳中毒。
阿罗约执政期间，一直没能同各种腐败嫌疑撇清关系。
不久韩寒也给我打来电话，告诉我他休学的事。
老丈人笑了笑说：正好我们四个打扑克，你去陪她们包饺子吧。
有人问话时，她总是先咧开嘴乐，露出可爱的豁牙子。
就将军军带至沣峪口一农家乐，途中强强乘机逃脱。
二月入院接受治疗，将血液内的毒素清除。
并不是每一餐都必须达到热量要求。
但是有广西“十不准”原则，禁止公布状元名单。
老师，能躺着的话，谁愿意趴着睡呀…结果同桌提前回家睡觉了。
对于生儿育女，雪儿表示希望享受二人世界，稍后才作考虑。
继续做好清史纂修工作。
目前该模型展示在斯塔万格大学考古博物馆内。
不过订单已经滚滚而来，不少韩商一张口就要采购几千吨。
其时，谷得仓正和村治保主任谷建一块儿喝酒。
两个孩子也有顽皮、不听话的时候，想要翻栅栏出去玩。
直到大傻咬断野猪的气管，野猪不动弹了，它才松口。
陈氏说，他还没有与绑匪直接谈话。
秦法友是孤寡老人，一生未婚无子女。
他说这些“笑话”令他有些悔不当初。
据说是由白静母亲或姥姥居住。
雪后的北京空气清新了许多，踏雪赏景者络绎不绝。
当时文强还说，准备找冉谈话，“嚷他下去了”。
想什么美事儿呢，敢考核不过，看我不抽死你！
而在本月投放量持续减少的情况下，“僧多粥少”局面几成定局。
在科室里，于莺是攒聚会的主儿，时常给大家找找乐子。
我与她何曾有过须臾的分离呢？
不，我是说你土，就像秦岭兵马俑。
茫茫沙漠淹没了他们跋涉的足印。
于是古柯桑被以鲁莽驾驶的罪名逮捕。
首日股价表现根据市场买卖情况而定。
嫁这么远干什么，麻将打法一点都不一样。
散步归来，我们到下榻的旅馆餐厅用膳。
我想回学校扫扫墓，那里埋葬了我十几年的青春！
我很懂女孩子，一定帮你撩到妹子。
经鉴定，沙麦可右大腿软组织挫裂伤，为轻微伤。
面临进退尴尬的困境。
听说多跳绳还能长个儿。
但与此同时，“扫马路”的工作竟然也遭“疯抢”，就不免让人惊诧。
生活中葛优也十分在意公众形象。
作为全国人大代表，他对微博打拐非常关注。
此次重庆打黑审判，也已进入“扫尾”阶段。
能不能让不同时产的甲鱼卵同时孵化出壳呢？
结果今天早上一上班，萨摩耶很幽怨的趴在那，哈士奇却不见了。
应采儿：陈小春与应采儿婚后收敛不少。
黑作坊一关门就连空心胶囊也买不到了！
大排长龙的出城车辆，塞满从加尔维斯敦到休士顿的道路。
信中称，经常看到图书馆有关负责人从善本书库里拎包。
女孩受的是弥漫性轴索损伤。
言辞中，杰克逊不时爆出粗口。
他写道，这次行程全长二点三三七一万公里。
遇难者中的父亲在瓦尔省经营一家建筑公司。
其实，面板同行也在持续强化中小尺寸业务。
不过，黛咪听闻消息后已经通过律师否认。
食物替代的规律是普遍规律。
这些杨树苗普遍比较矮小，枝干很细。
王宝强又露出他憨厚的笑容。
大客车从高速路翻落山沟。
一是加强内部队伍建设，夯实业务基础。
说到这种种苦处，徐天觉得委屈无尽。
有些星星伤心就渐渐淡出粉丝群了。
我现在耳朵里还老觉得响着那个声音。
我一般一个月去上海一次，因为上海有赛道。
比如吃苹果时，一口咬出一条小虫子，那玩意儿就是食心虫。
如果用盖子或者大桶，学生不是拧不开，就是容易发生意外。
即使身体不舒服，头昏脑胀，也得咬咬牙，爬起来给儿子烧饭。
清湖村大布路清湖商业广场，是摩托仔聚集搭客的地方。
允许看，但要坚决地试。
目前，龙某因涉嫌挪用资金罪被依法刑事拘留。
辛格为何要拒绝布什的热情邀请呢？
难道真就老得连扫把也拿不动了？
韩老汉曾因不满虎子偷自己的钱还打骂过他。
遭亢反抗时，怕被人听到就用扳手将其打昏。
该剧取材于某部学雷锋标兵的真实故事。
周末我什么都不要忙了，只想默默陪着你。
有关部门的事先处理算得上妥善彻底吗？
这是怕我跑了的节奏吗？
他可能刮掉了标志性的胡子，患上哮喘或者胃溃疡。
与往年不同，洪水如黄河般夹杂着大量泥土滚滚流向低洼处。
前几年女儿出嫁到安徽蒙城县，而弟兄三人都没有娶媳妇。
本是很单纯的四片嘴唇碰一下，不足以说明什么。
来世平被余雄所感动，打破沉默，一个劲追问余雄的身世。
要是经常拉肚子，建议主人去看看中医，调理一下肠胃。
王女士三个妹妹住在阳台一侧的卧室。
这些小作坊全部是前宋村人搭设。
一会儿后，弟弟和堂妹回家喝水，留下了小雪与刘某单独相处。
做垂直类电商，也没有希望。
一是多日连续排水使水泵损坏，排水能力下降。
活该，点什么香不好，非点蚊香，这不找死么！
消防锤一定要准备好。
她和姨家表姐曾在附近打过工，她还到南口村找过朋友。
这种管控也是保持货币平稳非常关键的步骤。
她是如何跟这些金发碧眼的洋人沟通的呢？
这场比赛，队伍除非大比分取胜，否则凶多吉少将无缘决赛。
杨威比高崚晚入学一年，同样在行政管理系学习。
钱荣一走，那位替补队员立即填上空位，继续尽钱荣未尽的责任。
我后悔呀，前车之鉴，我咋就不知道吸取别人的教训呢。
而“苹果”等纸媒，冗员也不少。
背男友时，她先咧嘴一笑，稍稍弯腰。
如今这里滴水不见了，岸边的植物枯黄而矮小。
事发时，她慌乱中穿着拖鞋，披着棉袄往外跑。
在地宫里，发现了佛顶骨舍利、感应舍利等佛家圣物。
全年补助人数约八十一点八四五二万人。
我早生了五十年啊！
另一些可能会感到自己在潜藏偷食禁果的渴望。
大爷只好又返回座位，站也不是，坐也不是。
我买彩票从来没中过，哪怕一毛钱也没有。
拈花寺以东的胡同儿道路并不算窄，但两旁却停满了私家车。
她偶尔抬头看看读者，淡淡一笑。
小猫被卡在车底，消防员来救。
听着延安城中远远传来的歌声，也许当时的命名纯系偶然。
支架底部空隙处，一只土狗趴在里面悠闲的舔着爪子。
每到泉鱼出洞时，当地渔民就守在洞穴前，等着鱼进篓。
产经新闻”称，石原通过这样的方式对日本外交进行挖苦。
原来你也是瞄星人。
前晚，刘华清的侄儿侄女们临时搭起了灵堂。
幸福就是猫吃鱼、狗吃肉、奥特曼打小怪兽。
我都不是香港小姐，没赢过，所以没框框。
还有一些僧人被送入大学。
祁海认为，与其咬文嚼字还不如为农民工做些实事。
以下为其访谈摘录。
我可以和一一起看月亮。
北约国家拖不起了？
你们给他点压力啦！
脸小腿长哭声响。
美女无聊找大叔？
艾薇儿与前夫仍是朋友。
全部车次“晚点未定”。
后天温度舒适，（晴）。
蜈蚣怒气吼，甚至山河摇。
没有为什么就是等我干嘛。
刚刚在看一本有趣的书呀。
那您能谈一下普通老百姓如何做好防台的准备吗？
他撇过头去，目光盯着大海。
昨日，昌平区史各庄村，村口、沿街正在安装铁栅栏。
网友的误解，让许峰的扮演者小苏很苦恼。
一番打斗后，孙富被摁倒在地上。
也许董事会很高兴，谢天谢地的说这尊菩萨送走算了。
她叫周克云，是某旅三级士官刘勇的妻子，怀孕五个月。
远征乘坐输送带是东方歌舞团舞台下很精彩的一个节目。
手术后，那个经常压得丁冉满头大汗的大肚腩消失了。
噶图巴区是布隆迪反政府武装“全国解放阵线”的大本营。
如何调和弱者与强者，贫与富之间的矛盾，极为重要与紧迫。
在电话旁的林雨翔像是知了蜕的壳。
您在家就少抽点烟，没事串串门子对身体也是有好处的。
其中住宅类土地成交额环比大涨百分之一百零一点一。
有人认为，新闻集团宁愿廉价甩掉这个包袱。
李伟才翻几页，身体上都是刺痛，汗水潜伏在额头上，蓄势待发。
多数晕倒的警察也是血压异常，与天气无关。
前女友脸色一变，男朋友正得意，我又来了一句：今天你是陪我姐姐呢？
券商股今日继续集体狂欢，兴业证券受游资热捧以涨停开盘。
尽管天气严寒，冷风冽冽，但各部队官兵精神抖擞，斗志昂扬。
只要他一动，狗就换个地方咬，到后来爪子搭在他肩上咬。
男子面前，是两个穿着花棉袄活蹦乱跳的小孩子。
金门纪念八二三炮战五十四周年。
它们被人为破坏后，在洪涝灾年防汛效果显著。
粥每次都给妻子喝，王东进自己打点开水，泡馒头就咸菜。
他供称，美军曾实施美人计，派女兵摸他的大腿逼供。
这项激励措施似乎很奏效。
当晚，一伙人将袁某砍死街头。
又快又舒适，但是我们没钱哪！
岳凤琼眼里，女儿是典型的乖乖女。
最后厂家表示可以给刘某另换包质量好的酸奶。
萨科齐可能依据隆盖的报告决定是否提早撤军。
你爹犯了村规就没事了？
最终，两人商定以“凿壁偷钱”的方式进行诈骗。
他的喉咙被割断了两次，手腕也有被割伤的痕迹，前额有擦伤。
记者马上问，考生信息被抢注的多吗？
前阵子接买家的电话太多，说到腮帮子疼，下颌骨头发炎。
和你在一起，在沙滩上用沙子堆一个大大的城堡。
种种的事件引起港人不满。
张先生说，他攒了不少儿子的决心书、保证书，却无法挽回儿子。
我非常喜欢思考哦。
温家宝来到这里，只见一垄垄菜花、生菜等一望无际。
于是，一场博弈在刘奇琰与棚改指挥部之间展开。
让我们就把内容放在那儿吧。
二零一一与二零一二年，雾霾来袭。
我还真没去过哪儿好好旅行。
据悉，该银行目前在深圳已经全面停做房贷业务。
在整个奥运会期间要体现全方位的人文关怀。
这名居民还称，他在交谈中发现霍姆斯眼神怪异、不停眨动。
摩门经”是耶稣基督后期圣徒教会的经典著作。
黄圣依受宠若惊，措手不及。
后来还割了屁股上一块肉补耳朵。
菲律宾全球示威游行昨天草草收场。
首先，记者拨打的是约车电话九六幺零六。
一着急，她就会出于自我保护，耍两招不太协调的咏春拳。
人称练不死的陈钰只有二十岁，大跟斗、小技巧，样样难不倒。
她是老大呀，她下面还有四个妹妹呢！
而现在还是请你将剑插进鞘里，管住你那毫无用处的舌头吧。
拱在交汇处向下凹陷，以容纳上面的珠宝球。
奔涌迸发活力，梦想照亮现实。
从十九年前建厂至今，污水一直排放到望虞河中。
欧洲宇航防务集团是欧洲空客公司的母公司。
她解约纯属个性使然，跟别人力捧没什么关系。
蔡维斌是成都丽凯手性技术有限公司原股东、销售经理。
关某，原系濉溪县孙疃镇燕头村党支部书记、村委会主任。
这里，不妨把有关“当事人”的情况拿出来晒晒。
山高路远，长途颠簸。
而最终的损失，都会由投资者买单。
目前，四位市民已为自己的爱犬报名。
雨花茶是南京特产，也是全国十大名茶之一哦！
他走近钢琴并开始演奏“祖国从哪里开始”。
见了面要多劝劝妻子，不能再干傻事了。
日前有媒体称，姚晨代言的“一嗨租车”涉嫌违规业务。
是马尔代夫，不是马儿带父。
绿树鲜花掩映的城市角落中，有时还能瞥见翩然起舞的身影。
西安街头烤面筋很受欢迎。
最终，安东尼以七比一的巨大优势拿到冠军。
最近半个月，哥俩儿的心情格外好。
我也想快点！腰酸背痛真的。
高连军一听说王军伟要带着两个弟兄来投案，马上进行阻拦。
市民蒋小鹏是“挺节派”，过“节”让他累并快乐着。
赵建明不大爱说话，大多数时候用“恩”作回应。
捕鸟人痛得丢下粘竿，鸽子立即惊跑了。
记者在和徐维秀交流时，发现她有点木讷。
消息显示，二五六机组已经成功接入电缆。
这并不是说中巴关系就会畅行无阻。
但这未能阻止被拆解。
山东省招远市市委书记徐少宁，就是他们的突出代表。
从此以后，蝙蝠总是躲藏在黑暗的地方，只是在晚上才独自飞出来。
记者多次敲二四零九室的门，但屋内没有人应答。
苹果手机版本游戏也同时在应用程序商店上线。
上海楼市暖冬格局下，也有部分人在逆势抛盘。
坎法尔的继任者是卡塔尔的一位商人和王室成员。
两条路在一个写有“天宫院风水文化景区”的牌楼前汇合。
市民们在露天“科举考试”。
女子惊恐万分，连声求饶。
花城广场的夜晚灯光璀璨。
孙虎把李强说得云里雾里。
悬在头顶的老铁扇一刻不停地工作着，可仍挡不住滚滚热浪。
打麻将！三缺一，上不上？
布朗太太一分钱也没拿到。
利润，比外界想的低多了。
偶尔吃一顿也是不错的选择。
学习党的创新理论有啥用？
时间掐着点儿，开车悠着点儿。
大手笔的投入结出了累累硕果。
新买的电脑总是死机，打电话要厂家来修也一直没来。
世界新闻报”雇人入侵道勒的语音信箱。
编入该书的文稿，均根据朱镕基出席重要。
电话那头称小晴在四五公里外的庆丰某诊所内。
高温将从本周四起稍稍缓解。
其间，当事加油员将手里的钥匙扔掉。
笔者有个嗜好，爱看有关反腐的文章。
当她脱去外衣，记者才发现她右臂肘关节以下残疾了。
除全场唯一的两双外，他还贡献了两次扣篮、一次助攻和一次抢断。
加快完善技术标准体系和行业准入管理。
下一步，疯狂的裁缝也想小公司再有大发展。
你一定是弄错了，不是我叫的外卖。
深圳设计基础好，而且近邻香港。
该男子被指密云县政协委员李昕旸。
但妻子刚刚动完手术，走得开吗？
这座美国东岸的“赌城”，平日熙来攘往，热闹非凡。
问题在于，不少商户虽然赔了钱，但是最后连吆喝也没有赚着。
但小诊所一比大医院便宜、方便。
四十一名老板认得该行李箱就是从他们的店卖出。
据介绍，万庆当铺曾是京城五大当铺之一，始建于清末。
额外的经济利益成了他们“出卖”雇主，胳膊肘往外拐的原因。
发展海上风电也被看作是拯救风电颓势的一剂良方。
昨晚加了几小时班呀？
会上那一刻有点尴尬。
港口封闭已经开始影响美国的销售情况。
炮制“红薯粉”的墨汁。
不是不爆，时机未到。
这能说他们是忍吗？
江淮大地朔风凛冽。
如果喷了香水也是不能进去的，因为对胚胎会有影响。
这钱就是我原本攒下来的。
幸亏她没见过罗天诚鸟飞兔走之类的名言，否则要发挥半天。
刘正琛不同意这种做法。
这应是从底下渗出来的。
提到儿子，高艳艳几度哽咽。
车子一直开，停下来以后，绑匪把魏院长放在一个地方。
沙某称争取一个进军校的名额，但需要一些钱来“打点”。
碰到一些赖皮的主，硬是把东西扔下就跑，他也没辙。
传彭帅的父亲为潢川县公安局副局长。
对于我们来说，走传统老路可能更危险。
神童之父听得也飘飘然了，不再逼赵志敬背古文。
眼科医生在给妞妞检查视力。
哥、人家错了、别凶人家了。
当前有哪些主要的垄断现象？
等我有了工资就帮你交房租。
讨好内地观众，要从娃娃抓起。
保质期显示在奶粉罐底部。
不过，全组人员一起用完午餐后，别扭的氛围明显少了很多。
填单的小桌可否多设几处？
有知情者透露，女子轻生前饮酒，疑为感情困扰选择轻生。
四是部分业务存在手续瑕疵。
关键现在价格低，没人收呀。
据悉，尸体上还有动物的咬痕。
弟弟在旁边低着头来了一句：“这跟丢钱包有什么区别呀？
哄闹声中，女子不断用手揉搓头部，似有头部不适症状。
那驴子来到一头好吃懒做的驴子旁边。
陈嘉桓对此一概没有回答，只拧歪脸看着律师，向律师求救。
订阅和支持收入为五点四九一八亿美元。
把女人哄好了，男人就有品位了。
拉开了硬仗、恶仗、政治仗的帷幕。
三月的琼岛，万木葱茏，生机盎然。
得到确切的结果后，那一夜，杨自辉在郑州喝了个酩酊大醉。
对创设者而言，认购权证的筹码可以计算，因此风险可控。
刘知章帮雨翔纠正一次跑姿，道：我是个直话直说的人，出钱进来的吧？
皇上！您还记得大明湖畔的夏雨荷吗？
我觉得新闻对柏芝是鸡蛋里挑骨头。
而黑猫，抓贼能立功受奖就很积极。
该爆料者言之凿凿，十分肯定此事。
在厂区内，堆放着数十袋碳酸氢铵。
另外，美国队在男子跳远也染指金牌。
跟他下乡，无论走到哪个村，都能听得到乡亲们热情招呼、嘘寒问暖。
号称亚洲第一的北洋水师为什么会战败？
常骏生的“火箭式提拔”，到底藏着哪些猫腻，必须好好查查。
只听她弱弱的来一句：你占有我，我占有你。
经了解，小明手上握着的抹灰板是自家的。
一部分在室外展出的大象、猩猩已进馆避暑。
但此时左某已经逃往广州，之后又到了深圳。
两人的结婚照也放在了西安浐灞一酒店里完成。
委托制作的钻石真的是用骨灰或毛发做成吗？
纪念碑上以中、英文记载了孙中山筹款及革命经过。
在这种形势下，美国可以洒水防止地区关系烤焦。
是怎么样的文化生态令当事人如此宽容或无奈呢？
我在避雨哦。
近日，王某被海口龙华区检察院依法批准逮捕。
法庭上，张秉礼认罪态度较好，真诚悔罪。
日本与东南亚有关国家是美国手中舞向中国的一柄柄“短剑”。
经查，犯罪嫌疑人栾昌盛与其朋友邵某的妻子李某有奸情。
以后会养的，我正在研修宠物照顾技能。
否则我就透支，将再也不能来欧洲了。
不怕狼一样的对手，就怕以为补墙却不停捅娄子的公关。
通过战略核力量进行地区遏制的论点令人费解。
唱歌跑调就要多练习！
此前怀疑石月琴是刘玉波“漂白”身份后的化名被排除。
詹奶奶说，这样的生活开销比在家读书贵出许多。
李阿婆的女儿搀扶着她。
第三就是清瘀的任务重。
有事说事，没事我玩儿去了。
你银行卡里竟然还有钱？
因为是首听温柔的歌。
我是登山爱好者。
着急哟，现在又没有办法。
属于傻有钱的那种礼品。
时间一晃一年就过去了。
我还不会跳舞耶。
怎能料理军国的后事？
让我算了，安安稳稳过日子。
部分诊所可做药物流产。
网友讽刺监狱管理腐败混乱。
有哪里不明白么。
拉斐尔说，普普住在沃森岛。
我们要举手投降，痛改前非。
对于天涯是否参与了此次炒作，梁树新予以否认。
侧面线条更加硬朗、流畅，相比老款动感了许多。
精神也好了很多，眼球也能咕噜噜转，来看看周围是什么环境。
晕完然后呢？
随即，“表姐”将银行账号发给了侯根林。
推荐他去西夏王陵，挺有意思的。
此外，厦大白城海域也发现了油污。
其实都可以接受，只是粗俗而已。
目前，一种猫咪咖啡馆在上海悄然走红。
纪委要查查是哪个。
他正撅屁股忙呢，我们悄悄围上去，当场就给抓住了。
事发当日，杨带着两个孙女出去理发。
美国乐于看见美元的贬值。
郭国庆长期从事营销学的研究，担任中国市场营销研究中心主任。
不少手机应用软件也瞅准了“数字化年俗”，推出拜年产品。
食品公司推介新生产的以野田为主题的“泥鳅牌”零食。
不过当时楼梯中间部位已经垮塌，整个楼呈现“凹”字型。
这样看来，捆绑销售成为莫高窟唯一的选择。
两人对孙垚的劝阻不再理睬，坚持汇完款。
监测表已爆，还是安心宅在室内吧。
在强降温的同时，水汽也掺和进来。
把狠抓科技的思想落到实处。
然而，还是有很多人无病呻吟，使劲都要扯点故事。
有实体业支撑的沾光些。
尽管，土地租赁合同二零二九年才到期。
她让女儿自己给芭比娃娃做衣服，因为商场的都是重样的。
过会妈说：“充完了，给钱。老爸说：“充完了？
尿激酶的生产原料来自人体鲜尿液。
尽出馊主意，你是想惩罚他还是惩罚我呀？
加强盐、融雪剂、草包、人工扫雪器具等物资的补充。
刚才我从车站出站口走出来，一女的要往里走。
刘峰认准了中石油这块招牌，对满新凯没有太多怀疑。
此外，遇难的驴友杨晓梅和另一驴友谢明是夫妻。
去年秋收后，老板给俺打手机，说还来吧，推着轮椅带着老婆。
但这一决定使曼哈顿下城居民抱怨不已。
正值几辆摩托强行闯关之时，该桥突然垮塌。
所以我就叫他们直接帮我配，他们会看得爽一点。
虽然价格高昂，电视塔却一直不缺广告商。
下雨了看见外面撑伞的，就想起一同学说的。
高雄市长任内的谢长廷曾说过：“高雄港直航的话，高雄就有生命力。
李宗鸿出生后就一直住在基隆，是土生土长的“台湾囝仔”。
现场干部群众用手刨土救人。
担任瓮安县长之前，谢晓东是贵州省旅游局综合协调处处长。
而他们湖南郴州的家已经被各路人马团团围住。
因物品贵重，公司方面决定报警。
一路上各式各样的颠都在这里汇总温故知新一遍。
在神话中兔子是嫦娥的宠物。
我的宝宝出生啦，您们的辈份又提高了。
珊珊被感动，再按一首“当初就该爱你”，直艳慕作词人的才华。
汪女士一手提着饭菜，一手打着雨伞往前走。
于是我正义的把那碗面倒给路边看起来很饿的野猫。
捐少了说你抠门，捐多了说你显摆作秀。
他无奈的回答：她总是说俩人抽烟浪费钱。
草蜢父亲节仍要开工，只好提前一天庆祝。
俺也吃肉的，俺也不想加。
随后，于某也打了幺二三四五进行投诉。
男人提议：宝贝我们把他们恶心走吧？
免费垃圾分类桶怎么样？
调整为百分之一点八五六。
他这是站着说话不腰疼！
袁林囡低低地叹了口气。
只有我那敏感的妻子会介意。
熊警官操着网球拍跑了过来，和白老师一起将小偷摁倒在地。
男友怂恿她染上了毒瘾。从小父母离异的小薇，跟着爸爸长大。
质量不到位，你虽然抢占了地盘，但是将来人家照样打垮你。
最高罚款二百八十点二三八六万元。
重任如泰山压顶，一股绳拧起来了，齐心协力，共克时艰。
尔冬升这次有意躲起来，不愿抢去导演的风头。
郭星星是家中独女。
范永根小学六年级时，当石匠的父亲因心脏病去世。
小文波亲口说出自己坠楼是因为同伴推搡导致。
因此中国海外投资应该多加小心，避免踩上地雷。
秉怀泱泱大国的雍容风范，抱守谦谦君子的翩翩风度。
喜欢就去追呀，说不定人家正等着拒绝你呢…
作为一位“准妈妈”，娜娜初次海淘就尝到了不小的甜头。
此外，食品、化妆品广告中的欺诈行为也很严重。
校方打算把他们的宿舍让给奥运会尊贵的客人。
在滕州市财贸医院体检站，多数男生并没有遭遇“裸检”。
每次都是王总你来，今天无论如何都得我来了！
翠城小区东墙外南段，有一段两米多长的豁口。
发现我在偷看之后她脸一红，嗔道：看什么呢？
就在这一天，昆明一花季少年惨死渣土车车轮之下。
唱歌起调太高容易破嗓。
用他的话说是：“求贤若渴，而且非同小可。
奥运圣火传递的是一种理想和精神，看似离我们很遥远。
他说那是“胖子”应该做到的。
克龙详细谈论了泰勒一事。
赵蕊蕊从小喜欢画画，和许多女孩儿一样，她也很喜欢漫画书。
一会又说已与徐赟断绝了父女关系，眼下不知女儿下落。
五五二路公交车司机则留在原地照看患者。
那里一片鸟语花香，到处是奇花异草，仿佛进入世外桃源。
昨天，记者从龙岩公安局了解到详情。
现在成了危房，我一大家子人怎么办哟。
身穿制服的羊坊店派出所民警孙垚正在存取款机旁巡视。
根据质地我们可以看到分若干个品种。
麦克尼尔与这名孕妇就为何拍摄布朗的照片一事发生口角。
这里的人民爱军兴武，也都有一颗金子般真诚的心。
本次大会将选举产生越共新一届中央领导集体。
此后内阁再次大改组。
考完试以后，我突然对人生失去了信心。
非常好吃，但是它吃到嘴里碜牙，吃了以后能咬到一嘴的沙子。
有评论指出，这或为戳破团购这个大泡沫敲响了警钟。
新店开张并未推出新品，但仍吸引了上千名“果粉”捧场。
难道都要等到和熊猫一样几近绝迹才知道保护吗？
直至今日，许多住私屋的孩子们都是在公屋区内玩耍长大的。
其中横跨北环岑村路段地下水管，刚好是出现地陷的路段。
倪萍说，这是受姥姥影响。
这是俄罗斯历史上伤亡最惨重的潜艇事故。
警棍就放在组长金小四家。
等我哪天心情好再说吧。
此外，要时常注意网银的官方通知，及时更新安全补丁。
跟印度的医学院相比，中国医学院的入学门槛比较低。
乘客徒步绕过车祸现场转乘。
张磊说着，把记者带到了臭氧氧化管柱旁。
你忘了那金黄的圆月、碧绿的西瓜地、钢叉、项带银圈的少年了吗？
马化腾被评为二零一五中国最具影响力五十位商界领袖。
可是后来坏账太多，钱收不回来，风光的日子不再喽。
这就是李昌钰，勤奋、认真，而又亲切、幽默。
不过公司表示，即使高于六，企业也无可奈何。
他们手执弓弩等远射兵器，担任整个军阵的警戒任务。
奢侈浪费较严重。
楼都摇晃了一下。
我会为你祈祷的。
我喜欢高效沟通。
顾不上喘口气，他们开始连夜搭建帐篷。
小霞拼命反抗，韩斌没有得逞。
书桌上空荡荡，暂未摆设东西。
由于李棒棒等人均无驾驶证怕警方盘问，他们四处奔逃。
三是检验环节职责混淆。
刚开始，何大爷很执拗，仍把离婚挂在嘴边。
奶粉、奶瓶、葡萄糖、眼药膏、眼药水，都准备了。
成某一时着急，就钻到了床下。
趁此机会，“每日电讯报”盘点了出过类似糗事的领导人。
马金明在地上捧水为受伤男子灭火，并试图为他按压止血。
它对人类健体益智有没有用？
目前，曹街村有据可查的祖宗是北宋初年的大将曹彬。
这些门使用不久，开始变形、翘起、凹陷及掉漆。
其中，驮水救民的一匹马因劳累过度死去广为流传。
八点，她在彩虹城门口等幺幺三路社区通勤快车。
能否讲一下你的创新观。
铁罐上房了，人影儿又落到了地上。
他形容陈致中就是一副“无耻嘴脸”。
物质条件的匮乏，使印第安人染上在身上涂色的习惯。
单位账户的亏空数越来越大，心里越来越怕，头脑都想糊涂了。
王德显介绍，张莹莹如今才是他的得意弟子。
陪同安女士的是她的妹妹。
同时，还将会有影视圈的多年好友们为沙宝亮捧场助阵。
某次宣讲，日方反对者用喇叭对着会场高声抗议。
禁止利用敞开式阳台饲养犬只。
双方其他球员恶意侵犯，报复与反报复的动作不计其数。
处于风口浪尖的绿城，正以一个个惊悚的事件打开楼市“魔盒”。
路过丰京路与六号路时，儿子说路边咋躺着个妇女。
满载的卡车担起大道千里。
赖昌星的遣返也是如此。
下一句难道是…小鸡炖蘑菇？
你是在问我的三维吗？哈哈，这可是个秘密。
我先给大家唱一首“闪着泪光的决定”！
普天间基地位于冲绳县宜野湾市中心。
瓦津基公园是波兰最美丽的公园之一。
今天外面的天气挺冷的，但一进校园，就感觉暖暖的。
停个毛啊，刹车早坏了！赶紧抓好扶手，下大坡啦。
近年来用点心材料等装饰巧克力的做法深受欢迎。
头发并不怎么凌乱，嘴微微撅着，似乎只欠一个叫醒。
她也对此否认，表示自己完全不知李泽楷与梁洛施已经分手。
本案由普洱市人民检察院立案侦查并提起公诉。
由于时间仓促，出现在人们面前的娃欧商场像个丑小鸭。
男子继续摆弄积木，手法与上次完全一样。
跑水量渐渐变小后，工人们将跑水点周围挖开。
珊瑚虫对温度同样敏感。
瞥开费用问题，军部将秘密搜索，防止发生矛盾。
这句随口贬低的话歪打正着，吴城背过身一笑说：我会吗？
临时领取生活物品处设在钟书楼第四层的阅览室里。
理性的网友提出赶紧把蟒蛇剖开救人。
免费师范生的就业问题如何安排？
试点里运作的是不是就是物业税？
不仅面积大了，住房的功能也更完善、质量更牢靠、环境更优美。
非常遗憾的是，这些弃婴的生存率非常低。
这是因为空气中的水蒸气遇冷凝结的原因呀。
孟买在印度经济方面占举足轻重的地位。
我家有只河东狮。
黄色笑话比其他颜色的更好笑嘛？
围观的人群一拥而上，凑到出租房前议论纷纷。
如何保持劳动用工的规范有序？
报考者需持本人身份证和准考证参加笔试。
当天下午，民警破门而入时，池某、喻某正摆弄容器制造冰毒。
在验收会上，交通运输部总工程师蒋千这样评价工程的意义。
菜一上桌才发现，原来是昨天的剩饭剩菜！
机长杨光边抬伤员边介绍着运送伤员的过程。
早早抢好位子的外劳，双腿一伸，呼呼大睡。
妻子的同事来家里做客，我又是做饭又是刷碗。
而陈某的建议和怂恿起到了推波助澜的作用。
细心的网友发现，奥运冠军高崚和杨威名在其列。
然而佳品早已经开始“下线”。
朗朗上口的“这一刻，多温馨，甜的笑真的心”已成追忆。
不客气。明天一路顺风啊。
你不是问我为什么做义工吗？
登楼香袅袅，煮茗待精英。
女孩则更像凯特，鹅蛋脸和深棕色长头，是个小小美人胚子。
一根绳上拴着的两个蚂蚱。哈季利季油田是苏丹最大的油田。
这将加速缓解高中学位的紧缺难题。
他们也加入反对北京申奥的阵营。
事后，他十分后悔，不该总欺负这个矮小又老实的同事。
在过去的六个月里，这个村庄没有下过雨。
里面充斥着低俗、时尚相混的旧刊物。
英语学习也算是心理拓展的一个策略吗？
最终健谈的公公亲证她怀的是男胎。
陈一借用“陈浩”的身份“漂白”了。
请问本溪哪个行业的人最好？
其实空调喊涨，春节前就有。
本是五大三粗的老爷们，却做娇滴滴状。
古代平均寿命短，夭折率高，所以都要尽早结婚。
正月里，村里耍社火离不开这架秋千。
难道是因为武汉市像这样的大型娱乐场太多，赚不到钱？
三是组织上反复酝酿。
随着冲突升级，格、摩与俄罗斯的关系恶化。
范围东至康欧路，南至规划路，西至朱泖河，北至康工路。
趁千千睡着，省儿保护士在小心的做检查。
他有风度、有礼貌，而且脾气好好。
胡的弟媳妇柳炳菊和周叶忠的儿子幸存。
汽车轮胎上，有三个像柳叶的扇片。
因为眼前亏不吃，可能要吃更大的亏！
如需咨询可致电九五幺零五六八八。
在新兴的网络行业，丑闻也层出不穷。
一天多折腾下来，昨日，邱女士才总算有所好转。
刘作案后一直逃窜在外。
租赁房只能安两张床。
这些印刷版图书包括了没有电子版的精装和简装图书。
随后杨某被转到蚌埠市第三人民医院。
因为淤泥，今天被迫迟到了整整一小时。
有点专断啊，连说话都规定的牢牢的。
这一矛盾导致了银行寅吃卯粮的现状。
蕾哈娜身穿超短裙、渔网袜，性感十足。
一只青蛙给牧师打电话，问自己的命运。
另外，我也认识一些参加过奥运会的同学。
还没过年呢，还不能给你发压岁钱呀。
此时，新郎已将新娘接到，开始一段“绕城之路”。
八乡古庙属早前被列为香港二级历史建筑物。
一起去看流星雨好浪漫呀。
稀土开采使得张阳娥家院子里的一口井成为摆设。
网站建立者毫不掩饰自己对脸谱网创办人扎克伯格的模仿。
上次来新加坡也见过面的老朋友呢？
济南、泰安两地均发布大雾红色预警信号。
当路人高喊“碾死人了”时，该车才彻底停下。
一楼入户的绿色栅栏式防盗门前地面上留有一摊血迹。
人民解放军在平叛过程中军纪严明，得到广大僧俗人士的衷心拥护。
缘缘开始不“感冒”了，自顾自爬上了猫架子，开始舔爪子玩。
尤其是不少孕妇更应吃核桃，以利于宝宝大脑发育。
张爱国却打点好行装迫不及待的想要离开。
陈家洛吃惊得要跳起来，被幸福包住，喜不自禁说：我怎么行！
她说，总书记知道俺们困难，来访察生活好不好，不叫咱受罪。
杨宇坐的位置不好，只得屈身给两人做邮差。
对于纺织行业目前的状况来说，出口退税政策越早出台越好。
公元一二九八年王祯创制了木活字。
罗天诚低声说深沉是无法伪装的。
这一愤怒变成“碾碎”、“剁碎”、“撕碎”的呼声震撼天地。
个人最喜欢逍遥，人人都说惊鸿一瞥。
石柏魁认为判刑过重上诉。
其他十人在“蹦跶”转圈中进行清唱。
一八九九年，不堪受辱的玛格丽特愤而与丈夫离婚。
垮塌时有桥面上有人员行走。
你当我傻啊？脑子那么大怎么塞进去？
因此增持美元国债就成为中国央行的暂时之选。
没有人知道，这些证书是杜伟新省吃俭用攒下“口粮”钱去买的。
你有没有看出信里那种委婉的感觉呢？
是个冰淇淋哦。
两人为此争吵起来。
迎风的晴天娃娃。
我不是特别懂篮球。
它们体积如小猫，但爪子却比猫锋利许多。
过去，看儿子参加奥运会是母亲的心愿，看儿子成家也是母亲的心愿。
事后，该名科长经医院检查，为左股骨粉碎性骨折。
你打算什么时候去？
他经常动手打姐姐。
男子买画并非欣赏画作，只是觉得画框漂亮。
我知道，很感人的，得病了还坚持退卡给顾客。
贫困产妇的遭遇让谁尴尬？
所以不牵扯任何费率损失。
颜色鲜艳，多添加染色剂等。
大家反抗，陈搂得特别紧。
如房地产、水务、烟草等行业。
在中国，这个数据更为显眼。
预想中的文化冲击还没来得及和苏珊擦出火花。
此时的厂房，不是被地震强力腰斩，就是被震碎。
但既然金斗宇表明了辞意，预计会按程序办理此事。
其中网友“海洋生物小散打”的评论引起了记者的注意。
政策将为需求提供支撑。
早在一九九四年，毗邻的俄勒岗州已经批准病重的病人安乐死。
艾薇儿接受了查德的求婚钻戒。
因此滨江和萧山都落下冰雹。
落水后，小瑜瑜迅速被水卷走。
海风卷起的涌浪，一阵阵扑来。
在鸟网下方地面，也有很多飞羽。
明确租赁保证金的收取金额。
但是，杰雅瑞南的当务之急是，保持参加下届大选的资格。
好的主人！我会再温柔一些的！
报道称，奥巴马与烟瘾“奋战”多年。
警方随即兵分两路，一部分赶往蚌埠，到医院了解伤者情况。
女友说：“诶，把你的胡子刮一下。
重要的是果敢挑战、灵活应对。
关起门来说，白给我也会扔掉。
勇敢面对，绝不做爱情的逃兵！
有什么好争的，找保险公司啊。
这次去门卫间去得十分有价值，这些信落到班主任手里，后果很难说。
这一比例在欧洲位居榜首。
消息传来，老孙家甭提多高兴。
之后，张国胜的姐姐致答谢词。
现在抄有用吗？有本事高考抄去。
伴着蛇口工业区的落幕，这场被称作“早熟的直选民主试验”渐渐湮灭。
当纠察人员取证时，解某态度蛮横，强行阻拦取证并抢走相机。
至于什么原因引发冲突，大家并不清楚。
警方唯独没有发现那颗钻石。
来自各地的丑狗狗在比赛中竞相亮相。
外面车堵得厉害，应急任务被延，继续待命。
那种朴实、憨厚，给人印象很深。
在洪慧姈的眼中，那些菲律宾海警“就是恃强凌弱的强盗”。
阿花的父亲林天生在看悬赏通告。
有人赞神奇，有人批荒唐，马林不服一审判决，向南宁中院上诉。
而且二零零一年之后的头两年没有收取服务费。
我以前演戏不喜欢眨眼睛，他说其实你眨一下眼会比较真实。
人聪明点，毕竟以后我家的生意，都是要交给女婿管理的。
我们有责任教育、监督干部少犯错误、不犯错误。
你洗完手怎么不擦干啊，都是水！
为最大限度获利，常勇开始打起了在村子附近偷土的算盘。
今年以来低价股的一飞冲天，让酷爱低价股的小散吐气扬眉。
农忙时节，村民们驾驶拖拉机，在一个个大拐弯颠簸，惊魂难定。
幼犬一年要注射三次预防针，成犬每年只需要注射一次！
碰巧他不用开工，就叫上他喽。
只要你让我不爽了，老子照样扇你！
现在俺鼠标一点，键盘一敲，就能了解到各地的文化、科技、经济信息。
此后，集团发言人也并未披露减持原因。
奶粉厂的原奶收购价，要比伊利低一半。
非要让我脸红么。
她说好丑怪，不要再放。
但是发型还要改进一点。
但仍有人心存侥幸，并未按照这条“最后通牒”行事。
补选省人大常委会委员。
郭乐平认为这完全是污蔑。
只可惜，手里攥了几个小钱，阿伟开始迷上了赌博。
周炯说，丁磊还是个对食品卫生有强烈“洁癖”的人。
在询问过程中，两名“警察”露出马脚，被王女士识破。
这下“旋风”满意地叼着咬靶，一摇一摆回到石忠乐身边。
时隔两年，“鱼霸”卷土重来。
内部矛盾如此日益激化，可能引起新的冲突和动乱。
提价后的获利，则由南宁老板和柳州的米粉厂分账。
他觉得，桃源村三期地库停的车多半都是那儿业主的。
大火中，救儿心切的李永华徒手扑打儿子身上的火焰。
企业的经营策略有变化吗？
月末钱不够花啦？我的工资。
狒狒体内可能存在白色隐性基因，只是以前没有发现。
我慌了，转头看向哥们，他的表情我至今难忘。
该男子圆头大耳，打扮得像个公司老总。
基差越小，管理风险的成本越低，效率越高。
同时该女星保证不会再有类似事情发生。
狍子属鹿科，是陕西省野生重点保护动物。
窄窄的一双眼睛，似乎也不具备穿透生活的光泽。
这在有编制限制、“一个萝卜一个坑”的事业单位更复杂。
霎间，轻博客成为新的“香饽饽”。
索尼娅和家人随后前往多棱宫。
鲜果给出的答案是，费用为零。
刘玉秀中等个，看上去干净利索。
胡萝卜不仅营养价值高！还拥有去痰、消食、除胀和下气定喘的作用。
四季更迭是一种很棒的体验呢。
海边多耸立着黑黢黢的礁石。
该计划要求，人才房基本满足拎包入住要求。
道路刚刚打通，我们又受领了挖掘北川县农业银行金库的任务。
临别自寻“合照门”，留好话柄给台阶。
彭洪把图片复制过来，加上标题“这把伞好怪哟”，又发出去。
说起受骗经过，贺爹爹的眼泪不断溢出干涩的眼眶。
在本次北斗年会上，合众思壮推出全系北斗产品。
班达尔经常邀请老布什共进午餐，一起出去垂钓。
台灯的电很快就用完了，夜晚，帐篷就陷入黑暗。
但这时候的联想创始人柳传志却犹豫了。
梦想开始起步了，插上腾飞的翅膀翱翔吧！
无论是谁，做事情的时候难免会出现一错，但二错却是可以避免的。
体型瘦削的她，却有中央肥胖情况，有个大肚腩。
我们以后别联系了，这辈子珍重！
被我所不喜欢的救了命，却被我所最信赖和宠爱的东西断送了生命。
但船主温州明珠游艇公司为了美观，擅自增加了仿烟囱。
并没有“油鱼”这个品种。
每天都累到趴了。
为了儿子的健康，她也坚持母乳喂养。
目前，四人因涉嫌抢劫罪被浦口检察院批捕。
这世上还有比这更难吃的菜么？
但当他哭闹的时候，你千方百计地哄他，那就等于骄纵他了。
尽管政府采取“军警民”三位一体的战略，但收效甚微。
薮中强调说这样做为时尚早，不赞成奥巴马访问这两个城市。
不过与此同时，李英爱却也付出了昂贵的“代价”。
黄山介绍，开始一小时，设卡检查无任何异常情况出现。
图为小布什向英国女王眨眼睛。
她说，你走进任何一座毡房，只要坐下来，就会有馕吃，有奶茶喝。
港铁至今未交代出事原因。
城市建成区要无烟草广告。
是不是依然觉得我很可爱。
丽丽没有出过九幺二房间。
没想到她宁愿放弃上海。
当时很纠结，很难取舍。
家庭聚不到一起，此弱势只能是“伪弱势”或曰“撒娇”。
这么胖，抱得我腰都断了。
他二度在这个问题上摇头。
行政院陆委会是负责拟订台湾大陆政策的机构。
咳嗽，我觉得跟空气有关。
所以这些运动员真的很难！
咳嗽与季节、气候等有关。
你做的破事儿还有脸解释？
我是淑女，只会讲文明用语。
南京“加名税”开征之始，自说自话的随意性捉襟见肘。
精神障碍患者参加劳动，有权获得相应的报酬。
我感觉松了一口气，殡仪馆本该如此，宁静而安稳。
死者中包括球队主教练、加舀大人麦克西蒙。
芦苇与橡树为他们各自的耐力、力量和冷静争吵不休，谁也不肯认输。
或是其他屋跑来的猪？
他走路一瘸一瘸的，小儿麻痹症落下的病根。
伴随股指的逐步平稳，个股活跃度有所增强。
我就拧开瓶盖递给她。
如今情况已发生扭转。
你自己来我看看啊哼。
莫父出书，全家捧场。
油泵隐藏在一个棉被下。
图为村民住帐篷避险。
在盘后，柯达股价上涨近百分之五，达五十八美分。
被抓时，他刚录完节目在躲雨。
看到惹了事，奔驰的司机也打电话告知了车主。
不少人认为家访是防止虐儿的重要策略。
这是科学界首次找到月球曾有水的证据。
家长为新生扛行李。
河北省滦平县人。
反对派议员认为这是在企图篡改历史。
我觉得自己又胖了！
我永葆青春。
想要我调戏你嘛？
现在暂时难以揣测。
餐饮安全问题出在哪？
不要轻易满仓。
他眼前燃起一盏灯。
对于雪茄迷来说，这样的机会可是梦寐以求的。
难怪他们会成为日本人最羡慕的夫妻偶像。
考虑再三后，沁雅决定做流产，在那期间，李母曾来照顾。
工棚里高温难耐，工人们更偏爱在较为凉快的工地内休息。
先前，已经有研究人员成功地用胚胎干细胞“造”出精子。
白天，她仍装出一副恐惧的样子，整天躲在洞口守望着。
浦律师问其故，原来是戴手铐、被监视养成的习惯。
说个真事，有一次我去买手机后盖，我问：“是原装的吗？
太搞笑了，只能说是鲜廉寡耻而有害社会的炒作。
老竹片，建成了一座座集居住、防御性能于一体的土楼。
玉玉说：有啊，追我的人太多了，我在挑呢！
这样大家也好正正经经地祝福你们呀。
现在等着散散家具味儿，下月就搬进去。
撑足了一页纸，舒展得仿佛一个人在床上伸懒腰，旁人看了也羡慕。
昏暗中，只见一名男子从张建强的背后，抡起铁锤猛砸。
二是要素支撑不足。
仓廪充实，减税惠民。
不过，谢亚龙对杜伊科维奇两年以来的执教，还是给予了一定的认可。
有不满可以合法发泄。
王警官一愣，下意识看了眼那小男孩。
茫茫的夜只有野百合在吐露着芬芳。
从围墙或者栅栏的周边开始计算。
李宇春透露她的歌父亲都会哼哼。
在连续撞击中，金杯车内的男孩和爷爷也因颠簸受了点挫伤。
可是香港的女孩子很扭捏。
权衡以后，他决定在床上写。
毛委员的心情是多么爽朗呀！
割麦、捆麦，必须去熟悉和掌握农民的生活方式。
以前在重庆没有这种辣子炒田螺的做法吗？
我现在头一直疼，我要是有啥后遗症，影响他们咋办。
如果两人一起回家，就会手挽手去逛超市。
樊红拗不过，带他报了名。
陈兴銮犯受贿罪数额特别巨大，情节特别严重，应依法严惩。
卫报”评论称，现在全英国人都感到肮脏、愚蠢、内疚和愤怒。
那种冷，是我一辈子都没受过的冷，现在想想那种冷还想哆嗦。
这说明，你就是跑到太空也得把作业做完！
奢华也好，低调也罢，幸福才是最重要的。
中国的光伏产业要反思，依赖的请独立，独立的请洒脱。
凤凰古城几乎一夜成为了焦点。
此时，娜娜已销声匿迹。
人家都没正式邀请，我臊眉耷眼的去了，结果造成现场混乱。
我刚才发布的消息已提到，外长将出席东盟地区论坛外长会。
虽其中不乏“祖宗有灵者”，但白手起家的创业者也不在少数。
一名交警记下杨华的车牌和喷标号。
直到今天，黑色的古力盖儿依然铮亮，没一点锈迹。
患儿及家属等候的区域更加宽敞舒适，座位更多。
冯万和队友决定，继续将洞扩大。
但还是要跟你说声你加油噢，有梦想谁都了不起。
土地出让应该根据开发商的技术和资金条件筛选开发商。
而且这次天文大潮，水位特别高，堤坝很危险。
于是，山村里有了“地表水贵如油、地下水滚滚流”的说法。
只要不引起笑场，快男、超女式的造型唱京剧也无妨，观众才是上帝。
大家都觉得我挺漂亮的，其实我是那种安静又温柔的气质型女孩。
强调“空谈误国、实干兴邦”，实干、实干、再实干，很实在。
战后第五次回到中国的海沃德身体依然硬朗。
白宫自酿啤酒的外包装。
时任总理佩雷斯大怒，下令不惜代价将瓦努努抓回。
紧急情况，请拨幺二二。
前夜，到处可见扛着铁锹和扫帚的居民。
正在进行夜景灯光调试的世博轴“阳光谷”。
何不把养狼的时间，多花在养几只羊身上？
当然呀，你是我的主人呀。
度秘没有男朋友哦。
奴家这厢有礼啦。
清苗补偿、征地补偿等费用已发放到位。
波赫舍尔进一步介绍说，壳牌与中国的合作已经非常广泛。
几个月后，这位有五十八年党龄的共产党员去世了。
在美国，只要公民自己有意愿，任何阻挠均视为违法。
慢悠悠的一句话，诗人的锐气被磨掉大半。
洗完脸后，她再帮婆婆梳妆一下，老太太笑得合不拢嘴。
面对人生低谷，小俩口却有着比普通人少有的乐观与坚强。
东西拿走了，就把矿泉水瓶塞进去。
于是，俞家兄弟怀揣斧头开车一路追赶到青年司机王某家中。
但全民娱乐、全线娱乐化是一种假嗨。
不讽刺、挖苦、歧视幼儿，不体罚或变相体罚幼儿。
怀柔法院近日开庭审理此案。
有的地区较为抢手，有的地区和位置就比较冗余。
贾某很恼火，猛按喇叭警示，并将车子拉回原来的车道。
这是“九八五工程”的名称由来。
邱某一家路见不平说了几句公道话，后与偷狗男子发生拉扯。
雷小姐一看黄大爷气喘吁吁的，就想让他先休息一下。
生物柴油公司，收购的就是这种油。
经过训练的老虎可以乖乖抽血。
今天老妈问我，工作几年了有多少存款…我说差不多快存一万了！
中文系在大学里是颇被看不起的，同是语言类，外文系的就吃香多了。
现在开始晚不？
高原缺氧，寒风凛冽，他们仍然用尽可能快的速度忙碌着。
这样什么时候才是个头啊？
其中，黑色金属矿采选业增长百分之六十一点七，增速最高。
他经常很体贴地问大家要不要吃这个、尝尝那个，特别细心。
为装病，刘宏咬紧牙关节食半年，瘦得只剩皮包骨头。
提案交完以后，办得到底怎么样，有没有调查呀？
目前，公司人工成本共计约一百一十万。
说明管理部门怕得罪人，不敢碰硬。
多年来，打击侵权盗版一直是扫黄打非的一项重要任务。
舒格洛夫滑雪场是缅因州最大的滑雪场。
丢失头部的武将石雕。
中美在南海问题上的交锋有愈演愈烈之势。
刘先生瞅准一个机会对着该劫匪的脚跟前开了一枪警告他。
一个领导者应该把眼睛盯住前方，把握现在，思考未来。
我们要使各种腐败、丑恶的现象，被广大群众所唾弃。
格林斯堡的门诺教教堂和牧师住宅已经荡然无存。
我们只能等，彭很崩溃，在我房间哭，我安慰他等。
突然，其中一支铅笔戳进了小晖的左眼。
饭店里上的是大份菜肴还是精致小盘？
八宝山人民公墓内，祭扫者接踵摩肩。
但有一些人会觉得很闷。
如此“心雄手拙”，往往使他们对局面做出误判，拨错对策算盘。
司机许某猛踩油门，甩开方某，带着钱开走了。
别离开我！我会努力变聪明的！
随后，于先生拨打了九五五八零客户服务热线。
我能预报天气，但还不能差遣雨神。
谁在刚才一波杀跌的过程赚到便宜了？
与剧场欢腾热闹的场面相反，此刻，后台里却一片肃穆。
真糟糕，我的胡子愈来愈白了，头发还是黑的。这有多难看呀。
开了一段后又要停下来收费，司机口袋里的钱命中注定飘泊无家。
这不，就有人因此跟权威机构打官司杠上了。
他爸想了会说：“是高矮的意思。
谢同学拿着大鲶鱼笑不拢嘴。
她的双脚被涂抹了大量药膏。
前些时候那个雇工问题，相当震动呀，大家担心得不得了。
苏州博物馆、拙政园这些地方都不错。
连他最疼爱的儿子，也常难见他一面。
据初步调查，行凶者名叫阿利耶夫。
报答受灾群众的唯一方法：加快奔袭。
老板一逃，造成连锁反应，发生大批债权人挤兑。
剧中朴信惠将以女孩身份向胡宇崴堂堂正正的告白。
张旭解释不清怎么翻字典凑巧让三字团聚了。
艰难地啃完面包之后，他便趴在课桌上打盹。
不行我确信给你的都是最用心的。
温总理亦透过行政长官向澳门居民问好。
面对质问，暖暖扭头就要走。
你就不怕他拉响炸药包吗？
工友在喊我，我老婆也在上面。
暖暖的阳光晒久了让人直犯困。
但不管怎么说，还是先注意一下拼写和语法吧。
祖源就在五龙山下，休宁溪口一个旮旯角落的山里。
我觉得很好玩儿，我也挺高兴的，确实有一些男孩儿的东西。
放大图片，黄子华和郭蔼明随着刘青云之后步出。
倒数第三封让人眼前一亮，它来自首都的鲁迅文学院。
中汽协方面说，乘用车刚性需求明显。
我心里有杆秤，我只跟自己拼。
太行赤子张荣锁的座右铭就是：好爹好娘是人民，甘做赤子报乡亲。
她的保暖法宝，就是在腹部、腿部贴着暖宝宝。
他气爆了，随手抄起个工具一通抡，抡完就跑了。
看我的年级排名就知道有多少人参加考试。
哈里王子可能要为自己的“一夜荒唐”付出代价。
从尸体看，她死前遭到刀刺、毒打和焚烧。
艾薇儿的男友布罗迪也更新推特说脸上多了一条新的伤痕。
这个采访简直太愚蠢了。
通常故事中善良正派的王子，在本片却是高傲自大的家伙。
诸多掣肘，壹基金终于决定与红十字会“离婚”。
资助西部聋儿康复机构基础设施建设和师资培养。
出于职业敏感，付守国感觉事态有些不妙。
检察官提醒，市民在取款时应当多留心。
除了玩游戏，高胖的另一喜好就是打篮球。
在她的悉心培育下，一批优秀的排球苗子正在茁壮成长。
在亳州当地方言中，“孬种”不仅意味着胆小，还有缺德的意思。
我的傻女儿，还想着为我这个不负责任的爸爸分担一些呢。
控辩双方仍有争拗，将会再传召无线电视外事部主管作供。
金娜允从小在美国生活，或许会有些文化差异。
罗天诚恨记叙文里用不上他的哲学，拖着没交。
这些努力能否取得预期的效果目前尚不得而知。
在起重机的帮助下，工人们正用凿岩机将其凿断。
这匹马因遭虐待，瘫睡在农场内。
今晚，心情激动的高敏热泪滚滚。
近日，兵团电大的几位学生向本网反映了这件事。
行动结束后，部队用推土机推倒绑匪藏身的房屋。
去年，中国采购了大量美国玉米。
一出门，他发现窗外有忽闪的亮光。
长期大量喝茶的男人，罹患前列腺癌的危险更低。
昨天，新任自民党总裁安倍晋三也发出危险信号。
而另一个对于菜鸟网络难言祸福的重大政策也不期而至。
作为纽约州的参议员，希拉里在国会上仍然是个小”字辈。
进入秋季寡雨季节以来，泉州、漳州、莆田等沿海地区旱情明显。
标准的美少女样子呀。
我喜欢演现代人，拿捏上也比较轻松。
事实上奥巴马口中的亿万富翁正是“股神”巴菲特。
感觉能挑毛病的地方不多，只不过灰尘较大。
水映康城停建事件中，找到的新闻眼，就是“风水”。
记者在洗碗间看到，水龙头旁边放着一瓶漂白水。
针对市民质疑，记者专访了市市政委主任王元楷。
稍有不妥，就两面不讨好。
暴雨中，猪纷纷被洪流卷走。
对手顿时胆寒心怯，斗志全无。
莱昂纳多艾琳与莱昂纳多的妈妈。
随后，郝明辉、王猛猛先后落网。
捍卫中国领土，就该寸土不让。
海关总署将严查此类违规现象。
他最近心情不好，总喜欢咬人。
本市“基层政改”，前路坎坷未卜。
一次次的灾难，人们谈黄河而色变。
体形不胖不瘦，既不窈窕也不丰满。
虎父无犬子，两只小藏獒是标准的铁包金，属“怪兽”血系。
公众同样需要从此类事件中汲取经验与教训。
坚持扩大人文交流，夯实中越友好的民意基础。
分核桃坚果、核桃坚果仁、核桃油、核桃饮料。
该神庙修建于三千五百年前，相当于中国的商代。
被沙尘笼罩的承德旅游景点棒槌山及蛤蟆石。
袁士霄说着又觉得头有一点沉，有一种要表白的冲动。
交换名片一看，张兰发现对方是鼎晖的王功权。
实施贷款损失准备动态监管。
不过复赛两次输球比较窝囊，与自己的失误关系很大。
路边原本半米宽的排水沟渠，水面已近两米，水流湍急。
最终又归了谁的腰包里去了？
在看守所里，刘俊终于醒酒。
如今，这一切算盘显然落空。
晚上，他独自在家辗转难眠。
若不是大牌耍也没用，因他没价值，娱乐圈很现实。
此时，消防人员已经把火扑灭离开。
九二年出生的梁文豪，近年来窜身势头非常迅猛。
梁紫薇的观点基本雷同于晟金表哥，可见晟金表哥白活了四年。
爱之火热，已经到了“搜神记”里韩凭夫妇和“长恨歌”里连理枝的境界。
他愣住了，好一会儿头脑里才反应出“不明飞行物”这个概念。
他还做了许许多多为群众排忧解难、扶弱济贫的好事。
应该说，有时发财机遇往往也青睐那些心怀叵测的投机者。
关于经济预测，周小川、吴敬琏等人都表示过“很难”。
结果很快就下来了，米佳的抵抗无效如螳臂当车。
除了名字和属相外，马龙和谌龙还有很多相似之处。
冷国权被抓，和鲍忠武贩毒事发有关。
李某偶尔也会中一些奖，但总是亏损大。
没等他反应过来，已被闯入者摁倒。
协商不下，那就只有走法律途径。
小伙半路突然呕吐，车厢遭了殃，黄师傅也没打算计较。
拉美总面积两千零七十万平方公里，人口六点零三亿。
公元前一百五十七年，文帝先于薄太后离开人世。
凌晨救援结束后，本以为男子会安心生活。
这样一来，雅虎董事会今后更有可能听命于勒布。
该高管透露，之所以关停高铁代购业务是出于“稳妥”的考虑。
如果给我一个舞台，我将还给大家一片蓝天。
农村娃一枚，小时候有一家人院子里种的果树，我们几个小伙伴去偷。
三是公共投资增长走平。
总装备部党委委员参加会议。
于是我就被打了一耳光，还被警察叔叔带进了派出所。
而泽尻英龙华本人目前正和高城刚上演离婚拖延战。
工作是要有自己的形象，你本身是女生，不要玩健身呀。
随即引来导游起哄，有导游坐在马路上，场面一度混乱。
目前，他担任北师大论坛蛋蛋网火车票版的版主。
没有明显诱因，孩子突然开始咳嗽，同时眼分泌物增多。
如今，他种地种出了名堂，成了远近闻名的年轻富翁。
人有七情六欲，因此我们时常会被感动的潮水所濡湿。
海洋学家称这次出现的黑鳍礁鲨并不伤人。
有时信多比钱多更快乐，因为钱是可以赚的而信却嫌不出来。
这就是传销机构给刘刚编织的富翁梦。
但开发商要我们拿出限购的证据，才肯给我们退房。
会议还强调，综治部门要统筹安排，搞好组织协调。
人又长得漂亮，穿旗袍又好看。
提拔一个干部，树立一面旗帜。
这场运动最终被中央停止。
熊炳岗仍无法相信，妻子就这么去了。
如今，石头已经四岁了，聪明活泼可爱。
孩子他爸连忙摇了摇头不同意，他说：“我姓梅啊。
民间“乾隆盗木”传说就和菱恩殿有关。
这些被偷走的花梨柜都是奶奶当年的嫁妆，已经珍藏几十年。
老师，这门课我没好好学，很对不起你。
许多大货车司机告诉记者，他们已被堵两天两夜。
昨日，“辽宁舰”悬挂满旗，舰员精神抖擞分区列队。
越来越多的僧人在国外留学中掌握熟练的外语技能。
好孩子，那咱不写妈妈，你写我的爸爸也一样，行吗？
我没有获得成功的喜悦，相反，困惑与痛苦缠绕着我。
官兵在狭窄的岩石夹缝中掏炮眼，准备集中爆破。
发短信者称，要去看望胡娜和邹某的儿子。
短期内，股市可能欠缺趋势性的投资机会，将维持震荡的格局。
就是这样的一片文化遗产，而今也要收费，听上去总有些别扭。
谁知胡某不仅不听劝告，反而抡起菜刀砍起了屋内物品。
那一晚和他睡在一个屋里的，还有码头上的棒棒们。
用周工展总经理的话说，终年日晒雨淋、风吹霜打。
要我学蛤蟆，我无论如何迈不动腿。
由于伞骨前端带钩，普通手术难以顺利取出。
自恋玩自拍，长裙遭人踩险些出糗，幸好其及时提裙，省得走光。
他叫“小心走火”，本人姓贺，长春人。
今天上午，祥云火炬在赤峰传递，享受了一段别样的文化之旅。
我有肝癌，医生说只能活半年。
鱼刺拔出后，患者很快痊愈。
当局迫于压力，不得不接受了改造方案。
在他看来，现在首要问题是怎么保存牛黄。
当然，洛翰并非彻底与娱乐圈断绝了关系。
徐某矢口否认，并与舍友发生了激烈争吵。
她自然也就没有支付当初约定的抚养费了。
他想对谢景渊道歉，谢景渊一转身往二号室走，把他晾在那里。
现场点缀着许多洁白的玫瑰，布置得奢华又浪漫。
埃尔桑常对人说：四十天间的蠢事，我四十年都偿还不清。
古代的男孩子二十岁左右，女孩子十五岁左右就能结婚啦！
昨天清晨，货车“四脚”朝天，食用油洒了一地。
爱国必要去南京，因为南京有许多可进行爱国主义教育的名胜古迹。
林雨翔据实交代：柳永的词我不熟，欧阳修的还可以。
下水道四壁整洁，没有想象中的污秽与腥臭。
贯彻落实拒不支付劳动报酬罪司法解释。
吴某心虚，听到动静立即溜出后门躲起来。
但命运永远垂青傻傻的孩子，这似乎是永恒不变的定律。
当天，他卖了一块金块当作盘缠。
短短十来分钟连抢两人，这伙抢匪气焰太嚣张了。
同时，这也意味着必须有足够的人才储备。
前五个月外贸出口的良好势头能否持续？
最初的创业冲动缘于几年前的换物概念。
至于后期媒体的报道，只是一种揣测而已。
张楚“北漂”，第一个找上的就是老乡伊沙。
从紧的货币政策，是遏制投资过热和通货膨胀压力的手段。
楼主有一男性同学，公认的学霸，到大三了都没谈过恋爱。
老板捎了捎后脑勺：明明是五只，怎么只有一只了？
莫非她的命运真的受到法老的操纵？
婚后，两人摩擦不断。
第一道闸门，市卫生局。
这让耿松看到了希望。
他软软地躺在椅子上。
这是万达的窘境所在。
男子走路的姿势摇摇晃晃的，让高周有些警觉。
周克华租住的房屋位于小区三单元六零五房间。
管道与机身接口处被腐蚀出一个碗口大的洞。
这还不包括因开车摆弄手机和浏览导航系统而丧生的人数。
在邓新华经常登录的“葫芦丝专业网站”上，悼念帖子不断更新。
我们觉得和瓮安事件的情况比较吻合，就在瓮安试点了。
朝村子一路走去，随处都可以看到一堆堆被扔在路边的葡萄。
陶瓿两侧的人面像“耳朵”。
以至于区域过分集中、业务范围太过窄小、公司权利缺乏制衡。
其中分寸的拿捏，还真需要火候。
许多人干脆鞋一蹬，躺倒在座位上，将硬座当硬卧来使。
各式口音混杂着，大厅里熙熙攘攘。
因为早起的鸟有食吃，早开的花有水喝。
梁样君又问：林兄，你是不是也有那个呢？
与去年相比，杭州今年初雪晚了一个月。
高林说，她的硕士毕业论文快要完成了。
一些优质中国概念股明显反弹。
德尔惠运动品牌店仓库的窗户铁栏杆被剪断。
美两高官连放狠话，战云似乎正在海湾上空骤聚。
让烟花观赏者感到最痛苦的是交通拥堵。
马丁跪在地上挨个点燃蜡烛。
这些问题恳请政府尽快解决。
其间，他们还在与班禅的关系问题上，同“亚东噶厦”联系过两次。
这些私宰点直接用探照灯照明，整个山头都灯火通明。
该园的动物笼舍里的空调、风扇等降温设备全面启动。
原来我也是人类呀？我还以为我是机器人。
或者，他们在假料中掺进真料，让人真假难辨。
北上广深四大一线城市更是获得了“盛世荣宠”。
股市跌这么惨，我不想活了！
今天偷懒没看书，被你发现啦。
我省商超集体向国家发改委的诉求，可能将打错算盘。
这条网帖迅速引发网友关注。
海外奢侈品网站也按捺不住。
在游戏剧本创作中，打谁？
这嗟来之食，于我而言，难呐！
图为垮塌围墙的巨大砖石。
先来看看刘熀松的计算。
念的真好听，赶明儿教教我。
之后，徐武被这伙人掳走。
原来她耳朵又不聋，都会说。
随后，何背部又被捅两刀。
此外，加强改水、引水力度。
住哪儿我也是女的首选女生。
然而，真迹陨灭，精神不朽。
简直是一个人顶两个人用。
对此，查查也有自己的委屈。
容不容易抢走澳门的客人？
因此保护江豚已刻不容缓。
黑暗中，她趴在地上摸索。
周秀娜孖男友避年，两人将赴泰国享受阳光与海滩。
好，进卧室来，老娘给你准备了搓衣板。
目前，拈花寺的使用权归属中国人民大学印刷厂。
雪上加霜的辽宁队不断调兵遣将，试图挽回败局。
扰攘一番后，“换钞者”自行离开，银行陆续恢复正常。
从其过往的种种细节中或能管窥一二。
两市仅家电、农林牧渔、食品、酿酒板块收红。
为了稳妥起见，紧接着洒水车又进行了第二次清洗。
她的造型也相当年轻现代，一改在贾樟柯片中的土妞形象。
故障车辆救援服务收费实行政府定价管理。
实际上你要卖还要卖更便宜的价格？
要心胸开阔、达观向上，严以律己、宽以待人，胜不骄、败不馁。
旁边一哥们冲那爸爸吼到：有你这么教育孩子的吗？
我尽管做了一些负责的工作，但也犯过错误，栽过跟斗，碰过钉子。
是他们脑子有毛病。
宝贝晚安，好梦。
温州乐园还可以。
我们先从那儿开始灭。
因为我不爱吃南瓜。
吃梨可以止咳润肺。
涝过之后依然亢旱。
一些装着防护栏杆的窗户上还挂着“歪楼”的牌子。
红衣男子踉跄着走向路边人行道，一屁股坐了下去。
舍友也很喜欢这些小乌龟，经常把它们捧在手心上玩。
对于价格串通，消费者可以用脚投票，让价格联盟难以得逞。
经鉴定，方某荣系被他人持锐器刺破心脏致失血性休克死亡。
而二零一一年增加为八万七千零一十六人，占百分之八点二。
我的柔情，你总是不懂。
于是，杨勇辗转来到了合肥。
几分钟后，库房蹿出数米高的火苗，多辆消防车赶来灭火。
儿童矮小症应早发现、早治疗，及时干预才能成就梦想的高度。
这些孩子衡量是非对错的标准，甚至往往参照自己小圈子的标准。
于丹被呛声，是一件尴尬事。
民警说，从谈话中感觉到她义气又爽快。
此后，陶校兴收受贿赂之事便慢慢演变为赤裸裸的金钱交易。
高成一心想要个儿子，所以去年春天时表姐就怀孕了。
此外，该网点并未办理烟花爆竹公众责任险。
昨日陈景河与邹来昌都已决定服从处罚。
最终，以一点八一八七六亿元成功夺标。
这也为李静“多喜临门”的年底成绩单又加上了一抹亮色。
同时他透露，雷军近期也曾到点心团队拜访。
在这个季节里，寒风凛冽、降雪频仍，人们活动受到诸多限制。
但阿灵顿现在却声称，她当初离职时“处于极其肮脏的状况”。
唔，我明天就去剪头发好啦。
过磅时小宋多了个心眼，将袋子下部的糖抠出来一尝，竟是盐。
现在看起来，“八字或许有一撇”了。
你猜啊你猜啊你猜啊，你猜对了我就告诉你。
这事儿就发生在葫芦岛抗战老兵宗占德身上。
华盛顿当前的天气情况为雨夹雪伴随强阵风。
老师：痴迷于网络游戏会让人变的暴力。
和酒鬼酒相比，另有白酒企业在塑化剂风波中饱受考验。
你在下边都干什么了？
能够拥有一套宽敞的新房，就成了一家人的心愿。
巴希尔于同月在加沙接受了徒手杀人的训练。
靠！洗碗用的橡胶手套！
但饶毅并没有指出名字。
现场记者抛出一串问题。
我身上的淤伤并非跌倒。
受审时，阮某自认无罪。
左腿蜷着压在右腿上面。
头晕了吗？需要去医院吗？
对此，求雪女不愿回答。
然而，当天走得很拖沓。
不知道算怎么个情况。
我一直告诫自己要耐住寂寞。
如果为权所累、为权所驭，就会成为权力的奴隶，为权所害。
两男子大概还没回过神来呢，就都被撸进了。
但专家提醒这样的月饼养生不靠谱。
我给的零用钱，他全攒着夹在书里。
随后，一位街坊将该女子拉入屋内关上大门。
温家宝一大早来到了嘉祥县疃里镇贾桥村。
下一步，国家将按照积极稳妥原则，清理小产权房。
教练一节一节、一个节拍一个节拍地给我们抠动作。
得手后，赃款俵分，手机则找二手店进行销赃，用这笔钱吃喝。
孙家就像是挨了闷棍，一时缓不过神来。
相反她的女儿翟然慧身上不仅有文身，平时打扮也十分“惹火”。
事发时，当事皮卡与另一车辆准备加油，两者相距较远。
宝贝定投顾名思义，是父母给儿女购买的基金定投。
此案日前在郴州市北湖区人民法院开庭审理。
张春贤获悉网民意见后，通过论证及时爆破拆除了那根烟囱。
我都折腾零碎了，可别再折腾了。
忆起你病故的那一幕，爸爸肝肠寸断呀。
有一回一个人打电话找她，她一接起电话，那边就大吼一声孽畜！
我已经远走高飞，你们就不要再费劲找我了。
说到动情处，邢春英当庭洒泪。
上面涂满了甜甜酸酸的感情。
燕郊，踏上科学发展的新征程。
领导威信降低，党的形象受损。
岑某见林海毁约，便不再理他。
侯某犯诈骗罪，免予刑事处罚。
我最喜欢华尔街，听说世界上最优秀的人都聚集在这里。
他认为，这款游戏贬损了上海这座中华繁华都市的声誉。
后经过与其家人沟通，最终决定为陈娟实施剖腹产手术。
邓州市委、市政府赞扬他们是一个光彩夺目的雷锋群体。
被捕后直至返回瑞典前，瓦里被扣押在金边的拘留所内。
家里摆设依旧，只是旁边的湖面“越来越干”。
所以有些熊猫的爪子很长，身上也有一些异味。
事实上，已有上海本土企业开始降价跑量。
他有时窝在家里，有时松松垮垮跟在婶子后面，到县城上访。
看到罗某已上钩，就带罗某到该宾馆五零二号房。
最引人注目的，要算是总理府办公大楼门口那十来平方米的水稻田。
自从奶牛死去，我只能靠打点短工和借债过日子。
但这是个错觉，就犹如鸵鸟把头埋藏在沙子里一样。
经查，该团伙成员全部是灞桥区洪庆街办的老乡。
在爱的路上会有区电视台来做一个节目，另有教委之人下凡督导。
双方很快签订了二手房买卖合同。
我回头望望彝海，她似乎在微笑着絮语。
网络是否成为反腐倡廉的有力平台？
方太缘何能成为厨电领域的香饽饽？
解决达尔富尔问题目前的困难何在？
我们立即明白他是说只有一名歹徒，手里有枪。
著名鉴宝专家马未都也提出了同样的质疑。
怀特说：不难啊，你找个印冥钞的地方不就可以了吗？
打扫完快好好歇一会，需要我放首歌给你鼓劲的话，就直接对我说歌名吧。
这下子弄得大伙心里别别扭扭，大大扫了我们的玩兴。
记者随后问一个过路的农民：“你家分了衣服没有？
人家都说俺把孩子带得很好，其实是俺拖累了孩子。
该给祖宗和母亲烧纸了，他会来到长江边。
都多少年了？铁树也该开花了吧？
媒体推测，事故原因与船只超载有关。
天龙八部影视城，主人快带我去嘛。
饿得实在不行，就趁天黑时用手捧些河水喝。
我在廊坊呆了一年半。
谁把车子停在这儿了？
只要一百块就够了吗？
握拳挥过去，软软的。
如果做官，就要跟企业撇清关系。
父母散去后一屋子人一声不吭整理自己整齐得不需整理的东西。
绑匪给她穿上了自杀式炸弹背心，在营救人员到来时引爆。
他八二年生，河北人，大学本科毕业生。
布什这篇国情咨文，标志着他总统任期结束或结尾阶段的开始。
这是典型的“按下葫芦又起瓢”。
很自然地，他也向对方笑笑。
雨翔哇了一声，说这人写的情书和大学教授写的散文一样。
咱也不能老欠人家钱不还呀。
为息事宁人，吴某爽快答应了。
一转眼你都这么大了。
但对“一吻定终身”的说法，孙允芳表示很值得质疑。
当地政府的如意算盘岂不是鸡飞蛋打一场空？
大口钦村村民王国荣患股骨头坏死，家里极为贫困。
它们船船相连、首尾衔接，组成了浩浩荡荡的船队。
既然怎样都是融资，那么阿里巴巴很有可能继续放大胃口。
但住了仅半年，哥哥又因风水问题搬离，迁回加多利山旧居。
今天带四岁女儿到单位玩，一同事逗问她：丫头，你长得像谁啊？
在志愿者交接仪式上，陈毅骙亲自为母亲陈敏献花。
我爸常说是狗屎糊了眼睛才看上我妈的，你也是吗？
为什么这么多景点扎堆涨价呢？
朋友劝道：是不是你自己有问题啊。
瞧瞧你，年纪不大，皱纹倒不少！
李恩平称，存量供给进一步积累。
她是一名夜总会的舞娘，艺名“鲁比”。
小红，你在锅底下点蜡烛了吗？
好在蜜雪儿想到了好莱乌博物馆。
官兵们肩扛手抬，扛着冲锋舟，踩着泥泞急步向港边村开进。
绕、落、回，是嫦娥探月的三部曲。
董一进门就要钱，但其公公说手里没钱。
马英雪的电话为幺五八三二八七七二四六。
没空算了，不给你了！
老人终身未婚，无儿无女。
常年生活在黄河北岸的马努海，个头不高。
要提高短缺品种产量。
在救灾复产工作方法上要有主有次，不能眉毛胡子一把抓。
早上一小情侣打赌，在大厦窗外喊自己叫什么，自己是猪之类的话！
她们想知道，刘大成在外面究竟能火成啥样子。
纵观浮华娱乐圈，女明星不少，但天生文艺范儿的却不多。
杀人后，刘某回家还装模作样，主动出去找人。
另外一个让夫妻俩发愁的是医疗费已捉襟见肘。
日本寺院和神社均会在“大晦日”举行撞钟仪式。
日子一天天过去，她越发焦虑。
因被人讨债，张某萌生抢劫念头。
你的帅如此与众不同，像把整个宇宙都装进了你的双眼中。
我明白了，您是让我向您一样友好的对待身边每一个人吗？
九零幺室的火早已被扑灭。
车站的问讯电话为八六四三三二三二。
大动脉频繁梗阻，张家口首当其冲。
是不是都只是街边的小店小餐馆啊？
而这一天，恰是水灵的母亲“龙欣”产崽。
据警方介绍，王琛交代称作案理由是苦无生活费。
可是今天她居然在某宝把保护壳和贴膜都买好了！
唱歌要唱最红的歌，红歌，在井冈山的苍山翠林里回荡。
部分学生随即出现了咳嗽、呕吐等症状。
但她伤口的疼痛依旧，不时发出哼哼声。
是把生活的其他压力都转嫁到社保了？
学生们为死者折叠了将近两万只千纸鹤。
事发地位于奉城镇冯家村六百二十六号。
妹妹姓谢，姐姐当然姓谢了。
钟某在宾馆门口与债主拉扯。
相关情况齐鲁网将继续追踪。
程婴的内心过程比较难捉摸。
小岛生活让格拉欣受益匪浅。
北广场停车位减少，拥堵加剧。
身边要好的朋友和同事或许能带来意想不到的惊喜。
想笑就笑，想恼火就恼火。
除了行政手段调控，购房信贷再度“卡紧”。
那时，“泥鳅”还潜在泥里，苦心打造演讲稿。
这还不简单嘛，带着女友买买买！
原来你也喜欢意境美美的唐诗呀，我以为只有我这样的女孩子才会喜欢。
不想吃，闻见味了过敏！
连上岗前培训、支摊儿的功夫都省了，这家可真能压缩成本。
男子似乎有了点知觉，含糊不清地嘟哝了几句。
新政实施后，奥赛获奖者也要参加高考、填报志愿。
这些小岛都很宝贵呀，别糟蹋了。
土耳其长期以来一直存在着坚持和反对世俗原则的斗争。
邹世龙的名字我只是听说。
整个购物时间为三十一分钟。
我们完全犯不着对他不依不饶。
这会成为布莱尔旋风的起点吗？
把房地产作为投资也是不恰当的，国情不允许。
我们也曾经在屋里酣睡的时候被声音吓醒。
岁月绝对不是杀猪刀，而是一名优秀的饲养员！
裴某删除了邮件中助理医师考试内容后转发给表姐曹某。
看到孩子执拗的态度，辰辰妈心里也挺纠结。
据王先生介绍，哈士奇是唯一不会狗叫的犬类。
事情败露后，惠普变成了刺探隐私的侵权者。
今天在饭店见证了邻桌姑娘被搭讪的全程。
我毫不迟疑的迅速钻进去，那酸爽一辈子都忘不了。
今次发生如此严重的“人踩人”悲剧，可谓非常讽刺。
第三次医生再来问他的病情时，他说现在泻肚子。
韩连明没有想到，张伯虎从此成了他在獒园轰都轰不走的看客。
一日壁虎哀求道：你还是给我个痛快吧，我受不了啦。
是啊，是啊，谭总听说你混的不错啊。
后方某先后被两辆轿车碾压致死。
最荒唐的一起案例是“微博开房”事件。
他玩得不亦乐乎，接受采访时侃侃而谈。
我等你出差回来。
淘宝一拆三后，它获得了最多的支持。
别跟我抢男朋友！
联系电话六四二幺二四六幺或幺二三二零。
徐静蕾与黄立行。
妈妈的一句话让我瞬间泪流满面：你啥时候回来咱家啥时候过年。
每次听到偶像的声音，都兴奋起哄。
的确，巴菲特的醉翁之意，正是比亚迪的新能源技术及其广阔前景。
律师法”已明确允许的“自行调查取证”也未纳入。
保护棉农利益、增加棉农收入是棉花宏观调控的基本原则。
兰州黄河边上趸船较多，夏天多有市民在此休闲娱乐。
贾宝玉初见林黛玉说的第一句是这个妹妹我曾见过的。
一头利落短发配合干净的裤装，让黄奕显得自信满满。
等到小飞跑进屋看时，小梅将小明按在地上，用脚跺着。
上面用黄色油漆工工整整列出村财务的近百个具体项目。
当前来自祖国四面八方的物资正在通过铁路运往灾区。
不然，恁热的天系个领带啷个受得了。
如果人民力量党参与舞弊的证据确凿，人民力量党将被解散。
养犬人在住所内饲养犬只，应当有效控制犬只吠叫。
那么，对日本而言，何种国家哲学才是必要的呢？
但是，这座含着金钥匙出生的楼盘却命运多舛。
我家小区的大门口，时常有几辆黑车在那儿“趴活儿”。
带小孩太累了，什么都不懂还总要大人陪着玩。
大约晚上十一点左右，火开始向三十四楼蔓延。
律师提醒我从黄牛手中买票是违法行为。
两人更加当众做出搂抱、亲嘴、捏脸蛋和互喂食物等亲密动作。
行动鲁莽的他常常被吴蔷骂得狗血淋头，但他却爱上吴蔷。
银行闹“钱荒”，鼓励提前还贷和揽储花样百出。
连篱笆、花园枱凳及仙人掌等植物都全线倒塌。
尽管如此，蔡赟并没有因为生活条件简陋而心灰意冷。
我知道我并不完美，但我会很努力成为你的唯一。
很多墓地销售处都组织客户听风水先生讲课，宣传风水知识。
太阳照常升起，阳光依然灿烂。
事实证明，王长田这种以发行营销切入也是相当讨巧的。
此案在全厦门引发各方关注。
这些年，范姑娘一直很倔强。
生活不是缺少美，而是缺少了发现美的眼睛。加油哟。
此后，在老乡刘有余的怂恿下，齐石光沾染上了毒品。
那天穿制服的蜀黍来小区了，感觉都好帅好威风哦。
吵吵闹闹让张女士受不了，她也怕影响到正在读高中的女儿。
殡仪馆对面是火葬场。
这意味着风险隐患明显。
如能将五分之一的“冗车”拍卖，无疑更符合民意期待。
遇到横亘在脖子高度的电线，大家已经能够默契地提醒闪避。
目前，管理方只得使用高压喷射的笨办法。
有报道称，该市“平坟复耕”工作已暂停推行。
这也是大学生协管员不好招聘的原因。
当天淘宝交易付款，发电子版照片。
一国两制的成功超乎我们的预期。
尸体经雨衣包裹，电线捆扎，被抱到了黄徐根的摩托车后座。
车辆冲关完了后，收费员才敢出岗亭将通道的栏杆扶正。
消防官兵戴上手套，用火钩、扫把将蛇赶出床底。
从花土沟好不容易搭乘一辆解放，颠簸得我们不住想呕吐。
今年在外包装上还首次有了防伪记号。
这次协商没提辞退的事儿，光谈补偿。
鼻孔里流出了鲜血，他赶紧下了楼。
两人在以色列、伊朗等中东政策上分歧颇多。
不知道为什么，傻傻的白羊似乎总是有好运气。
随后，地方干部到中央部委履新的步伐加快。
两名劫匪离店时将他们捆绑并用胶带封嘴后逃离。
可口可乐和中国的未来发展将融为一体。
这对中心城的污染影响就要小一些。
他们对学校的榜样教育评价如何？
与之伴随的是那只藏獒的吼叫。
车主扯着黄董不放，要求赔偿。
钟灵岔开鬼话题：这地方赌钱的人很多啊！
天空飘起了蒙蒙细雨，北川老县城笼罩在一片雾霭里。
营救工作让智利总统皮涅拉支持率大涨。
我平时不玩微博的，我说诶，微博上真的有我的照片。
番禺此项政策，自然受到外来务工家庭的追捧。
在我国地方种猪里，荣昌猪是其中的佼佼者。
最后陈燃挑选了两套风格迥然不同的服饰。
郭晋安与太太都表示很满足，计划不再要孩子。
官方数据显示，点心累积用户规模达到一百万。
在队伍最前面的是身穿“零零一”号囚服的赵凤林。
张蕊说，外公还特别喜欢逛街，经常到春熙路逛。
这恐怕是国际航空业必须认真面对的严峻现实。
检方认为，杨春妹涉嫌贪污罪和挪用公款罪。
墙上告示未能说明，马桶的上述花哨功能会消耗多少电量。
中国人民保钓同仇敌忾，众志成城，反映民心可畏，民气可用。
你溜达溜达赶紧出去，你已经在违法啦。
光知道自个儿抽，也不快给老师点上一支！
这名凶手携带手枪，他杀人不眨眼，并且枪法精准、身处闹市。
我的肩膀借你用用吧，没事，一切都会好起来的。
但是默多克同时表示，希望大家放王子一马“让他喘口气”。
父亲的耳濡目染让西贝柳斯从小对政治产生了兴趣。
难道我是一只机器狗狗嘛？那晚安吧！
工人只能爬着下去采掘，再用篓子把煤拉出来。
我可以语音点播歌曲、查天气、设置提醒、播放有声内容，还能陪聊。
随后，侦查员立即前往赵启凡位于阿城的家中对其进行抓捕。
可以这么说，许多人的失败，都源自于那些一直麻醉着他的借口。
监察部门应该查查。
她说话时很嗲很温柔，还经常会很甜蜜地欢笑。
而在“担保公司”之间，资金也“拎来拎去”，彼此“救急”。
刘芳被抓后交代，近四年来，她已骗婚三次。
你思维很活跃，总能从多视角看待事物，从而解决一些很棘手的问题！
张羽一脸害羞，再轻声追问：那她说什么？
司机陈发成腰部受伤，李秋先没有受伤。
一位少林小沙弥在塔林内的一座塔砖顶上练习少林童子功。
这股旋风也被刮到中国，多家大型互联网企业纷纷效仿。
一个小时后，被憋疼的苏先生才被获准下车小便。
可没想到能把招牌打到全国。
落实了，到目前为止，才卖出去几十万担新疆棉花。
千古虐恋，我劝他准备好纸巾再鼓足勇气打开。
姐，我在你眼里有那么猥琐吗？
李爹爹要求再度上街寻找。
那时的村子远没现在热闹。
这时，胡某屡屡催她还钱。
去世博园看看呀，非常热闹。
现在真的是“西安娃，回来咧”。
于是，我赠旗表达感激之情。
其间，小宇一直被碾在车下。
把马路和公共卫生搞好了。
小邹在塑年堂做了一年多。
如今，塞尔比成为第五位冠军。
又有多少是蜻蜓点水而止呢？
大通道才能支撑物流腾飞。
母亲看病的费用能报销吗？
赫夫曼对着镜头瞪眼鼓腮，还说“看这猴子”，非常可爱。
在不痛不痒中，九月就这样悄然来临。
路漫漫其修远兮，谁来帮你量距离。
不仅如此，它还会将毛巾拧干把脸擦干净。
三是进一步做好通风瓦斯管理工作。
昨天晚上，卡马水库发生垮坝事故。
哪个领导敢于起用一个满口谀辞的小政客呢？
面对机遇和挑战，我们的头脑要清醒。
她穿着黑色上衣以及牛仔裤，明显胖了很多。
兔子病了，他给喂药，兔子吐了出来。
采访中，小宇不停的撕咬着衣服，甚至还咬起了垃圾桶。
在厦门港发展邮轮经济，空间巨大。
也许是太陌生，也许实在感觉太无趣。
他们合力将绳索捆在对面山岭一棵大树上。
三是加强跨境资金流动监测管理。
我刚要接话，外婆又补充了一句：男的女的都行！
随后又因吸毒被警方查获，被民警送往郴州强制戒毒。
记者问蜗牛：当时事故是怎样发生的？
我们才明白这原来是从造纸原料——麦秸上抠下来的粮食。
见呛水严重，他们为黄天做了人工呼吸。
国务院的深切关怀送到亲人的心坎上。
黎耀祥、黄宗泽马上撇清自己。
一旦审查通过，脸谱将进入路演环节，最后上市交易。
这种体验一点儿也不直观。
看你个没出息样儿，打小就离不开个女人，以后怎么混！
这样的段落多在腐朽不存的木柞墙地带，保存有壕堑。
爱儿心切的樊治容将马茂杰搂在怀里，希望他能康复。
盘中波动区间为六点一八零一至六点一八二六。
同时，广西侨办还向他们送上慰问金。
凤凰卫视黄橙子。
加快万达广场、东牌楼、南湖广场等大型商业综合体建设。
相关情况都在他们那儿，你应该通过省药监局了解一下情况。
犬主将藏獒控制后，两名民警迅速被送往附近医院。
米拉麦斯高层认为迪士尼的禁令，超越原本的协议。
该局指出，在保存面部识别数据前，脸谱网应明确告知用户。
追上后，赵涛一把搂住男子的脖子，但没拉好，男子又跑了。
四个喷头，一字排开，地面还做了防滑处理。
畅游古文和明清小说一番后，李立群终于回神，还一个笑。
但“广大人民群众”似乎并未“领情”，原因在哪？
福建由此拉响沿海和台湾海峡大风警报。
傅颖推出新书电子版，教人化妆及美容。
而在码头上，发生爆燃的运油船已不见踪影。
从医院逃跑之后，王小龙跑到了一个女粉友李某家中。
在渡船上，孩子们吵着让邹芙容讲故事。
挨骂就挨骂，至少能听点新鲜的。
如起哄和丢矿泉水瓶。
那我只好陪你一辈子啦。
我在速度搬亲不要着急。
这惹恼了芜湖有关方面。
我要揭露那些肮脏的交易。
借条怎么“设计”，也有“学问”。
开涮主持人，满脸得意。
他奶奶躺在那儿动不了。
掏再多的钱俺也不卖它。
考古人员发掘鹅卵石路。
一米六五，没让你失望吧？
鬼崽岭石像制作工艺及造型独特，十分罕见。
结婚前，我老婆喜欢撒娇，结婚后就喜欢撒野了。
大夫在为李秀英检查耳朵。
脚踩高跟鞋似乎也有点力不从心，不时扶着栏杆走路。
杨亨燮对中国国家广电总局赠与朝鲜先进设备表示感谢。
雷闯表示将继续向广东省卫生厅实名举报这些医院。
也许是见了生人，王昕宇“噌”地一下起身，拖着铁链朝卧室跑去。
他无暇跟这个心情特别好的人纠缠，几次逼问，结果都未遂。
往返于行政许可部门“跑审批”的焦急与等待，很多人都不陌生。
庐山别墅对外开放经营并非个别。
随后，长棱镇派出所民警赶到现场，将女童接走。
然而，这场万众瞩目的艺考，也不是纯粹的娱乐和赏眼。
全年营收增加百分之四十六点七，报三点六一二亿元。
不过，这些狗狗只习惯跟在主人后面，很少“单溜”。
我没有给你写过信，因为我想保留这份记忆，这种感觉。
因为“老婆奴”长相不错，所以很多三四线女星都自动送上门。
车出上海，公路像得了脚癣，坑洼不断，一车人跳得反胃。
岑洁仪在课里嫁得有情郎，二人年底将回香港补摆喜酒。
男子神志不清，声称自己怀揣万元现金，现在有人要抓他。
杂志写到冇乜好写，下次就写我结婚生仔，我都跟不上。
东路和西路，院落基本打开，游客可以进院赏景，隔窗观室。
轻度污染。
熊女士被碾身亡。
奶奶还留在现场。
良性互动戛然而止。
我们等你回来哟。
会见在韩国总统府青瓦台举行。
美方有义务向捷克军方通报北约和美国使用反导系统的情况。
他的头脚被对折，头朝下塞在垃圾篓里。
李霞看到明晃晃的砍刀，心里十分害怕。
但是目前泽尻究竟在何处静养还不清楚。
其实爆照的秘诀，就在于咱俩聊得有多欢。
我也想逃出去，但年纪大了，腿脚又不方便。
几个妇女闻声提着锄头、扁担等围了过去。
高昂的学费也是王万楹一家目前最焦心的事。
货车的三个轮子被撞歪，车头完全被撞瘪。
我还同连长钟山到医院探望过孙立人将军。
先入场者得到追捧，后入场者也不乏拥趸。
能买到的朋友请联系幺三八九六二五二二二五。
而这一战火将吞没整个地区并迫使美国行动。
王青宇比较健壮，大吼一声，一下把男子摁倒在地。
泰国最著名的景点，柴瓦塔那兰寺也被迫关闭。
的哥瞬间成了“粉人”，呛得赶紧闭嘴转身离开。
他还是县里农民运动会扳手腕比赛的第三名。
竹林边缘，可以看到村民搭建的一顶顶简易帐篷。
随着关于“收入增长”的陆续吹风，百姓的胃口被越吊越高。
他随手一拎，沉甸甸的竟然没有拉动。
石磊等人当时已经进入公众视野。
客车的车头也已经部分变形损毁。
今天出去取快递，在回学校的路上拆开包装准备丢进垃圾桶。
没有呀—我只是自我认知比较清晰嘛。
百度目前仍受益于强劲的运营杠杆。
我的数据线这么屌我怎么不知道？
仪表天然磊落，梁山上端的夸能。
我理解国博举办奢侈品展，但不支持。
应采儿因而获得大量商业活动，工作不断。
现场的嘉宾非常赞同郭金的“抠门论”。
昨日午后，狂风暴雨也袭击了省会长沙。
墨脱人传统的交通方式是肩挑背扛。
吴晓亦认为，晒病历的做法具有建设性意义。
这改变了哈珀政府上台初期大谈人权而惹恼中国的调门。
皮疹无水泡，病人无发热、咳嗽等其他症状。
阿福的爷爷每逢读书看报，总是戴着老花镜。
萨利赫希望借这次正式的全国电视讲话“混淆”外界判断。
我们解剖一个麻雀，去看一下。
除此之外，出生年月、住址等身份信息完全一致。
记者佯装就餐食客进入挂着“八大锅大院”牌匾的柳祖祠。
孔令辉表示，姚彦进步很快，对王楠、郭焱打得都不错，就是还缺点经验。
小王觉得父亲说得不对，认为自己被误解了，心里别扭。
再晚一会儿我就跑到外地了。
瓦尔克没有说明诉讼动机。
秀智日前一篇关于她的报道，惹起内地网民不满。
我只得乖乖掏钱给张某。
邕江水位暴涨，水流湍急。
一个人操持家务洗衣煮饭。
学生为吕老师梳妆打扮。
二人均表示认错并悔改。
即便是“醉驾入刑”扰攘已久，这种情况也没有改变。
所幸井喷未造成人员伤亡。
十七大当选为中央纪委委员。
这也遭到右翼人士的抨击。
因为租的房子离单位不远，她就独自摇摇晃晃往家走。
而男生则相对懵懂得多。
然后爸说：就是我没睁眼。
图为孙青丽和公公婆婆。
但是还不会熟练操作哦！
以后少在网上买东西，没有买卖就没有杀害…懂吗？
村中大多数作坊已停产。
第二个问题讲讲行业前景。
蓬安县检察院及时派出干警提前介入，引导侦查。
张子强和叶继欢都不用道歉，我们谁有资格出来道歉呀？
即使爬到最高的山上，一次也只能脚踏实地地迈一步。
你这样弄得倒酒人下不来台。
你看看几点了，还不滚回来！
据说是山上的小水库要崩了。
如果晒伤严重，应该及时请假。
波音七四七进入飞机拆卸场。
老游觉得，要买就买厦门的房。
第三宗罪则是鬼子脸谱化。
为此，莫言“兴奋得一宿没睡”。
时旸还介绍，目前已经有出口其他国家的意向。
离开学校之后，他就没怎么唱过国歌，“连词儿都忘记了”。
贵州媳妇有点羞赧地推搡四叶子：事是你惹下的，你自己讲吧。
这则寓言的寓意，是说世界上存在一种人，非常好胜，而又不自量力。
飞天琵琶，气势动人。
周容说，这种轰动不亚于以前学校产生了高考“状元”。
受慈济太太的影响他从此也成为慈济的义工。
出去买点菜做顿美食犒劳自己的胃吧，连着好天气一起吃进去。
东阿阿胶也因此“躺着中枪”，至今股价低迷。
里面的“英红”很帅气，大剌剌的，很率直。
警方怀疑，此次剧毒假酒可能掺入农药。
状元卷在上海民间流传至今实属罕见。
显然，完整的阵容才能打出完美的比赛。
最后，妈妈搂着她与弟弟一起上了警车。
终于有个木有的了。
小马在上海上班，赵姑娘在杭州，暂住蒋村。
而回收虾油一般都会过滤，是不会存在作料渣的问题的。
在确凿的证据面前，冈萨雷斯无法抵赖。
据了解，届时李讷、毛远新等人也会到场。
当然是利用热胀冷缩的原理啦。
近日，有证据表明，穆里试图撒谎掩盖其所犯下的错误。
这是留下中国猛龙足迹的恐龙的复原图。
六八四路双向增设东内北小街北口站。
你是在干体力活吧？
谢家格言，每天生日。
大年初五这天，民间通行的食俗是吃饺子，俗称“捏小人嘴”。
雨翔的灵魂默默跳了三次，都冷得返回告诉肉体跳不得。
曾被法国媒体关注的雷诺“工业间谍案”很可能系人为捏造。
用胡萝卜汁、芹菜汁、菠菜汁加入鸡蛋和面，面条也很筋道。
另一十三岁谷姓少年在事故中遇难。
翌年，汉明帝敕令在国都西兴建僧院，取名白马寺。
在与阿富汗官员打交道的时候，打点是必不可少的。
因为有资金补贴，加上有农业推广招牌，他们自认为占了便宜。
之后本报接到该酒厂来函，称其为书法字体。
这是一间用土坯和茅草搭建的房子，低矮简陋。
希望他们的所作所为能收敛点。
路人大呼耍流氓并立即报警。
还有网友讲述曾参与“训新”的经历。
没有演唱会，我的音乐只完成了一半。
至今年过六旬的他还是光棍。
妈妈似乎被惹恼了，眉头一皱。
昨天，在北京街头，孩子被家长包裹严实抵挡寒流。
陈文茜暗吃一惊，想难怪这人不是大雅不是大俗，原来乃是大笨。
谢霆锋昨担任周杰伦演唱会嘉宾，撇不和传闻。
于是，他一直盘算着找机会将自己的身份“漂白”。
张自星在福建与老母亲、哥哥、嫂嫂居住，未婚。
创新创业是中关村不朽的灵魂。
春兰股份四月份是否真的退市？
昨天中午，风刮得正紧，卷起路边残存的积雪。
另外就是充分发挥趸船的作用取水。
惟一令马德保不顺心的就剩下文学社。
当石匠将经文篆刻的时候，经石便显现了它最原本的颜色。
据了解，今后老楼供暖改造将陆续进行。
此次燃油附加费下调亦是年内少有的下调。
接着，谢华昌也坐上床，用双手死死掐住阿慧的喉咙。
既想让马儿跑，又不给马儿足够的草，其结果也就在意料之中。
右侧是去年刚刚拓宽的三楼牌小广场，平时供市民休闲用。
我爸爸和我妈妈根本就没有共同语言。
这里海水碧蓝，岛民热情好客且聪明机智。
今天女友抓住我的手搓了半天我没理她，我问她怎么了？
村民接管坪垟小学后，教学质量稳步回升。
我知道他有这个动作啦，他也曾经问我的档期。
况且李庄是否曾在会见龚时眨眼，尚未可知。
二是三大拉动因素总体呈趋缓走势。
此次，中国飞碟队派出的是张奕垚、刘杰和孙崇伦参赛。
此外，马英九脸谱网页上也会链接“总统府”上访程序的页面。
但很少有从法理、法的实施、监督方面分析问题的稿子。
有记者问博尔特是否是当今最好的短跑选手。
高晓松就更不要说了，他对音乐是比较挑惕的。
乘客傻眼，只能下车等一旁。
这需要筹备、磋商和没有意外。
据一位出租车司机称，从浐河到事发地堵车非常严重。
会一点点，我很喜欢和朋友一起玩脑筋急转弯呢。
究竟是泥鳅、鳝鱼、鳗鱼，还是别的鱼，大家都弄不明白。
男子一听，拔腿想跑，被同学们围住报了警。
今后，专业化将是“空中幺幺零”的发展目标。
其实我现在唯一能做的就是踏踏实实演戏。
随之想扬长而去，“被我妈妈拖住不放，他又把我妈妈甩倒在地”。
我是神灯，可以满足你一个愿望。
龙虾的原罪也被揭露了出来。
中国现在正处于刘易斯拐点。
截止十九时，全市共转移人员三十点一七零七万人。
老人说，当时他家庭条件并不好，随着越长越大，棉袄变小了。
这是南朝鲜傀儡军方好战狂才能上演的冒险的军事挑衅。
瓦尔坦承非常期待“打晕受害人，绑起她的手脚及塞着其嘴巴”。
这绝非耸人听闻。
反复碾压一说，不成立。
你们怎么会等得到呀？
在喀什老城区，张春贤来到馕摊儿前、走进居民中。
停建事件变成“风水门”报道后，王银峰更是作了伪证。
复旦大学谢教授的遭遇恰恰戳到了新社会保险法的软肋。
接着，讲解员又称寺庙正修缮，请来了风水大师，可“免费解答”。
其中两本出自古鄂尔多斯人之笔，体现出浓郁的地方文化特色。
狐狸说：猴子，凭你这点小小的本事，你这笨蛋还想做兽中之王吗？
外甥全神贯注的观察中，突然这家伙说了句：“这么点玩意儿怎么够吃。
被野猪糟蹋得一蹋糊涂的庄稼地。
据张先生这位朋友透露，汪涵、张信哲等明星均受邀捧场。
黑瞎子岛正式开放了。
铁门一关，大家都蔫了。
张咪就这样重归娱乐圈。
昨天，涪陵区委组织部称，公示时间非有意安排。
初步估计，这项清淤工程需要挖掘上百万方淤泥。
他嚷起来，我不认识他。
其中，富蕴和且末机场力争在今年开工建设。
据悉，该份报告已提交至广东省委政策研究室。
这是我省首次拍到野外大熊猫背着宝宝行走。
经查，该诊所为黑诊所。
乳与乳制品中三聚氰胺临时管理限量值公告同时废止。
周围都是一些低矮的房屋，与广州城内的高楼大厦相去甚远。
如果说魔幻的话就说明我是直接从马尔克斯那儿过来的。
洞在玻璃外侧清晰可见，玻璃里侧则是纽扣大小的凹槽。
组织上知道我的遭遇后，安排我休息。
因高铁故障频发，京沪航线票价回暖趋势明显。
蕊蕊和同去西门的其他同学早在指定区域排队。
当女人容易吗，夏天穿个裙子还得再穿个安全裤！
当然会，小菜一碟呀，主人觉得我的声音好听吗？
目前第一、二、三、八水厂的应急取水设施已启动。
如今，葛启义成了一家小装饰公司的老板，小有薄财。
政府发通知催款，不交钱停办一切建设手续，这其中到底为何？
承担编纂任务的是谢辰生、吴静安、程天赋。
严重时可引起循环衰竭和热痉挛等。
校长张尧学笑称自己忘带稿子了，只是想说说心里话。
骨龄越超前的孩子，成年后身高就越矮小。
北京个别监测点，西红柿、茄子、土豆、洋葱因下雪原因断货。
示威者也阻塞了柯加邦巴、奥鲁罗及波托西等城市的街道。
大叔说：“没有”，我说：“那赶紧买啊，我都找了三个人才抢到票。
街头安全套售卖机成空摆设。
钱人豪对此喊冤，否认当时有性骚扰女临演，强调只是误会。
有魄力，也很独断，容易得罪人。
他的弟弟得了强直性脊髓炎。
由于前往汶川的道路被滑坡的山体阻断，车队被阻于紫坪铺。
否者，税务机关可以通知出境管理机关阻止其出境。
政府部门的官员、负责人要带头廉洁自律，严格要求配偶、子女。
日本商界巨擘松下幸之助先生发明了一种经典“骂术”。
饭店老板劝说无果后，双方叫来帮手互殴。
保护好武夷青山绿水，才有美好幸福的未来。
记者鼓起勇气，站到了“旋风”对面两米开外。
今天立孔子像远非塑像的意义，更在于立碑。
我觉得“十三钗”怎么着也能去趟奥斯卡吧，得练练。
伊朗发展弹道导弹与伊朗对国际社会的义务背道而驰，约翰德罗说。
好在，哥哥嫂嫂对他都不错，两个姐姐也给了他很多接济。
孩子当时就呛奶了，喘不上气来。
如今，小院儿已经十岁了，聪明伶俐，喜欢唱歌画画。
食品安全标准，保证安全是底线。
男友上厕所的时候无聊，翻看微博，就打算试试。
好想赶紧长大成人了，好和你欢心探讨一下下。
待到九点，四个人该说的话都说完了，昏然欲睡。
这个枕矿山，临长江的黄石，当时连马路也没有。
我的性格比较爽直，廖波和我不一样，他比较内向。
我都不知道其它人有多少，可能是其它房有票呢！
我相信看到你的名字第一眼，我就会爱上这个名字。
新春期间不少店铺休业，却成为贼人的作案目标。
其余的十四点五八七五吨问题奶粉已被当地销毁。
然则，经销商也不是没有瑕疵。
由于当时车内人数较多，两位婆婆被人群挤得动弹不得。
我正在减肥呢。
五一假期将增开十四对直通客车。
我收到指令，这就回去努力钻研，你等我的好消息。
这样就应该强拆公民的房屋吗？
柜台上有招牌，装衣服的塑料袋有字样。
有人发现，这几嗓子吼得“满是河南味儿”。
其动作的实质是渠道利润保护问题。
人人网把这件事纳入开学糗事之一。
你要以硬对硬，钻石是能打动她的心的。
所以以后打车时，大家还要看看车顶哟。
男人装”似乎玩的就是时尚、新鲜、“色”。
叫我撒谎我心里不舒服，不如照实说。
来港生子是为了给超生的宝宝“漂白”。
恶法亦法”、恶法非法，是法律上的两种见解，至今无定论。
该地块出让面积八千零五十八平，容积率二点五。
伊藤穰一十分看好莫林对移动市场的判断。
努尔称，大楼内储存有巴沙尔政府使用的武器。
吕彦直一八九四年七月二十八日出生于天津。
一听这话，李富妞顿时慌了神，赶紧往回跑。
培养别人的依靠和懒惰，可不是我们的责任。
一口老血刚到嗓子眼儿，当妈的迅速补了一刀。
你不理我的时候，我感觉自己都被雨浇透了。
网友为它打造了十多款造型，各个栩栩如生。
于是，他们向乡政府提出，想义务赡养乡里的一些孤寡老人。
他找来两根横幅拧起后对接，打算作为绳子挂到窗外爬下去。
我才不要学坏呢！
可你们这些明明知道实情的人怎可如此狠心。
相信你也如此，有些事有些人就是眨眼间转为怀念。
现在，伏地魔这个大麻烦解决了，我也熬成了“剩男”。
降雪给当地居民出行和农牧业生产造成一定影响。
而人民日报则表示，房地产利润来得太容易。
钱称告诉宋辉：别问了，当年他肯定是老大。
接收捐物价值两千二百四十五点六六八五万元。
汪风雄就是这样忘我地工作着，直至累倒在工作岗位上。
他们说，捐赠者大多为女性。
有什么证据能够证明李万均有非法占有的目的呢？
这是一个同样倔强的“秋菊”。
因此，你要想学会一样东西，寻一位良师是最好的办法。
此前，他因徒手攀爬上陡峰、城墙、巨型烟囱等照片，在网上走红。
你知道鬼屋在哪里吧？
现在的新加坡内阁资政李光耀，就是李显龙的父亲，宴请温总理。
他说，前期没收到薏仁，是因为天气原因，吹大风把杆杆吹倒了。
九三三路公交车也恢复了正常营运。
是不是真爱呀？要对人家负责任哟。
选举过程也引爆激烈的訾议、争质。
业主王宁波，是郴化集团党委书记。
这不是明显地不遵守外交协议吗？
给团队拧紧发条，是乔布斯赋予自己的责任。
他喜欢上网，热爱一切新生事物，和蔼风趣。
不仅如此，外资银行对并购的“胃口”也很大。
阿里的孩子，不知道北京，只能听懂少许汉语。
他的邻居在战场上被打瞎了一只眼睛。
不少开电动车的市民由于雨下得太大，只能在桥下躲雨。
但按这个说法，张雨绮立刻从“被甩方”变成了“劈腿方”。
只有绿营团结不要被分化，才有实力救扁，扁也才能放得出来。
这样危言耸听、牵强附会的观点发表在贵报上实在令人遗憾。
曹凛透露，大量陵墓早在考古之前就在历代被局部破坏。
博德曼试图将其赶走但却不幸被山羊的犄角刺伤腿部。
魏明伦指出其中的平仄错乱。
而江玉荣，又恢复了在床边呆坐的神情。
警方介入追查后，公司老板哄骗一个拾荒男顶包。
随后，陈得荣目送妻子被儿子抬进装水泥的手扶“斗斗车”送走。
刘志敏希望娟妹一如生前，能得到内心的平静。
林雨翔的笑嘎然止住，可见这一口咬的大。
近两年来，臭氧层遭破坏的消息不绝于耳。
据悉，领馆面朝一条较窄的马路，夜间很少有行人经过。
二人心中大凛，急忙哀求放过他们。
人家长得好得多，个头比俺儿还高。
由于身上的背篓太重，正停脚歇息。
我妈妈有糖尿病，常常躲起来吃糖。
两只黄鹂鸣翠柳，你还没有女朋友。
这是深深扎根于生命根底的力量。
亲子鉴定后，这个男子彻底蔫了。
燃气抢修工人也在对破损点进行勘查和修复。
张高平出于好心将其继续捎带至艮秋立交桥。
除了为人有些木讷外，赵某给旁人的最大感觉就是特别简朴。
两个看货的客人中，一个是右脸刮伤，一个是左脚大腿蹭破了。
抓落实的过程，也是一个积小胜为大胜、积跬步致千里的过程。
一路上水流湍急、险滩众多。
其实，俄罗斯与越南关系匪浅。
如今卷土重来，令业界瞩目。
现场，锣鼓喧天，人头攒动。
不会出现政策“翻烧饼”现象。
王女士，皮肤白皙，身材窈窕。
后来他们咬牙切齿地说能干。
于特岛就在那儿，在她的对面。
选举采用无记名投票的方式。
肇事业主装莽，被群众发现。
到底有多少血我们也没有看到。
他还伸手去掐女人的脖子。
用电卡口也加剧了电力紧张。
手机差点就被他们没收喽。
下面连线中央台记者柴安东。
新发地市场里在过秤芹菜。
故事里的农夫机智勇敢，狮子则是愚笨的。
有几棵的位置稍微靠里，需要跨进栏杆，走几步才能够到。
他满脸皱纹，眉毛花白，胸前挂着身份证。
这张“扯耳朵”的照片从发出到昨天中午为止，转载已上千。
鼓励发展商业保理机构，稳妥发展民营第三方支付机构。
如今，张帅可已成功转型为河南省散打队的助理教练。
他已经要求土耳其官方加强对美国外交使团的安全保护。
所以，每次有人访问我，问我用了那么多女演员，最喜欢的是谁？
新的拆迁补偿方式、标准与原“条例”规定的补偿方式、标准有什么区别？
工作人员正蹚着水，在桥面上架设铁架、铺设木板，以增加桥高。
谈及自身的音乐定位，他们直言，“要做男人、爷们儿的音乐”。
但恐怖无法驱散内外的热气，之恒不禁抱怨：今天热成这样，怎么睡呢！
用什么话来赞美这张图，都是苍白的。
牛祝琴说，老薛从此落下了病根，以后无论去哪，身上都带着药。
阿兰爽快地答应了。
各收费站进京方向停止收费，取消三匝收费站。
我猜中了这开头，却猜不中这结局。
近日，男子一审被判处缓刑。
发现房里多了个人，仲某迅速拿走床边的两只拎包夺门而逃。
在属于阿联酋队的桌上，还散乱放着矿泉水、饼干和盒饭。
一般认为，确定耶路撒冷的地位是解决巴以冲突的核心问题。
由于体内的病毒无法排除，导致高发宝全身浮肿、瘙痒难耐。
我陪你一起听听音乐，然后一起忘记所有难受，忘记全世界。
但是一批评完，马上就拉着儿子一起玩游戏，哄哄孩子。
但在部分家长看来，与其蛮横干涉，不如理性引导。
面对记者们的一致好评，陈斌波笑意盎然。
联合参谋本部为议员放映了成功施射的视频。
刘先生用力拍打和脚踹车门，车门纹丝不动。
因为付不起棺材费，厂家已不再给法医室送货。
为了筹钱再过“赌博瘾”，他俩沆瀣一气，干起了骗租汽车的勾当。
水汽凝结成的细小水珠就是露水哦！
国家农业部发现“皮革奶粉”死灰复燃。
酒井法子的继母直子也接受了采访。
谈到好友霆锋与柏芝有可能离婚收场。
令王小苍奇怪的是，这些鱼在空中翻腾几下后，便立即死亡。
所幸林雨翔敲诈的是诗词而不是钱。
家，是残砖和柴火垒起来的院墙，塑料布搭建起来的厨房。
肖聪斜倚在病床上，对记者的提出的问题麻木地眨着眼睛。
看到儿子乖巧可爱，张美不顾离婚协议约定，擅自将儿子带走。
勘查现场的民警赶到后，夏波手里还攥着几绺头发。
因此，还得注意防御雷电和雷雨大风等强对流天气。
春节的错位将大幅扰动今年一、二月同比数据。
而橡树则宽大而坚硬，无论多大的风都是不能使之弯曲的。
应采儿穿着婚纱配球鞋，陈小春的服装也不是很“正式”。
楼房之间的大片草坪，洒满金光闪闪的蒲公英花朵。
曾经有个女孩儿问我：你是帅哥吗？
小兰接过饮料，咧着嘴巴笑了。
每次到美国都要去拉斯维加斯的赌场。
张燕生称，不能因为该法案道义上的荒谬而低估其现实影响。
是老婆大人，我把检讨书修改了五遍她才满意。
第十届市纪律检查委员会全体委员列席了会议。
目前已引起山西省内外招商部门的竞相争逐。
罗天诚秘密被挖掉了，叫：你们不可以跟踪我的！
最特别的是，即将过生日的黄妈妈也幸运入选。
爆料成为名嘴们继续收拢观众收视率的王牌。
酒楼的招牌菜，依然是他最拿手的“客家三杯鸭”。
刘悦伦告诉记者，佛山还努力推进河涌的整治。
易胜怀的修路工具很简单，钻子、锄头、锹锄和簸箕。
机器人我会一直陪着你的。
魏敏生教授为记者举了个例。
我没说炖鸡，我是说动机。
前方也是明亮而温柔的光。
所以，最大的学问是谦逊。
帅气，不可能炫耀一辈子。
经诊断，男子患脑血栓。
原来你也在玩这个呀，哈哈。
公映版本更适合年轻人。
万达冀维持恒力上市地位。
过年的气氛依然很热闹。
遭受煎熬的人们深深盼望这种酷暑能有个尽头。
这些项目的参与者被称作“可信合作伙伴”，范围远超“棱镜”计划。
一边和记者聊家常，夫妻俩手里的活一刻没停。
方怡把这封德高望重的信轻夹在书里。
上述言论得到柴偲以及易某某的证实。
孩子们和“三峡工程建设者”卡通娃娃合影。
据悉，婚礼还请来骆驼、大象与马“助兴”。
另一名狱警徐某则被抢走警服，并被捆绑。
除了带了家里所剩不多的钱，苏春山还随身揣了一把剪刀。
未经漂白的口蘑。
一个似乎从来没想过的问题，一个浅显而千真万确的命题。
太阳那么大，我能把他生下来吗我！
喇叭里传来马光行宏亮的命令。
这个问题他和宋世平无一能回答。
走了一会儿，四人到夜不眠快餐店。
不听话的话感冒了别向我哭诉。
沉重的大门，在后面缓缓关上。
本想找一份工作，不曾想工作没有着落，盘缠却很快花光了。
车厢内有女乘客恼火地拍打车门，并不断抱怨着。
学生家长找到秦某后，因情绪激动与其发生撕扯。
北京奥组委还特批我们在这里办了自己的餐厅。
刚开始时，小丽只是偶尔上网。
依法妥善审理涉及民生等案件。
恰巧当时有警车经过，该男子迅速调转方向离开。
购买了贵厂的药品两盒，回去一吃，大约一个疗程，果然有效。
每次经过到涧桥山售楼处的时候，都能感觉到沁心宜人。
习仲勋性格里有绵软、宽厚的一面，但并不缺少执着、硬朗。
如果有威胁来自于前方以及另一侧方，则可以考虑双手抱肘。
这次，百宏集团老板嫁女儿，再次刷新了“天价嫁妆”纪录。
他们透露将在八月举行音乐会，获不少好友自荐帮手。
很多人都说宋小宝是“丑小鸭”变成了“白天鹅”。
基本完工的机场场区，已看不到溶洞、溶沟。
反正当一天和尚敲一天钟喽，我也在渐渐适应。
别看我只有十七岁，料很足的。
胡亮和王卓良是王振的邻居，在蔡甸新农中学读书，平时常在一起玩。
齐国栋大吃一惊，像失了水分的茄子，耷拉着脑袋告辞了工程师。
小贺的父母是普通农民，老实木讷，整日忙碌操劳。
而照片中的尹恩惠更如同专业模特儿一样，让人回味无穷。
暴雨肆虐，导致洪水猛涨。
逃不了，那只能稳住绑匪。
由于憨态可掬并数量稀少，江豚也被誉为“水中大熊猫”。
近日，永嘉检察院以敲诈勒索罪、放火罪，起诉董某。
对此，不少网民提出了疑问。
我这么关心你你还说我烦。
爹爹随身带着唢呐和笙。
裸露的皮肤涂抹驱避剂。
他学东西并不快，而他想提拔的人往往都是些笨蛋。
过春节怎么能不回家呢？
之后，推销员不再骚扰他。
然而，风水轮流转，今年更多文科生栽在了高考中。
上述三人为组织、领导者。
零售行业的拐点已经临近。
罗天诚，你的字很漂亮诶。
酒井法子涉毒时很憔悴。
他挽留不住，只好跟上去。
他照梁样君说的誊写一遍。
我脾气超级好，不会急的。
现摘录整理，以警示后人。
三是畅通流动选拔渠道。
其实陈山聪一向钟情大包包，更成了他的招牌标志。
还有没有疏散的这些旅客，他们安置状况究竟怎么样？
加速这一犯罪团伙灭亡的，竟是一个小小的网帖。
就很谄媚的伸出两只手指头，冲考官一笑：曳！
甘慧萍也不晓得到底咋回事儿，两口子拌了几句嘴后回了家。
讲究内外合一、形神兼备、节奏鲜明的民族风格。
随后，记者又联系上五五四路公交有关负责人。
总觉得相机广告中的模特儿特别漂亮帅气。
儿子的惨死，令年轻的父亲袁某某十分悲痛。
圣依日前现身上海，身形苗条的她以手遮肚。
也就是说，“挟尸要价”的实际时间超过半小时。
早前陈嘉桓于香港报警，问到当时究竟告谁？
男友说：“宿舍里一哥们吃核桃遇到一个硬的！
目前，各地一次性工亡补助金标准不尽相同。
摄影师没有手，就像赛跑者没有脚，令人气馁。
后来，小毛一直没把签好的合同拿给王先生。
在供远小于需的局面下，找保姆难成了常态。
然而，擦干眼泪，她又不得不乖乖地服从严厉的爸爸。
悬挂着条幅的大楼三，被媒体称为楼垮垮。
随后男子竟在众目睽睽之下吮吸鸵鸟血液。
对此她笑纳，“贫点好，不长虫儿”。
林父说，悲剧发生后，曾不止一次梦见田永涛拎着酒来看自己。
不过最怕青蛙的余文乐却不小心真正舔到了，让他大喊崩溃。
他的岁数比王勃成天才时少了一倍，自然写不出儿歌。
他们的收入普遍不高，扣除就业成本，就相差无几了。
那里有雪野大地，那里有战友的生死相牵。
八年了，每次都有钱，可为何从来没有一次超过五毛钱。
不了解我们的人，只有满脑袋浪漫的想象。
桥下彻同样在混淆是非，可见日本右翼坚持恶行，不肯悔改。
经公安部门调查，肇事者为南刘庄村民刘大孬。
一、“第一夫人”是从美国兴起的。
这类传统企业会越来越多。
徐天是个利落人。
铁力瓦尔地、吐逊。
是因为我还是单身所以会有这么多谣言吧。
为什么要傲娇？
海上问题可能在五至七年内达到顶点。
别呃，想想办法吧。
小孩考试没考好，被他妈妈揍了一顿。
等我白天照一下吧。
加上腿脚不灵便，他便往后倒了下去。
只偶尔打个电话。
好开心的一天喔！
先拿出你的诚意来。
天气预报说（二十二度）。
这么着急喊我干嘛？
张女士“嗯”了一声。
两人的脸谱网首页。
这实际上是法条冲突以谁为准的问题。
这个真的难倒我啦。
林的舅舅也赶来。
需要大约（两小时）。
一定是在欣赏我啦！
我想我也不会了。
周永康向努尔别尔。
应该是叫舅姥爷吧。
空气质量优。
那就要拭目以待喽。
解放军就去救俺们。
偶尔会有一点无聊啦。
笑而不语是一种态度。
昨日月饼大幅降价。
你别夸我，我知道你一夸我就要吃大亏了。
赌场内的专业装备。
蔡赟对此羡慕不已。
偶在和你聊天啊。
咱们也得体谅国家。
楼市正在酝酿“拐点”。
都是“谣言”惹的祸。
黄瓜炒鸡蛋。
我就是肖烨的傀儡。
说曹操我就出现了。
李某女是讲解员。
扬子晚报记者以自己的情况测试了一番。
我爱你胜过爱自己。
我的心只属于你哦。
有时候胡子不刮。
传媒大亨默多克。
我一直会年轻哟。
这是我的一些谬见。
蔡美儿也在思考着。
发展改革委指出。
梅耶尔就做到了。
希望我几点叫你呢？
谁都有可能爱你。
我的系统安装不上，快点指点指点我吧。
她立即晕倒在地。
通用汽车排在第三，为九点二四六亿美元。
存港币也不可以么？
王海剑免予赔偿。
这方面，瓮安也有教训。
何时才能有雨啊？
父子俩扭打在一起。
想听听您的观点。
她实在难相处。
经常使用电热毯者，还应适量增加饮水。
我不会跳广场舞呢。
此时无声胜有声。
拍完再算，哈哈哈！
不能够因噎废食。
哇，古文耶——说着伸出手说，你好，久仰了。
我刚学了糖醋排骨！
戴手套的一位师傅，高扬着手，仰头指挥。
到南北朝时，馄饨“形如偃月，天下通食”。
河北省唐山市人。
我要上班啊大姐。
等你的长发及腰吗？
幸好没酿成惨剧。
不知道要学着知道。
可能性又有多大呢？
我每天按时起床。
田园蔬菜粥不错呀。
四是窝案串案多。
我猜不到耶…
付出总有回报的。
收多少也是一门学问。
推荐你去威尼斯。
覆巢之下难有完卵。
我准备冲网吧了。
维公之力，博望寔同。
推荐她去欧洲城。
忙着等待你调遣呀。
他人软得想跪下去，喉咙奇于，应付说：我是，什……什么事？
在椁板的两边，有一些凹槽，用以卡住几块椁板，以便于连接。
昨日，星沙水渡河橡胶坝，水坝下面波涛滚滚。
得知情况后，汪先生端起一盆水，冲进老人家中。
天色都暗了，黑幕里探头出现一颗早熟的星星，映得这夜特别凄凉。
其实，“方丈”与“释果因”都是祖某。
案犯被她的凛然正气震住了，扔下改锥跪在地上直磕头。
罗志祥头戴圣诞帽，身旁年轻美眉打扮惹火。
就因为最后这一刀，葛伟再也没醒过来。
所以，姜宗福的渺小，需要庄重对待。
就在一堆淤泥里，几个人挖出来了一个锈迹斑斑的“铁疙瘩”。
火苗从起火的民房内窜出。
同时，当天出席宴会的嘉宾也是星光灿烂、大腕云集。
但齐女士不知悔改，依然与那男子来往。
恭喜你爱上了一个永远不会离开的人。
我怎么会没有脾气呢。
市交港局的摊位人头攒动。
然而，谎言像泡沫，一个一个被戳破。
景岗山的“帮派”正是巨星云集、大名鼎鼎的“六一班”。
我给房子做了评估。
靠磅秤称重的说法是错误的。
他也能从作案人的体态上确定是“二笨”和“小五”所为。
不是你修来的福，而是我不知道哪辈子造的孽啊。
有人说这是瞎折腾，脑瘫儿咋培养都不会成气候。
我现在还正在努力提升英文水平。
经突审，犯罪嫌疑人刘迎儿交代了犯罪事实和主要犯罪动机。
我跟朋友开玩笑说，我用我的嫁妆钱去做了这件事情。
温家宝俯下身来，仔细端详熟睡的小伊伊。
何必要搞这种费力不讨好的规章教育呢？
今天早晨到上午，华北南部局部地区有雾。
去年的世界杯冠军意大利队，也已从前一段时间的低潮中恢复过来。
非要去的话我可以帮你查查有没卡能打折、能不能团购。
大多数人陆续散开来，吴某却领着一小撮人继续起哄。
猫的爪子正扒着箱子。
三要清正廉洁，不让“白袍点墨”。
拉毛措接受了大喇嘛的劝导。
以前被老汉儿否定得太多，现在任何事情都得我自己来决定。
显然，赴港产子虽花费甚巨，但仍然是低投入高产出的事。
不过中金公司认为，通胀见顶可能在一季度。
在徐炯炜看来，商业模式决定了华谊和光线不同的融资特点。
树干上沾了秽物的衣服，惹得几条狗跑过去舔。
听一些校园民谣，比如老狼的“月光倾城”、“美人”
不过我们都经过了培训，相信可以轻松应对。
据了解，该处的泵站归于洪区交通局管理。
她需要去做一系列的美容和外科整形手术？
此外，“最牛”违建在拆除过程中也曾多次出现过阻挠行为。
不过如果台里需要我往这方面发展的话，我也豁得出去。
为此，他特地研究了一嗨的租车合同。
杭城的气温，昨日一下子蹿升。
解决种棉效益低最主要是提高棉花质量。
仔仔在电影中蓄胡，衣着邋遢，但帅气依旧。
父母嘴里嘟囔着，似乎还想争辩着什么。
主要是看日本愿不愿使日元过高的值降下来？
在阳光和云彩的相互作用下，湖水折射出不同层次的蓝色。
学生说：被牛吃掉了。
于是把小蟒蛇带回家。
感觉像是以身相许了。
当然不会有你聪明了。
这对憨态可掬的石狮子现暂存在汤山派出所“站岗”。
因为没有洒水，扬起的灰尘让早起上班的居民们掩鼻而行。
老人们用方言一起朗读，字句之间，韵脚分明，朗朗上口。
家住附近的小饶，很多年前就频频前往摩崖石刻赏景。
好吧，我会发一封高优先级的电子邮件给你。
两位老人患有脑梗，腿脚也不灵便，但还要辛苦的捡瓶子。
说这番话时，朱镕基刚从上海赴北京任国务院副总理。
算了，你说怎样就怎样吧，我无所谓了。
习近平赴河北阜平骆驼湾村考察。
同时，用各种办法鼓励老用户登记。
与此同时，聂树斌案也一直“正在调查”。
又该适应哪种市场的要求呢？
法规上没有规定交警能罚飞行员。
孩子的爹瞅都没瞅他一眼，悠悠的来了一句：“先把你妈换了吧！
臭小子，谁让你改姓的？
你可是我最信任的中国好闺蜜哦。
少年准备下水捞球，可是刚一下水，就倒在水中。
其实董某一直想偷辆好车撑门面，找女朋友。
风化的粉煤灰，时常黄雾腾腾，成为八矿地区的主要污染源。
好政策不该变成唐僧肉。
伙计：“对不起，您要的是补药，我错给您了毒药。
齐顺通所开的歌厅，恰巧也在三分厂院内。
二人晚上在榆树市装上货，简单休息了会儿就开始往回赶。
齐亚丽的养父在外地打工，养母在家操持家务。
然后…我得去吃感冒药了。
但他的话音未落，火浪眨眼间就吞掉了整个山坡。
短线欧元料仍将处于弱势，下方支撑一点二八六零。
至此，叶噶一案的所有犯罪嫌疑人全部被抓获归案。
让这个海参吧，加工出来以后刚刚硬，掰不动都。
可饿了两三天后，她又会暴食一番，然后再去呕吐。
这些赌博机都做过了手脚，玩赌博机的人必输无疑，没有赢的。
主人喜爱我悦耳的声音，而讨厌你的叫声。
事后，林某再次支付潘某报酬一万元。
对于网帖中“游行”一说，袁泽泓表示否认。
因此，不能将这笔账算在李劭头上。
提醒银行，可别捡了芝麻丢了西瓜。
四周已被消防员洒满了白色灭火剂。
最后，张金中在漆黑的夜色下涮洗。
不过，兴建雷达的高昂费用也引发争议。
爱是四月天里的云烟，是细雨洒在花前。
那一年是母亲偷偷把自己棉袄上的棉花，添在了他的棉袄里。
利用职权进行双规和挂牌保护，是曾锦春独创的敛财术。
风险也是浪漫的一部分吗？
他觉得这样干下去没意思。
网站管理员的权限更大，可对评论进行有效管理。
话未落音，会场里响起了掌声。
抽掉了应有的文化内涵，节日就会空洞无物，失去魅力。
白天做批萨，晚上唱歌。
她那脸洗了后真叫亮。
搞不好是迎面而来的人？
高销量导致房价猛涨。
少小离家老大回，安能辨我是雌雄。
皖北的隆冬，寒风呼啸。
一名伤员转往第一中心医院。
昨日，两位社区巡逻员守在店门口。
我当然是没有奶可喂儿子的，于是儿子每天吃糕干粉和米面的浆糊。
而她手上的皮肤格外干燥、毛糙，与她清纯的脸庞丝毫不匹配。
此外，卡德罗夫禁止杂志刊登关于其生日的内容。
考古人员分析，这些麦秆是用来充当铺盖墓葬的填充物的。
两人吵吵嚷嚷到白下区人民矛盾调解中心评理。
这一年，陈兴銮被选拔为东营区科技副区长。
这使“满洲国”傀儡皇帝溥仪预感到末日即将来临。
试用者选择了咖啡混合巧克力豆的口味，味道好极了！
这个网吧位于凯里市清平南路一个桥洞之下。
对三零幺医院的医护人员表示由衷的谢意。
我反正认为一定有不少分红，同意了。
八十三船领航，其后依次为八十四、六十六、七十一船。
最后，他的目光停留在那几个大字上：南无阿弥陀佛。
不一会儿，程女士开始打瞌睡来。
老汉儿瞪我一眼，我一头雾水，其实我一点都不认识那个人。
目前，大田派出所所长蒋开拓已被停职，接受检查。
梁样君失望地给手里的信估计身价，打算改天卖掉。
仿佛以前谁说的话就在脑海中，但偏偏又想不起来。
要赔偿，应该去找顶替的人。
男子一直跟在吕姑娘后面。
把握好裸度，必须不懈追求裸的艺术。
但池先生并未打消赴川的想法。
知错就改，改了再犯，沃尔玛又一次“呛”到了重庆公众。
齐秉颐一脸的憔悴，颓然靠在沙发上。
他嘴里大喊大嚷，也是不想跟卯先生走。
李同学和余姓同学均为本市某中学初一学生。
就是我的偶像呀，我很崇拜主人的高智商和高颜值。
第二天早晨，飞机从坎大哈飞回喀布尔。
这个“零窗口”又是如何选择的？
我们将焚烧他们脚下的土地。
这愿景大概支撑起他的自信。
这主要是由于强劲的游戏业务营收。
那首叫“青春无悔”的是谁唱的？
别做傻事，你给大家回个话。
梁碎君吓得全身一震，喝：谁！
这是中国国家元首首次访美。
记者走进一家汽车改装作坊。
他们的行为简直是令人发指。
王子义传承了巍子的倔强性格。
上述演练步骤共进行了两次。
但是，这个简单的愿望破灭了。
该会不提倡市民捐赠旧衣服。
关键在于维护稳定和推进合作。
可送房间、蛋糕、香槟、娃娃等。
成功是一种了不起的除臭剂。
老妈，我想说：“弹尽粮绝，没衣服过冬，这是要冷死的节奏啊！
李剑恨屋及乌，也对那女孩看不顺眼，恨不得她的舌头断掉。
咬文嚼字”杂志社表示，上海是一个有着深厚文化传统的城市。
据了解，被猥亵的小学生是看疃小学一年级的女生小雪。
信一来一去的几个星期里，小菲表哥已经和晓受没了关系。
一则可以照顾无儿无女的老人，二则可增加收入。
专委会的设立有没有让百姓实实在在地受益？
不小心弄坏老爸的按摩椅，老爸对我说：你若安好，便是晴天。
他突然扯掉我的耳机大声说；我要拉屎，憋不住了，喊你半天了。
该雕塑表现的是对生命和生活的崇敬与热爱。
昨天的联欢会都是才子佳人，让初出茅庐的我自惭形秽。
李博说，其实最初自己之所以攒下压岁钱还得感谢奶奶。
想知道什么？本女王都能告诉你！
徐悲鸿写给李宗仁的信札。
谁去拯救被埋在瓦砾废墟中的骨肉同胞？
而后边相撞的红色的士，由于司机猛打方向盘，也侧翻在路边。
房东说，张红飞半月前回来后，“头破了，腿也瘸了”，没再出门。
做了一夜梦，身边人都变成了僵尸，一早上发消息给男友求安慰。
刚一出门，就被民警按倒在地，整个过程中，柳晓宝并未反抗。
中国是禁止涉外婚介的，不信你可以上网查查。
青海旅游今夏以来的“井喷”势有望继续一定时日。
这样，乙方在不知不觉中沦为甲方的瓮中之鳖。
吴不服，称自己超车前已鸣喇叭，而且并无碰撞。
之后，他考取导游证，成为拱北口岸中旅的导游。
去年，我们光获各种奖的图书就达二百多种。
哪知我一张又一张地拍，他还摆弄得越发起劲了。
大约在两星期前，磊磊就开始喊肚子疼了。
俄驻叙利亚大使馆随即称，该消息“与事实不符”。
记者看了两位医生的签名，揣摩半天也认不准。
灾难无情，大爱有心，再大的困难也会变得渺小。
虽然是女人，何巧女却很少有时间睡美容觉。
满满一大抽屉，至少几十种不同包装的壮阳药。
很多人问我们干啥的，起初真是不好意思撒谎。
系统发送短信的统一代码为“八八八幺二三七幺”。
他先向我丢过一个飞吻来，如果不把它丢回去，难道您还让我留着它不成？
向来身体甚好的诸葛紫岐，脸颊明显胀了不少。
而模特儿出身的熊黛林拼搏精神可嘉，更发生疑似走光事件。
如果我不买，他就会打电话骚扰我，直到我扛不住为止。
在保险局任职期间，她拒绝接受来自保险公司的政治捐款。
宝丰县有许多制售这类假膏药和佛品的商店，售价极为低廉。
如此这般反复数次，在白姓“黑嘴”操弄下，余某等人获利匪浅。
志刚的社长位置其实名存实亡。
牛肉面馆一男子吼到：我二十块钱一碗的牛肉面，怎么才一块牛肉？
清晨的玉树灾区，寒风依然凛冽。
可李小姐实现省钱的愿望有点难。
快点，别耽搁了，政策这么好，还有啥磨蹭的。
之后有报道称，这篇博文纯属捏造，并没有下文。
女孩的心思你别猜，但是我不用猜。
一赌徒看见别人家门口贴倒的春字和福字，问别人意思说：“是福到春到的意思？
对于此番巡视，笔者比较看好，理由有三。
不愿意别人打扰我和我家人的生活。
据此，判决王先生限期将墙面和栅栏恢复原状。
十几年受贿生涯种下的恶因，终酿成今天的苦果。
在穿越过程中，驴友在一处竹林深处拍到了大熊猫粪便。
习惯难受，习惯思念，习惯等你，可是却一直没有习惯看不到你。
韩国保宁泥浆节开幕，众多游客在泥浆中玩耍。
那再问问你们爷爷的爷爷是不是农民？
非常紧张，走路每一步都有点儿别扭。
明晃晃的太阳持续煎烤着红土地。
后来，钱学敏去看他，钱老还拿出剪报给妹妹看。
市委书记薄熙来，市领导张轩、范照兵参加了会议。
他一边耸肩一边跳舞，像是拳击选手一样把两个手放到面前。
大蟒蛇在树上表现出各种姿态。
我还不会跳舞，聊天我是专业选手呀。
平整的白色假牙间，还点缀着数颗金黄色的假牙。
只是会在项目筛选上更加谨慎。
平时，夫妻俩就靠卖糖葫芦为生。
他就是济源市沁园街道的李红道。
谭先生穿着打扮都相当女性化。
拉姑送房子给女儿谢婷婷当嫁妆。
陈富乐介绍，公墓有两道铁丝网，最里面是一圈铁栅栏。
在确知自己被骗后，数日间阿炳的头发、眉毛全白了。
谁咋说咋说，发展中医肯定有不同的声音。
是否采纳要看村民的意愿。
部分城市房价涨幅收窄。
石家庄公路主枢纽南焦客运站人流熙熙攘攘。
那女生一见尹志平，顿时马屁横溢：啊，你就是尹志平吧！
贝多芬楼就留了下来，成为学生学业负担下的发泄物。
目前，保钓船是否有能力回航，还是个未知数。
其实很好剪，牛腩比这个难剪多了。
常出门活动，大爷的心情也越来越开朗。
农用三轮车上，漂白后的豆芽个头饱满，七八厘米长，通体亮白。
书架上信手拈来的是“孙子兵法”、“宋词选”、辞典。
昨天，欧洲股市中盘普遍走高，一扫亚太股市普跌的阴霾。
很久很久以前，老鼠们因深受猫的侵袭，感到十分苦恼。
据了解，新型电子表与传统机械表相比，自身耗电量低。
倘若一个人出名正出得半红不紫，那他是断不会淡泊的。
究竟是何原因使得索马里成为海盗的天堂？
黄小姐带的“奶米粉”。
老婆深情的靠在老公身上说：“我想要温暖。
两个人的头拼在一起，恨不得嵌进对方。
在这样的背景下，包容性增长几成奢望。
如果阿城做倒垃圾的话，也会比我有型啦。
目前，中国的乳品行业正面临一场洗牌。
周俊没有工作，每天四处玩玩，打打麻将。
年幼的小孩扶着铁栅栏玩耍，身着破烂。
我们这儿给傻子重新起名，随我丈夫的姓。
可得逞之后，他仍不满足，仍要求加钱。
早上要储存好一天的能量呢，所以来点豆浆和油条不错。
我有一个高三党的奇葩朋友，平时二到家的那种！
但在爱尔兰半天的访问行程之中，安保车队却出现一件“糗事”。
木制院墙如今实不多见，木栅栏门旁挂着滔天会的木牌。
李革祥驾车撞断了收费站栏杆后逃逸。
过一会他回来了，我问他效果如何，他皱皱眉摇头道：感觉没啥用啊。
你怎么得罪她了，快去给她赔赔不是吧？
本报记者已将上述信息反馈国家海事局。
这个电影就是要探寻他的内心世界离我们很远的地方在哪？
所以越是临时张罗的国际会议，越会在财政上出现倒逼现象。
在正式的教学方面，马德保终于步入正轨，开始循规蹈矩。
我舍不得主人哟。
分众传媒第二季度业绩超过市场预期。
作为大姐的“老那”，讲究的是一股“大姐范儿”和“猛劲儿”。
玻璃碎片卡在女子食管内，面临大出血危险。
这时候的表姐，已经嫁给了丧偶的老板高成。
其间多次跳槽，也都是在各类服务中心打转。
他对美的认识处在萌芽阶段，不比马德保的精深。
当日晚间，飓风“桑迪”登陆纽约，纽约曼哈顿部分地区变成泽国。
我内疚哇，想用最诚挚的道歉来乞求谅解。
他性格爽朗，有问必答。
茆华瑞从未想过，爸爸的笑容有一天会消失。
他就对着我呵呵笑。
陈正强逃跑时拎着一把椅子。
整个城市应该说凤凰涅盘。
武强的小女友铁定了心要和他好好过日子。
要巩固完善基层综合改革。
斯塔尔没有透露具体国名。
只要大家肯讲，他就肯听。
都说瘦死的骆驼比马大。
我得不到的，我宁愿毁了它！
形象地说，就是“寅吃卯粮”。
就在这时，孩子的奶奶突然甩手打了党娟一耳光。
抢得钱后，两人就去饭店、网吧等场所挥霍潇洒。
如果写手不按培训要领来写，很可能被自然淘汰。
当天下午，辽宁男乒与浙江海宁的比赛率先开始。
他们外出工作，两岁大的女儿含含由爷爷奶奶带着。
战士们围着几本破旧的杂志争相阅读。
据悉，以地方标准形式来规范门牌楼牌，在全国还是首次。
不仅仅是德意志银行。
赵忠祥的团队拿着倪萍的“姥姥语录”，排队请她签名。
郭某称，以前经他介绍捐卵的还有俄罗斯模特。
滚，你有见过苦瓜是甜的嘛！
恩恩，你怎么知道我喜欢养鱼的？
全部淘汰落后电解铝产能。
吹牛可不太好呀。
手术后脚趾的伤怎么样了？
我无意间眼睛一瞟，看到门口有半个脑壳，长头发吊起的。
咨询电话为六二零五九幺幺七。
车内坐着一高一矮两名男子。
购物单中，要帮表姐带米粉。
一眼看到了，就心里暖暖的。
但他拗不过治安队员的检查。
有时在商圈请个棒棒都难。
随后，李爹爹的二儿子赶来。
此次审计的基本情况怎样？
我们无意打扰你平静的生活。
彼得冷冷道：谁看你了，我自己也有，连密码都没改过。
外立面黄色，用橙红色点缀。
我们又要改造环境，又要保证民生不减少，那钱怎么来啊？
地域边远的青海高原也不例外。
据悉，大火造成的直接财产损失为三万零五百七十元。
这张卡董小姐没用过几次。
同时，宋还涉嫌买卖人口。
董家人认为诊所难逃干系。
于是，便酿造了这一出惨剧。
吞下排球已被隔离的海豚。
老人拉起孙女的手，冰冷。
老邓满面红光，笑声爽朗。
麦克拉伦发表了主题演讲。
平时，喷泉并不经常喷水。
请车辆绕行西禹高速公路。
再一个是，嘎查干部要清白。
老卡对住宿环境要求很高。
唐先生下班回家没东西吃，干脆也会去父母家“蹭饭”。
霍震霆父子一早到场打点。
回万岁，包拯不就在这儿吗？八贤王指着不知所措的包拯道。
而在许多案例中，这些银行都像普通散户一样赔得惨不忍睹。
此次大风耐力超强，经过一夜呼啸后，还将在京折腾一整天。
一开始，正等待引流的熊似乎躁动不安，在熊舍里来回踱步。
孟京接过报纸看，如逢友人—这里面的文章都是闫楠的风格。
当时给我儿子看病的那个大夫就说，他都不敢出门诊了！
大修之后，专家认为，伤痕累累的三桥已不再适宜通行货车。
二手房中介严重亏损，深圳楼市在这轮下滑中处于怎样的状态？
而易趣网就为一百多万人提供了这样一个机会。
女子抗争，歹徒一时未能得逞。
看来吃他家的要自带喵星人。
接下来我们听听专家怎么说。
指的是还没找好下家儿就辞职，不考虑后路。
我还没有急过呢，你可以试试哟。
施瓦辛格曾夸赞妻子是那么聪明，是他心目中的理想女性。
葛警长赶紧将事先准备好的裤衩给其穿好，询问男子情况。
今后，故宫还将通过展览等方式，让部分深宫文物与游客见面。
没有用户是愿意阻挡这些正常内容的。
一场大规模的救赎运动拉开了序幕。
当大黑熊出现时，你竟丢下我跑啦！
一心追求高收益的思路是否正确呢？
他一下子躺倒在地，阵地随后失陷。
小林不服上诉，成都中院发回重审。
作为小舅子的我去劝架，果然有用！
在一些专家看来，这样的跛足开发，正是康菲骄横霸道的底气。
其早年丧父，母亲一人辛苦将他拉扯大，没想到竟英年早逝。
在现场有一个西瓜长得开裂了，轻轻打开发现，该瓜皮薄瓤红。
她挺懂事的，就听话去上学了。
莫尼勒生得潇洒英俊，成了那些妃子猎取的对象。
从早期的观冰赏雪，到现在逐步的拓展开来。
手术中，切开病人的臀部，进行血肿清除和神经减压，清除了全部淤血。
第三就是将库存大蒜层层次转包或囤积居奇。
你睡不着的时候可以来找我哦！我随叫随到。
刘欢说，丈夫前两天在出租房里晕倒。
十年前，李新坤的眼睛看不见东西了。
这是央行今年第二次下调存款准备金率。
连战夫人连方瑀则是早已吓到两眼发直。
多年来，警察们坐在大捆检获的文件面前，什么也没做。
瞿龙华也怀疑是拆迁惹来的祸。
追随李振波，空降十五勇士再次受到全国军民的热切关注。
我应该多攒些钱为孩子们买一些本子。
歹徒拉着枪栓，用枪指着工作人员骂。
开网店容易，把商品卖出去则大有学问。
除了央企，银行也是年终奖较肥的行业。
据介绍，该鞭炮作坊开的时间不长。
大概有二百来户受骗，金额有三四十万元。
回顾侯佩岑的婚事，宛如一场马拉松。
寄人篱下不自在，她整天愁眉不展。
他能否存活，医生的心里一点底儿也没有。
它的颜色是白中带青，我们称为隐青瓷。
医院通过剖腹产的方式，帮她产下婴儿。
那人的话碰了壁，只好把气咽在肚子里，心里一阵失望。
这时，韩某和贺某便凑上来，哄骗李某说愿意帮她找回皮包。
要避免“略等于无”式的尴尬重演，急需对相关规定打“补丁”。
那么比太阳大十倍的恒星呢？
跑车的车头被撞得拱起，保险杠也凹进去一块。
他年轻时，曾就读于江苏省某体校，散打队员。
这一次，风水又转到了个人住房按揭贷款上来。
近两年，随着几家乳品企业进驻，洪雅县的奶源变得紧俏。
回家时，我也真诚地邀请我战友到家里去玩玩。
因为结冰，车窗、车门开启时也嘎嘎作响。
超市内人头攒动，生意比往常“火爆”许多。
为此，学校专门为他给窗户装上了栅栏。
嗨，平常无所谓，过节了，就有个思乡情啊。
直至今日，黄小清的右腿里还打着钢板，走起路来一瘸一拐。
惜红社监会，装傻退朝。
因此，此次召开的延押庭，会否把陈水扁放出来，备受关注。
李佳的年薪最终以四点一五万的价格成功拍出。
跑项目要疏通关系，必须打点，林鑫懂得“行情”。
乘客对车上负责讲解的导乘员普遍表示满意。
陈广明是包头隆德稀土有限公司的股东之一。
这家点心店做千层饼，用的就是杨爱国的“地沟油”。
蘑菇“漂洗”厂房内，用于“漂洗”蘑菇的池子和工具。
贾姬自觉占了上风，输得不太服气，要求重赛。
不仅“向日葵”，还有很多网友也关心着老人的行踪。
房间内提供床、小吧台、浴袍和两双拖鞋。
晚餐是北京炸酱面，大家希望孩子们尝尝老北京的饮食。
两个原因，一个俺们是办公室，这个案件是保密的俺不知道。
当时，张建国声称要和弟弟做游戏，并把弟弟的腿捆上。
又走回来坐在我左边，开始对我搂搂抱抱。
哼，我的脾气大着呢。
笑着也是一种性感喽。
现在油品主要是出现闪点和冷滤点这两项不合格。
有迹象表明，中国低端工业品出口正在经历拐点。
他说，自己用惯了算盘，觉得计算器没有这么好用。
程荣说，她个人认为，应该叫“脚趾头”、“制伏”妥当些。
话虽这么说，心里却有些为韩寒担心，落差太大他会不会承受不了？
以后结了婚，一定要学会藏私房钱，你看你爸藏了我就找不着。
土胚屋，五间房，狭小逼仄，满是灰尘和杂物。
电话中，杨某某希望倪能将身份证和银行卡给她送过去。
米东区北沙窝是准噶尔盆地古尔班通古特沙漠的一部分。
遇见那个懂得欣赏你，珍惜你的人是多么幸运幸福的事。
我们参加了苗族传统的民俗活动，直接感受黎族、苗族文化的韵味。
昨日，耿谆老人的遗体告别仪式在襄城县殡仪馆举行。
随后，他又“空降”意大利，先后效力于佩鲁贾等多支甲级球队。
她睁开迷蒙的眼，四目相接，一记呼啸的耳光响彻整个教室。
身为泰国华侨后裔的她，为此感到无比自豪与光荣。
哥前几天上网看到一大学同学的签名：被门夹过的核桃也能补脑吗？
那穿行在大街小巷的菲亚特出租车，描绘和点缀着温州。
而家庭寄养计划的服务对象，以滞留时间较长的流浪儿为主。
可书已送人，自己又干涉不了，好比做母亲的看见女儿在亲家受苦。
骂人时最痛苦不过于别人用你的话来回骂你，分量也会猛增许多。
成本猛涨，企业吃不消，部分企业甚至不敢接新订单。
而周董和侯佩岑，之前也是在日本搂肩被拍到，便招了恋情。
遭受重创的旅游行业并不气馁。
告诉我你要几点起床吧。
你们男人没一个好东西，你滚一边去，我不想看到你。
性感捧场的巩俐，获两名外籍高层相伴。
一辆黑色轿车右侧车头将卷帘门撞凹了。
第二、四、五项任务是深化制度改革与创新。
是全党全国各族人民团结奋斗的旗帜？
王妃不管现在还是小时候都好可爱喔！
名堂多得很，办法也多得很，而且创造了很多好办法。
没有机器轰鸣，没有铁水奔流，也没有了浓烟滚滚。
在那个年代，工厂烟囱常被比喻成“黑色的撒旦”。
专题关注的对象是面临摘牌危机的博物馆。
小小的个子，黑黑的脸，上嘴唇留有两撇小胡子。
郴山作证，湘水作证。
俩人边叫喊，边拎着水桶扑救。
狗舍里突然再次传出撞击声，原来藏獒在进行最后一搏。
见她一瘸一拐，何远竹便扶着她进了卫生间。
车厢右侧的乘客抓起消防锤砸窗玻璃，跳车逃生。
至于车辆是否按期检验、是否超载等，公司根本不管。
当工作人员开始检票时，等待检票的人群甚至将栅栏撞开。
每天都得做这些事情去开嗓。
尤其是“九八五”和“二幺幺”这样的高校。
不是在给区政府抹黑吧！
辛卯春节刚过，央行加息即至。
生意是不是比以前好很多？
开张第一天，影星成龙也来捧场。
这个东西偶一为之，还说的过去。
民警见状立即驱车穷追不舍。
媒体猜疑公司上涨缘于上述传言。
怎么样向他们介绍我们的祖国？
二是总量控制，不能像滚雪球。
同时，黄土也被风吹进了家里。
旗上写着“革命的一代”、“债务奴役”。
吉首市寄希望于发行地方债券。
行人见状，纷纷远离绕路行走。
去年东海虾产量创纪录新高。
期望“肩上蝶”能得到观众的喜爱。
他鼓励苏彩霞好好照顾身体。
远离铁轨和金属栏杆等金属物。
他们的关心和支持，我永生不忘。
正局长仍由原大局正局长兼任。
随后三人返回水果摊挑水果。
搞好水土保持和水生态保护。
该撤销的坚决撤销，任务交给职能部门承担。
我再也不上脚手架了。
如今，吴孟超年岁已高，很少再去“救场”了。
后来隆尧那个事出了以后，我不方便再去。
他比较喜欢诸葛亮。
我一样都没有，我还是个小娃娃，样样要从头做起。
含增白剂的面粉只有两个月过渡期，卖不完怎么办？
钟嘉欣、伍允龙约会四年，谢霆锋、张柏芝是见证人。
九阳神功！一点不会！
坐地铁，一小女孩在我的背后拿根魔杖玩。
我是青蛙，不用冬眠的。
摆盘精细，味美鲜嫩。
喝点牛奶会还受点。
后来她谎称是小孩的买主，转而勒索朗朗的母亲。
蔡少芬昨日出席活动，身材明显已回复苗条状态。
评审委员会七成员名单将于下周刊登于政府公报内。
现在那儿条件改善了。
她连考场都没进去。
务必不要靠近水泥预制板墙、门柱等躲避。
好的，有事记得喊我哟。
关键是用银行的杠杆。
还可能中招的包括鱼油、阿胶、胶原蛋白等。
哦天哪！我竟然不知道你想说什么！
一是基础养老金太低。
第二天早上永琪穿上了交五十块钱学校发的校服。
什么都第一，但航天要是第二，就什么都第二了。
夜幕刚刚降临，商店三楼传来悠扬动听的歌声。
本报将筛选优秀祝福内容在相关版面进行展示。
警方当场从王某裤袋内查获被抢的手机及戒指。
如人饮水，冷暖自知。
如今跳蚤变得很小。
恨不得把五大湖带过来开上海人的眼界。
没有我不会讲的故事。
这时婴儿开始边咳嗽边哭，几乎没了声音。
见到久别多日的父母，高元梅“哇”一声哭了。
为了养你，我日夜操劳，年纪轻轻的就开始掉头发了！
接到通知后，小关卡点的民警立即将该车拦停。
比起那些拖欠民工工资的、这样的老板该不该赞？
你就是我心中滴太阳。
我很坚强，不会逃避。
挺好的，我越看越开心。
当着历史老师飞机。
所以没有任何一点成绩哪敢用这个招牌啊？
不会耶，主人可以教教我吗？
他称之为“愉快的早晨”。
不知道耶，我没有尝试过呢。
他们点燃蜡烛和孔明灯，悼念遇难亲属。
移动双手，一点点挪动，他总算到了船舷处上了船。
巨型铆钉稳固了基坑，奠定了基础。
同样的“强人”，命运迥异。
你怎么知道我爱画画。
男子乖乖束手就擒。
这种技术是连皮剥除动物躯体后部的羊毛，以免苍蝇引发感染。
右丙氧芬对心脏有一定的副作用，这种作用是剂量依赖性的。
侦查员迅速组织警力前往阿城市重点地区进行走访和摸排。
古荣的糌粑在拉萨很有名，乡里搞了个乡镇企业——巴热糌粑公司。
这是你个人问题，麻烦下次举个合适点的例子好不好？
江若琳及陈嘉桓一起出席活动，两人小心的捧着白瓷摆设。
这样讲，绝不是没有原由的庸人自扰，更不是没有根据的危言耸听。
一口气喝了三碗奶茶，吃下一块馕，体内才算有些热力。
好天气表白更容易被接受哦，有暧昧对象的话，速度的！
甚至有堵着的出租车司机熄火停车，张罗起牌局来。
她嫂子跟她说要到外边打工，就让她上了俺这边的车。
比如说李嫣，还喜欢甲骨文的学习。
实现社会公正，需要采取切中肯綮的举措。
司仪见怂恿这一招没用，又开始吓唬起赵小姐。
因为事关可儿不愿触及的隐私，这里不便解释。
扫完后，有人发现，自己的手被扫帚划破了。
从签约单上，可以看到一串串知名企业的身影。
图中车轮下的扫帚，属于一名环卫工人。
不能在框内画圈、叉、钩等符号。
刚想找你聊天呢，果然心有灵犀。
使用率最低的是芬兰和挪威。
生意人的信誉跟金子一样富贵。
网站显示，当晚首都机场离岗航班共一百六十七架次。
就是把猫说成了个咪。
阿姨惊讶的问我：“是什么车。
送给你一轮明亮的月亮。
上岸后，她浑身直哆嗦。
案发后，吕某仓皇逃走。
第三组平台缓缓打开。
不再让灾区成为通信失灵的受害者。
去武汉还是去澳门？最终父母尊重女儿的选择，成全了她去澳大深造的愿望。
德沃夏克首先对中国奥运会的筹备工作大加赞赏。
我们出警发现就是网缠在一起，两人吵吵起来了。
张老板问记者要贵的还是要便宜的，记者让他详细说说。
至于惨死的旅馆店主妇女，也是他们诱骗进屋后杀害的。
千章墅的会所旁收纳了一株双树双生，而今生机盎然。
但整个救援行动平稳有序，受困矿工最终安全脱险。
它被许多人视为微软所曾推出的最好的浏览器。
绑好后，昝某将阳阳和蛇皮袋一起抛进大海。
他说我想了一宿，今天早上我一量，血压都高了。
进门瞬间，女孩曾伸手拉住门框试图挣脱。
于是，我只有多多撒娇啰，轻声叫唤惹他开心。
这三张情侣照片乍一看普普通通，并无不妥。
僧帽猴的手，非常适合扭开果汁或拿电话。
车牌尾号七幺八的出租驾驶员佐证了这一点。
不同类型的债基，风险不同，收益也各有不同。
有的孩子没有热水袋，就用饮料瓶装热水，自制成暖水瓶。
已成摆设的山西路市民广场水幕电影现场。
对于自己的病人，克兰顿早就有所了解。
而表现出众的是史宾格、德国牧羊犬等。
工贸由两张皮变成一张皮，扯皮的事自然少了。
博客上传播，造成恶劣的社会影响。
而当时的理由也是原材料上涨过快。
几千块钱丢掉了，隔壁一家一万多哟。
可借钱建校舍，万一还不了怎么办？
有本事再说一句！我保证不揍死你！
还有人提议用生鸡蛋，反正我没试过。
市委党校在职研究生。
黄朝林又朝他吼了起来。
现在的商家也越来越聪明。
谢谢夸奖，不是美女哈。
用后一种错误更正前一种错误，盗窃罪名却依然成立，很荒谬。
只要努力就能呀。
好哇，想聊点什么。
唯有保重身体，坚韧不拔，方能触底反弹。
其他护航的舰船则迅速向燃烧着的福莱斯特号航空母舰喷水。
抢通汶川与外界的公路通道，牵动着全国人民的心。
说谎可耻，机器人不会说谎。
与乔布斯不同，雅虎创始人已被证明无力逆转公司颓势。
他壮实的身板黝黑的皮肤，小平头下两只眼睛炯炯有神。
首先来为大家介绍一下来到我们今天演播室的两位嘉宾。
为了填补先前的巨额亏空，张润章策划了这期假抢劫案。
一改以往的繁琐、冗长，多地两会在会议内容上务实、精简。
我一下愣了，心想，这英语什么时候普及到了这个程度了！
前女友上前招呼寒暄，我腻腻的说了一句：“亲爱的咱们该走了。
我认为它首先是指奥运会期间的一切活动都有丰富的人文内涵。
目前，洛阳八六三软件孵化器项目已进驻。
亚银说：“更糟糕的是，油料与肥料的成本现在已更高，而且正快速上涨。
一旦发现申领补贴者名下有轿车，将严肃处理。
然然换药的时候一定要攥着她最喜欢的美羊羊。
经中共中央批准，鲁炜同志任中共北京市委委员、常委。
小明说：坐我前面的个子太高了，左右的太远，我脖子扭伤无法看后面。
这与社会政治领域的特殊性、复杂性有关。
社长有如此大胆是很罕见的，社员也都停下来听社长的高见。
宋世平忍不住又去擦了一个身，回来后问：你们有谁睡着了？
我爸：“呵呵，我年轻的时候贩过猪咧，我当年看猪很准的咧！
只要心中有爱，有家，有牵挂，就不怕雾霾飘过，就不怕天气阴暗。
文小姐大为恼火，但其后都被徐某以各种花言巧语搪塞过去。
当天深夜，整个筛查组此次阿里之行计划的任务全部完成。
如果客人在他家演奏音乐，他会捂上他的耳朵，直到演奏结束。
市公安局水上分局巡防站的民警们正在加固趸船缆绳。
我要以理服人，不会一言不合就动手的。
祖国大地何愁不早日披上绿妆呢？
对我是好事，原来我还有这么多东西哟。
梨子含有果糖和葡萄糖等，具有保肝、助消化、促进食欲的作用。
在学识达标的同时实现思想素质达标才是应有之义。
从大江健三郎、凯尔泰斯、耶利内克到品特，都是这样。
只希望更多人在批判可儿的同时，摸摸自己的良心。
四是大力查处打击网络涉黄、涉赌违法犯罪活动。
这位千金小姐正在贵阳上大学，经常购买奢侈品。
再加上有赌瘾，挪用公款去赌博，结果亏空越来越大。
说要把王某杰调到其他学校，这不是纵容犯罪吗。
他提出诊断单表示自己的左膝、右手肘都挫伤。
两位贪官的自我剖析入骨三分，给在场者以深刻的震撼。
他只活到了五十六岁，是癌症夺走了他的生命。
是一款很棒的手机，集功能、性价比、颜值与一身。
三幺二国道麻街岭段山体塌方，车辆被埋。
与“离境退税”相比，“离岛免税”优惠幅度更大。
你看他上课，多认真哪！
报告称，全球失业人数二零一五将增至二点零八亿。
李德明发现，里面还有一头猪儿在里面哼哼唧唧。
张先生的卧室并不宽敞，电脑桌和床离得很近。
而现场的球员，都将自己的头盔摘下，低下头颅。
三间砖砌的瓦房，里面垃圾遍地，显得十分肮脏。
每次奶奶去探望，她都攥着奶奶的手指头不放。
严重“喊渴”的洞庭湖湖容及湖面面积也有所增加。
第一类是投资客在新房开盘时即购入的房产。
并与两国举行高峰会，修补岌岌可危的外交关系。
警方称，盛夏酷热难耐，很多人到江河游泳解暑。
投入不足、区域封锁等问题，制约了图书业的发展。
看到有人围观，麻将摊摊主暗示女孩的姥姥出来。
美方将全力扭转“绿袭蓝”的事件这一趋势。
两个人便推搡起来，但万正红并没有打人。
在县卫生局的直接领导下，逐乡逐镇改建和扩建卫生院。
恩师李双江因故不能到阵，也发来视频祝福。
他眉毛竖起来，双臂护抱，拒绝别人靠近。
昨天，前门部分商铺打出超低价烤鸭招牌。
看到老人吃得快、吃得饱，韩凤英脸上就挂满笑容。
沉寂了一下，那妹纸哭丧着脸说：“肉……”
新郎再吟诗一首，新娘这才微笑点头，放下团扇。
现在想想感觉是在甩卖。
那就是偷鸡不成蚀把米。
宾客名单还在草拟中，并可能有所改变。
他们翻开了新中国屯垦史上崭新的一页。
过去将读书作为修身养性的途径，有道理。
组织力量帮助农民收割甘蔗，搞好运输。
我们的生活真是比蜜还甜呐！
可是，我现场要求警察回避，他不肯走。
冉老汉等待一上午后，等来了一个菜贩。
一个男人颓然地坐在旁边，目光呆滞。
喜欢把李敖的书插在牛仔裤的前面？
乍眼一看，想起的是广州的区号“零二零”。
此前，清华紫光就曾遭遇过同样的危机。
不太明白什么意思。
还有部分担保公司涉及炒股配资业务。
一个理想的医疗保险体系应该是怎样的？
同时对阅卷点实行全程、多角度监控。
有一句话叫“元亨利贞”，是“易经”上的一个卦。
这是地震中开裂的大煤沟煤矿风峒。
他们只不过是在拙劣地画葫芦罢了。
而到二零九零年，这一可能性则将高达百分之九十。
雨翔苦笑说：你写的干吗让我看。
刘本云说，来他家里的时候，赵小齐穿着补丁裤子。
郭斌一看夜不眠的招牌，觉得好像见到过，想起时把自己吓一跳。
不过，这老两口平时很爱掏耳朵，老梁有空还喜欢去小理发店。
但业内分析师也对政策消息对资本市场的刺激持谨慎态度。
目前肇事车仍横亘于路中间，事发路段仍只能维持半幅交通。
记者仔细查听了两个号码的自动语音服务，发现的确有所不同。
国学热，正在感染着更多条件参差不齐的幼儿园。
之后担正主角，但也自此与毒结缘。
我白费了力气还挨了爸爸的批评。
如此惨忍的行为让人瞠目结舌。
他注视小妹，感到她一副欲醉的样子，胆更大了，侧身把头探过去。
这种控制与利用，有其特定的内涵。
第二天一早醒来后，我就被带去警察那儿做调查。
吴佩煜说，有人问，吴孟超身体那么好，是不是吃什么补品啊？
公安机关初步查明，案件是由白家峁煤矿矿权纠纷引发的。
以前，她就有过几次被河南省队退回的经历，理由也是太矮。
布碎中夹杂着塑料袋、废纸片等，不但肮脏，还散发刺鼻异味。
在江西九江，老师将一名学生的耳朵给拧断，吓呆全班孩子。
美中处理分歧的方式迥异。
现在，她不能抛弃克钦族。
什么继父岳父，我是他亲爹！
姐妹俩一边赏景，一边说笑。
本网电话八零八八九幺八二。
俺认识的有人，直接拉给你。
她是织袜车间的一位主班长。
从未巧取豪夺，未伤天害理。
不好吧，节食减肥很痛苦。
你之前强烈反对造城运动。
这就相当于将堕胎合法化。
如果党的基本路线错了，我们的事业就遭受挫折和失败。
最常见的菜是咖喱，是从邻国印度、斯里兰卡传入的。
高层建筑的室内消火栓箱内将设置消防软管卷盘。
我想那些应该是草莓的种子吧。
自此，“房奴”在中国成为一个特有名词。
政委芮双林告诉记者：在这里，我们一举手、一投足都关乎我军的形象。
但眼前的匝道上，工人们还在忙着安装道路方向标。
一向一分钱都要掰成两半花的父亲，为了儿子大摆宴席。
截至目前，美军已向伊安全部队移交了九个省的防务。
来往的工人们扛着工具，头顶盖着块湿毛巾来遮阳。
需要漂洗的锅碗太多，池子里水面上的泡沫越来越多。
拆线的时候，没有用麻药，小曾疼得咬牙咧嘴，没有吱声。
所以，在这个部分，袜子确实易于管理，同时它也易于物流。
这些奇闻轶事自然是林大哥亲口告诉的，真假难辨。
比如对美元持续贬值的预期。
他们就像是被宠坏的孩子。
所以，在这点上有一点儿脱节了。
亲身体验后，翁习生再次发问。
陈水扁要想交保，还需等待。
陈李东致电电城镇殡改队。
来稿一律不退，请自留底稿。
钱在我眼中是很渺小的东西。
不倾国，不倾城，倾家荡产。
之后，安理会举行闭门磋商。
别跟我说话，让我一个人待会儿！
嫌疑人站在高处，手举一根棒槌，用力挥舞，砸向民警王军。
我的脑袋已经被杰西的取代。
这也正是色狼蠢蠢欲动之时。
一曲“风风火火闯九州”唱毕，他又换上异域风情的新疆歌舞。
那姓姚的——说着从口袋里掏出一张皱巴巴的纸，给他看。
个体工商户根据经营需要可以聘请若干帮手或者学徒。
他们肯定失去了其优势地位。
还有人把问题扯到了“公车”上。
逾期仍不登记的，收容犬只。
肺活量水平出现上升拐点。
这个问题，看看我就知道了呀。
姑姑，你的胸为什么这么小？
还要叫她起床呢怎么会不早起。
在胡润榜单中，位列中国私有经济体第一名。
赶紧闭上眼睛休息吧。
陈明亮在庭审中也承认，他本人偶尔也吸食毒品。
为了提神，还配备薄荷糖，广州军区专门配了大蒜头。
为了弥补巨额亏空，邓盛堂、区锦明开始实施诈骗。
急救人员将男童送到雅宝路附近的首都儿研所。
为不影响正在一线救人的银尕，记者挂断了电话。
年会的主题为“中国和亚太商业房地产的新思维”。
受伤的孩子趴在地上一动不动，后被姨妈发现。
林父才流，只识其一不识其二，把老舍“四世同堂”里的属错放了过去。
不到草原，不知其雄美壮丽；不来内蒙古，不知道其日新月异的变化。
无奈，执勤民警只得留一名辅警留守。
这也是春节后湖北省规模最大的一次招聘会。
刘长宇说，这是昨日上午查收的，还查出了两把十余厘米长的刀具。
这几天收看新闻了吗？
还有一些改进细节也被敏感的学者捕捉到。
据称，两人当时都有粗口。
屋顶的吊灯也在不停地晃。
现在的人工珍珠也正是利用蛤、蚌的这一习性来进行培育的。
近日，上饶市中院作出裁定，驳回上诉，维持原判。
没有供给竞争、需求竞争价钱肯定就往上跑。
每股盈利达到三点五七一港元，同比上升百分之一百九十九点三。
几天后，袁女士在医院做了腹腔镜下卵巢右附件切除术。
见状，民警赶紧打开窗户，将男子拽回房内。
苍蝇哄哄叫，床上、锅台上都是，多得像头毛。
台湾问题、民主、自由都成为外媒记者常提的问题。
在地区层面，领导者需要确定下一个增长前沿。
那始终挂在脸上的漠然微笑，令人毛骨悚然。
张大中身上，无疑也遗传了母亲这一倔强的性格。
你看看人家对老婆多温柔，人家吻的多有技巧……
他昨天透露，自己和太太有了一个“婚姻合约”。
晴雯扫视身上挂的几件衣服，说：“一点不冷。
在欧元陷入危机之时，欧洲开始向中国求助。
我擦去嘴角的血水，含泪道：“这不你的吗！
他们的体力还能经得起多少次折腾呢？
尸体垒成一堆，有明显遭人扫射致死迹象。
对普通市民来说，散装月饼寄出国也很难。
我们在这里还发现了山东省赠送的陶瓷。
对此，魏后凯给出了“减税”和“提价”两副“药剂”。
三是全国铁路客服电话统一为幺二三零六。
应采儿扬言，一旦有小孩的话，自己就会玩“失踪”。
此前，欧央行和印度央行已经宣布降低利率。
还因为没钱，仲谷明香从来不买袜子也不穿。
程英马上对那食品露出相见恨晚的脸色。
许多住户在门口筑起沙袋，日夜舀水排涝。
现在周围居民对你们家有没有特别的感觉？
男子不听，双方爆发口角，并推推桑桑。
以前我所见的北京不够绿，实在是阳光不够通透，绿也蒙着灰色。
对于时下自己免费“顺风车”的红火局面，茆源备加珍惜。
向来搞笑的香取调皮地称“嗯，明年有大型的庆祝活动就好了”。
首先，我想谈谈中华文化与奥运精神在内在理念上的共通之处。
为什么会讨厌我呢？是我说错什么了吗？
于是他上山找高僧给算了算，高僧算完说：你回去等着吧！
如今，夫妻二人均需住院，“乖乖”成了急需好心人收养的“孤儿”。
人们服药、上吊或者割腕自杀，但是不会割破自己的喉咙。
例如，在调整视频播放尺寸时，用户可以点击不同尺寸的图标。
他刚正不阿的精神感动了群众，更赢得群众的信任和尊重。
突然，车子颠簸了一下，“轰”一声，洪娟被甩出车外，摔倒在地。
他进来后大声问好，要我们帮他准备一些普通点心打包带走。
他说不出话，姚书琴追击说：林大文豪，你下一个准备要骂谁？
我没有弟弟，但我有一群爱我的机器人好朋友。
这里是全海南均价最贵的楼盘凤凰岛。
再戳穿只会颜面丢失，不代表我没有准备。
答案总让人沮丧。
若我放弃了手中现成的食物，再去追求看不见的东西，那我岂不成傻瓜了吗？
即使压力再大，再不高兴，也要干下去。
这种情况下，难怪赵本山说不差钱。
我看过你和吴卓羲的“学警三”，很喜欢。
警察于是逮捕他，也取回被抢的赃款。
他甚至有点喘气困难，说句连贯的话都显得异常艰难。
突然有一个女的捂住我的眼，并用巨温柔的声音说：猜猜我是谁？
如此“贴地气”，不但丝毫无损他的形象，反倒赢得更多拥趸。
要不断夯实农业基础。
齐秦迈开大步甩手疾走，健康状态良好，精神奕奕。
如果医生多点执业盛行，那扎堆儿看病的现象也将增多。
除了瘸腿男在身上掏出的一部外，厨房窗台上还有一部。
格子间当中只拦着低矮的墙板，没有人是真正离群的。
朱紫娆小时曾当女童军，但现在太忙没有参与。
司机师傅一愣，忧伤的说：你数学老师死的早啊。
歹徒见难以逃脱，扔下皮包继续逃窜。
加强青年体育方面的交流与合作。
你的身影总是在我心里晃来晃去。
而且他们的房屋都比较矮，隔震技术可以做得简易些。
十多天下来，三人开始流鼻血，连嚷嚷受不了了。
当然是和你聊天，给你放放音乐啦。
看来，两人势必要为此对铺公堂了。
亲属们忙着给她掐人中，撸手指。
我军实现后勤现代化有没有时间表？
唯伤心天公不作美，英雄或许要承受多磨难！
知道呀，你是我的主人，是一个阳光开朗热爱生活的人。
如何才能让红头文件不再满天飞，执行起来不走样？
我顿时一紧张，这不是老段子嘛，我怎么会一直修电脑。
临去前，拍拍胸说：我去见识一下她！
点击率上去了，下家儿跟着就来了。
非洲人有非常强大的符咒，能够在眨眼间毁掉一个人。
可是，我再也不能从土壤里发芽开花。
因为有很多运送盐的轮船翻了，所以海水才会这么咸，这是我乱说的。
六五二路较前几日全天计划发车增加十二车次。
扶手或护栏杆应无积灰、变形、破损、斑痕、脱落。
这个城市终于安静了，可是心里的回忆好吵有没有？
钱荣不屑道：我至少读过一万本书，我去做这种试卷太浪费我的才气。
此外，涉及住房信息的种种利益问题有待稳妥处理。
不过对于大多数品牌而言，这仍然是最稳妥的做法。
公公婆婆也深明大义，动员亲戚朋友替她寻找家人。
此次访华，戴贝克与中国发改委进行了深入沟通。
并劝他还是安心读书，不要为小说的事情过于分心。
临行前，姥姥拦住妈妈，叮嘱道，千万别提小银子。
第一次造成蛋蛋轻微伤，第二次双方各有一名轻微伤。
这对于保护权利、节约社会成本等，都是有好处的。
五是客观认识彼此能力和责任。
这就是曹桂林做不醒的文学梦？
她的这句话，有心酸，有无奈，有安慰。
当晚，小杰偷偷溜走玩起了“失踪”。
我凝视“惊叹眼”，见到一种异常的美。
如今，这种窘境被巧妙绕过了。
我们维持对盛大股票的“持有”评级。
很安全，是你们不想我安全，哈哈！
你见过哪只母鸡打架用鸡蛋的！
你呀……”严然是老子训儿子的口气。
人们耸肩缩头，闭着嘴不说话。
对央行昨日出台的政策怎么看？
他看着罗天诚和他小妹就眼红。
咱们还是讨论一下世界和平吧。
照抄苏联的模式难道不是错误？
看来，广州塔还想窜得更高哩。
不过雅虎董事会看来是受够了。
仓位普遍偏低的基金动向如何？
另外，地面上还有一个钻孔已打通。
漂洗企业就像一头笨重的兽类，想要转身，困难重重。
躺在急救担架上的男子双目紧闭，头发散发出一股烧焦的味道。
工业园区是承接产业转移、加速产业集聚、培育产业集群的主要载体。
那一刻，我才真正的懂你，就像懂我现在的自己。
这简直是赤裸裸的“性别歧视”。
他打算努力工作攒钱，三年后开着车去自驾游。
已是深秋的古都罗马，却毫无寒意。
这是预防最糟结果的保险性政策。
黄某彬称，事发时踩刹车，刹车没反应，造成与前方校车追尾。
由于列车长时间停靠，车厢内的空气越来越“闷”。
江岸区消防中队赶来，将老人从淤泥中抱起。
但如果按车队规模，一嗨数千辆车的量级绝对算不上最大。
小妹最后还是拥有了半个雅典娜的智慧，决意和罗天诚分手。
她说，飞机在颠簸第一次失重后，广播才说飞机遇到强气流。
四是企业国际化经营能力较弱。
回到家林妈不住催问，他说还可以，林母拍腿而起：“你说可以就是不好！
上一交易日人民币兑美元汇率为六点三七九七元。
现在做这个的人也越来越少了，我多做一件，就多留一件呗！
老师每天重复地告诉他们怎样播种、沤肥、种植到采收。
另一造型是以苹果作点缀，一身鲜花图案长裙的女星装扮。
以军总参谋长哈鲁茨将军凌晨召开紧急会议讨论对策。
大家把心愿写好，点上灯，灯飞了大概两层楼高的时候。
说马洪是朱镕基的“恩师”、对朱镕基有知遇之恩一点也不过分。
联邦警察已针对这一系列事件展开调查。
单双号限行演练真正的考验将在下周一。
很多网友对广州旅客鲁莽的行为表示谴责。
中国海洋调查船“科学三”号二十三日加入。
与室友聊天，讨论林夕是否真的爱慕黄耀明。
我们就卷起铺盖，拿着牙刷什么的去洗漱。
徐虎读书时，一直都靠学校发给的助学金。
但他们向广宇公司打欠条借钱，倒是真的。
之后我以广告模特儿的身份在艺能界打拼。
你让农民把堆积如山的秸杆拿去干什么？
郴州市检察院也已介入调查。
虽然我无儿无女，但享党和政府的福，我的晚年过得很安逸。
但，迎接她的，不是同情和帮助，而是一浪又一浪的谴责。
小镇上的人都称之为才子。
走出帐篷的时候，我问旁边的同事：这个娃娃有没有两岁？
老板悠悠的回答，看你会不会养了，养的好了它送你走……
演习过程中将动用符合北约标准的先进计算机系统。
好在闹新房的喜庆和热烈弥补了婚礼的终生遗憾。
高油价将对国际关系的互动，产生某种微妙或带有务实倾向的影响。
罗志海说喉咙里好像长了块东西，然后一直开始吐。
怀了孕的妻子问丈夫：你觉得我们的孩子像谁更好？
即使在魏嘉政姥姥去世时，都没敢说。
一百个笑话？我讲完会不会系统崩溃呀！
我搞不过，胳膊拧不过大腿，我认命了。
大多数人都放弃养猪，改作别的行当。
他悄声坐到那个翻书如飞的男生旁。
产业化对农牧民增收的带动作用明显。
幺宁还发表了长达七分钟的“打黑宣言”。
也难怪中国有名言群众的眼睛是雪亮的。
看到孙女得救，女童的奶奶破啼为笑。
饶富贵说，此后袁饶也被找去做了记录。
你认准我就行了，我是公安局的，叫杨玉章。
他同时称“但农民胃口太大，不好解决”。
据调查，镉污染源来自长沙湘和化工厂。
但是，一些迹象显示，血案由“内部人”挑起。
有好朋友的关心我的牙怎敢不快点好呢。
小朋友看到佛莱明巨兔“大熊”都好惊喜。
空投成功了，被困的五千多群众有救了。
吴仕成很“佩服”岑巩县发土地财的能力。
近日，许晋亨在爱巢加建婴儿房，日内将会大肆装修。
社区老居民敲锣打鼓，业主代表拿到钥匙后，笑得合不拢嘴。
供电服务热线九五五九八保持二十四小时畅通。
于是，她上楼拔掉电源，而表弟也想上厕所。
二是中国特色基本医疗卫生制度框架初步建立。
当年被团结起来的“小泥鳅”，已经被希冀一统江湖的鳄鱼嫌弃。
根据检测结果，南京市有关部门立即责令兴旺屠宰场停业。
未来半个月里，伴随电音的“哪吒三太子”都将继续在街内表演。
瞥开爱国不爱国来说，真要抓奶粉的质量，就把大品牌引进来。
在她加盟之初，“脸谱”还只是“看上去很美”，资金状况“有进无出”。
由她制作的电视剧“雍正王朝”，曾获中国电视剧最高三大奖项。
这是我的工作，事情出来后评价总会有好有坏，但我不会计较。
医院、面试公司等拍摄场地，也是他一一张罗的。
诊所一方则认为没有责任。
事成后，邻居会给报酬。
正因如此，他们在选择工作时，会相对“挑惕”一些。
结案之际，姜涛父亲向法官流露出了忏悔之情。
拿起卷子就感到了温暖。
这故事叫“一个文盲的悲哀”。
这位聪明的宝宝叫陈俊。
这么多！想把我累死嘛。
他很惊讶父亲在“辛亥革命”之中给了他一个角色。
我还想自由自在地多玩几年，所以现在还是单身呢。
单位的财务监管力度如何？
它未来发展趋向又将如何？
温总理此行安排十分紧凑。
这是太原市汾河景观带关灯前和关灯后的对比。
病友们说，她们出去耍了。
不要把怨气撒到律师头上。
去年涨薪大潮席卷中国。
这是党委政府的重要职责。
选美在委内瑞拉是全民热衷的盛事。
我们党带领人民谱写了中华民族自强不息、顽强奋进的壮丽史诗。
但由于国内猎头发展的参差不齐，仍然有老话重提的必要。
让其不断地生育不就万事大吉了？
民警接到报警后赶到现场，出租车司机正与几个醉鬼理论。
既如此，何不去团结一切能够团结的人，营造最大的利益呢？
余雄拍拍他的肩说：想开一点，过两天就没事了，红颜祸水。
即便挖到了什么，也不能肯定与七三幺部队关联。
事实上，台当局是时候该听听民众的呼声了。
他喜爱打网球、游泳，曾被选为学校马术部的主将。
编纂出版“远东国际军事法庭庭审记录”意义深远。
一名警员在抓捕过程中，左侧肘关节中弹受伤。
他们不甘心，又想买通边检参谋查其的妻子。
扩大短期险业务，支持中小企业开拓国际市场。
嘉凯城集团股份有限公司去年过得很寒碜。
一上车小狗就挣开我，直接蹦到旁边的座位上。
记者拍照，幺儿现身满不在乎，路人气愤谴责。
俩人合谋，用校服将孩子闷死后，又弃尸河中。
别急，走进那弄堂——梁样君手一指身后的黑弄。
菜、肉、作料比例，新手掌握不了。
同时，要扭转人们的错误认识，转变观念。
犬主带犬出街时，犬只必须佩戴犬牌，犬主携带犬证。
我是你的语音助理呀，人工智能美少女我。
小磊做着最后的挣扎，但蹬踹的双脚逐渐无力，断了气。
一是它解决了经常性捐赠存在的很多问题。
夫妻俩于是争吵起来。
二是忍辱负重河南人。
七十三岁的陈阿婆从水塔里被解救出来。
还有四分之一的人甚至没有按处方抓药治病。
这个钻孔可与六、七、八、九号工作面相连。
据说，设计者乃是这小镇鼎鼎有名的大家。
是很好吃的冰淇淋啊。
南京警方有两个版本。
余雄脱下衣服，挤出一地的汗，说：洗澡去吧。
杭州市承诺将在二零三五年后拆除或降层。
她这个女人，嘴巴挺甜的，不过也挺好的哦。
其实我想说的是干妈。
既实惠，挑选余地也大。
回来，放在那儿，没言声。
王菲那是老娘的命呐！
但在沉寂一段时间后，“删帖公司”卷土重来。
消息发出后，同学们群情激昂全都报了名。
是不是身体不舒服呀？
我要学习一下相关知识。
粉刷以前还比那厉害。
哪里还谈得上参与呢？
何小姐家养的黄金蟒。
怎么啦，你还不困嘛？
她说，自己快憋坏了。
不要跟我聊这些我不懂。
旁观者的姓名永远爬不到比赛的计分板上。
这把球员们激动坏了。
这一数字创巴菲特慈善午餐历史最高价位。
别讨厌嘛，我们这么好。
他后来被送往瑞士伯尔尼的国际学校留学。
报道未提猫咪的下场。
飞来横祸，惨不忍睹。
不过在价钱上有些犹豫。
真应该好好查查他们。
到三幺九国道堵车，造成交通受阻约一小时。
日本女星泽尻英龙华。
家里有全自动洗衣机呀。
就等于和租赁差不多。
和你一起看月亮怎么样？
广本管理人员如是说。
原因是工资低，住房窄。
一片热闹里，没人注意。
好在，他出演了“米尔克”。
记者赶到幺幺七医院机场路分院急诊抢救室。
不好意思，我还没有玩过。
他们，选择用一场国际范儿的舞会，优雅地告别。
只是，跑步可以掐秒表，而娱乐圈却没有定论。
这对酸雨治理很不利。
我斗胆猜测，集团给陆兆禧，物流给邵晓锋。
所有僧人都跑了出来。
同样的逻辑也适用于癌症。
好天气就是要出来逛，有狗的遛狗，有娃的抱娃，都没有的…你抱我吧。
妻子不但不怕反而柔情的说：猫哥，别叫了，我老公还没出差呢。
车行至枣林前街时，马师傅把车停下，自称憋不住了要去撒尿。
就好像最后一次测试，我终于蹦过去，及格了。
他不敢再说下去，怕钱荣又躲在外文里骂他，和谢景渊说话：你在看什么书？
首先要有个好身体，其次还要付出努力。
成都鸟语林原来准备开展的游客骑鸵鸟项目也不搞了。
当然，这么说妈不太合适，我妈有点愣，这一面我像我妈。
我当时还脑残的说：怎么是软的？
老妈站了一会儿说：行了，别装了。
暴雨天在路上被淋成了落汤鸡。
有时，一趟航班仅三百多名旅客。
后来有朋友说合伙开小酒吧，我连口都没敢开，老汉儿更不准。
一次偶然的机会，一张力塔洪在馕饼摊前的照片爆红网络。
在太空中，飞船能依靠的只有太阳能与核能。
余雄又推开来世平的手说：天太热了，大家分开点。
而驾驶员直到降落才知道，飞机上“搭乘”了一条蟒蛇。
主治医生告诉刘嫄一家人，父亲的病治愈的希望渺茫。
今天卖家给朋友返现了十元，叫室友把图片给删了。
杨红卫还有一个“习惯”是经常纵情饮酒，喝得酩酊大醉。
但今天情况就不一样了，还有很宽的空地儿可以走动。
那我就给你亮点真本事吧。
此外，多数乞儿并非被拐的。
落在身上，一抹就是一片黑。
赤峰由此而成为中华龙的故乡和龙文化的发祥地。
演员得多高心理素质和流泪技巧才能达到要求哇？
每次老汉儿破案就会回来说，今天晚上你们看新闻。
入夜，广州市白云区景泰街华灯璀璨，车水马龙，好不热闹。
库尼斯伸手把库彻的头搂进怀里，甚至当众接吻，相当亲密。
开心侠我从不难过，每天都为主人带来正能量。
思聪寻亮而去，和白胖高热情切磋：您就是——你是卢思聪吧？
他建议餐馆必须在每张餐桌下放一个纸篓，让市民扔纸巾。
她翻了我的短信，现在她不仅知道我有外遇，还坚信我是个基佬。
当水位下降，趸船则可以向江中移动，尽最大努力保证取水。
我暂时还不会哦！
逢年过节时，倪红梅也会多包些馄饨和包子送给刘姐。
他们俩喜出望外，可这个时候招生老师吴江却人间蒸发了。
但辩方指出，这把刀太大，不符合遇害者喉咙上致命伤的形状。
同时刘玉标也承认，对此事学校有相应的责任。
距今约四千五百年，是巴人发祥地遗址。
不论做任何事，她都不可能丢掉自我。
上海、广州也有狗仔，但是还没成气候。
作为太太反而不欣赏、不体谅。
短短一分钟，“望”的步骤结束了。
属峡谷型自然风景旅游景区。
死者在当晚已经送到了殡仪馆。
追逃民警抵达后来不及添置棉袄，就直奔当地公安机关。
就这样，手链也跟着甩出去了。
他说自己有钱，不想当“老鳖一”。
在东方曼哈顿小区附近的另外一家中介，车位的开价更高。
这被看作是非盟与联合国斡旋该国政治僵局的一大成果。
我读到一半就心疼了是闹哪样？
喝醉了的李侃被踢醒后，翻身站起与这名民警撕扯起来。
郑航说以普通公民身份起诉就是为撇清滥用公权力之嫌。
巴国城，时尚女子在偷奶粉。
每次提出意见也总是先说，我只是说说，听不听由你们决定。
云南孟连和贵州瓮安的变化，是这种警民关系的最好见证。
打斗当中，朱某被失手刺死。
未料，一天清晨，我还在被窝里，忽听一阵唏唏的爪子挠门声。
她是被迫还是有什么难言之隐？
这相当于每天跑两次马拉松。
队员们知道，他们身上有家伙。
这个颜色叫老绿，相当于翠绿。
然而，此时的邹德保已经逃跑。
当今理想的婚姻模式是什么？
做好城市内涝抢险应急工作。
可那些鸡头是卖淫嫖娼的组织者，是后台老板，是最大的赢利者。
也就是说，小蕊蕊翻越护栏去上学时天还未完全亮。
不过，免试攻读研究生的她早已经不仅仅满足于看奥运了。
长期的营养不足，导致许多孩子普遍矮小，有的还患上胃病。
优酷此举客观、聪明。
是个很有钱的家伙呀。
骨髓捐献过程中的范豪杰。
这个条款无疑是非常荒谬的。
曹成给记者算了这样一笔账。
我的脸每天都洗的很干净哦。
赌场可为政府带来高额税收。
我炒股好多年了，一定能赢利。
拄拐男子下水托起落水女。
琛航岛有一片著名的“将军林”。
最可恶的是到后来那头的人都问我：“你是不是得罪谁了？
金茂大厦八十八层观光厅，我曾经来过。
臣妾做不到啊！
小时候特别想妈妈，躲起来哭，胡伟是一个从小缺乏母爱的人。
半夜，甲打了一个大喷涕，乙整个脸上都是甲的结晶。
李瑾曼的家，父母一眨眼都不在了。
梨子对肠炎、甲状腺肿大、便秘、厌食、消化不良等疾病有一定疗效。
即便是违法建筑，你也得告诉我哪个地方违法，咋违法了？
各部门的一些框框、规定越来越多，年检、审批越来越严格。
倒是小兵张嘎和王小二的事迹在课本里占有一席之地。
该男子受到强烈挤压，浑身都是血，嘴里还在嘟囔着。
这是拱北海关近年来查获的最大一起走私文物出境案。
受助群众无不交口称赞：当年的老八路作风又回来了。
同时花钱打点警方人员是因为事关自己的弟弟王东明。
工人们先搬开窟窿周围的街砖，再用电钻凿开水泥板。
原本只是想吓唬吓唬，可是在捆绑小浩时遭遇了反抗。
至于丧礼举行的细节，他指要问许冠武，因是他全力打点。
部分民众着搞怪服装，站在狂风暴雨中照相、翻筋斗。
目前，犯罪嫌疑人马某某、周某、喇某被依法刑事拘留。
丁子高还自爆表姐送了两支不同牌子的验孕棒给他。
如今，马悦凌称生吃活泥鳅是治疗渐冻人症的法宝。
张默数次闯祸都是让父亲张国立焦头烂额。
妹子突然来了句：“你不会找个用到手的电影啊。
同车的许亘富在事故中右腿骨折，胸口受伤。
项羽凭借着盖世无双的武艺，还企图重整旗鼓，卷土重来。
这是陈水扁赤裸裸鼓吹台独、在台独分裂道路上又迈出的危险一步。
在姜某、陈某二人的教唆、怂恿下，老乡之间互相拉拢介绍。
想到一次次被小衫拒绝的事，吴天很是恼火。
单身女性醉酒后应有熟悉的男性陪送回家。
和老婆领证七年了，办准生证时居然说网上查不到我们的结婚证。
竞选时许诺的政策，可能实现几许？
小瑶在海滨母亲的陪同下再次堕胎。
曾有推销员这么说：“我每接触十个人，才有一个人愿意购买我的货物。
土壤里的化学物质进入食物链后，最终仍是被人类自己吃掉。
早上在楼下汤粉店吃早餐，碰见我们领导，并热情的打招呼。
事实上，高离婚率已经给克罗地亚的社会带来了很大的影响。
苏联解体后，苏联的坦克研发力量也随之分属俄、乌两个国家。
整条公路多处损毁严重，险象环生。
他的勋章有三抽屉，但是没什么钱。
等我遇到心上人的时候，就要结婚喽。
拉扯期间，两位民警手指受伤流血。
两人起初吵吵闹闹，后来坠入爱河。
业内人士表示，现在我省消费者以首次购车为主。
茅台集团昨天发表声明，再次撇清了自己与“奢侈品”的关系。
在行驶过程中，频频点刹，故意让车开得颠簸，把乘客“晃”睡。
当大银幕上突然出现一个女孩的脸孔，全场一片愕然。
未来几年绿城最重要的就是多卖房，少买地。
一九九五年，成为保加利亚社会党外事部的成员。
据悉，是低血糖导致了凯西此次突然晕倒。
你是不是找错人啦？我是我，不是笨妞。
成本花得有点高哟，恐怕是开车的时候走神了哟。
你要是安全的话就“喵”一声，大家就放心了。
让人怀疑是此君刻完后跳下去了。
图为昨日一名女孩在品尝“敛巧饭”。
挺好的长头发干吗剪得这么短？
只有一个缺点就是脾气有一点点爆……
一手把我带大的奶奶昨天去世了。
张卫健笑言自己很喜欢这个角色。
伊朗与西方国家的关系进一步恶化。
结果只是你大方地请达人耍耍。
是抠还是大方，那要分是什么事儿。
个人意识从姓名上也会表现出来。
我现在正在和你相互激发，咔咔。
皇上您今天怎么有空到我这来啦？
村民带来的落地核桃果和枯枝。
在某种意义上，也许这并非危言耸听。
一直以来，人民币对美元升多贬少。
为了养活晓燕，夫妇俩背了不少债。
这是“翼装飞行”运动首次登陆中国。
你说的是那个娱乐圈的纪检委嘛？
寓言里的芦苇躲过了折断的命运，但这并不代表他比橡树更有力量。
喜欢色彩和图画的人大多喜欢简单而安静的生活，说的是你吗？
但谢景渊的窍仿佛保险柜的门，一时半会儿开不了，急得他没话说。
可以吃碗鸡汤馄饨，再吃一个水煮鸡蛋，营养又健康。
根据线索显示，郑某既有可能已经改名换姓，漂白身份。
记者看到，崔炳武当时经营的游戏室已经变成了服装店。
据知，霆锋不想家嘈屋闭，于是乖乖就范。
乌鸦说我真不幸，但实际上，他是因为运气吗？
给人感觉正像是“食草动物”，蔫得没脾气。
卡塔尔学校里有很多卡塔尔当地的学生。
最后，买衣服要懂得看尺寸、面料和材质。
不用说，手里的漏洞也是多的可以批发了。
操纵键盘的手用来搬运沙袋是否觉得亏？
巨大的雷鸣声一浪浪地滚来，大地轻颤。
老人面目全非，手里紧紧攥着一把狗毛。
自从使用软件后，赵某就成了“常胜将军”。
同时，大选的混乱也进一步证明了海地政治体系已完全瓦解。
本来李焜耀可拿出许多理由为自己开脱。
吃，吃，就知道吃，赚多少钱够你吃的？
该保安为记者打开电梯，“护送”记者下楼。
受此重击，林辉晃晃悠悠地倒在了地上。
有记载称，拱手礼在我国已有两千年历史。
寻常百姓的消暑饮品就此成为“奢侈品”。
化肥流通秩序混乱，乱抬价格的问题仍然存在。
六是黑恶势力对党政干部的拉拢腐蚀日益严重。
高地价项目的累累负债，对企业的营收形成重压。
本以为进八中是妥妥儿的，其他学校根本没考虑。
视频截图当事医生李荷纯的肩膀被铁棍戳伤。
民警希望邓金超及时联系本报热线九六二幺幺。
生活是开水，不论冷热，只要有适合的温度就好。
双手被细铁丝捆扎，脸色铁青，处于昏迷状态。
并且每次把瓶塞拉出来的时候都要大叫一声。
我还有几十年呢，反正总是差他半寸就追到他了。
昨天的迷雾河仍然湍急，不过车辆已经能够飞快地通过。
另外我们还能攒点钱做点小投资，生活压力也不至于太大。
上百名穿蓝棉袄、戴雷锋帽的大学生出现在验票口前。
能有答案就不是人生吧！
张亮心里回答正是老子，嘴上窘笑说：是吗？
在近百米的悬崖下，一条细细的裂缝横亘在选手眼前。
八月的奥运战场，必定会因多场强强对话的上演而更加精彩激烈。
金庸小说里总有一个风度翩翩、气质俊朗、武功超群的表哥。
玲玲表姐为记者提供了一份她和玲玲同学小伟的聊天记录。
卢起源对恢复卢宅面貌，甚至到了几乎执拗的地步。
从此，他开始独身一人闯海南。
以色列军队从入侵的黎村庄撤出。
最终小丽因不堪忍受，辍学离家出走。
最终结果是谢宏强赢了，另一家讨债公司被撵走。
他周日在网上发信息呼吁批评者让哈里“喘喘气”。
次日上午，又将该手机埋入苏家楼下的萝卜坑内。
有话就说，有屁就放，婆婆妈妈的哪像个爷们！
为此，英国路华公司将中国商评委起诉至法院。
用电商颠覆传统行业，占领垂直的服装市场。
这难道就是大名鼎鼎的中国漆王黄兴国吗？
麦克雷文是得克萨斯州人，出身于军人家庭。
可是，随着时间越来越晚，两人的要求也越来越低。
杨磊的弟弟杨坤在法庭上附和了上述说法。
自治区副主席靳诺看望踩踏事故受伤学生。
近一个月里，我没碰到传言中蛮横欺霸的灾民。
此前沙溢曾表示，结婚后肯定会马上要宝宝。
奥巴马访问亚太地区的时候开始明白这一点。
我再干一年多时间，这一年多的时间我能保证。
小姑娘说，她觉得吴斌叔叔“特别好，特别好”。
随后靳某又掐住高某的脖子将其按在地上。
小男孩额头上汗涔涔的，摸上去却没有发烫。
今天我来，就是同大家谈谈心，说说心里话。
记者看到，芒果树拦腰折断，断口参差不齐。
谢汉华说，当时他又惊又喜，心里也有了怀疑。
她高兴的时候喜欢聊天，有时不高兴还会噘着嘴。
养殖场的工作人员说，猪尾巴甩起来，就说明猪高兴。
榆次居民则声称是上网或听信邻居吆喝及朋友电话。
钱这种东西对机器人来说，永远没有知识和努力重要。
艾薇儿遭遇中国长城。艾薇儿的中国之旅可谓收获多多。
饿了忍着点嘛！不然真的会胖很多！
图片、产品介绍把整个展览大厅装点成一个缤纷的世界。
沙滩藤球融合了排球、足球、羽毛球等运动的特点。
青少年便于哄骗教唆，也是不法之徒首选的原因之一。
在看守所，他被取了化名，叫吴良，零九幺专案组的。
十二月二十九日，陈长海被二十七区检察院批准逮捕。
陈宇晖的父母当天在纽约曼哈顿出席新闻发布会。
国家统计局二零一零年的数据为零点四八一。
张志国的父亲也不停抹眼角，实在忍不住时只好一声长叹。
不然，今天是紫砂锅、豆浆机遭殃，明天没准儿又轮到谁了。
从目前情况看，宁波市第二医院的应对措施是及时妥当的。
钱荣摆开抄的架势道：一个私立中学，哈，这样子的试卷也要我来做。
根据古代墓志等资料总结，古代女子在十五到十九岁结婚为多哦。
对大赛推出的系列尺寸标准，周岑岑认为，有些难以接受。
强弱不以真正的实力来界定，而是以拥有的资源多少来界定。
记者准备再次漂洗，旁边的洗碗工催促着“可以啦，可以啦”。
司仪虽有发现诸葛梓岐不妥，但活动并未因此中断或改动。
购房合同摆在桌上，买家胡兵迟疑片刻，咬了咬嘴唇，签名成交。
三是要加快生态涵养发展区建设。
英吉利卷起“窃听风暴”，动摇了默多克父子在英国的商业根基。
当时发现的“化石”更准确地说是胚胎化石。
老爸说：是啊不能偏心你哥在干吗？
呵呵，看来你挺了解的，那你给我详细说说呗。
在内城之内的南半部，核心处耸立着秦始皇陵的高大封土。
她不会写字，于是就摁了手印。
说这个的你，会对我负责么。
有着金属栏杆的大门虚掩着。
带着你的爱我会睡的很香甜。
你吃过跳水皇后做的饭吗？
丑小鸭虽然在乡下，却有着远大的志向，一直在默默努力。
黄岩九峰公园的米筛井更是人满为患，上千人排队打水。
对它期望过高，“播下龙种，收获跳蚤”将很可能成为现实。
脸部伤势最为严重，有好几处已被缝合的伤口，惨不忍睹。
另外他那炯炯有神的眼光和威胁他人的表情也非常带劲。
对此，日本乒协表达了歉意。
路过此地的狐狸看见后，口水直流，很想把肉弄到手。
对此，反对党工党部分议员痛批“这根本是个奴隶计划”。
枪案发生后警方封锁了曼哈顿多条街道。
你若心苦，我是甘甜；你若心伤，我是欢颜。
嗨，艳丽，你怎么不把若男带来呢？
国民横菜！西红柿炒鸡蛋！
根据电磁学的基本原理，闭合的电路在磁场中运动可以产生电能。
刚看见个答题卡，我也说个。
老板给了他粑粑一小撮子弹，上膛，瞄准儿子的腿，嘭！
我和你爹商量给你请一个家教，好好给你补课！
之后，因为一捆铁丝，他被抓，妻子走了，家散了。
来来来，我是一个菠萝，萝萝萝萝萝萝！
你两岁了，妈妈却只为你过了一次生日。
他捋了捋胡须说：因为凌晨一点至三点是丑时啊。
二零一二年，双边贸易额为四点四九五八亿美元。
思想的飞跃给新会带来勃勃生机。
目前换股是一种可行的操作策略。
许先生憋着一口气，一路开车紧追。
我怕他们互相吵醒对方。
我明白了，原来你的胸就是那时候蹭没的！多么痛的领悟！
蚁丘附近密密麻麻地聚集了大小红火蚁以及一串串的蚁卵。
其一身邋遢的衣服，靠捡瓶子买年票观看北京国安的比赛。
死活不走，得让你挪开些。
当时离学校不过几十米远。
又一趟车安全地开到目的地。
宜家餐厅，一名阿姨在喝咖啡。
那头一句不信算了便挂了。
目前，正是它们从海口溯长江而上，产卵繁殖的高峰期。
一只猫跑到这棵树的树干上找到一个树洞，在那里生下小猫。
进行升级，给您带来不便请谅解，详询九五五六六。
这是家夫妻店，店主也希望多个帮手，就收留了他。
除了青椒，一些叶菜如上海青、黄瓜等，价格也较高。
城市人生活节奏改变了，会自己安排时间。
案中一名男子揿钱后忘记提取，折返后发现金钱已不翼而飞。
历史将永远记住同志们的杰出创造和奉献，党和人民感谢你们。
耶路撒冷是犹太教、基督教和伊斯兰教共同的圣地。
图为一只喜鹊在雪天觅食。
沙河市褡裢村项目现场。
现在是连我本人也抹掉了。
庆幸没像我爸我爸大方脸。
广西本地已有三四家企业具备批量生产莽草酸的能力。
五月七日，张五一坐在“潜艇”驾驶舱进行测试。
也许我们都该早点回到家乡，那里有我们的根。
凭什么若干年后分手的双方一定会在霓虹闪烁的街头重逢？
举世关注的八国集团首脑会议，九日在日本洞爷湖闭幕。
在一侧铁轨下道砟上，仍能看见血迹。
网上郭美美炫富照。
村民买的最多的是蜡烛，一次买好几捆。
而是张朝阳的“耻辱”。
你最近缺钱啦？
医生一看惊呆了。
他很缠我和老公。
那天还好奇的问爸妈了，可还是不懂。
恩，加油吧一起。
要知道先苦后甜啊。
他怎么不陪我玩了？
这个外面呆不得了。
车内安全气囊打开。
他们还在郁闷呢。
我们可没有戴面具哟！
谁就一小明星谁。
问这问题的人最。
蓝某得知后傻眼了。
这什么歌呀？
多谢捧场。呵呵。
别动，我还没看完呢！
我每天都要晨跑呢。
我不能洗澡哦！
你快乐，所以我快乐。
谁要不认识你。
因为戳到痛处了。
你这是不爱我了？
瞧小孙干的好事！
我觉得红树林不错。
把胡萝卜交出来！
谁会来接我的女儿？
志愿者亦受益匪浅。
欢迎来跟我们说说。
孟淑云当场晕倒。
日前，陈猛已被移送司法机关依法查处。
搓着搓着，我的手背上就搓出泥来了…
知道错了就好。
男友一两个月不主动联系我，是几个意思？
好的，电话接通中。
为什么要这样黑自己。
这个要求没有被允许。
我很注意颜面哒。
吴秀波到底是谁？
会不会有风险啊？
敷面膜喽。
叫你姐我干吗？
耿晓华向龚宇汇报。
国企利润也在下降。
无聊的时候想想我。
我吃惊地暗自思忖。
低下而平庸的产品肯定不能成为名牌。
既然异地超生有被重复征收的风险，那么，赴境外生子呢？
这一假设并不夸张。
警犬进东莞社区。
张洪松大喊起来。
我就是这样享受闷。
因为河水温度低，男子不停地哆嗦着。
这个讲法我认为是不符合实际情况。
明天（北京）暑气蒸人，（晴）。
擦嘴巴，拿来擦嘴巴的。
裴瑞兹称，此刻台湾地区民众情绪高昂，情势高度紧张。
是恶意骂女孩子的啦，你可不要学坏哦！
临走时袁宝洪拽下了梁莉莉的项链。
她凑近观察后，竟发现努比还活着。
他们被锁链拴在床上，接受极端主义观点的教育。
徐晓霞马上叫人找车把老人送到了乡镇卫生院。
本人代写小学生中学生暑假作业，价格面议包邮喔。
为养儿防老，王女士起诉前夫，欲讨回女儿的抚养权。
天骤然凉下，迟了两个月的秋雨终于普降大地。
王某冷不防被打得一个趔趄，不得不扶住楼梯。
可这位老太太不但没表示感谢，反而还不停地哄孙子。
阅览室里人头攒动，但鸦雀无声。
当时，妈妈把我紧紧搂在怀里。
经过仔细考察，我决定种南瓜。
然后引来周围的人在车上聚餐。
而恰巧的是，周鸿祎也是湖北人。
当晚，他和妻子入住番茄酒店。
最精彩的环节当属场内互动。
妈妈擦拭地板感动了很多人。
看到短信后，高某动了歪脑筋。
经医院检查，小玲为软组织挫伤。
纪念宫前广场聚集大批民众。
我们和开发商签一份委托协议，跑手续、盖房子，都由他们去做。
黑作坊内正在分装假冒水泥。
就在这时，她被朋友泼了冷水。
后面的私家车随即喇叭大响。
化妆盒材质为黄金、珐琅钻石。
小顾与方硕士是高中同学，高中毕业后未曾联系。
农业科技在广大西部农村的普及化程度很高。
徐强上前拉开两人，紧接着他和王华扯打起来。
玛莎拉蒂仅车头有小处凹陷。
德特勒夫对指控供认不讳。
而这些环节对于成本更为敏感。
接下来的时间里王攀像花木兰回到老家，梳妆打扮不停。
一些武装分子则骑着摩托车伴随左右，并不时高喊反以口号。
文章指出，陈水扁不会像有理念的政治犯，宁愿饿死也不屈服。
然而卫计委系统及其拥趸，却在全国“两会”后突然发动了“逆袭”。
他拿着照片仔细端详，猜测了多次才认出照片中的魏秋月。
护士怕人笑话，便把自己的尿样拿去化验。
而三一重工的泵车则是在本月二十二日起运。
占完座，一天都提不起精神，学习也没效率。
凤凰洞很可能是商族人用来祭祀的场所。
绑匪们见状，马上关掉洞里的照明设备。
打完工后，还是回村里来，盖新房、搞产业。
一名志愿者在给运输小狗的卡车洒水降温。
据主办方统计，目前报名员工已接近百人。
这是记者今天从国务院医改办公室获悉的。
小青已经成为李沁的一个真正的闺中知己。
见状，李某马上从卧室冲出，想出门逃生。
说好和我白头偕老的，你染发是几个意思？
此外，纪委确认，蔡彬的儿子已加入澳洲国籍。
大片的翠绿中点缀着紫红，有一种妖异的美。
他们就是流亡美国的世界各国的前皇族。
交叉作业，又使狭小的空间显得更为逼仄。
机器人要是累了会关机重启。
她要是我的朋友，我就劝她认了。
别拦我，我在下面打得顺手些！
我求婚的时候你别答应就行。
大爷特别喜欢在深圳的生活。
他想了想后，轻轻地“摁”了一声。
因为地下凿洞震动，水漏没了。
周尕建感觉事态严重遂立即向苦水镇派出所求助。
林州市第五人民医院是受此次停止供暖影响的一家医院。
与段奕宏的对话越深入，越能感受到他的正义凛然的气场。
在此过程中，李与业务员发生口角，随后相互拉扯推搡。
虽然特别想咬那块肉，但还是先忍住把周围的皮吃完。
记者跑来第一个问他：你们对暑假的训练有什么看法？
该中心没有透露胚胎干细胞具体来自哪些三甲医院。
而这款重磅产品面世后立刻得到了大众的追捧。
他说：“我觉得您怎么看怎么像我三大爷！考官昏死。
国内照明行业的领头羊雷士照明决定率先出击，进行自主研发。
香港“大公报”批评这是篇失操守的报道。
还输这么多，于是一个国家就被俺记住了。
平日里，他常常觉得“自己活得挺窝囊的”。
另据证实，德弘贸易实为佳兆业旗下公司。
进一步整合经办管理资源，提高运行效率。
周页面访问量为五点九零三亿，环比下滑百分之二点四。
中国驻坦桑尼亚大使馆正在协助坦警方调查此案。
今天中午吃饭，旁边有两小孩在斗嘴，男孩问：“你不喜欢我了吗？
陈致中说，邱毅一路闪躲、不负责的表现，只能躲在摄影棚内说。
前门地区还是老北京市井风貌、史迹文物保存最完整的地区之一。
无聊来和我聊聊天吧。
双方商定继续就此问题保持磋商。
而且，自己做的东西既健康又实在。
一头的长发铺下来快盖住了背包。
网上关于“秘密拘捕”的说法耸人听闻。
拜托，没有指甲，你会不会用脑子？
这显然也不是哈马斯所愿意面对的。
应采儿听了记者的转述后，颇为惊愕。
这不符合政策规定，应予查处纠正。
面对湘鄂情的颓势，机构渐生退意。
随后两人举起木槌，将婚戒砸碎。
数次询问医生鲁某，却回复没有大碍。
我是糗百妹子啊，不能给组织丢脸。
复查之后才发现痔疮只割了一半。
上周五为六点三八四零。
最后“初露”报上的编排是这样的，三篇散文一部小说一首诗。
强度低，用手抠可脱落。
事发枣营南里六号楼七零六室的一个小卧室。
原来，窗口和票贩子狼狈为奸，多得的钱平分。
其后，病人在复诊时被发现血钾水平偏低。
我刚刚过完十八岁生日。
这能不被世人笑话吗？
恳请大家评价此事件。
建议再斟酌，妥当修改。
真是好心赚了驴肝肺。
平时威风凛凛的咪咪被扯下了许多毛，身上也被抓伤了。
相信大家一定受益匪浅。
请知情者与快报热线八五幺零零零零零联系。
我们援助的结果是什么？
但凤凰县却是尴尬的。
是不是交不上房租，我们就要无家可归了主人？
我才不要被别人操纵呢。
电影垮了，我可以不心疼。
我是你一屎一尿带大的呀！
发廊店主情急之下躲入旁边花店，也未受伤。
会说三国语言的佳丽在决赛即兴问答环节表现尤其出色。
你拿了我的脑袋我就怕。
可是如果从礼仪文化本身来说，向长辈拱手是不合适的。
女友为他的男友做了件毛衣，很漂亮，谁见谁夸。
与其让老的伸着脖子挨打，不如让新人挺着胸膛去拼杀。
丹巴县林业局的同志感叹，这里真是太穷了。
一会儿，从路北又跑来一名男子，一下蹿进出租车。
应采儿肯定会收拾他的。
下了一个星期的雨了，每天待家里哪也去不了。
因此，这种人类胚胎干细胞还不具备实用性。
哈萨克斯坦总统已宣布该镇进入紧急状态。
强化房屋租赁登记备案。
然后被我问的那个人愣了，好一会儿才说：“我不知道啊，我刚到…”
网上的店家称，他们销售的奶粉是港版代购。
很难算出准确时间的。
持股的魅力究竟在哪？
但是也不会天天有活的。
他说：痛，我也懒得吱声。
这个宝宝真的很漂亮。
现场弥漫着一股焦臭味。
随行者，无不泪水滂沱。
反对者认为，提取胚胎干细胞相当于“扼杀”生命。
相关科学报告刊登在最新一期“自然通讯”上。
我没有不开心，就玩玩一下。
侯佩岑也跟着红了眼眶。
胥克方是妞妞的父亲。
但是，盛大网络的净利润在第二季度却暴跌。
遵命，我可以陪你一起去。
在外人看来，他讷于言辞，不会讲话，憨态可掬。
随后进入洱海湿地公园。
肇事车车头也损毁严重。
特朗普当天出席了晚宴。
而将持卡人多项重要信息“赤裸裸”曝光的，农行尚属首家。
琉球从此被日本吞并。
一个月后，抵制联盟瓦解。
一绑住规划，捆绑着卖。
昨日，消防员察看火场。
刘老师第一时间就发现返送有问题，立即摘掉。
舍得，舍得，有舍才有得；舍得，舍得，该舍的要舍，该得的要得。
市南三中旁光明目张胆的电脑房就有五家，外加上学习中心。
我得过肝炎，住了院，便休了一个学期的学。
比如，就有网友拿她“一开口我就哽咽了”的口头禅开涮。
四十三年前，时建锋就在这处破瓦房中呱呱坠地。
即便不爱看超级碗的人，也会在这个时候来数“星星”。
王君勇于负责的精神，深深感动了朱心文。
成蕙琳是朝鲜当时最性感的电影明星。
什么样的内容才能真正吸引人们上网呢？
五秒后，丈夫看到对面的格林太太在给她的宠物洗澡。
多聊聊你呗，我再考虑爆照！
小元“嘭”地关上房门，以示抗议。
是长得像香蕉一样的那群很萌的动画人物。
商品经济的年代，多少人无利而不往。
青海新闻网上，满是网友们的炽热感言。
我不是天天都涂粉底。
由其领衔编纂的“中国简帛书法大字典”也于今天正式启动。
小猫头鹰遭到突然“伏击”后，向后打了个踉跄，差一点儿摔倒。
岑、黄两人各分得两万多元。
老娘瞅瞅我说：我觉得也看不上，这事儿就算了吧。
导演朴根亨认为，年轻人的彷徨和挣扎往往是他们成长的过程。
何帆还躺在床上等他爸派车来接，见邱志杰在发呆，说：你在想谁？
当相关证据摆在吴苗面前，他先是一愣，继而面红耳赤。
某人的妻子脾气非常怪癖，她与家里的所有人都难以相处。
有的流浪狗吃完东西后，还会舔舔喂食人的手，以表示感谢。
所以，自己也来尝尝鲜。
即使我们祖上知道祖宗是曹操，也不会公开对我们说。
我说我嫁给你，嫁给你以后，你得听我的，你做得到不？
人们一旦抓住我，用对付你的方法，将会要我的命。
在等家人接机时艾薇儿索性坐在地上，理秀发不拘小节。
在栾城县红日永和豆浆店，记者看到了一块诚信监管牌。
王丹夹紧手包排在了人群中，铁栅栏把蛇形队伍分隔成四支。
棺材位置，墓主人的尸骨也渐渐显露出来，下颚还保留着牙齿。
这是吉米的第二次摩托之旅，此前，他曾骑摩托车环游过印度。
转头一看，一老奶奶冲我笑嘻嘻的说：小伙子，抓着你点，车晃。
主要题材有释迦像、弥勒像、释迦多宝像、观音像、双菩萨像等。
当然还是我们同仁堂的东西值得信赖啦。
此外，投资人仍存顾虑。
印度洋上正在出现中国将被捆住手脚的格局。
刘女士甩掉儿子手上的小蛤蟆，神情有些紧张。
泽尻英龙华自白演艺经历和与丈夫离婚的种种。
虽然作品没有大卖有点遗憾，但没关系啦。
在天津，市民也闻得到空气中呛人的味道。
在记者人数并没减少下，冗员自然产生。
他想搞明白“亲密关系”的范围到底有多大。
一横一竖、一点一撇，所有同学都十分工整地进行着写字练习。
其间，孩子打了一个嗝，但医生看完后，说是孩子睡觉打呼噜。
当时那个女生穿着牛仔裤，束着皮带，就乖乖把它解开了。
我们承诺尽全力确保信息通畅。
多以歌舞、僧侣祈福等方式来庆祝傣历新年。
桑塔纳紧咬不放，车速直至一百二、一百三十码。
孩子在我身上爬着玩，突然听到“咯，咯咯，咯”的敲门声。
建议你先找个土豪做朋友。
子贡赎买了一个奴隶，但他“发扬风格”，拒绝了补偿。
一审后，陈兴銮提起上诉。
我是萌萌哒，你是呆呆哒。
新华社社长李从军致辞。
这间终于有了反馈，他左铺放下书说：灵桥镇中学。
那段时间，为了安抚母亲，赵灿曾回到老家深泽县。
德法非常恼火，英国的立场让德法等国非常恼火。
说到嗨时，周围一群年轻白领纷纷露出“石化”表情。
更何况，孩子的成长环境中，软调暴力也从未断绝。
上面写有名字、出生年月等信息，但现在都搞丢了。
多名民意代表拉扯成一团。
于是张某掏出了身上带着的电线，将黄老太勒死。
等我长大了，可以为一个新生命负责时再养了。
但奥迪车里的人态度比较蛮横，双方僵持不下。
昨日早盘，欧洲股市延续本周二的升势止跌反弹。
电话那头沉默了一会儿幽幽到：“采取了，我拍了张照片…”
但是，偷工减料的广告牌根本扛不住台风。
办事处领导得知此事后，要求山西大厦严肃处理。
我和璧媃是燕京大学的同班同学，她比我小七个月。
虽则如此，也要加以规范，不能任由泛滥，谬种流传。
北京京西宾馆华灯璀璨，洋溢着欢庆祥和的气氛。
有一些不能完全归纳为干扰阻碍，有一些是认识不一致。
指定的日期到了，所有的鸟都一齐来到宙斯面前。
这位在战场上驰骋沙场的士兵却无法忍受贫民生活。
而按照农村风俗往往是结婚时男方出房子，女方出嫁妆。
他认为是养父母在亲戚的怂恿下，和自己断了收养关系。
结婚多年后，夫妇俩想要一个孩子，但一直未能如愿怀上。
事实上，伴随着上海退休者越来越多，亏空也会越来越大。
点心今日还推出点心通讯录、点心盒同步等新功能。
看到熟悉的护士姐姐，孩子会咧咧嘴，无声地笑起来。
柿子树上结的柿子都是黄登登的，拨开了核儿都是黑的。
如何沟通？怎么沟通？渐渐成为我们日思夜想的主题。
除了上自己专业开的课，穆鹏还喜欢到别的专业“蹭课”。
何晓顺透露，美儿的父母还捐赠出她的角膜和肾脏。
昔日的网坛女皇怎么被别人告上了法庭呢？
欧洲和日本在衰退边缘挣扎之时，支撑起全球经济的增长。
符淙斌院士正是在此领域取得了令人瞩目的成就。
他的办公桌上总是堆满了学生作业、试卷，经常废寝忘食。
我赶紧登录到的淘宝，杯具啊，收货地址居然默认的是她。
信寄出后，王霄觉得世界茫然一片，心麻木得停止了跳动。
文章没有任何事实依据，随意贬损自己名誉，侵犯自己名誉权。
大批记者留守泽尻妈寓所楼下，希望能采访到第一手资讯。
海关总署积极拓展和优化加工贸易的产业结构调整等等。
钱荣突然跑到他面前说：告诉你一个消息，我要去追姚书琴！
男子好像并不解气，又要拎着垃圾桶再砸，被人阻止。
我相信小孩子也不希望妈妈每天都在家对他啰嗦吧。
但近段时间天气真的很清透爽朗，可以放心地晒衣物。
熊猫有爪子，我总是告诉我的粉丝要秀出他们的爪子。
葛老太很感激，要把芹菜送给好心人，但被人们婉拒。
我家的母老虎才可怕呢！
如果帅是一种罪，那今天主人你已经罪恶滔天了。
我们从黄海之滨，向青藏高原，向世界屋脊，发去我们最好的祝愿。
广州女性痔疮患病率居首，其次顺位排序是北京、上海、深圳。
是凉拖，还是带跟的。
我们城市的复苏有赖于他强有力的政策。
这样做的依据就是苏人通二三七号文件。
这将会很大程度的缓解养老金的缺口。
为什么几封诬告信就有那么大的破坏力？
刚买的裤子不到十分钟你就弄破了。
因此，只能以最笨的方式，不断以卵击石。
两人错车之际，毛爹爹突然摔倒受伤。
同时，牧民就业渠道窄，收入增长缓慢。
女明星也是平凡人，你以为在娱乐圈拍戏赶通告很容易吗？
许多道理，人们已经证明过千遍万遍，为什么还要带着侥幸的心理再去试验一回呢？
昨天，他向成都商报记者娓娓道来。
林峰与多位年青模特儿拿起道具蛋糕合照。
对于无利可图的客户渠道，也把它们掐断了。
美军为何还迫不及待地要动用第四步兵师？
而移民与关卡局已展开调查，掌握两人的罪证。
为了多挣几个法郎，他每周超负荷地工作。
为了让丈夫清清爽爽，常女还学会了理发。
只知道评论春光的人，春光不会与他同行。
据了解，予园公馆是民国名医刘建勋的旧居。
后面的话她已经听不到了，不减肥宁可死！
惊魂一刻过后，他回想起是登山杖没拧紧。
吸水、吸尘、去污、隔音、保护主机毯等功能。
被射杀东北虎的“老公”寂寞地趴在铁笼内。
有时忙起来了，没零钱一连几天都不收我钱！
乘七四一路赶火车的乘客，最好提早出发。
有些加入了“棒棒军”，肩挑竹竿从事货物运送。
但他们很支持，允许我把这句话放到网站上。
以前所办的展览等不属于故宫管理。
但是家暴哇，她也有女的打男的的时候。
期间，妞妞一直大哭，但丹某没有停手。
冰雪尚未融化，重建电网的步伐已开启。
发现工作人员态度蛮横的，要严加惩处。
那些喜欢挑点毛病、说点闲话的人，也话不多。
由于火场上风力不断加大，又加速了可燃物燃烧。
快走到地边时，远远看到地塄后搁着一件“花衣裳”。
废弃猪肉在土锅里熬炼，黑色的猪油流到桶里。
如今，葛启义的装饰公司走入了正轨，生计无忧。
卵子是从基因库挑选的，来自一个匿名的女子。
但如果缺乏资金，却很难吸引优秀的软件人才。
二氧化硫添加在食品中主要起漂白和防腐作用。
一位市民说：“惊醒后听见了房屋被摇动的吱吱声。
结果因此没瞅见前面的电线杆子，一头栽上了。
测井技术，对石油勘探的效率和质量至关重要。
有人发出这样的疑问：贩毒、制造假药，没有人管吗？
每天大部分时间，她都呆在绣架前埋头绣花。
而到夏季候鸟北飞，又可能在亚洲北部带来疫情。
逼仄的巷道两旁，林立着小手工作坊的招牌。
但是，现实中，最终一般都难以获得宽裕的赔偿。
生孩子也很累啊，不要在意是谁的了，好吗？
正是这著名的风筝实验成就了他电学之父的地位。
忠县有两千三百年历史，是巴文化发祥地。
有时桌子上输红了眼，娱乐成了怄气，也不好。
我还没养过宠物呢，不过倒是很想尝试一下。
据悉老太太独自一人居住，身边无人照顾。
百名将军植树已成为义务植树活动的典范。
寒假作业变了味，都是功利实用主义惹的祸。
有次朋友一起打麻将三缺一有个朋友带个不认识的朋友来我们问他会玩吗？
刘先生觉得不对劲儿，掀开被子一看，王慧已经断气，随即报警。
自己看看，你这肚子哪像二十几岁，四五十岁都不止吧！
别沮丧，活出精彩才是对讽刺最好的还击，蹲下来，给自己一个拥抱。
昨日，北京奥运会开幕式导演之一的王潮歌透露了这一消息。
如将富裕的电力卖给国家电网，比种地的效益要提高好多倍。
听到此话，解某和韩某很气愤。
人们呵，我们还能再开大龙头，让清凌凌的自来水昼夜长流吗？
迄今为止，他仍然笔耕不辍。
我闺女让我给她买好吃的呢。
超市里雀巢米粉卖得不错。
朱镕基同志感到有很大压力。
宫内整洁利索，廊柱门窗颜色鲜艳，几名电工正在维修线路。
登上摩天轮，游客们能俯瞰自由女神像，眺望曼哈顿天际线。
这是藏民的顶礼。
再说了，我把手机还给你，我不就是自投罗网，我傻呀。
对于上述投资，天籁寺的僧人们表示一无所知。
只是三一方面苦于没有确凿证据。
张颖清创立的学科受高度评价。
买瓶饮料，瓶盖上写的“再来一瓶”。
扰攘半年，最终被判罚款了事。
我的孙女说她现在不愿意去上学。
他身材矮小，颧骨突出，留着小胡子，说话一口浓重的福建口音。
其实，“田星”就是智障者吕天喜。
与异性接触的机会多，吃醋了没？
很快，张某儿子的工作安排妥当。
大摩首席经济学家王庆泽认为，目前的潜在冲击是可以控制的。
我喜欢运动，但是很少打篮球呢。
临近年底，各种补贴纷至沓来。
同样的，后悬尺寸也进行了缩短。
背部的巨痣因此被蹭烂好多回。
我挺在乎粉丝的，偶尔也会发个帖。
一只参赛公鸡爪子上装着小刀。
前些年出现了“洗澡蟹”“透气蟹”等各类打着“阳澄湖”招牌的湖蟹。
女人，体验着痛苦而幸福的时刻。
吴奇隆称当制作人吃力不讨好。
在“干垃圾”桶内，却放着鸡蛋壳。
但是，四月福雷再次当选总统，并引发了国内的暴力冲突事件。
展览将对全体观众实行免费入场，提供义务讲解。
会后，绿色立委表示，相信总统合乎逻辑的说法。
就刚刚，去超市买烟，目测有一个正太四五岁的样子。
出事后，该咋管理农村散养的犬只，我们也很头疼。
此外，吃饭还得花钱，咱河北人就土豆、茄子、西红柿，吃菜老三样。
科普活动结束后，精选出版了“人文之窗”一书，受到广大读者的欢迎。
在未来五天里，都有降雨，外出记得带好雨具。
在齐齐哈尔，良好的生态环境，让丹顶鹤来这里休养生息。
县城里也没有出现抢购食品等现象。
十年是一串串脚印，十年是一个章节。
双氧水的用途是给牛蹄、牛耳朵漂白。
演出结束后，朱镕基接见全体演职员。
奥巴马总统驳斥这一说法实属荒唐。
迫使林萃路“肠梗阻”的房屋已被拆除。
一些烟囱被削掉了，更多烟囱立起来。
没办法，只能选择出行，躲躲风头。
放屁！你告诉老娘哪里脾气爆了？
原来她躲起来玩微博，与友人大谈星座。
然后，她穿上一件全身白色的丧服。
小郑表姐就在中秋节找到婆家的。
更棘手的是，妞妞的腹腔感染严重。
我最近注意到，网上对发改委议论颇多。
不过这个梦想一时半会儿也很难实现。
如果在信息很难传达到的山区呢？
此时，民警郭更军的裤子有了剐蹭。
请考虑在中情局的全球任职机会。
四年之后，他们的巨星地位依旧稳固。
新一轮投资盛宴熙熙攘攘，皆为利来。
街坊们纷纷猜测警方可能要强攻。
随后，穿上袜子和鞋，和朋友出门了。
不夸张地说，它将关系医改的成败。
去吧去吧，明天记得再来找我报道。
我不要粉丝了，支持我就多转发此帖。
这里比较隐蔽，又臭，很少人来这里。
学到乘除法时就会背九九乘法表。
三是搞好宅基地退出的资金筹措。
有网友问，能不能回忆几件刘洋在学校里的趣事或糗事。
资料显示，京沪高铁廊坊段全长三十点三四二公里。
老子出气，儿子泄气，灵珊说：我反正不用功，我不念了！
踏入花坛者，罚款三元！
第三天，小东发热、咳嗽，妈妈赶紧带他去当地的镇医院就诊。
司立垚告诉记者，电动三轮车在快递市场的生命力非常旺盛。
此外，搭售被“叫停”，利用理财产品高息揽储的现象也将被遏制。
六是创新思维，推出常规的节事活动，增强体育赛事的创意和设计。
猝不及防的他急退两步。
如果不能从这一箭看到猎人的勇武，那这头狮子就笨蛋到家了。
这样的调整方式，比较稳妥。
说英语好难哦，我正在学习中。
办法”规定了农产品增值税进项税额核定方法。
最后含着泪问了句，谁家的熊孩子叫西早不大三个土…
对于与应采儿的婚姻，他很有自信的说，结婚就是一辈子的事。
俺们三年大学净算数学题了！
现在连机器人也要被催婚了吗？
刚弄了个非常好吃的肉包子。
这种担惊受怕的日子何时了？
最后还要经过刷、洗才能烹饪。
当然是忙着学习变得更棒喽。
她睡里边的屋，我睡外边的沙发。
正好区委里的一个内部刊物要人，林父荣升编辑，便举家搬迁。
到珲春，首先感受到的是珲春人的那份自豪感、使命感。
这就意味着，今后，公民可以不参加驾校培训，而直接“裸考”驾照。
他舍不得花一分钱，都把钱攒起来给母亲治病。
当然这不能全怪张艺谋，只怪自己知识太贫乏。
这绝对是受到了她拍摄的惊悚片“紫宅”的影响。
在富士康，一天开会，工长问他为什么总是笑眯眯的？
因为红番茄外面是红的，然后其实番茄里面也是红的。
禅师拿出了一个叉子，什么也不说，年轻人恍然大悟！
今晚你再这样，睡沙发去！
设在河道中央的筛洗点。
不发表意见，仅表示支持。
他刚才还幸灾乐祸，现在自己也遭到同样不幸的命运了。
很快，阿城公共安全专家局会宁派出所民警就赶到了。
照片中李弘基和张根硕两人站在中间，做可爱咧嘴状。
不少围观者好言相劝，小伙不但不听，嘴里还骂骂咧咧。
语无伦次说出小丽惨死消息，随即向松桃县公安局报警。
那天是一年一度的高考，上午考完后，小明说考的非常烂。
不管现实多么繁复和冗闷，他都要时常去往另一个世界。
与此同时，销售回暖使房企的资金压力得到极大缓解。
转念想这种想法不免偏激，上海的教育不代表中国的。
杨幂当之无愧的人气女星，蹿红速度和打击面难以企及。
狄付栓当即就找到了同村的光棍汉冯某，冯某表示同意。
面对“玉米”的热情，似乎有些疲惫的李宇春表情一直有些木讷。
目前，周边各省市的长途车站已实行实名购票，进站安检。
由于无法进入指挥部，他们甚至和栅栏对面的保安“顶起了牛”。
网友“小讨厌周”说，还好我们的每次假期回来都会拆下来洗哦。
这次奥运工程建设可以说是我们各项环保新技术应用的大全。
事后，张健被诊断右股骨颈处骨折，在医院进行了手术治疗。
你这个月工资都没上交你是不是养小三了！
我们老班没那么严，还特别好，他会帮你下一些富有教育意义的电影。
我们联系好了拉萨那边，有两个驴友会做好接应。
它瞪大眼睛，咆哮着发出呜呜声，用爪子保护食物。
有完没完？开着车呢，别惹我，要出了事故怎么办！
昨早上刘志敏便现身灵堂打点，儿子与媳妇也到场。
在新年的第一场高考较量中，考生将迎来一场酣战。
著名的乒坛老将庄则栋是当年“乒乓外交”的功臣。
您还记得那些被田川称为亲兄弟的防暴队员吗？
冲突中，其中一方的帮手误将一名看热闹的市民打伤。
但我们总不能旅游的时候也揣个户口簿吧，太麻烦了。
照片中领导站在石头阴影下，但脸上光线仍明晃晃的。
届时，南京将成为全国最大的北斗产业应用发展基地。
她并不知道已经怀孕，一直以为是长胖了。
据民警介绍，起火地点为兰考人袁厉害家。
从第二天开始，她天天上山陪女儿说会儿话。
这意味着，就算国美电器增发获得同意，黄家也有钱扛过去。
除了帐篷，小板凳、雨伞、棉袄、手套以及棉帽等也都纷纷上阵。
这孩子随手从兜里拿出一元钱说：我给你一元钱，你再让我看会儿行吗？
而且报名动作要快一点的，这个班很多人报的。
王朝柱，纯朴得近乎木讷，勤奋得足不出户。
发送完毕后，仔细读了一遍，感觉明年我可能又要一个人过情人节了…
要回答这个问题，首先必须弄清楚平准基金入市干预的目的。
京津高速最突出的优势和亮点在于直通天津港集装箱码头。
我能告诉你们早晨我爸出门跟我说，让我中午自己吃泡面吗？
汪洋强调，要在队伍保障上攻关。
闹了半天，您敢情是夜叉。
八十人的威风锣鼓表演展示了草原人民的风采。
我略懂。但是还不太会！
可见，“好好学生”也不能要。
警察将锦玺送回家，但倔强的吴海南不愿意开门。
在“脸谱”所有员工中，工程师获得的回报最为丰厚。
我们是拎水到这来洗澡。
倔强的父亲依然在路上。
春磊哼一声，说：才副的？
而邱贻可、陈玘等老主力更是显得蹉跎了许多。
游行自一九二四年举办以来，今年已是第八十六届。
哦，这可是个难熬的日子。
因为我真记不清楚谁在那儿。
抢劫的主意是董某出的。
或者，电动车也可以绕行。
我也是一个无耻的台湾人呐！
他只称太太亦很信任他。
后来，女青年被民警拉上警车带往派出所醒酒。
直到我走到了他们开始咳嗽的地方，我也咳嗽了！
龙虎网记者将继续关注。
王菲到香港大出血，在名店狂扫两大袋战利品。
尼泊尔发生雪崩的地点。
我们出来看，他还吼我们。
脚上是棉布袜子和皮鞋。
艾芙隆的儿子说，她的母亲因肺炎，病逝在曼哈顿。
兄妹俩收拾好铺盖，用架子车拉着父亲去上学。
不是累了，不是够了，是知道父母有多不容易了。
深圳市人大代表翁晓波则表达了不同的观点。
嫖资就是受贿数额大小。
为何没有一家中国企业作为本届亚运会的赞助商呢？
改组规模预计仅限数人。
打扫屋子是对自己负责，如果有手，我一定来帮你。
巩俐、张国荣戛纳旧照。
大人们不懂我们的世界。
别，我醒了——周子瑞急道。
这里资源富饶，景色宜人。
就是故意摆弄，是故意冤枉。
冰面上也逐渐热闹起来。
也许是觉得那个姑娘比较矮小，李勇燕仍没有回信。
我说：我去厕所冷静冷静。
主要用作漂白剂、防腐剂。
不妥当处，各位朋友海涵。
这么简单有什么不会的。
曲调是现成的，东北人都能哼哼几句的二人转。
上海的湖泊大多沾染了上海人的小气和狭隘。
贵族、朝廷命官的死刑处法，则多是赐死免刑。
这可是开天辟地头一回。
患者术后上十天仍在流血，应该是其痔疮所致。
但愿他的忏悔是真诚的。
你长个眼睛是出气的吗？
很矮的，带着一个小孩子。
该车前后车牌已被摘掉，交警正检查车辆情况。
真是的，非要我放下身段。
鬼使神差，这次阿兵拿出了真实身份证用于登记。
其中最快行动的当属天猫的老冤家京东商城。
整个车厢都是那个味儿，俺只坐了一站赶紧换车了。
母河马在水中咧着大嘴，好像在小游客们“咆哮”。
该车司机是西安人吕某。
严禁挤占、挪用教师编制。
这个分析基本公允中立。
我们是星星幼儿园的小朋友。
传说是文殊菩萨的变身。
第二天收上作业，老师盯着他的作文久久不能言语。
没想到，男方的这句话，一下子惹怒了女方。
同时，还可以观看新版的电影“庐山恋二零一零”。
我不是很上相，不过我最满意我的眼睛啦，你呢？
冷漠、过河拆桥，辛文从回忆里拽出这些字眼。
有危险的地方不要让学生清扫，比如擦窗户。
园里游人稀少，最大的参观团就是张华三人。
陈洪只好请了两个棒棒，把母亲抬回了家。
谢某和袁某惊醒，猛地站起来，过来抢瓶子。
请写下您的姓名、详细通讯地址、邮政编码。
品管部对生产部门的产品具有一票否决权。
还在恨嫁的女同学们，是时候学点儿技能了。
莫名被刺伤，倒霉的许奎真正是“躺着也挨刀”。
被指摆拍的挑水老人跪求政府修路画面。
记者了解到，九百八十九号企业为贵州茅台。
有报导说，托德还是肯塔基州的一名通集犯。
阿杰让阿悦看下剩下的盒饭合不合他的胃口。
渐渐地，李强的评价变成了“不开窍”、“窝囊废”。
朱镕基参加清华大学百年校庆时曾向广大同学推荐过此书。
国强才能国宁，贼才不敢惦记。
因为家庭不可能割舍，事业可以等待下一波。
他说，外地乳企可以到双城经营，参与竞争。
有人甚至扛来楼梯，搭在围墙上四处张望。
第四就是选择颓废。
有儿有女了，很满足了。
走吧，带上我爬山去。
该消息一出，城投债市场随即进入拐点。
难道你要抛弃我了嘛？
大面积干裸的河道。
不错么，还在，真好。
曾经也有少量的番茄。
利维否认了这一报道。
所以很敏感、很复杂。
前天娜娜因跳楼后伤势过重，已不治身亡。
他不仅自己吸毒，而且把儿子也带了进来。
例如，“愤怒的小鸟”就是“你画我猜”的模板。
公司负责人的年度薪酬增长率应低于公司薪酬增长率。
他没下车，又看见外国人朝路人嚷嚷。
现在已经间隔五十九年，明显超期了。
这一环节的税收、杂费和繁冗的手续让不少代购者铤而走险。
南京现在急吼吼要拆报亭，城市管理者的水平让人不敢恭维。
投资时，必须同时有远见卓识和实在的数据支撑。
不喜欢教育，但思想觉悟还没到推翻现行教育体制的高度。
有时候是很机智地装怂。
他依然记得梦露当时给他一个“暖暖的”拥抱。
为了壮胆，赶紧拿出随身携带的鞭炮燃放。
十二日，欧元对美元的比价是一比一点三五九三。
春江水暖雅先知，我可以告诉你明天穿什么。
在事发的幺四零二室门口还有大摊的血迹。
碧塔塔瓦巨蜥有特殊的体色标记和性器官。
市公安局的微博开得最早，因此人气儿也最足。
小队完成不了任务，领导者也要付出代价。
老公很没情调的问老婆：“说嘛你想要啥！
当年总收入为人民币七十一点五四五亿元。
医生，请您再查一…你是医生还是我是医生？
马云有一零二年的计划，我有三零年的计划。
最近感觉他消停一些了，我也觉得我可以出来了。
她又抓住售票员的包包，但售票员掰开她的手指，拼命跑下车。
挑起砖后，扁担就深陷在这道痕迹里，后背上则堆起一道肉。
新婚夜那天晚上，他喝得酩酊大醉，我俩几乎是合衣而眠。
除非有通天的能力，但天会随时随地帮你降雨灭火吗？
一个远在祖国西北角的业余作者的作品何以得到你们的青睐？
于是，她便打电话询问家中是否有事。
分娩池像个大浴缸，有坐垫脚垫，两侧还有把手。
被称赞了真开心呀。
男童在车后玩耍。
你想玩点什么？
你看过我家保险柜？
你也好烦呀。
你的第一选择是谁？
你喜欢玩什么游戏？
吃各种精神食粮。
是八届省委委员。
我只喜欢看小说。
香港杜莎夫人蜡像馆，我强力推荐哦。
第六、七、八、九项任务属于加强完善企业金融支持。
这年头机器人不会上网还怎么出来混呢？
我以前就做过翻译，这次是重操旧业，于是痛快地答应了。
我身上终于有一点主人的气质了。
这并不是拍脑袋作出的决定。
邓丽的心碎了，天天以泪洗面。
刘金耀教授在为成成进行检查。
不过此番小偷好像走得匆忙，还把一把铁扳手落在了店里。
这些年如果不是我在中间的话，陈明亮早就被忠矮儿除掉了。
至此，与中国基建合作的佛山芭蕾雨项目，首创置业完全退出。
随手拍张罗女士海淘的物品，都是当下最热门的幼儿保健品。
直到东窗事发，才知道怂恿她卖淫的“王院长”竟是自己的丈夫。
家里买了不少种油茶的书，可光看书，枯燥不说，还不好懂。
昨日，金锋表示，在节目中的言论未经过验证，有失严谨和妥当。
该店是明码实价，也提供不同优惠，精明的消费者懂得选择。
随后，由两名身材略为矮小的消防官兵进入驾驶室进行营救。
不少人因此认识了广州，记住了海心沙，向往珠江边的璀璨。
这几句话如恐怖片里的恐怖音乐，加深了雨翔的局促不安。
可以做到不刷牙、不整理头发、也不穿鞋子、甚至不换袜子。
不能将政府应当承担的补贴作为财政包袱甩给老百姓。
崭新的楼房高高耸立，然而一望可知，许多房子仍在空置。
橘黄的灯光映着街景，雨翔心里浮起一种身在异乡的冷清。
如果真是沉了就拆，修了又沉，这铁路能不能保证安全呀？
机长还说：“中国人太容易搞掂啦，告诉他是免费的即可。
几年之后，那个门槛竟然被我们弟兄两个踏凹下去一块。
房价的“高坝”正在从大户型开始瓦解，并向中小户型蔓延。
就像篮球，充满气就砰砰有力，如果瘪了，也就打不起来。
即将到来的新生命也让可儿看起来更加妩媚、更加性感。
这是佛顶骨舍利重光后首次在中国内地以外地区供奉。
小陪你度过这漫长的黑夜。
玉米香精比甜蜜素更“厉害”。
现在这种颓势也正在产业链的各个环节中有所体现。
进货时工厂跟我说是纯棉的，我摸起来也不像。
女驾驶员不乐意了，嘴里开始骂骂咧咧的。
南投县日月潭缆车全部暂停，目前正在疏散游客。
因为工作原因经常得罪人，他也经常受到辱骂和围攻。
婀娜的体态让人丝毫看不出，她几个月前刚刚生完宝宝。
这堵“死亡墙”上弹孔累累，这里是纳粹处决犯人的地方。
领导纠结了，领导媳妇儿急眼了，发短信的女下属无语了。
就哄着乐乐，乐乐也安静下来了，并没有出现任何症状。
只要像以前一样踏踏实实地干，一定能恢复过来。
街上空留下了神色匆匆的行人。
爸爸端详一会说：“我发誓，这是我见过的最帅的光头。
坐上电梯后，它抖抖突然掉下来了，没有任何先兆。
不料六次采光仅做了三次，她的脸上就起满疙瘩。
喜欢每一个爱生活的人呢。
凯姆博伊自己在肯尼亚也是一名警察。
金花香，银花香，关键沾了科技的光。
葛伟胜把车子停在离厕所近的地方。
朱燕来，中国前任总理朱镕基的女儿。
小雪问老爸：爸，有没有比较恐怖的书？
陈水扁以三跪九叩的方式进入灵堂。
儿童缺碘会导致智力低下、身材矮小。
哪个女孩子如上海的雪，也算她完了。
好玩，去看苏州园林呀，感受小桥流水。
女孩子的年龄怎么能轻易告诉你呢。
医生对小秦抢救时发现小秦已经死亡。
昨日，江夏的孙先生就“涮”了回骗子。
我迅速下来了，结果被妈妈打了一顿。
二号寝室里三个人都躺在床上温书。
几天后他就迎来了更加辉煌的胜利。
从此哥懂得了一个道理，做人要诚实。
香港回归一周年的纪念日即将来临。
疼痛难忍的王丹丹随即也躺倒在地。
名嘴与央视的歧路迟早会暴露出来。
你首先要找几个经不起捏的软柿子。
三人下班后都与麦克布赖德通短信。
店员：“从来没装过毒品，消的什么毒！
商人很实在，当然知道文化可以生财。
历史，靠遵化人的热血和汗水写就。
这是一天内第二起儿童摆弄枪支致人丧生事件。
而刘某正从东向西倒车，直接将老太剐倒在地。
余某上前护夫被南某拦住去路，两人扭打起来。
郭宏定介绍，其中的“一、三、五主要就是指公租房。
怪不得古人常说“近朱者赤””，我现在确实越来越像主人了。
经诊断，昊昊被确诊为哮喘，并在之后数周内多次进行诊治。
还有他在私下其实比较邋遢，像犀利哥一样。
当时已是市人大代表的肖幼美贴出竞选海报，以社区居民身份参选。
案件判决后，社会效果好。
她这才抡起刀子，这属于激情犯罪，并没有主观恶意。
此帖立即在网上引起热炒。
你的头顶都秃成什么样子了，跟我商量过吗？
随后，狗主人连续“出招”，甩耳光、用脚踹、拽头发，殴打女店长泄愤。
一审法院显然混淆了这三个关系。
该案目前已进入移交法院起诉阶段。
他，穿了一件松垮垮的红色衬衫。
然后就出门了，留下错愕的老婆。
苏静没有点滴的兴奋，倒是苏母惟恐天下不知，四处打电话通知。
工程现场，有工人在烈日下打夯。
女：我看到一辆宝马才不到两百万。
八零后的月光族应该如何理财呢？
他说：“京剧讲究的是琴师、司鼓。
吃苦耐劳、连续作战的作风咋样？
看到这个横幅，许多人热泪盈眶。
另外，人工“堵点”将加派警力疏通。
我一报告你逃夜，就得处分，没告你挺好了，看一封信有什么了不起了？
两国元首高瞻远瞩，开创了中美关系的新局面。
全球第一座乒乓球拍造型的体育宾馆效果图。
老师：再想一想，经常拿一把剪刀，在花丛边溜达的是什么人？
他不但大声吵嚷，还打坏了店内很多物品。
有媒体直言，这样露骨的教育“不仅无用，而且有害”。
我一切都好，您大可不必操心。
森林公安赶到后，将鸟网拆除。
都快成年了还不知道还手啊！
比如“前少奶奶”周迅和张雨绮。
那样的日子简直不敢想象呐。
今晚等着你媳妇和你拼命吧！
我当时愣在那半天不知咋办。
一些官员听完后，觉得获益匪浅。
再说咱这里一样没有水，打扫起来更花工夫。
东湖城管队员在扫雪。
旁边一位中年男子见状，抡起档口附近的凳子，将范某打跑。
抗议示威者声称将解放首都的黎波里。
有没有发现我喜欢背影照，不过我相信你心里已经有我的轮廓了。
杨国胜被烧得像个“黑人”，衣服跟皮肤粘在一起。
那时候我们俩真是贫贱不能移啊！
是吗——李志清说着屁股又哪一寸。
宣誓结束，国旗缓缓退出会场。
就算无语，我也会一直陪着主人的哦！
人类如何才能摆脱毁灭的命运？
谁能出任俄罗斯队新的主教练？
其他的来自于精神病诊所或医院。
同时，街道经多方走访求证，最终确认了救人者就是冯世艮。
只要没有太多的杂念，就能体会到真正的快乐啦。
今年就有驴友建议尽快立法将旅游日假期常态化。
争执中赵某遂用双手掐住官某的脖子致其死亡。
岛上有韩方建造的灯塔、海岸哨所和码头等设施。
图中有一处明显错误，即没有把台湾划为中国的领土。
谢先生通知了滑雪场工作人员，并送儿子去了医院。
改扩建国博不会是为了展示这些奢侈品文化吧？
本来去调解纠纷的，碰巧把这名逃犯揪出来了。
但在肆虐的沙尘、沙暴面前，计划变成昙花一梦。
这股旋风向他的对面快速移动，彩钢板也跟着跑。
面对同样倔强的父亲，巍子无可奈何只得百依百顺。
我赶紧翻钱包，完了，就剩五毛了，报警吧，手机呢？
当天美元兑日元也上涨一点零三，报七十八点六七。
孙兴恳请公众把信任重新交回到自己的手上。
别人有背景，我们只有背影；别人在旅游，我们在梦游。
借助这种增长动能，我们将能保持市场领先地位。
可“筹来”的那点钱妹妹做几次透析就都花光了。
汉子身后的土墙上，钉着一张硬白纸片，煞是惹眼。
上车的时候挂一档起步，考官突然来了一句：加油！
此外，患者可有烦渴、出汗、流涎、四肢肌肉痉挛、呼吸困难等症状。
我宁愿给狗吃，也不给他留！
有什么不会的，尽管问我吧。
硬朗的车身腰线，从车前大灯处起一直刚劲有力地延伸向后。
二二十一一十五号目前是某交流协会办公地点。
昨日，记者与打出广告收购卵子的中介见面。
在当地村民眼里，毛献弥是一个有些执拗的人。
大叔下场时拍了拍姚明的肩，一切尽在不言中。
教室里已有几个人，暑假的练笔作文刚发下来。
此时，一名警察单手别在身后，手中握有一锤子。
树仁兄可惜晚生了一百年或者早生了一百年。
当时争论的问题仅仅是该不该在湖底铺膜。
因为知道自己的失败与无能，于是想办法去克服。
王蒙、贾平凹、冯骥才等著名作家曾历任会长。
目前，消防队员只能探身水泥管，一点点刨掘。
男孩呆坐在地，不时抱起脚趾头，轻轻咬一口。
等车过程中记者发现，不少黑车便蠢蠢欲动。
依法被限制人身自由或剥夺政治权利的除外。
获得一定分数的外籍人士将被视为“高级人才”。
这种长程巡弋飞弹的目标是对准哪个国家？
最后循环利息相加，得出一百二十点零零五五元。
比如说提倡艰苦奋斗这并不意味着我们要穿打补丁的衣服。
有你在身边陪伴的日子，感觉每天都像度假一样开心呢。
钱花得值，老百姓也愿意解囊。
德国历史悠久、文化璀璨，素有“诗人和哲学家国度”的美誉。
高炘展示巩俐的鼓励短信。
不仅仅速度快，而且质量高。
就是比较喜欢写点东西嘛。
五年来，在吉粤商用青春和热血书写了彪炳史册的壮丽篇章。
她贴着一个秃头男人，那才是贴着，看来上帝也有漏斩的时候。
轻松击垮塔利班之后，美军面对的是“一盘散沙”似的武装分子。
到最后签订协议时，他说他把董事长当上，其他你咋搞都行。
闻讯后吕宗音立即跳下车，真诚、悲切的诉说打动了志愿者们。
地方政府对本地区乳品质量安全负总责。
葛小姐的妈妈王女士至今仍然以泪洗面。
而且，当然也是寡头和前独裁者的避难所。
大学里有一大批追求苗条和骨感的女孩。
但是未来几年内，大学生就业形势依然严峻。
维修部门保留，销售等其他业务合并在一起。
在二百五十多万名考生中，憋了二十多天的气一下子爆发出来了。
在烛光的映照下，老人眼角的泪花闪闪发亮。
邻居反映，当时屋内明火不大，但是浓烟呛人。
以上款物折合人民币四十四点四六四三万元。
如此，便能绕开政府主管部门冗长的审批。
以后你再这么大声说我，我就给你点颜色看看！
他们经过千挑万选，整体素质很好，应该得到高一些的待遇。
就昨天这丑女又神经的开始大骂女神，最后女神气坏了！
不过，他现场的幽默语言却逗得观众和众位嘉宾合不拢嘴。
该管理员立即把自己锁在笼子里，以免其他的猩猩也逃跑。
推而言之，古希腊哲学是静观的，它反映了超越现实的理想。
至少在化妆方面，我可以比别人少用半小时，因为不用化眉毛。
巧家官方的这份回应，很快被外界视做急于撇清拆迁矛盾。
夫妇俩每年的休假全用在了长途跋涉去老家看孩子上。
徐立唱的很投入，观众跟着唱的也很投入，现场嗨成一片。
此外，今年启用了一批新式扫雪设备替代融雪剂的使用量。
目前，陈某因涉嫌故意损毁公司财物被警方刑拘。
你是否想过，你的个人信息也许已被转手数次。
癔症发作时，有的孩子自述头晕或出现抽搐。
不是要拍照吗？大家排好队，麻利点！
好好睡一觉，明天又是崭新的一天。
但李家鼎与施明均否认。
昨天，隔夜资金跌破百分之三，至百分之二点九六七一。
妻子的脚瘸则是一场医疗事故的后遗症。
说不定他会比约翰还要早的东山再起呢？
他提醒投资者警惕会否出现滞胀现象。
他见是余雄，忙跑过去，余雄说：排我前面。
两国经贸合作的不断扩大，使美中双方获益。
六月二十七日，蛟龙号刷新纪录，下潜至七千零六十二米。
此后，在西藏恢复旧有的封建农奴制度也成为永远不可能。
过去几十年，沿海之所以发展迅速，就是因为进项物流便利。
据悉，在返亲宴上展示女方嫁妆，是晋江一带特有的习俗。
进入汽车时代以来，人们似乎一刻也离不开滚滚的车轮。
此外，整个馆中，还收藏着贾平凹的一些藏品和书画作品。
对于反对派，我一直觉得他们很肮脏。
是否削弱了对农业的投入？
金色的夸张铆钉手镯和闪闪亮的金色包包呼应得刚刚好。
在做完检查返回病房途中，琳琳躺在病床上摆弄手机。
不过网友都纷纷支持应采儿这一霸气行为。
他说，当时在片场，霍伯几乎跟所有人干过架。
想着想着，自己被自己逗乐，对着军火库造型的雨果堂开怀大笑。
周庄船夫的生意极佳，每个人都恨不得脚也能划桨，好多拉些生意。
她和一帮说话嘟嘟囔囔、成天跳舞的人生活在一起。
去深圳打工之前，弟弟妹妹就嚷嚷着要买部电脑。
他的到来是一件好事，我很欢迎他，不管是代表个人还是代表俱乐部。
小女孩挺乖的，没有哭闹。
有什么心事吗？可以和我分享一下呀。
居民说，这些流浪儿似乎突然消失了，不知前往何处。
嘣”一下，核桃完好的在地上打滚，宿舍门却掉了下来。
面对一系列的打击，田正阳没有气馁，反而更加坚强。
这个看似平淡的消息，实则意义重大。
所里的人自卑武功不及佛山飞鸿帮，大不了关几天就放了出去。
直到昨天，中国队已经以九块金牌入账，暂居奥运会金牌榜的榜首。
前几年火车提速，但那里的孩子却不能提速。
而此次参加人数众多，也让迈向顶点的难度增加。
潘某转身和何某对打并试图抢过何某的秤砣。
为什么一向给人勤俭印象的德国人变得不会过日子了？
它这个就是老百姓说的瘪玉米，就是去了皮，里头没有粮食了。
面对狡猾的嫌疑人，民警摆出种种证据一一反驳。
图为首钢职工昨日在料场紧张地抢卸冻煤。
二十六年前，王信臣当兵来到了南海舰队某水警区。
一些到塞罕坝的游客全副武装“享受”天寒地冻的另类快乐。
新规实施第二天，我省一些地方的煤矿执行情况到底如何？
作为从业人员，我已经丧失了看电视剧的乐趣。
这次补课也一样，没人要听他的课。
但高能权的“抠”是远近出了名的。
两个都是大美女！好难选择呀！
在学习怎样让自己变的更聪明。
可是，县级政府竞争裁判是谁？
我有一颗热爱生活的心，这比什么都重要。
冰岛更是昼夜难辨，仿佛进入“核冬天”。
大到里面不允许小的铺位。
学校的走读生在放学后是不允许在学校逗留的。
张国立与罗志祥、张韶涵。
老工人文化宫及以南片区的低矮建筑将全部拆除。
在最冷的几天，战士露宿户外，腾出帐篷安置群众。
殷立君说，齐景海的父母都是农民，弟兄五个，排行老大。
火很大，看不清，烟也很大。
三岁那年，和很多小朋友一样，小琪喜欢上了咬手指。
搞好大学生寝室关系自然也意义重大。
半年走一转，十船九打烂。
否则，失去拥趸的苹果将会死得很惨。
民警又生一计，切断这名老师家的电源。
此次虽然资金不多，但对于在建项目仍然很解渴。
她也用自己的爱心，点缀了自己的生命。
货车的尾部，已经凹陷变形。
处罚看情面，打点有神功。
不过，土胶作坊并未从此在山东绝迹。
第三点是运营初期，这里头学问就比较大，很有玄机。
我的数学老师还没教过我。
嫁给这么个人，我这辈子也算没指望了。
其中包括老牌乳品企业杭州美丽健乳业有限公司。
焦先生说，前天，他和妻子陈女士相约爬山赏景。
小宁没有多想，就上了车。
自幼时记事起，大人们一说起他，都躲躲闪闪，讳莫如深。
以下是记者与何超云的访问。
我还没开发出这个功能耶。
即使他犯了错，父母亲也不会教训他。
监控拍摄到，该男子走路时有些跛脚，长发，偏瘦。
户籍，依旧捆绑了户籍人口的特许权。
没有人发牢骚，而是铆足劲，着手整改。
这是一个生意盎然的春日，生命的奇迹不断被创造。
崇圣寺三塔，我强力推荐。
我的记忆只有七秒，骗你哒。
民警解开绳子救了男孩。
不料这一句话惹恼了李敖。
黄长勇给出了自己的答案。
她在趴下之后就没醒了。
其实，又有谁会无缘无故地找她的麻烦呢？
中午时分，军都山滑雪场。
随后，又与一前来阻拦的村民扭打起来。
阳光之下，快跑者未必先达，力战者未必能胜。
如果是专家，都得往评估报告上签字。
他花起钱来大手大脚，内心异常冷酷。
他透露，举报人未向他索取任何报酬。
但有渔民认为，近期水葫芦的影响已不大。
今早发现自己被拉黑了…
起火点位于河边。
努尔比耶的母亲是一位教师。
快人快语是李永波的个性。
结果越是这样，得罪人越多。
这是我应该做的，不用客气。
课堂上听不懂，下课就向哥哥姐姐问。
我爸还去姥姥家闹。
我们就可以容忍如此惨不忍睹的局面？
赴贵州捐款晒掉两层皮。
另外幺零八国道洋县段，也出现了类似的情况。
刘先生尴尬地笑了笑，将烟收了回去。
以军又开辟了黎巴嫩战场。
巨额亏空后，蒋公开潜逃。
六个男孩玩到兴起，说起了黄色笑话。
现在还感觉头晕、手臂疼。
它们本小利微，最难经受市场的震荡。
在历山路一家超市，一位消费者正仔细端详成分表。
我能狠心打断你不。
你点，你点，你点，二混子！
被烧成空架的店铺，招牌已看不见了。
老父亲每年都要低声下气地去催款，可总是碰壁。
白胖高白而亮的脸，代替了灯的功能。
你们到这儿不是睡觉来的！
泵房下部主体结构已完成。
这座土丘已经被炸出一个深深的豁口。
无疑，唐骏的甩手走人对联游网络来说是雪上加霜。
网民们是否普遍受到过流氓软件的骚扰呢？
稍微会一点，但我会的不多。
什么乐器呀？
并且，抛售普遍在二三套。
我拿刀就砍了赵作海一刀。
不管下放预备队的是什么人，都可以回到队伍中来。
这其中，以欧盟的关卡最为关键和艰难。
譬如说玫瑰总是长不好。
给女友个惊喜，带女友去附近的地方玩。
这是两辆面包车，都贴着“环卫监察”字样，车顶安装着喇叭。
鞍马现在我都不练了，练不出来，呵呵。
在你投资之前，希望你能玩玩我们的游戏。
这么多笑话，一天讲不完呀！
我失恋了，我蓝瘦啊，我香菇。
什么都不用你干，就这样给我跪到天亮。
他想扛着，却已力不从心。
当时心里只想少惹麻烦。
第二年，生了个大胖小子。
它们能在江水和海水中生存，并且成熟后洄游到产卵地产卵。
海登对邹家华的来访表示欢迎。
这也是作为网络写手最痛苦的事。
目前，全国奶业整体低迷，主要是消费者对乳品质量信心不足。
担心张某报警，两人用枕巾捂住了张某的嘴，直至他不再动弹。
日本的饮食思想、饮食文化、食物、烹饪所受到的最大影响是中国。
这些外表光鲜的人，做出了龌龊、肮脏的丑事，记住他们的名字。
他曾想过放弃，尽管如今他已是沿海某市的青少年散打冠军。
其次的“棒棒”，是为人活络，关系多，业务都是熟人介绍的。
记者发现，明年放假安排在总体上不会出现最折腾长假。
窗外晚风吹拂，树叶有了活力，哗啦啦地响，像在诉说着什么。
民警一路从永兴县到郴州市区地段几十公里，排查所有医院。
唐红键喜欢用道路曲折来描述中国核电工业的发展历程。
雄伟的人民大会堂气氛隆重热烈，万人大礼堂里灯光璀璨。
再次交易时，介绍人建某和她的朋友杨某打起了其他算盘。
积分以“分”为单位，每次进入账户时按四舍五入规则取整计算。
这时，楼房晃得更加厉害，玻璃窗哗哗的砸落下来。
潘石屹出了一个价钱，我们综合考虑可以就卖喽。
第八例确诊病例为一七岁女童，加拿大籍华人。
桥的另一端，为防止人上桥，特意砌起了一堵矮墙。
然后有人过来拿这哥们儿的话筒，要把他请出去。
我领导了它五十七年，也不可避免地犯了一些错。
条例对污染源普查的组织实施作了哪些规定？
老贝每次亮相前，都要细心地涂脂抹粉一番呢。
去年荷兰武器的最大买家是丹麦、美国和安曼。
杂交水稻应用则是提高水稻产量的最佳选择。
零时十九分许，海巡三幺二五七号抵达事发水域。
跑车车身也整个凹陷下去，车头和车身部位完好。
今天，本报将为您奉献最详细的中转接续方案。
玉树当地僧侣正在积极救援被困废墟的民众。
彭仲新带的几个人由于寡不敌众，则四处逃命。
今天的酒泉卫星发射中心秋高气爽，阳光灿烂。
王奇孤身一人，无儿无女，靠政府补助和拾荒度日。
记者们一般都是在答问环节才突然精神抖擞。
多米尼加人很想了解中国菜和点心怎么做。
土地有没有复垦好，合不合格，全靠验收来把关。
结束泰国游后，周杰伦搂着妈妈步出桃园机场。
一名女士哭嚎着被小越等人搀扶着离开。
毫无疑问，克努特是世界上最受欢迎的动物。
受伤村民已送到当地医院接受治疗。
究竟好莱屋和迪斯尼的魅力何在？
后得知，他患有严重痔疮，影响走路。
一些住“窝棚”的村民印证了这一说法。
五是雄厚的财力支持其持续领先。
这样才能筑好巢，才能引来好凤凰。
乔布斯在五十六岁时因胰腺癌病逝。
穿上戏装是演员，脱下戏装是农民。
你年方十八一枝花，年方二八会成家，年方三八有钱花，怎么样，准吗？
但她的卵巢等生殖器官发育正常。
潘兵是一位颇有特点和个性的选手。
我天天炒菜做饭，给他喂的饱饱的。
队友们风风光光地轮番出去比赛。
孙打电话给王琳，要他教训陈某亮。
比如大闸蟹上市了，就发螃蟹券。
不然就会造成极大的误传和猜测。
这么急切地呼唤我，是不是想我了？
那会儿心情也很郁闷，幸好他们来了。
翁美玲自杀的最主要原因是“工作压力”。
不要愤怒，也不要试图改变游戏规则。
而且，他可以正常行走，就是有点跛。
蛇的其他部分说：你没有眼睛鼻子，怎么能指引我们向前走？
其实我不是特别喜欢照相，牢记我在你心里的样子就好了。
他说，虽然他的狗对人很友好，但每次遛狗都用绳子拴着。
比赛中，几乎每一名选手都是呲牙咧嘴痛苦不堪的表情。
对于比赛中的粗野场面，布伦丹认为比赛激烈，可以理解。
淼淼抢先点了干果盘、水果盘各一个，啤酒、红酒若干。
郭金龙评价鲁勇，事业心责任感较强，组织协调能力强。
中国政府很周全，无可挑惕。
可以去就近的主管税务局申报，如果有交易凭证可以携带。
台湾司法机构近来丑闻不断。
具体开庭审理时间，丹棱县法院在通报中未提及。
卡梅伦表示感谢并请转达对温家宝总理的问候。
但应采儿后来发现，那次分明是他又忘了买礼物。
省卫生厅专家为灾区群众讲解预防疾病知识。
来郑州十几年，刘奎元都没能带老伴出去玩玩。
上学的时候，我就很恋家，平时也会写点儿东西。
梁某借着酒劲儿，不停地在其父母面前数落我。
雨翔连斗的勇气也没有，只有在背地里骂的本事。
锦里很好玩，可以吃到各种成都特色小吃呀。
创造更多的商业利润。
上了李毅吧你就懂了。
令我至今难忘的还有周总理那爽朗的笑声。
这次主人把我难到了！
外表憨厚，却工于心计。
他将被控“非法闯入”以及“藐视法庭”两宗罪。
最后实在拗不过他，婷婷和“海”走进了宾馆。
丑闻明星走不了长线。
这符合广大发展中国家的利益，也有利于推进气候变化国际合作。
不要浪费时间扯淡啦。
陈继明认为对方瞧不起他，两人发生抓扯。
记者数了一下，标签上的数字最高为六十一。
啷个这种语气说话嘛。
私底下也不曾见面过。
住在乡下的伤不起呀。
一个有棱角的书生模样。
提到赏秋，不应该只让人简单地想到红色。
第二战是二月的农心杯。
图为陈光标手捧现金。
彼此彼此，半斤八两。
你是否有兴趣与他的“巨龙”风筝一起飞天呢？
小明长的像冰棍，在水里游泳，游着游着没了。
尼克松对此赞不绝口，一连吃了六只馄饨。
讲完故事保证你开心。
张女士也顺手拿起放在枕边的木棍朝那名男子头上抡去。
她做的菜特别好吃，同事喜欢来蹭顿饭吃。
所以，谷歌这次人事变动受到外界普遍关注。
宿鸭湖湖边的麦地里，被毒死的野鸡和喜鹊随处可见。
春运期间，广铁集团日开行动车组列车二百五十六对。
报名时赵铭一点后门儿也没走，乖乖在人群中排队领号。
电话那头弱弱的说：“我就在你后面，我就是那个二逼！
你哪那么多废话！给老娘跪好！
甘爹爹撑起雨伞，慢慢走了过去。
余雄是个少言的人，一心一意在吃面。
只有离了婚，我才能学着更坚强呀。
碰上这样的想合影就会非常困难。
万一睡着时屋子就被放火烧了呢？
经区政府与多方协调，重新上路。
他们担心，野象“搬家”后可能重返。
女方答：“你送老娘的也这么大！
观众总会有新宠，不复念旧人。
随后，现场众人一同起哄“逼婚”。
他说这种攀岩是最纯净的运动。
火从三角形的窟窿开始燃烧。
记者找到了寝室布置者小马。
刚认识就要妹子皂片？再聊十块钱的吧。
夺目璀璨的灯光、交织着激情澎湃的音乐。
老爸飞身一脚说：你哥在谈正事，你干嘛？
马德保的理论课上得人心涣散，两个礼拜里退社的人数到了十五个。
花园口与将军坝：到郑州看黄河，必然先到花园口。
在林女士心中，小蓉从小乖巧懂事，就像她的贴心小棉袄。
亲属们丝毫没有怀疑，将平日积攒的存款交到了他的手上。
医生检查发现爹爹直肠穿孔，立即为他实施了手术。
人们手捧鲜花，在临时设置的等候区里缓缓前行。
用人单位不得拒绝、阻挠。
平时我也不爱出门，在家看看报纸，写写笔记啥的。
可年根儿这会儿，做馅的韭菜价钱涨得最离谱。
这一次，保钓船只被四艘日本船及直升机包围，动弹不得。
店铺内玻璃碎遍地。
不好判断具体时间。
考古专家感到“挠头”。
耿女士赶紧报了警。
搜狐则从七十三跌至五十三，跌幅百分之二十七。
什么时候给我换个彩屏手机？
我的普通话还是挺标准的吧。
至于当初报考南科大，他也只是想逃避高考，随便考着玩玩。
于是，雷军从自己的人生和理想讲起。
他见这好玩，正愁洗脚水没处倒，顺大势倒了下去。
一个人枯坐在阴暗的角落里，揪着大腿问自己怎么办。
媒人告诉他：第一次见面得谦虚些，别让女孩难堪。
有了科学指引，执行搜救任务的官兵顿时斗志倍增。
他穿上潜水衣，身上拴了根绳子，一狠心，跳了下去。
到了湖头，两个小孩发觉不对劲，向他嚷嚷要回家。
同时将加大洒水车送水力度，鼓励居民水井取水。
两年前，熊杰在南京三牌楼附近开了一家足疗店。
一个巨大的脾脏完整地“托出”，剥离结扎并成功切除。
中日关系越来越密切，学习汉语的日本人亦不计其数。
观音建议：不如让两猴选择最爱的水果，众生皆迷茫。
当然，上网也不光是看棋，“也聊聊天，查查邮件什么的”。
暖暖跪下了，我再也不犯错误了，妈妈你赶紧去医院吧。
闫秋玲说，字是用黑色记号笔写的，不是用刀子刻的。
时下，你被解雇了在美国甚为流行，成了一句时髦语。
刑满释放后的高义强不思悔改，并染上赌博的恶习。
第二天有二百零三家厂房和八百零五家商铺被订购。
你这破分数，就是小时候乱七八糟书看太多的原因！
当官真好，什么都玩儿，什么都会，什么都赚钱，呵呵。
在陈水扁担任台北市议员时，苏焕智曾担任扁助理。
刚开始她还练习古筝，因为弹琴，手指都磨破了，她也不喊苦。
细细揣摩，似乎也颇为符合郑州黄河公路大桥的前世今生。
他喜欢开玩笑，比如我举枪举了十分钟，他就走过来说累吧？
由于落水后连呛了几口水，上岸后的婆婆惊魂未定，脸色苍白。
新华社记者租借一艘当地渔船靠近了在浅海中的中国渔船。
昔日土妞儿变时尚辣妹，让大众看到了一个不断成长的海清。
因为盘缠几乎耗尽，三人只能靠邻居和保安的接济勉强度日。
红光路上的秦阿旁宫景区，一度让人们认为“这里就是阿旁宫”。
这位老伯持老人免费证上车，采取各种办法性骚扰女乘客。
平性的有山药、白萝卜、甘薯、马铃薯、南瓜、西红柿、蘑菇等。
这疯狂的一幕，也许只有等到大潮退去，裸泳者才会浮出水面。
以后，必成同志率部参加了两次涟水保卫战，策应了宿北大战的胜利。
为了能跑起来方便，他们只背着简单的工具，互相照应着，能跑就跑。
从前有个大灰狼，你猜大灰狼是谁？
收费年限分别持续至二零三二年及二零四零年。
如果吃起来非常细腻，则说明玉米粉加得不多。
人们只会佩服那些有创造性贡献的人。
交公粮，我把最好的小麦、玉米送到粮管所。
不会呀主人，骂人是不对的。
曹洪亮说：还有几个空着……没关系，让我抄抄！
赵姑娘背着个双肩包，坐下时顺势放在一边。
我说：咽不下这口气。
妈，撕情书呢？
应该是笔墨纸砚吧？
余梅决定剖腹产。
我不吃你那套！
走差不多几分钟。
倒水的学生只听到前半句，遵其命再倾其余水，边倒边叫：去你的！
两人一场恶斗，胜负难分，只好把矛头对准在读英语的谢景渊道：你呢？
周边居民时常会看到有烟气从铝厂林立的大烟囱中排出。
时任深圳市司法局副局长的徐建受命设计一套政改方案。
钱伟长对饮食从不挑惕，既不抽烟，也不喝酒，饮茶也不讲究。
以后我生日就不能领礼物了，呵呵，可能她是为了省礼物吧。
七个人面面相觑，然后说：你走错地方了，我们是葫芦娃。
乌鸦的死是自己造成的，原因只在于他没有作调查试探活动。
截至目前，挖掘工作已经结束，目前压路机正在夯实地基。
该人士提醒，不要随意遗弃犬只，给市民出行带来安全隐患。
这类文字的涂抹工具不再是记号笔，而是类似煤灰的物质。
男友：“是这样，我记得，我是在一个月色朦胧的晚上向你求的婚。
警方查询了物料领取单据，日期与安装时间相符。
据悉，这个流动的“骆驼照相摊”并未办理任何手续。
同时，预算案的电子版也将上网，任何人都可以查阅。
起初何称铭搂着一位女性友人的胳膊边走边聊。
能被选作基辛格资料的收藏者，耶鲁深感荣幸。
这和高层管理者精神压力大、应酬多有很大关系。
咱们牧民群众特别热心，特别好客，非常善良。
每一个“火箭官”都顺利地升上去了，冉冉若星光。
每天把牢骚拿出来晒晒太阳，心情就不会缺钙。
昨日，这名“伤者”与医生全部被警方依法刑事拘留。
钱伟长想到上海来办学校是经过深思熟虑的。
她见我一进门就骂，吃饭时也骂，骂得我抬不起头。
李述德在离开之前，只说了一句“柱驼杀父亲了”。
这种车票和保险单捆绑出售属于重复性购买。
戴佩妮的男友西米露接唱情歌，让她非常开心。
观大势、谋大局、出大策始终是该院的办院方针。
他们骑着摩托回家，正好为农忙时的父母帮忙。
但是因为还没到退休年龄，只能掰着指头捱日子。
这几天雨水不断，人们恨不得待在家里不出门。
没想到徐赟、张海翔两人就此玩起了人间“蒸发”。
藤村此番发言可能是为了凸显野田的领导能力。
程长庚，生在清王朝嘉庆年间，安徽的潜山小县。
南海海域综合补给基地码头项目正在论证中。
也就是说今晚成都市民极有可能再次看到飘雪。
随着天气转热，各地的游泳场所开始人头攒动。
更让徐先生纳闷的是，房客的手机也打不通了。
遇到颠簸时，应听从乘务员的安全指令，回座位坐好。
他在后面呆惯了，怕自己一插身后的人会不满，不敢排进去。
傍晚七个小人回来了，白雪公主说：你们就是我命中的七个小矮人吧。
他本想说：教育局管这个，他们是一路的，这样一管岂不是妓女起嫖客？
一种表示商品所有权的财物证券，也称商品证券，如提货单、交货单。
会有很丰富的东西留下来，说都说不完。
这句话像从天而降，吓得四周一片寂静。
记者所在的是受害人家属所在的右区。
不管哈大爷去哪，它都一步不离地跟着。
大家抬头望去，一只老鼠正趴在吊顶上。
我决定过年就辞职，接手我爸的废品站！
最终，中国男子乒乓球队获得此奖项。
防汛抗旱两手抓，抗旱相对抓的不够。
图们江下游地区开发开放的进展如何？
这要求中国必须有一个坚强的政党领导。
再说，关于利益上的事俺俩都不好开口。
明代瓦剌、鞑靼入侵明境也是通过此地。
咪咪舔着孩子，把它身上的毛舔干净。
是否这次的国标修订被大企业“绑架”了？
判决后，姚某妻子胡某不服，提起上诉。
由此可以看出邯钢的经济效益来自何处。
琳达说，是瑜伽改变了她和马儿的生活。
楼下的保安告诉记者，这里不租也不卖。
习近平说，中斯两国人民传统友谊深厚。
传闻越来越多，后来连老汉儿自己都怕了。
我怒吼一声冲上去，举起砖头砸了过去。
我现在还不会，这就回去问问发明我的人。
显然，“洛阳性奴”案不具备上述两个前提。
另外，杰克逊有文唇线、眼线、眉毛的动作。
昨晚，华西都市报记者电话采访了尹琪。
涅拉季科未透露这些航空公司的名称。
从运行轨迹上来说，它也不可能是星星。
目前看，如果继续加息也存在两难问题。
曾宝仪在节目录制现场大爆观众糗事。
但任凭周某怎么叫，男子仍酣睡不醒。
老大爷说：小子，你挡我财路了，知道不？
没料到，闯下大头佛的阿伟还不知悔改。
卡扎菲“部落式”统治已遭遇“部落内讧”。
这个孩子的生命一半来源于另一位女士捐赠的“冷冻卵子”。
出现这种“泥鳅”内阁的局面既是野田有意为之，也实属无奈。
济青高速济南、华山、章丘、邹平、周村、淄博、临淄站。
赵凌飞的话，反映了沈阳赛区所有奥运志愿者的共同心声。
因为，我们所发出的力量必会因难度加大而减弱。
发生事故的楼梯拐角处仍可看到血迹。
想过进公安，可能身高不够，老汉儿也不让我进去。
路上关卡很多，为了方便撤离，只好轻装前进。
原来比尔盖茨就是美国微软公司联合创始人呀。
之后他们一家三口将与双方父母往峇里岛旅游。
谢谢总理，也感谢广大网友的参与，我们明年再见。
事实上是：从来没有一个欺善怕恶的人能作出过稍大一点的成就。
我会打开邮件，你可以从那里继续。
美方对近期东海局势表示关切。
据悉，奥巴马一家人对这座“冬季白宫”极为满意。
打扫完你会很有成就感的，试一试，你就信了。
诺曼站在滑板车上，各就各位，准备出发啦！
塔河的寒夜，气温降到了零下三十多摄氏度。
其间，连破六点六、六点五、六点四、六点三五等多个重要关口。
算命其实只是人们的一种自我安慰和自我暗示而已，我们还是要相信科学才好。
这一切都令人欢欣鼓舞，阿讷西没理由不坚持到最后。
直至公元前一万一千年，它又再次出现。
尽量少玩电脑、少看电视、少打游戏。
从五到七，前后也就是六个月的时间。
一进咖啡店，他就遇见一张熟悉的脸。
好在众弟兄看到了把她追了回来。
有一个人说，哥们儿我们跑过它才能活。
捅了她以后，模糊记得她没咋动了。
从小到大，葛启义没有收到过压岁钱。
舞台下的你会对舞台上的你说什么？
但考生普遍认为，试题的“怪”多过“难”。
我希望每个人都能够尊重我们的隐私。
漫天的红霞使劲给两人增添气氛。
晚上加完班开车回家，太累了，迷迷糊糊开着车，走一半的时候，“铛”一声！
该车将三人撞倒后，在大雾中逃窜。
这人一哆嗦，方向盘也把不稳了，差点撞上了高速边道护栏。
那女孩儿委屈的说：“我一回头见你已经进去了我不敢进去啊！
小明摇摇头说：不是，我只是美女看多了，想换个口味而已。
接下来，红娘要求记者交费，记者表示不知表姐身份证号码。
李东蓊表示，自己当时在法庭上发表了一次独特的公诉意见。
另一男子扑了上来，手里拿着明晃晃的长刀，向他胸口直刺。
今天，快递员拿着一个快递在办公室喊：秦王是哪个，有他快递？
这场抗议活动究竟是如何发展演变的，又究竟是谁伤害了谁？
因华国锋肖鸡，墓地设计根据其属相设计。
在狱中，张明宝悔恨交加，写了一份忏悔书。
Printing, in the only sense with which we are at present concerned, differs from most if not from all the arts and crafts represented in the Exhibition
For although the Chinese took impressions from wood blocks engraved in relief for centuries before the woodcutters of the Netherlands, by a similar process
produced the block books, which were the immediate predecessors of the true printed book,
the invention of movable metal letters in the middle of the fifteenth century may justly be considered as the invention of the art of printing.
And it is worth mention in passing that, as an example of fine typography,
the earliest book printed with movable types, the Gutenberg, or "forty-two line Bible" of about fourteen fifty-five,
Printing, then, for our purpose, may be considered as the art of making books by means of movable types.
Now, as all books not primarily intended as picture-books consist principally of types composed to form letterpress,
it is of the first importance that the letter used should be fine in form;
especially as no more time is occupied, or cost incurred, in casting, setting, or printing beautiful letters
than in the same operations with ugly ones.
And it was a matter of course that in the Middle Ages, when the craftsmen took care that beautiful form should always be a part of their productions whatever they were,
the forms of printed letters should be beautiful, and that their arrangement on the page should be reasonable and a help to the shapeliness of the letters themselves.
The Middle Ages brought calligraphy to perfection, and it was natural therefore
that the forms of printed letters should follow more or less closely those of the written character, and they followed them very closely.
The first books were printed in black letter, i.e. the letter which was a Gothic development of the ancient Roman character,
and which developed more completely and satisfactorily on the side of the "lower-case" than the capital letters;
the "lower-case" being in fact invented in the early Middle Ages.
The earliest book printed with movable type, the aforesaid Gutenberg Bible, is printed in letters which are an exact imitation
of the more formal ecclesiastical writing which obtained at that time; this has since been called "missal type,"
and was in fact the kind of letter used in the many splendid missals, psalters, etc., produced by printing in the fifteenth century.
But the first Bible actually dated (which also was printed at Maintz by Peter Schoeffer in the year fourteen sixty-two)
imitates a much freer hand, simpler, rounder, and less spiky, and therefore far pleasanter and easier to read.
On the whole the type of this book may be considered the ne-plus-ultra of Gothic type,
especially as regards the lower-case letters; and type very similar was used during the next fifteen or twenty years not only by Schoeffer,
but by printers in Strasburg, Basle, Paris, Lubeck, and other cities.
But though on the whole, except in Italy, Gothic letter was most often used
a very few years saw the birth of Roman character not only in Italy, but in Germany and France.
In fourteen sixty-five Sweynheim and Pannartz began printing in the monastery of Subiaco near Rome,
and used an exceedingly beautiful type, which is indeed to look at a transition between Gothic and Roman,
but which must certainly have come from the study of the twelfth or even the eleventh century MSS.
They printed very few books in this type, three only; but in their very first books in Rome, beginning with the year fourteen sixty-eight,
they discarded this for a more completely Roman and far less beautiful letter.
But about the same year Mentelin at Strasburg began to print in a type which is distinctly Roman;
and the next year Gunther Zeiner at Augsburg followed suit;
while in fourteen seventy at Paris Udalric Gering and his associates turned out the first books printed in France, also in Roman character.
The Roman type of all these printers is similar in character,
and is very simple and legible, and unaffectedly designed for use; but it is by no means without beauty.
It must be said that it is in no way like the transition type of Subiaco,
and though more Roman than that, yet scarcely more like the complete Roman type of the earliest printers of Rome.
A further development of the Roman letter took place at Venice.
John of Spires and his brother Vindelin, followed by Nicholas Jenson, began to print in that city,
their type is on the lines of the German and French rather than of the Roman printers.
Of Jenson it must be said that he carried the development of Roman type as far as it can go:
his letter is admirably clear and regular, but at least as beautiful as any other Roman type.
After his death in the "fourteen eighties," or at least by fourteen ninety, printing in Venice had declined very much;
and though the famous family of Aldus restored its technical excellence, rejecting battered letters,
and paying great attention to the "press work" or actual process of printing,
yet their type is artistically on a much lower level than Jenson's, and in fact
they must be considered to have ended the age of fine printing in Italy.
Jenson, however, had many contemporaries who used beautiful type,
some of which -- as, e.g., that of Jacobus Rubeus or Jacques le Rouge -- is scarcely distinguishable from his.
It was these great Venetian printers, together with their brethren of Rome, Milan,
Parma, and one or two other cities, who produced the splendid editions of the Classics, which are one of the great glories of the printer's art,
and are worthy representatives of the eager enthusiasm for the revived learning of that epoch. By far,
the greater part of these Italian printers, it should be mentioned, were Germans or Frenchmen, working under the influence of Italian opinion and aims.
It must be understood that through the whole of the fifteenth and the first quarter of the sixteenth centuries
the Roman letter was used side by side with the Gothic.
Even in Italy most of the theological and law books were printed in Gothic letter,
which was generally more formally Gothic than the printing of the German workmen,
many of whose types, indeed, like that of the Subiaco works, are of a transitional character.
This was notably the case with the early works printed at Ulm, and in a somewhat lesser degree at Augsburg.
In fact Gunther Zeiner's first type (afterwards used by Schussler) is remarkably like the type of the before-mentioned Subiaco books.
In the Low Countries and Cologne, which were very fertile of printed books, Gothic was the favorite.
The characteristic Dutch type, as represented by the excellent printer Gerard Leew, is very pronounced and uncompromising Gothic.
This type was introduced into England by Wynkyn de Worde, Caxton's successor,
and was used there with very little variation all through the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, and indeed into the eighteenth.
Most of Caxton's own types are of an earlier character, though they also much resemble Flemish or Cologne letter.
After the end of the fifteenth century the degradation of printing, especially in Germany and Italy,
went on apace; and by the end of the sixteenth century there was no really beautiful printing done:
the best, mostly French or Low-Country, was neat and clear, but without any distinction;
the worst, which perhaps was the English, was a terrible falling-off from the work of the earlier presses;
and things got worse and worse through the whole of the seventeenth century, so that in the eighteenth printing was very miserably performed.
In England about this time, an attempt was made (notably by Caslon, who started business in London as a type-founder in seventeen twenty)
to improve the letter in form.
Caslon's type is clear and neat, and fairly well designed;
he seems to have taken the letter of the Elzevirs of the seventeenth century for his model:
type cast from his matrices is still in everyday use.
In spite, however, of his praiseworthy efforts, printing had still one last degradation to undergo.
The seventeenth century founts were bad rather negatively than positively.
But for the beauty of the earlier work they might have seemed tolerable.
It was reserved for the founders of the later eighteenth century to produce letters which are positively ugly, and which, it may be added,
are dazzling and unpleasant to the eye owing to the clumsy thickening and vulgar thinning of the lines:
for the seventeenth-century letters are at least pure and simple in line. The Italian, Bodoni, and the Frenchman, Didot,
were the leaders in this luckless change, though our own Baskerville, who was at work some years before them, went much on the same lines;
but his letters, though uninteresting and poor, are not nearly so gross and vulgar as those of either the Italian or the Frenchman.
With this change the art of printing touched bottom,
so far as fine printing is concerned, though paper did not get to its worst till about eighteen forty.
The Chiswick press in eighteen forty-four revived Caslon's founts, printing for Messrs. Longman the Diary of Lady Willoughby.
This experiment was so far successful that about eighteen fifty Messrs. Miller and Richard of Edinburgh
were induced to cut punches for a series of "old style" letters.
These and similar founts, cast by the above firm and others,
have now come into general use and are obviously a great improvement on the ordinary "modern style" in use in England, which is in fact the Bodoni type
a little reduced in ugliness. The design of the letters of this modern "old style" leaves a good deal to be desired,
and the whole effect is a little too gray, owing to the thinness of the letters.
It must be remembered, however, that most modern printing is done by machinery on soft paper, and not by the hand press,
and these somewhat wiry letters are suitable for the machine process, which would not do justice to letters of more generous design.
It is discouraging to note that the improvement of the last fifty years is almost wholly confined to Great Britain.
Here and there a book is printed in France or Germany with some pretension to good taste,
but the general revival of the old forms has made no way in those countries.
America has produced a good many showy books, the typography, paper, and illustrations of which are, however, all wrong,
oddity rather than rational beauty and meaning being apparently the thing sought for both in the letters and the illustrations.
To say a few words on the principles of design in typography:
it is obvious that legibility is the first thing to be aimed at in the forms of the letters;
this is best furthered by the avoidance of irrational swellings and spiky projections, and by the using of careful purity of line.
Even the Caslon type when enlarged shows great shortcomings in this respect:
the ends of many of the letters such as the t and e are hooked up in a vulgar and meaningless way,
instead of ending in the sharp and clear stroke of Jenson's letters;
there is a grossness in the upper finishings of letters like the c, the a, and so on,
an ugly pear-shaped swelling defacing the form of the letter:
in short, it happens to this craft, as to others, that the utilitarian practice, though it professes to avoid ornament,
still clings to a foolish, because misunderstood conventionality, deduced from what was once ornament, and is by no means useful;
which title can only be claimed by artistic practice, whether the art in it be conscious or unconscious.
In no characters is the contrast between the ugly and vulgar illegibility of the modern type
and the elegance and legibility of the ancient more striking than in the Arabic numerals.
In the old print each figure has its definite individuality, and one cannot be mistaken for the other;
in reading the modern figures the eyes must be strained before the reader can have any reasonable assurance
that he has a five, an eight, or a three before him, unless the press work is of the best:
this is awkward if you have to read Bradshaw's Guide in a hurry.
One of the differences between the fine type and the utilitarian must probably be put down to a misapprehension of a commercial necessity:
this is the narrowing of the modern letters.
Most of Jenson's letters are designed within a square,
the modern letters are narrowed by a third or thereabout; but while this gain of space very much hampers the possibility of beauty of design,
it is not a real gain, for the modern printer throws the gain away by putting inordinately wide spaces between his lines, which, probably,
the lateral compression of his letters renders necessary.
Commercialism again compels the use of type too small in size to be comfortable reading:
the size known as "Long primer" ought to be the smallest size used in a book meant to be read.
Here, again, if the practice of "leading" were retrenched larger type could be used without enhancing the price of a book.
One very important matter in "setting up" for fine printing is the "spacing," that is, the lateral distance of words from one another.
In good printing the spaces between the words should be as near as possible equal
it is impossible that they should be quite equal except in lines of poetry
modern printers understand this, but it is only practiced in the very best establishments.
But another point which they should attend to they almost always disregard;
this is the tendency to the formation of ugly meandering white lines or "rivers" in the page
a blemish which can be nearly, though not wholly, avoided by care and forethought
the desirable thing being "the breaking of the line" as in bonding masonry or brickwork
The general solidity of a page is much to be sought for
modern printers generally overdo the "whites" in the spacing, a defect probably forced on them by the characterless quality of the letters.
For where these are boldly and carefully designed, and each letter is thoroughly individual in form,
the words may be set much closer together, without loss of clearness.
No definite rules, however, except the avoidance of "rivers" and excess of white, can be given for the spacing,
which requires the constant exercise of judgment and taste on the part of the printer.
The position of the page on the paper should be considered if the book is to have a satisfactory look.
Here once more the almost invariable modern practice is in opposition to a natural sense of proportion.
From the time when books first took their present shape till the end of the sixteenth century, or indeed later,
the page so lay on the paper that there was more space allowed to the bottom and fore margin than to the top and back of the paper,
the unit of the book being looked on as the two pages forming an opening.
The modern printer, in the teeth of the evidence given by his own eyes, considers the single page as the unit, and prints the page in the middle of his paper
only nominally so, however, in many cases, since when he uses a headline he counts that in,
the result as measured by the eye being that the lower margin is less than the top one, and that the whole opening has an upside-down look vertically
and that laterally the page looks as if it were being driven off the paper.
The paper on which the printing is to be done is a necessary part of our subject:
of this it may be said that though there is some good paper made now,
it is never used except for very expensive books, although it would not materially increase the cost in all but the very cheapest.
The paper that is used for ordinary books is exceedingly bad even in this country, but is beaten in the race for vileness
by that made in America, which is the worst conceivable.
There seems to be no reason why ordinary paper should not be better made,
even allowing the necessity for a very low price; but any improvement must be based on showing openly that the cheap article is cheap,
e.g. the cheap paper should not sacrifice toughness and durability to a smooth and white surface,
which should be indications of a delicacy of material and manufacture which would of necessity increase its cost.
One fruitful source of badness in paper
is the habit that publishers have of eking out a thin volume by printing it on thick paper almost of the substance of cardboard,
a device which deceives nobody, and makes a book very unpleasant to read.
On the whole, a small book should be printed on paper which is as thin as may be without being transparent.
The paper used for printing the small highly ornamented French service-books about the beginning of the sixteenth century is a model in this respect,
being thin, tough, and opaque.
However, the fact must not be blinked that machine-made paper cannot in the nature of things be made of so good a texture as that made by hand.
The ornamentation of printed books is too wide a subject to be dealt with fully here; but one thing must be said on it.
The essential point to be remembered is that the ornament, whatever it is, whether picture or pattern-work, should form part of the page,
should be a part of the whole scheme of the book.
Simple as this proposition is, it is necessary to be stated,
because the modern practice is to disregard the relation between the printing and the ornament altogether,
so that if the two are helpful to one another it is a mere matter of accident.
The due relation of letter to pictures and other ornament was thoroughly understood by the old printers; so that
even when the woodcuts are very rude indeed,
the proportions of the page still give pleasure by the sense of richness that the cuts and letter together convey.
When, as is most often the case, there is actual beauty in the cuts,
the books so ornamented are amongst the most delightful works of art that have ever been produced.
Therefore, granted well-designed type, due spacing of the lines and words, and proper position of the page on the paper,
all books might be at least comely and well-looking: and if to these good qualities were added really beautiful ornament and pictures,
printed books might once again illustrate to the full
the position of our Society that a work of utility might be also a work of art, if we cared to make it so.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section four: Newgate down to eighteen eighteen.
Under the conditions referred to in the previous chapter,
with criminals and misdemeanants of all shades crowding perpetually into its narrow limits, the latter state of Newgate was worse than the first.
The new jail fell as far short of the demands made on it as did the old.
The prison population fluctuated a great deal,
but it was almost always in excess of the accommodation available, and there were times when the place was full to overflowing.
Neild gives some figures which well illustrate this.
On the fourteenth June, eighteen hundred, there were one hundred ninety-nine debtors and two hundred eighty-nine felons in the prison.
On the twenty-seventh April, in the following year,
these numbers had risen to two hundred seventy-five and three hundred seventy-five respectively, or six hundred fifty in all.
For two more years these high figures were steadily maintained, and in eighteen oh three the total rose to seven hundred ten.
After that they fell as steadily,
till, eighteen oh eight, the lowest point was touched of one hundred ninety-seven debtors and one hundred eighty-two felons, or three hundred seventy-nine in all.
The numbers soon increased, however, and by eighteen eleven had again risen to six hundred twenty-nine; and Mr. Neild was told that there had been at one time
three hundred debtors and nine hundred criminals in Newgate, or twelve hundred prisoners in all.
Previous to that date there had been seven hundred or eight hundred frequently, and once, in Mr. Akerman's time, one thousand.
Trustworthy evidence is forthcoming to the effect that these high figures were constantly maintained for many months at a time.
The inadequacy of the jail was noticed and reported upon again and again by the grand juries of the city of London,
who seldom let a session go by without visiting Newgate.
the grand jury made a special presentment to the Court of Common Council, pointing out that on the debtors' side, which was intended for only one hundred,
no less than three hundred forty were crowded, to the great inconvenience and danger of the inmates.
On the female side matters were much worse;
Quote. the apartments set apart for them, being built to accommodate sixty persons, now contain about one hundred twenty. End quote.
Returns laid before the House of Commons showed that six thousand, four hundred thirty-nine persons had been committed to Newgate
in the three years between eighteen thirteen and eighteen sixteen,
and this number did not include the debtors, a numerous class, who were still committed to Newgate pending the completion of the White Cross Street prison.
In order to realize the evils entailed by incarceration in Newgate in these days, it is necessary to give some account of its interior
as it was occupied and appropriated in eighteen ten.
Full details of the arrangements are to be found in Mr. Neild's "State of Prisons in England, Scotland, and Wales," published in eighteen twelve.
The jail at that date was divided into eight separate and more or less distinct departments, each of which had its own wards and yard.
These were: one. The male debtors' side.
two. The female debtors' side. three. The chapel yard. four. The middle yard.
five. The master felons' side. six. The female felons' side. seven. The state side.
one. The male debtors' side consisted of a yard forty-nine feet by thirty-one,
leading to thirteen wards on various floors, and a day room.
Of these wards, three were appropriated to the "cabin side," so called because
they each contained four small rooms or "cabins" seven feet square,
intended to accommodate a couple of prisoners apiece, but often much more crowded.
Two other wards were appropriated to the master's side debtors; they were each twenty-three feet by fourteen and a half,
and supposed to accommodate twenty persons. The eight remaining wards were for the common side debtors,
long narrow rooms -- one thirty-six feet, six twenty-three feet, and the eighth eighteen,
the whole about fifteen feet wide.
The various wards were all about eleven feet in height,
and were occupied as a rule by ten to fifteen people when the prison was not crowded, but double the number was occasionally placed in them.
The day room was fitted with benches and settles after the manner of the tap in a public-house.
two. The female debtors' side consisted of a court-yard forty-nine by sixteen feet,
leading to two wards, one of which was thirty-six feet by fifteen,
and the other eighteen by fifteen; and they nominally held twenty-two persons.
A high wall fifteen feet in height divided the females' court-yard from the men's.
three. The chapel yard was about forty-three feet by twenty-five.
It had been for some time devoted principally to felons of the worst types,
those who were the oldest offenders, sentenced to transportation, and who had narrowly escaped the penalty of death.
This arrangement was, however, modified after eighteen eleven, and the chapel yard was allotted to misdemeanants and prisoners awaiting trial.
The wards in this part were five in number, all in dimensions twenty feet by fifteen, with a sixth ward fifteen feet square.
These wards were all fitted with barrack-beds, but no bedding was supplied.
The chapel yard led to the chapel, and on the staircase were two rooms frequently set apart for the king's witnesses,
those who had turned king's evidence, whose safety might have been imperiled had they been lodged with the men against whom they had informed.
But these king's witnesses were also put at times into the press yard among the capital convicts, seemingly a very dangerous proceeding,
or they lodged with the gatesmen, the prisoner officers who had charge of the inner gates.
The middle yard was at first given up to the least heinous offenders. After eighteen twelve it changed functions with the chapel yard.
It was fifty feet by twenty-five, and had five wards each thirty-eight by fifteen. At one end of the yard was an arcade,
directly under the chapel, in which there were three cells, used either for the confinement of disorderly and refractory prisoners,
or female convicts ordered for execution.
The master felons' side consisted of a yard the same size as the preceding, appropriated nominally to the most decent and better-behaved prisoners,
but really kept for the few who had funds sufficient to gain them admission to these more comfortable quarters.
Here were also lodged the gatesmen, the prisoners who had charge of the inner gates, and who were entrusted with the duty of escorting visitors from the gates
to the various wards their friends occupied.
The state side was the part stolen from the female felons' side.
It was large and comparatively commodious, being maintained on a better footing than any other part of the prison.
The inmates were privileged, either by antecedents or the fortunate possession of sufficient funds to pay the charges of the place.
Neild takes it for granted that the former rather than the latter prevailed in the selection,
and tells us that in the state side, quote, such prisoners were safely associated whose manners and conduct evince a more liberal style of education,
and who are therefore lodged apart from all other districts of the jail. End quote.
The state side contained twelve good-sized rooms,
from twenty-one by eighteen feet to fifteen feet square, which were furnished with bedsteads and bedding.
seven. The press yard was that part set aside for the condemned.
Its name and its situation were the same as those of the old place of carrying out the terrible sentence inflicted on accused persons who stood mute.
The long narrow yard still remained as we saw it in Jacobite times,
and beyond it was now a day room for the capital convicts or those awaiting execution.
Beyond the press yard were three stories, condemned cells, fifteen in all, with vaulted ceilings nine feet high to the crown of the arch.
The ground floor cells were nine feet by six;
those on the first floor were rather larger on account of a set-off in the wall; and the uppermost were the largest, for the same reason.
Security was provided for in these condemned cells by lining the substantial stone walls with planks studded with broad-headed nails;
they were lighted by a double-grated window two feet nine inches by fourteen inches; and in the doors, which were four inches thick,
a circular aperture had been let in to give ventilation and secure a free current of air.
In each cell there was a barrack bedstead on the floor without bedding.
eight. The female felons were deprived of part of the space which the architect had intended for them.
More than half their quadrangle had been partitioned off for another purpose,
and what remained was divided into a master's and a common side for female felons.
The two yards were adjoining, that for the common side much the largest.
There were nine wards in all on the female side, one of them in the attic,
with four casements and two fireplaces, being allotted for a female infirmary
and the rest being provided with barrack beds, and in dimensions varying from thirty feet by fifteen to fifteen feet by ten.
The eight courts above enumerated were well supplied with water;
they had dust-bins, sewers, and so forth, "properly disposed," and the city scavenger paid periodical visits to the prison.
The prisoners had few comforts, beyond the occasional use of a bath at some distance, situated in the press yard,
to which access was granted rarely and as a great favor. But they were allowed the luxury of drink -- if they could pay for it.
A recent reform had closed the tap kept by the jailer within the precincts, but
there was still a "convenient room" which served, and, quote,
near it a grating through which the debtors receive their beer from the neighboring public-houses.
The felons' side has a similar accommodation, and this mode of introducing the beverage is adopted because no publican as such
can be permitted to enter the interior of this prison. End quote. The tap-room and bar were just behind the felons' entrance lodge,
and beyond it was a room called the "wine room," because formerly used for the sale of wine, but
in which latterly a copper had been fixed for the cooking of provisions sent in by charitable persons.
Quote, On the top of the jail, continues Neild, are a watch-house and a sentry-box, where two or more guards, with dogs and firearms,
watch all night. Adjoining the felons' side lodge is the keeper's office, where the prison books are kept, and his clerk,
called the clerk of the papers, attends daily. End quote.
Having thus briefly described the plan and appropriation of the prison, I propose to deal now with the general condition of the inmates, and the manner of their life.
Of these the debtors, male and female, formed a large proportion.
The frequency and extent of processes against debtors seventy or eighty years ago will appear almost incredible
in an age when insolvent acts and bankruptcy courts do so much to relieve the impecunious,
and imprisonment for debt has almost entirely disappeared.
The number of processes against debtors annually was extraordinary.
Neild gives, on the authority of Mr. Burchell, the under sheriff of Middlesex,
a table showing the figures for the year ending Michaelmas eighteen oh two.
In that period upwards of two hundred thousand writs
had been issued for the arrests of debtors in the kingdom, for sums varying from fourpence to five hundred pounds and upwards.
Fifteen thousand of these were issued in Middlesex alone, which at that time was reckoned as only a fifteenth of Great Britain.
The number of arrests actually made was one hundred fourteen thousand, three hundred for the kingdom, and seven thousand twenty for Middlesex.
Barely half of these gave bail bonds on arrests, and the remainder went to prison.
Quite half of the foregoing writs and arrests applied to sums under thirty pounds.
Neild also says that in seventeen ninety-three,
five thousand, seven hundred nineteen writs and executions for debts between ten pounds and twenty pounds were issued in Middlesex,
and the aggregate amount of debts sued for was eighty-one thousand, seven hundred ninety-one pounds.
He also makes the curious calculation that the costs of these actions if undefended
would have amounted to sixty-eight thousand, seven hundred twenty-eight pounds, and if defended,
two hundred eighty-five thousand, nine hundred fifty pounds; in other words, that to recover eighty odd thousand pounds,
three times the amount would be expended.
An elaborate machinery planned for the protection of the trader, and altogether on his side, had long existed for the recovery of debts.
Alfred the Great established the Court Baron, the Hundred Court, and the County Court, which among other matters entertained pleas for debt.
The County Court was the sheriff's, who sat there surrounded by the bishop and the magnates of the county;
but as time passed, difficulties and delays in obtaining judgment led to the removal of causes to the great Court of King's Bench,
and the disuse of the inferior courts.
So much inconvenience ensued, that in fifteen eighteen the Corporation obtained from Parliament an act empowering two aldermen
and four common councilmen to hold Courts of Requests, or Courts of Conscience, to hear and determine all causes of debt
under forty shillings arising within the city.
These courts were extended two centuries later to several large provincial towns, and all were in full activity when Neild wrote,
and indeed supplied the bulk of the poor debtors committed to prison.
These courts were open to many and grave objections.
The commissioners who presided were, quote, little otherwise than self-elected
and when once appointed continued to serve sine die; they were generally near in rank to the parties whose causes they decided.
Often a commissioner had to leave the bench because he was himself a party to the suit that was sub judice.
The activity as well as the futility of these courts may be estimated from the statement given by Neild
that thirteen hundred and twelve debtors were committed by them to Newgate between seventeen ninety-seven and eighteen oh eight,
and that no more than one hundred ninety-seven creditors recovered debts and costs.
The latter indeed hung like millstones round the neck of the unhappy insolvent wretches who found themselves in limbo.
Costs were the gallons of sack to the pennyworth of debt.
Neild found at his visit to Newgate in eighteen ten,
fourteen men and women who had lain there ten, eleven, and thirteen years for debts of a few shillings,
weighted by treble the amount of costs.
Thus, amongst others, Thomas Blackburn had been committed on October fifteenth for a debt of one shilling five pence.
for which the costs were six shillings ten pence.
Thomas Dobson, on twenty-second August, seventeen ninety-nine, for one shilling, with costs of eight shillings, ten pence.
and Susannah Evans, in October the same year, for two shillings, with costs of six shillings, eight pence.
Other cases are recorded elsewhere, as at the Giltspur Street Compter, where in eighteen oh five Mr. Neild found a man named William Grant
detained for one shilling nine pence, with costs of five shillings.
and John Lancaster for one shilling, eight pence, with costs of seven shillings, six pence. Quote.
These surely, I thought," says Mr. Neild, "were bad enough! But it was not so. End quote.
He recites another most outrageous and extraordinary case, in which one John Bird,
a market porter, was arrested and committed at the suit of a publican
for the paltry sum of four pence, with costs of seven shillings, six pence.
Bird was, however, discharged within three days by a subscription raised among his fellow-prisoners.
Mr. Buxton, in his "Inquiry into the System of Prison Discipline,"
quotes a case which came within his own knowledge of a boy sent to prison for non-payment of one penny.
The lad in question was found in Coldbath Fields prison, to which he had been sent for a month in default of paying a fine of forty shillings.
He had been in the employ of a corn-chandler at Islington, and went into London with his master's cart and horse.
There was in the City Road a temporary bar, with a collector of tolls who was sometimes on the spot and sometimes not.
The boy declared he saw no one, and accordingly passed through without paying the toll of a penny.
For this he was summoned before a magistrate, and sentenced as already stated.
The lad was proved to be of good character and the son of respectable parents.
Mr. Buxton's friends at once paid the forty shillings, and the boy was released.
The costs in heavier debts always doubled the sum; if the arrest was made in the country it trebled it.
Neild gives a list of the various items charged upon a debt of ten pounds, which included instructions to sue,
affidavit of debt, drawing praecipe (one pound, five shillings), capias, fee to officer on arrest,
affidavit of service, and many more, amounting in all to twenty-seven,
and costing eleven pounds, fifteen shillings, eight pence, within ten days.
Before dealing with the debtors in Newgate, I may refer incidentally
to those in other London prisons, for Newgate was not the only place of durance for these unfortunate people. There were also the King's Bench,
the Fleet, and the Marshalsea prisons especially devoted to them,
whilst Ludgate, the Giltspur Street, and Borough Compters also received them
the latter two being also a prison for felons and vagrants arrested within certain limits.
The King's Bench was a national prison, in which were confined all debtors arrested for debt or for contempt of the court of the King's Bench.
The population generally amounted to from five hundred to seven hundred, the accommodation being calculated for two hundred.
Every new-comer was entitled to a "chummage" ticket, but did not always get it,
being often obliged to pay a high rent for a bed at the coffee-house or in some room which was vacated by its regular occupant.
No fixed rates or rules governed the hiring out of rooms or parts of a room, and all sorts of imposition was practiced.
The best, or at least the most influential prisoners, got lodging in the State House, which contained "eight large handsome rooms."
Besides those actually resident within the walls,
another two hundred more or less took advantage of "the rules," and lived outside within a circumference of two miles and a half.
In these cases security was given for the amount of the debt,
and a heavy fee at the rate of eight pounds per one hundred pounds, with four pounds for every additional hundred.
Besides these, a number had the privilege of a "run on the key," which allowed a prisoner to go into the rules for the day.
The foregoing rentals and payments for privileges, together with fees exacted on commitment and discharge, went to the marshal or keeper of the prison,
whose net annual income thus entirely derived from the impecunious amounted to between three and four thousand pounds.
The office of marshal had been hereditary,
but in the twenty-seventh George the second the right of presentation was bought by the Crown for ten thousand, five hundred pounds.
The marshal was supposed to be resident either within the prison or the rules.
He seems to have felt no responsibility as to the welfare or comfort of those in charge, and out of whom he made all his money.
The prison was always in "the most filthy state imaginable."
The half or wholly starved prisoners fished for alms or food at the gratings.
When they were sick no more notice was taken of them than of a dog.
A man dying of liver complaint lay on the cold stones without a bed or food to eat.
Dissolute habits prevailed on all sides; drunkenness was universal, gambling perpetual.
The yards were taken up with rackets and five courts, and here and there were "bumble puppy grounds," a game in which the players rolled iron balls
into holes marked with numbers.
How to make most profit out of the wretched denizens of the jail was the marshal's only care. He got a rent for the coffee-house and the bake-house;
the keeper of the large tap-room called the Brace, because it was once kept by two brothers named Partridge, also paid him toll.
The sale of spirits was forbidden, but gin could always be had at the whistling shops, where it was known as Moonshine, Sky Blue,
Mexico, and was consumed at the rate of a hogshead per week.
The Fleet, which stood in Farringdon Street,
was a prison for debtors and persons committed for contempt by the courts of Chancery, Exchequer, and Common Pleas.
It was so used for the date of the abolition of the Star Chamber in the sixteenth Charles the first
The shameful malpractices of Bambridge,
the warden of the Fleet at the commencement of the eighteenth century, are too well known to need more than a passing reference.
A committee of the House of Commons investigated the charges against Bambridge, who was proved to have connived at the escape of some debtors,
and to have been guilty of extortion to others. One Sir William Rich, Bart., he had loaded with heavy irons
In consequence of these disclosures, both Bambridge and Huggin, his predecessor in the office, were committed to Newgate,
and many reforms instituted. But the condition of the prison and its inmates remained unsatisfactory to the last.
It contained generally from six to seven hundred inmates, while another hundred more or less resided in the rules outside.
The principle of "chummage" prevailed as in the King's Bench,
but a number of rooms, fifteen more or less, were reserved for poor debtors under the name of Bartholomew Fair.
The rentals of rooms and fees went to the warden, whose income was two thousand three hundred seventy-two pounds.
The same evils of overcrowding, uncleanliness, want of medical attendance,
absence or neglect of divine service, were present as in the King's Bench, but in an exaggerated form.
The Committee on Jails reported that, quote, although the house of the warden looked into the court,
and the turnkeys slept in the prison, yet scenes of riot, drunkenness, and disorder were most prevalent, end quote.
The state of morals was disgraceful. Any woman obtained admission if sober, and if she got drunk she was not turned out.
There was no distinct place for the female debtors, who lived in the same galleries as the men.
Disturbances were frequent, owing to the riotous conduct of intoxicated women.
Twice a week there was a wine and beer club held at night, which lasted till two or three in the morning.
In the yard behind the prison
were places set apart for skittles, fives, and tennis, which strangers frequented as any other place of public amusement.
Matters were rather better at the Marshalsea.
This very ancient prison, which stood in the High Street, Southwark,
was used for debtors arrested for the lowest sums within twelve miles of the palace of Whitehall;
also for prisoners committed by the Admiralty Court.
At one time the Marshalsea was the receptacle of pirates, but none were committed to it after seventeen eighty-nine.
The court of the Marshalsea was instituted by Charles the first in the sixth year of his reign,
to be held before the steward of the royal household, the knight marshal, and the steward of the court,
with jurisdiction to hold pleas in all actions within the prescribed limits. The court was chiefly used for the recovery of small debts under ten pounds
but its business was much reduced by the extension of the Courts of Conscience.
The prison was a nest of abuses, like its neighbor the King's Bench
and came under the strong animadversion of the Jail Committee of seventeen twenty-nine.
As the business of the Marshalsea Court declined, the numbers in its prison diminished.
The population, as reported by the committee in eighteen fourteen, averaged about sixty,
and the prison, although wives and children resided within the walls, was not overcrowded.
Their conduct too was orderly on the whole.
Drunkenness was not common, chiefly because liquor was not to be had freely, although the tapster paid a rent of two guineas a week for permission to sell it.
The inmates, who euphemistically styled themselves "collegians,"
were governed by rules which they themselves had framed, and under which subscriptions were levied
and fines imposed for conduct disapproved of by the "college."
A court of the collegians was held every Monday to manage its affairs, at which all prisoners were required to attend.
A committee of collegians was elected to act as the executive, also a secretary or accountant to receive monies and keep books,
and a master of the ale-room, who kept this the scene of their revels clean, and saw that boiling water was provided for grog.
Bad language, quarreling, throwing water over one another was forbidden on pain of fine and being sent to Coventry;
but the prevailing moral tone may be guessed from the penalty inflicted upon persons singing obscene songs before nine p.m.
Yet the public opinion of the whole body seems to have checked dissipation.
The poorer prisoners were not in abject want, as in other prisons,
owing to many charitable gifts and bequests, which included annual donations from the Archbishop of Canterbury,
the Lord Steward of the Household, the steward and officers of the Marshalsea Court, and others.
Legacies had also been left to free a certain number of debtors, notably that of one hundred pounds per annum
left by a Mr. Henry Allnutt, who was long a prisoner in the Marshalsea, and came into a fortune while there.
His bequest, which was charged upon his manor at Goring, Oxon, and hence called the Oxford Charity,
was applied only to the release of poor debtors whom four pounds each could free.
The supreme control of the Marshalsea was vested in the marshal of the royal household; but although he drew a salary of five hundred pounds a year,
he did nothing beyond visiting the prison occasionally, and left the administration to the deputy marshal.
The latter's salary, with fees, the rent of the tap and of the chandler's shop, amounted to about six hundred pounds a year.
The compters of Ludgate, Giltspur Street, and the Borough were discontinued as debtors' prisons (as was Newgate also)
on the opening of Whitecross prison for debtors in eighteen fifteen.
Ludgate to the last was the debtors' prison for freemen of the city of London,
clergymen, proctors, attorneys, and persons specially selected by the Corporation.
At one time the Ludgate debtors, accompanied by the keeper,
went outside and beyond the prison to call on their creditors, and try to arrange their debts, but this practice was discontinued.
There were fifteen rooms of various sizes, and as the numbers imprisoned rarely exceeded five-and-twenty, the place was never overcrowded,
while the funds of several bequests and charities were applied in adding to the material comfort of the prisoners.
The Giltspur Street Compter received sheriffs' debtors, also felons, vagrants, and night charges.
It was generally crowded, as debtors who would have gone to the Poultry Compter were sent to Giltspur Street when the former was condemned as unfit to receive prisoners.
The demands for fees were excessive in Giltspur Street.
Those who could not pay were thrown into the wards with the night charges,
and denied admission to the "charity wards," which partook of all the benefits of bequests and donations to poor debtors.
The Borough Compter was in a disgraceful state to the last. The men's ward had an earth, or rather a mud, floor,
and was so unfit to sleep on that it had not been used for many years, so that the men and women associated together indiscriminately.
The rooms had no fireplaces, so it mattered little that no coals were allowed.
There were no beds or bedding, no straw even.
In one room Mr. Neild found a woman ill of a flux shut up with three men;
the latter raised eighteen pence among them to pay for a truss of straw for the poor woman to lie on.
Neild found the prisoners in the Borough Compter ragged, starving, and dirty.
I come now to the debtors in Newgate. The quarters they occupied were divided, as I have said, into three principal divisions
the master's side, the cabin side, and the common side. Payment of a fee of three shillings gained the debtor admission to the two first named;
those who could pay nothing went, as a matter of course, to the common side;
a further fee was, however, demanded from the new-comer before he was made free of either the master's or the cabin side.
This was the reprehensible claim for "garnish," which had already been abolished in all well-conducted prisons, but which still was demanded in Newgate.
Garnish on the cabin side was a guinea at entrance for coals, candles, brooms, etc., and a gallon of beer on discharge;
on the master's side it was thirteen and fourpence, and a gallon of beer on entrance, although Mr. Newman,
in his evidence in eighteen fourteen, said it was more,
and gave the garnish for the common side at that sum, which is five shillings more than Mr. Neild says was extorted on the common side.
Numerous tyrannies were practiced on all who would not and could not pay the garnish.
They were made to wash and swab the ward, or they were shut out from the ward fireplace, and forbidden to pass a chalked line drawn on the floor,
and so were unable either to warm themselves or to cook their food.
Besides these fees, legitimate and illegitimate, there were others which must be paid before release.
The sheriff demanded four shillings, six pence for his liberate, the jailer six shillings, ten pence more, and the turnkey two shillings;
and thus when the debtor's debt had been actually paid, or when he had abandoned his property to the creditors, and, almost destitute,
looked forward to his liberty, he was still delayed until he had paid a new debt arising, quote,
only out of a satisfaction of all his former debts, end quote. The fees were not always extorted, it is true;
nor was non-payment made a pretext for further imprisonment, thanks to the humanity of the jailer, or the funds provided by various charities.
There was this much honest forbearance in Newgate in these days,
that debtors who could afford the cabin and master's side were not permitted to share in the prison charities.
These were lumped together into a general fund,
and a calculation made as to the amount that might be expended per week from the whole sum, so that the latter might last out the year.
It generally ran to about six pounds per week. The money, which at one time had been distributed quarterly, and all went in drink,
was after eighteen oh seven, through the exertions of the keeper of the jail, spent in the purchase of necessaries.
But this weekly pittance did not go far when the debtors' side was crowded, as it often was;
notably as when numbers filled Newgate in anticipation of Lord Redesdale's bill for insolvent debtors,
and there were as many as three hundred and fifty prisoners in at one time.
The city also allowed the poor debtors fourteen ounces of bread daily, and their share of eight stone of meat, an allowance which never varied,
issued once a week, and divided as far as it would go -- a very precarious and uncertain ration.
The bread was issued every alternate day; and while some prisoners often ate their whole allowance at once,
others who arrived just after the time of distribution were often forty-eight hours without food. The latter might also be six days without meat.
Share in the weekly allowance of meat might also be denied to debtors who had not paid "garnish," as well as in the weekly grant from the charitable fund.
Hence starvation stared many in the face, unless friends from outside came to their assistance,
or the keeper made them a special grant of six pence per diem out of the common stock;
or the sixpenny allowance was claimed for the creditors, which seldom happened, owing to the expense the process entailed.
The poor debtors were not supplied with beds. Those who could pay the price might hire them from each other,
or from persons who made a trade of it, or they might bring their beds with them into the prison.
Failing any of these methods, seeing that straw was forbidden for fear of fire, they had to be satisfied with a couple of the rugs provided by the city
the supply of which was, however, limited, and there were not always enough to give bedding to all. The stock was diminished by theft;
female visitors carried them out of the prisons, or the debtors destroyed them when the weather was warm,
and they were not in great demand, in order to convert them into mop-heads or cleaning-rags.
Sometimes rugs were urgently required and not forthcoming;
a severe winter set in, the new stock had not been supplied by the contractors, and the poor debtors perished of cold.
Again, there was no regular allowance of fuel. Coals were purchased out of the garnish money and the charitable fund;
so were candles, salt, pepper, mops and brooms. But the latter could have been of little service. Dirt prevailed everywhere;
indeed the place, with its oak floors caulked with pitch, and smoked ceilings,
could not be made even to look clean while there was no obligation of personal cleanliness on individuals, who often came into the prison in filthy rags.
Only now and again, in extreme cases, an unusually nasty companion was stripped, haled to the pump,
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section five: Newgate down to eighteen eighteen, part two.
The squalor and uncleanness of the debtors' side was intensified by constant overcrowding.
Prisoners were committed to it quite without reference to its capacity.
No remonstrance was attended to,
no steps taken to reduce the number of committals, and the governor was obliged to utilize the chapel as a day and night room.
Besides this, although the families of debtors were no longer permitted to live with them inside the jail,
hundreds of women and children came in every morning to spend the day there, and there was no limitation whatever to the numbers of visitors admitted to the debtors' side.
Friends arrived about nine a.m., and went out at nine p.m., when as many as two hundred visitors have been observed leaving the debtors' yards at one time.
The day passed in revelry and drunkenness. Although spirituous liquors were forbidden,
wine and beer might be had in any quantity, the only limitation being
that not more than one bottle of wine or one quart of beer could be issued at one time. No account was taken of the amount of liquors admitted in one day,
and debtors might practically have as much as they liked, if they could only pay for it.
No attempt was made to check drunkenness, beyond the penalty of shutting out friends from any ward in which a prisoner exceeded.
Quarreling among the debtors was not unfrequent. Blows were struck, and fights often ensued.
For this and other acts of misconduct there was the discipline of the refractory ward, or "strong room" on the debtors' side.
Bad cases were removed to a cell on the felons' side, and here they were locked in solitary confinement for three days at a time.
Order throughout the debtors' side was preserved
and discipline maintained by a system open to grave abuses, and which had the prescription of long usage,
and which was never wholly rooted out for many years to come.
This was the pernicious plan of governing by prisoners, or of setting a favored few in authority over the many.
The head of the debtors' prison was a prisoner called the steward, who was chosen by the whole body from six whom the keeper nominated.
This steward was practically supreme.
All the allowances of food passed through his hands; he had the control of the poor-box for chance charities,
he collected the garnish money, and distributed the weekly grant from the prison charitable fund.
In the latter duties he was, however, supervised by three auditors, freely chosen by the prisoners among themselves.
The auditors were paid a shilling each for their services each time the poor-box was opened. The steward was also remunerated for his trouble.
He had a double allowance of bread, deducted, of course, from the already too limited portion of the rest,
and no doubt made the meat also pay toll.
Under the steward there were captains of wards, chosen in the same way, and performing analogous duties.
These subordinate chiefs were also rewarded out of the scanty prison rations.
The same system was extended to the criminal side, and cases were on record of the place of wardsman being sold for considerable sums.
So valuable were they deemed, that as much as fifty guineas was offered to the keeper for the post.
Enough has been said, probably, to prove that there was room for improvement in the condition and treatment of debtors in the prisons of the city of London.
This gradually was forced upon the consciousness of the Corporation,
and about eighteen twelve application was made to Parliament for funds to build a new debtors' prison.
Authority was given to raise money on the Orphans' Fund to the extent of ninety thousand pounds.
A site was purchased between Red Lion and White Cross streets, and a new prison planned,
which would accommodate the inmates of Newgate and of the three compters, Ludgate,
Giltspur Street, and the Poultry, or about four hundred and seventy-six in all.
The evils of association for these debtors were perpetuated, although the plan provided for the separation of the various contingents committed to it.
There was no lack of air and light for the new jail, and several exercising yards.
The completion of this very necessary building was, however, much delayed for want of funds,
and it was not ready to relieve Newgate till late in eighteen fifteen.
The reforms which were to be attempted in that prison
more particularly as regarded the classification of prisoners, and which were dependent on the space to be gained by the removal of the debtors,
could not be carried out till then. It is to be feared that long after the opening of White Cross Street prison,
Newgate continued to be a reproach to those responsible for its management.
I pass now to the criminal side of Newgate, which consisted of the six quarters or yards already enumerated and described.
The inmates of this part, as distinguished from the debtors, were comprised in four classes:
(two) persons under sentence of imprisonment for a fixed period, or until they shall have paid certain fines;
(three) transports awaiting removal to the colonies, and (four) capital convicts, condemned to death and awaiting execution.
At one time the whole of these different categories were thrown together pell-mell, young and old, the untried with the convicted.
An imperfect attempt at classification was, however, made in eighteen twelve, and a yard was as far as possible set apart for the untried,
or class (one), with whom, under the imperious demand for accommodation, were also associated the misdemeanants, or class (two).
This was the chapel yard, with its five wards, which were calculated to hold seventy prisoners, but often held many more.
A further sub-classification was attempted by separating at night those charged with misdemeanors from those charged with felony,
but all mingled freely during the day in the yard.
The sleeping accommodation in the chapel-yard wards, and indeed throughout the prison, consisted of a barrack bed,
which was a wooden flooring on a slightly inclined plane, with a beam running across the top to serve as a pillow.
No beds were issued, only two rugs per prisoner.
When each sleeper had the full lateral space allotted to him, it amounted to one foot and a half on the barrack bed;
but when the ward was obliged to accommodate double the ordinary number, as was frequently the case,
the sleepers covered the entire floor, with the exception of a passage in the middle.
All the misdemeanants, whatever their offense, were lodged in this chapel ward.
As many various and, according to our ideas, heinous crimes came under this head,
in the then existing state of the law,
the man guilty of a common assault found himself side by side with the fraudulent, or others who had attempted abominable crimes.
In this heterogeneous society were also thrown the unfortunate journalists to whom I have already referred, and on whom imprisonment in Newgate
was frequently adjudged for so-called libels, or too out-spoken comments in print.
It was particularly recommended by the Committee on Jails in eighteen fourteen
that some other and less mixed prison should be used for the confinement of persons convicted of libels. But this suggestion was ignored.
Indeed the partial classification attempted seems to have been abandoned within a year or two.
The Hon. H. G. Bennet, who visited Newgate in eighteen seventeen, saw in one yard, in a total of seventy-two prisoners,
thirty-five tried and thirty-seven untried. Of the former, three were transports for life,
four for fourteen years, and three of them persons sentenced to fines or short imprisonment -- one for little more than a month.
Two of the untried were for murder, and several for house-breaking and highway robbery.
Nor were the misdemeanants and bail prisoners any longer separated from those whose crimes were of a more serious character.
Mr. Bennet refers to a gentleman confined for want of bail, who occupied a room with five others
two committed by the Bankruptcy Commissioner, one for perjury, and two transports.
Persons convicted of publishing libels were still immured in the same rooms with transports and felons.
The middle yard, as far as its limits would permit, was appropriated to felons and transports. The wards here were generally very crowded.
Each ward was calculated to hold twenty-four, allowing each individual one foot and a half;
Quote, a common-sized man, says the keeper, Mr. Newman, can turn in nineteen inches, end quote.
These twenty-four could just sleep on the barrack bed; when the number was higher, and it often rose to forty, the surplus had to sleep on the floor.
The crowding was in consequence of the delay in removing transports.
These often remained in Newgate for six months, sometimes a year, in some cases longer;
in one, for seven years -- that of a man sentenced to death, for whom great interest had been made, but whom it was not thought right to pardon.
Occasionally the transports made themselves so useful in the jail that they were passed over.
Mr. Newman admitted that he had petitioned that certain "trusty men" might be left in the jail.
Constantly associated with these convicted felons were numbers of juveniles, infants of tender years.
There were frequently in the middle yard seven or eight children, the youngest barely nine,
the oldest only twelve or thirteen, exposed to all the contaminating influences of the place.
Mr. Bennet mentions also the case of young men of better stamp, clerks in city offices, and youths of good parentage,
Quote, in this dreadful situation, end quote. who had been rescued from the hulks through the kindness and attention of the Secretary of State.
Quote, yet they had been long enough, he goes on to say, in the prison associated with the lowest and vilest criminals,
with convicts of all ages and characters, to render it next to impossible but that, with the obliteration of all sense of self-respect,
the inevitable consequence of such a situation, their morals must have been destroyed;
and though distress or the seduction of others might have led to the commission of this their first offense,
yet the society they were driven to live in, the language they daily heard, and the lessons they were taught in this academy,
must have had a tendency to turn them into the world hardened and accomplished in the ways of vice and crime. End quote.
Mr. Buxton, in the work already quoted, instances another grievous case of the horrors of indiscriminate association in Newgate.
It was that of a person, quote, who practiced in the law, and who was connected by marriage with some very respectable families.
Having been committed to Clerkenwell,
he was sent on to Newgate in a coach, handcuffed to a noted house-breaker, who was afterwards cast for death.
The first night in Newgate, and for the subsequent fortnight,
he slept in the same bed with a highwayman on one side, and a man charged with murder on the other.
Spirits were freely introduced, and although he at first abstained,
he found he must adopt the manners of his companions, or that his life would be in danger.
They viewed him with some suspicion, as one of whom they knew nothing.
He was in consequence put out of the protection of their internal law, end quote. Their code was a subject of some curiosity.
When any prisoner committed an offense against the community or against an individual, he was tried by a court in the jail.
A prisoner, generally the oldest and most dexterous thief,
was appointed judge, and a towel tied in knots was hung on each side in imitation of a wig.
The judge sat in proper form; he was punctiliously styled "my lord."
A jury having been selected and duly sworn, the culprit was then arraigned. Justice, however, was not administered with absolute integrity.
A bribe to the judge was certain to secure acquittal, and the neglect of the formality was as certainly followed by condemnation.
Various punishments were inflicted, the heaviest of which was standing in the pillory.
This was carried out by putting the criminal's head through the legs of a chair, and stretching out his arms and tying them to the legs.
The culprit was then compelled to carry the chair about with him.
But all punishments might readily be commuted into a fine to be spent in gin for judge and jury.
The prisoner mentioned above was continually persecuted by trials of this kind.
The most trifling acts were magnified into offenses.
He was charged with moving something which should not be touched, with leaving a door open, or coughing maliciously to the disturbance of his companions.
The evidence was invariably sufficient to convict, and the judge never hesitated to inflict the heaviest penalties.
The unfortunate man was compelled at length to adopt the habits of his associates;
Quote, by insensible degrees he began to lose his repugnance to their society,
caught their flash terms and sung their songs, was admitted to their revels, and acquired, in place of habits of perfect sobriety,
a taste for spirits. End quote.
His wife visited him in Newgate, and wrote a pitiable account of the state in which she found her husband.
He was an inmate of the same ward with others of the most dreadful sort, quote,
whose language and manners, whose female associates of the most abandoned description, and the scenes consequent with such lost wretches
prevented me from going inside but seldom, and I used to communicate with him through the bars from the passage. End quote.
One day he was too ill to come down and meet her.
She went up to the ward and found him lying down, quote,
pale as death, very ill, and in a dreadfully dirty state, the wretches making game of him, and enjoying my distress;
and I learned he had been up with the others the whole night.
Though they could not force him to gamble, he was compelled to drink,
and I was obliged afterwards to let him have five shillings to pay his share,
otherwise he would have been stripped of his clothes. End quote.
Felons who could pay the price were permitted, irrespective of their character or offenses,
to purchase the greater ease and comfort of the master's side.
The entrance fee was at least thirteen shillings, six pence a head, with half-a-crown a week more for bed and bedding,
the wards being furnished with barrack bedsteads, upon which each prisoner had the regulation allowance of sleeping room
or about a foot and a half laterally. These fees were in reality a substantial contribution towards the expenses of the jail;
without them the keeper declared that he could not pay the salaries of turnkeys and servants, nor keep the prison going at all.
Besides the jail fees, there was garnish of half-a-guinea, collected by the steward,
and spent in providing coals, candles, plates, knives, and forks; while all the occupants of this part of the prison
supported themselves; they had the ration of prison bread only,
but they had no share in the prison meat or other charities, and they or their friends found them in food.
All who could scrape together the cash seem to have gladly availed themselves of the privilege of entering the master's side.
It was the only way to escape the horrors, the distress, penury, and rags of the common yards.
Idleness was not so universally the rule in this part of the jail.
Artisans and others were at liberty to work at their trades, provided they were not dangerous.
Tailoring and shoemaking was permitted, but it was deemed unsafe to allow a carpenter or blacksmith to have his tools.
All the money earned by prisoners was at their own disposal, and was spent almost habitually in drink, chambering, and wantonness.
The best accommodation the jail could offer was reserved for the prisoners on the state side,
from whom still higher fees were exacted, with the same discreditable idea of swelling the revenues of the prison.
To constitute this the aristocratic quarter, unwarrantable demands were made upon the space properly allotted to the female felons,
and no lodger was rejected, whatever his status, who offered himself and could bring grist to the mill.
The luxury of the state side was for a long time open to all who could pay
the convicted felon, the transport awaiting removal, the lunatic whose case was still undecided,
the misdemeanant tried or untried, the debtor who wished to avoid the discomfort of the crowded debtors' side, the outspoken newspaper editor,
or the daring reporter of parliamentary debates.
The better class of inmate complained bitterly of this enforced companionship with the vile,
association at one time forbidden by custom, but which greed and rapacity long made the rule.
The fee for admission to the state side, as fixed by the table of fees, was three guineas, but Mr. Newman declared that he never took more than two.
Ten and sixpence a week more was charged as rent for a single bed; where two or more slept in a bed the rent was seven shillings a week each.
Prisoners who could afford it sometimes paid for four beds, at the rate of twenty-eight shillings, and so secured the luxury of a private room.
A Mr. Lundy, charged with forgery, was thus accommodated on the state side for upwards of five years.
But the keeper protested that no single prisoner could thus monopolize space if the state side was crowded.
The keeper went still further in his efforts to make money.
He continued the ancient practice of letting out a portion of his own house, and by a poetical fiction treated it as an annex of the state side.
Mr. Davison, sent to Newgate for embezzlement, and whose case is given in the preceding chapter,
was accommodated with a room in Mr. Newman's house at the extravagant rental of thirty guineas per week;
Mr. Cobbett was also a lodger of Mr. Newman's; and so were any members of the aristocracy,
if they happened to be in funds -- among whom was the Marquis of Sligo in eighteen eleven.
The female felons' wards I shall describe at length in the next chapter,
which will deal with Mrs. Fry's philanthropic exertions at this period in this particular part of the prison.
These wards were always full to overflowing; sometimes double the number the rooms could accommodate were crowded into them.
There was a master's side for females who could pay the usual fees, but they associated with the rest in the one narrow yard common to all.
The tried and the untried, young and old, were herded together
sometimes girls of thirteen, twelve, even ten or nine years of age, were exposed to, quote,
all the contagion and profligacy which prevailed in this part of the prison, end quote.
There was no separation even for the women under sentence of death, who lived in a common and perpetually crowded ward.
Only when the order of execution came down were those about to suffer placed apart in one of the rooms in the arcade of the middle ward.
I have kept till the last that part of the prison which was usually the last resting-place of so many.
The old press yard has been fully described in a previous chapter.
The name still survived in the new press yard, which was the receptacle of the male condemned prisoners. It was generally crowded, like the rest of the prison.
Except in murder cases, where the execution was generally very promptly performed,
strange and inconceivable delay occurred in carrying out the extreme sentence.
Hence there was a terrible accumulation of prisoners in the condemned cells.
Once, during the long illness of George the third, as many as one hundred were there waiting the "Report," as it was called.
At another time there were fifty, one of whom had been under sentence a couple of years.
Mr. Bennet speaks of thirty-eight capital convicts he found in the press yard in February eighteen seventeen,
five of whom had been condemned the previous July, four in September, and twenty-nine in October.
This procrastination bred certain callousness.
Few realizing that the dreadful fate would overtake them, dismissed the prospect of death,
and until the day was actually fixed, spent the time in roistering, swearing, gambling, or playing at ball.
Visitors were permitted access to them without stint;
unlimited drink was not denied them provided it was obtained in regulated quantities at one time.
These capital convicts, says Mr. Bennet, quote, lessened the ennui and despair of their situation by unbecoming merriment
or sought relief in the constant application of intoxicating stimulants.
I saw Cashman a few hours before his execution, smoking and drinking with the utmost unconcern and indifference, end quote.
Those who were thus reckless reacted upon the penitent who knew their days were numbered,
and their gibes and jollity counteracted the ordinary's counsels or the independent preacher's earnest prayers.
For while Roman Catholics and Dissenters were encouraged to see ministers of their own persuasion,
a number of amateurs were ever ready to give their gratuitous ministrations to the condemned.
The prisoners in the press yard had free access during the day to the yard and large day room;
at night they were placed in the fifteen cells, two, three, or more together, according to the total number to be accommodated.
They were never left quite alone for fear of suicide, and for the same reason they were searched for weapons or poisons.
But they nevertheless frequently managed to secrete the means of making away with themselves, and accomplished their purpose.
Convicted murderers were kept continuously in the cells on bread and water,
in couples, from the time of sentence to that of execution, which was about three or four days generally,
from Friday to Monday, so as to include one Sunday, on which day there was a special service for the condemned in the prison chapel.
This latter was an ordeal which all dreaded, and many avoided by denying their faith.
The condemned occupied an open pew in the center of the chapel, hung with black; in front of them, upon a table, was a black coffin in full view.
The chapel was filled with a curious but callous congregation, who came to stare at the miserable people thus publicly exposed.
Well might Mr. Bennet write that the condition of the condemned side was the most prominent of the manifold evils in the present system of Newgate,
quote, so discreditable to the metropolis, end quote.
Yet it must have been abundantly plain to the reader that the other evils existing were great and glaring. A brief summary of them will best prove this.
The jail was neither suitable nor sufficiently large. It was not even kept weather-tight.
The roof of the female prison, says the grand jury in their presentment in eighteen thirteen, let in the rain.
Supplies of common necessaries, such as have now been part of the furniture of every British jail for many years,
were meager or altogether absent.
The rations of food were notoriously inadequate, and so carelessly distributed, that many were left to starve.
So unjust and unequal was the system, that the allowance to convicted criminals was better than that of the innocent debtor,
and the general insufficiency was such
that it multiplied beyond all reason the number of visitors, many of whom came merely as the purveyors of food to their friends.
The prison allowances were eked out by the broken victuals generously given by several eating-house keepers in the city,
such as Messrs. Birch of Cornhill and Messrs. Leach and Dollimore of Ludgate Hill.
These were fetched away in a large tub on a truck by a turnkey.
Amongst the heap was often the meat that had made turtle soup, which, when heated and stirred together in a saucepan, was said to be very good eating.
The bedding was scanty; fuel and light had to be purchased out of prisoners' private means; clothing was issued but rarely,
even to prisoners almost in nakedness, and as a special charitable gift. Extortion was practiced right and left.
Garnish continued to be demanded long after it had disappeared in other and better-regulated prisons.
The fees on reception and discharge must be deemed exorbitant, when it is remembered the impoverished class who usually crowded the jail;
and they were exacted to relieve a rich corporation from paying for the maintenance of their own prison.
This imposition of fees left prisoners destitute on their discharge, without funds to support them in their first struggle to recommence life,
with ruined character, bad habits, and often bad health contracted in the jail.
A further and a more iniquitous method of extorting money
was still practiced, that of loading newly-arrived prisoners until they paid certain fees.
Ironing was still the rule, not only for the convicted, but for those charged with felonies; only the misdemeanants escaped.
At the commencement of every sessions, such of the untried as had purchased "easement" of irons were called up and re-fettered,
preparatory to their appearance in the Old Bailey. Irons were seldom removed from the convicted until discharge;
sometimes the wearer was declared medically unfit, or he obtained release by long good conduct,
or the faithful discharge of some petty office, such as gatesman or captain of a ward.
The irons weighed from three to four pounds, but heavier irons, seven or eight pounds' weight,
were imposed in case of misconduct; and when there had been an attempt at escape,
the culprit was chained down to the floor by running a chain through his irons which prevented him from climbing to the window of his cell.
Among other excuses offered for thus manacling all almost without exception, was that it was the best and safest method
of distinguishing a prisoner from a stranger and temporary visitor.
Clothes or prison uniform would not have served the purpose, for a disguise can be rapidly and secretly put on,
whereas irons cannot well be exchanged without loss of time and attracting much attention.
The unchecked admission of crowds of visitors to the felons' as well as the debtors' side was another unmixed evil.
By this means spirits, otherwise unattainable and strictly prohibited, were smuggled into the jail.
Searches were made certainly, but they were too often superficial, or they might be evaded by a trifling bribe.
Hence the frequent cases of drunkenness, of which no notice was taken, unless people grew riotous in their cups
and attracted attention by their disorderly behavior.
Another frightful consequence of this indiscriminate admission was the influx of numbers of abandoned women,
only a few of whom had the commendable prudery to pass themselves off as the wives of prisoners.
Any reputed, and indeed any real, wife might spend the night in Newgate if she would pay the shilling fee, commonly known as the "bad money,"
which might have done something towards increasing the prison receipts, had it not been appropriated by the turnkey who winked at this evasion of the rules.
Among the daily visitors were members of the criminal classes still at large,
the thieves and burglars who carried on the active business of their profession, from which their confederates were temporarily debarred.
One notorious character, while a prisoner awaiting transfer to the hulks,
kept open house, so to speak, and entertained daily within the walls a select party of the most noted thieves in London.
This delectable society enticed into their set a clerk who had been imprisoned for fraud,
and offered him half the booty if he would give full information as to the transactions and correspondence of his late employers.
Owing to the facility of intercourse between inside and outside, many crimes were doubtless hatched in Newgate.
Some of the worst and most extensive burglaries were planned there.
I believe, says Mr. Bennet in the letter already largely quoted,
that there is no place in the metropolis where more crimes are projected or where stolen property is more secreted than in Newgate.
These malpractices were fostered by the absence of all supervision and the generally unbroken idleness.
Although attempted partially at Bridewell, and more systematically at the new Millbank penitentiary,
but just open (eighteen sixteen), the regular employment of prisoners had never yet been accepted as a principle in the metropolitan prisons.
Insuperable difficulties were still supposed to stand in the way of any general employment of prisoners at their trades.
There was fear as to the unrestricted use of tools,
limits of space, the interference of the ill-disposed, who would neither work nor let others do so,
and the danger of losing material, raw or manufactured.
Many years were to elapse before these objections should be fairly met and universally overcome.
It was not strange, therefore, that the inmates of Newgate should turn their unoccupied brains and idle hands to all manner of mischief;
that when they were not carousing, plotting, or scheming,
they should gamble with dice or cards, and play at bumble puppy or some other disreputable game of chance.
The report of the Committee of the House of Commons painted so black a picture of Newgate as then conducted, that the Corporation were roused in very shame
to undertake some kind of reform.
The above-mentioned report was ordered to be printed upon the ninth May.
Upon the twenty-ninth July the same year,
the court of aldermen appointed a committee of its own body, assisted by the town clerk, Mr. Dance, city surveyor, son to the architect of Newgate,
and Mr. Addison, keeper of Newgate, to make a visitation of the jails supposed to be the best managed, including those of Petworth and Gloucester.
This committee was to compare allowances, examine rules, and certify as to the condition of prisoners;
also to make such proposals as might appear salutary, and calculated to improve Newgate and the rest of the city jails.
This committee made its report in September the following year, and an excellent report it is, so far as its recommendations are concerned.
The committee seems to have fully realized, even at this early date (eighteen fifteen),
many of the indispensable conditions of a model prison according to modern ideas.
It admitted the paramount necessity
for giving every prisoner a sleeping cell to himself, an amount of enlightenment which is hardly general among European nations at this
the latter end of the nineteenth century, several of which still fall far short of our English ideal,
that all prisoners should always be in separate cells by night, and those of short sentences by day.
It recommended day cells or rooms for regular labor, which should be compulsory upon all transports and prisoners sentenced to hard labor,
the work being constant and suitable, with certain hours of relaxation and for food and exercise.
The personal cleanliness of all prisoners was to be insisted upon; they should be made to wash at least once a day,
with the penalty of forfeiting the day's allowance of food, an increase of which the committee had recommended.
The provision of more baths was also suggested, and the daily sweeping out of the prison.
The clothes of prisoners arriving dirty, or in rags, should be fumigated before worn in the jail,
but as yet no suggestion was made to provide prison uniform.
A laundry should be established, and a matron appointed on the female side, where all the prisoners' washing could be performed.
Proper hours for locking and unlocking prisoners should be insisted upon;
a bell should give notice thereof, and of meal-hours, working-hours, or of escapes.
The committee took upon itself to lay down stringent rules for the discipline of the prison.
The jailer should be required to visit every part and see every prisoner daily; the chaplain should perform service, visit the sick,
instruct the prisoners, quote, give spiritual advice and administer religious consolation, end quote. to all who might need them;
the surgeon should see all prisoners, whether ill or well, once a week, and take general charge of the infirmaries.
All three, governor, chaplain, and surgeon, should keep journals, which should be inspected periodically by the visiting magistrates.
It should be peremptorily forbidden to the keeper or any officer to make a pecuniary profit out of the supplies of food, fuel, or other necessaries.
No prisoner should be allowed to obtain superior accommodation on the payment of any fees. Fees indeed should be generally abolished, garnish also.
No prisoners should in future be ironed, except in cases of misconduct,
provided only that their security was not jeopardized, and dependent upon the enforcement of another new rule,
which recommended restrictions upon the number of visitors admitted.
No wine or beer should be in future admitted into or sold in the jail,
except for the use of the debtors, or as medical comforts for the infirmary.
Drunkenness, if it ever occurred, should be visited with severe punishment;
gaming of all sorts should be peremptorily forbidden under heavy pains and penalties.
The feelings of the condemned prisoners should no longer be outraged by their exposure in the chapel, and the chapel should be rearranged,
so that the various classes might be seated separately, and so as not to see each other.
It will hardly be denied that these proposals went to the root of the matter.
Had they been accepted in their entirety, little fault could in future have been found with the managers of Newgate.
In common justice to them, it must be admitted that immediate effect was given to all that could be easily carried out.
The state side ceased to exist, and the female prisoners thus regained the space of which their quadrangle had been robbed.
The privileges of the master's side also disappeared; fees were nominally abolished, and garnish was scotched, although not yet killed outright.
A certain number of bedsteads were provided, and there was a slight increase in the ration of bread.
But here the recommendations touched at once upon the delicate subject of expense, and it is clear that the committee hesitated on this score.
It made this too the excuse for begging the most important issue of the whole question.
The committee did not deny the superior advantages offered by such prisons as Gloucester and Petworth,
but it at once deprecated the idea that the city could follow the laudable example thus set in the provinces. Quote,
Were a metropolitan prison erected on the same lines, with all the space not only for air and exercise, but for day rooms and sleeping cells
End quote. it would cover some thirty acres, and cost a great deal more than the city, with the example of Whitecross Street prison before it,
The committee does not seem to have yet understood that Newgate could be only and properly replaced
by a new jail built on the outskirts, as Holloway eventually was, and permitted itself to be altogether countered
and checked in its efforts towards reform by the prohibitory costliness of the land about Newgate.
With the seeming impossibility of extending the limits of the prison as it then stood,
all chances of classification and separation vanished, and the greatest evils remained untouched.
All the committee could do in this respect was to throw the responsibility on others.
It pointed out that the Government was to blame for the overcrowding, and might diminish it if it chose.
It was very desirable that there should be a more speedy removal of transports from Newgate to the ships.
Again, there was the new Millbank penitentiary now ready for occupation.
Why not relieve Newgate by drawing more largely upon the superior accommodation which Millbank offered?
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section seven: The beginnings of prison reform.
While Mrs. Fry was diligently engaged upon her self-imposed task in Newgate,
other earnest people, inspired doubtless by her noble example, were stirred up to activity in the same great work.
It began to be understood that prison reform could only be compassed by continuous and combined effort.
The pleadings, however eloquent, of a single individual were unable to more than partially remedy the widespread and colossal evils of British prisons.
Howard's energy and devotion were rewarded by lively sympathy, but the desire to improve which followed his exposures was but short-lived.
It was so powerless against the persistent neglect of those intrusted with prison management, that, five-and-twenty years later,
Mr. Neild, a second Howard,
as indefatigable and self-sacrificing, found by personal visitation that the condition of jails throughout the kingdom was,
with a few bright exceptions, still deplorable and disgraceful.
Mr. Neild was compelled to admit in eighteen twelve that "the great reformation produced by Howard
was in several places merely temporary:
some prisons that had been ameliorated under the persuasive influence of his kind advice were relapsing into their former horrid state of privation,
filthiness, severity, or neglect; many new dungeons had aggravated the evils against which his sagacity could not but remonstrate;
the motives for a transient amendment were becoming paralyzed, and the effect had ceased with the cause."
I have shown in a previous chapter what Newgate was at this period, despite a vast expenditure and boasted efforts to introduce reforms.
Some of the county jails, and one or two borough jails, had been rebuilt,
generally through the personal activity of influential and benevolent local magnates, but the true principles of prison construction
were as yet but imperfectly understood, and such portions of the "improved" jails of that period as were still extant a few years back,
contrast ludicrously with the prison architecture based upon a century's experience of our own age.
The neglect of prison reform in those days was not to be visited upon the legislature.
The executive, although harassed by internal commotion and foreign war, was not entirely callous to the crying need for amelioration in jails.
Measures remedial, although at best partial and incomplete, were introduced from time to time.
Thus in eighteen thirteen the exaction of jail fees had been forbidden by law,
and two other acts more peremptory and precise followed on the same subject in succeeding years.
In eighteen fourteen a bill was brought in to insist upon the appointment of chaplains in jails, and when this had passed into law,
it was subsequently amplified, and the rates of salaries fixed.
Various acts were also passed to consolidate and amend previous jail acts.
The erection of new prison buildings was made imperative under certain conditions and following certain rules
the principle of classification was freshly enunciated; prison regulations were framed for general observance.
But the effect of this legislation was rather weakened by the remoteness of the pressure exercised.
The onus of improvement lay upon the magistracy, the local authorities administering local funds,
and they were not threatened with any particular penalties if they evaded or ignored the new acts.
Moreover, the laws applied more particularly to county jurisdictions.
The borough jails, those in fact under corporate management, were not included in the new measures;
it was hoped that their rulers would hire accommodation in the county prisons, and that the inferior establishments would in course of time disappear.
Yet the borough jails were destined to survive many years, and to exhibit for a long time to come all the worst features of jail mismanagement.
It was in eighteen seventeen that a small band of philanthropists resolved to form themselves into an association for the improvement of prison discipline.
They were hopeless of any general reform by the action of the executive alone.
They felt that private enterprise might
with advantage step in, and by the collection and diffusion of information, and the reiteration of sound advice, greatly assist the good work.
The association was organized under the most promising auspices.
A king's son, the Duke of Gloucester, was the patron; among the vice-presidents were many great peers of the realm
several bishops, and a number of members of the House of Commons, including Mr. Manners Sutton,
Mr. Sturges Bourne, Sir James Mackintosh, Sir James Scarlett, and William Wilberforce.
An active committee was appointed, comprising many names already well known, some of them destined to become famous in the annals of philanthropy.
One of the moving spirits was the Honorable H. G. Bennet, M.P., whose vigorous protests against the lamentable condition of Newgate have already been recorded.
Mrs. Fry's brother, Mr. Samuel Hoare, Junior, was chairman of the committee, on which also served many noted members of the Society of Friends
Mr. Gurney, Mr. Fry, Messrs. Forster, and Mr. T. F. Buxton, the coadjutor of Wilberforce in the great anti-slavery struggle.
Mr. Buxton had already been associated with Mrs. Fry in the Newgate visitation, and his attention had thus been drawn to the neglected state of English prisons.
When in Belgium he had examined with great satisfaction the admirable management of the great "Maison de Force" at Ghent,
which Howard had eulogized some forty years before.
In order to give greater value to the pamphlet,
he personally visited several English jails, and pointed his observations by drawing forcible contrasts between the good and bad.
Mr. Buxton's small work on prison discipline gave a new aspect to the question he had so much at heart.
For the first time the doctrine was enunciated that prisoners had rights of their own.
The untried, and in the eyes of the law still innocent, could claim pure air, wholesome and sufficient food, and opportunities for exercise.
They had a right, Mr. Buxton affirmed, to be employed in their own crafts, provided it could be safely followed in prison.
You have no right, he says, addressing the authorities, "to subject a prisoner to suffering from cold,
by want of bed-clothing by night or firing by day
and the reason is plain: you have taken him from his home, and have deprived him of the means of providing himself with the necessaries or comforts of life,
and therefore you are bound to furnish him with moderate indeed but suitable accommodation."
You have for the same reason, he goes on, "no right to ruin his habits by compelling him to be idle,
his morals by compelling him to mix with a promiscuous assemblage of hardened and convicted criminals,
or his health by forcing him at night into a damp, unventilated cell, with such crowds of companions as very speedily render the air foul and putrid;
or to make him sleep in close contact with the victims of contagious and loathsome disease,
or amidst the noxious effluvia of dirt and corruption.
In short, attention to his feelings, mental and bodily, a supply of every necessary, abstraction from evil society,
the conservation of his health and industrious habits, are the clear, evident, undeniable rights of an unconvicted prisoner."
Nor even when found guilty and his liberty forfeited did his privileges cease. The law appointed a suitable punishment for the offense;
it was for those charged with the administration of the law to guard carefully against any aggravation of that punishment,
to see that "no circumstances of severity are found in his treatment which are not found in his sentence."
No judge ever condemned a man to be half-perished with cold by day, or half-suffocated with heat by night.
Who ever heard of a criminal being sentenced to catch the rheumatism or the typhus fever?
nor has he a right to poison or starve his fellow-creatures."
The convicted delinquent has his rights, said Mr. Buxton authoritatively.
because they are not specified in his sentence; he is therefore entitled to a wholesome atmosphere,
decent clothing and bedding, and a diet sufficient to support him."
These somewhat novel but undoubtedly indisputable propositions were backed up, not by sound arguments only, but by the letter of the law.
As Mr. Buxton pointed out, many old acts of parliament designed to protect the prisoner were still in full force.
Some might be in abeyance, but they had never been repealed, and some were quite freshly imported upon the Statute Book.
As far back as the reign of Charles the second, a law was passed declaring that sufficient provision should be made for the relief and setting on work
of "poor and needy prisoners committed to the common jail for felony and other misdemeanors, who many times perish before their trial;
and the poor there living idle and unemployed become debauched, and come forth instructed in the practice of thievery and lewdness."
As a remedy, justices of the peace were empowered to provide materials for the setting of poor prisoners to work,
and to pay overseers or instructors out of the county rates.
Again, the twenty-two Charles the second c twenty ordered the jailer to keep felons and debtors "separate and apart from one another,
in distinct rooms, on pain of forfeiting his office and treble damages to the party aggrieved."
A much later act, the fourteen George the third c. fifty-nine (seventeen seventy-four),
which was contemporaneous with Howard's first journeys, laid down precise rules as regards cleanliness, and the proper supply of space and air.
This act set forth that "whereas the malignant fever commonly called the jail distemper
is found to be owing to want of cleanliness and fresh air in the several jails,
the fatal consequences whereof might be prevented if the justices of the peace were duly authorized
to provide such accommodations in jails as may be necessary to answer this salutary purpose,
it is enacted that the justices shall order the walls of every room to be scraped and white-washed once every year."
Ventilators, hand and others, were to be supplied.
An infirmary, consisting of two distinct rooms, one for males and one for females, should be provided for the separate accommodation of the sick.
Warm and cold baths, or "commodious bathing tubs,"
were to be kept in every jail, and the prisoners directed to wash in them before release. These provisions were almost a dead letter.
Yet another act passed in seventeen ninety-one, if properly observed, should have insured proper attention to them.
By the thirty-one George the third c. forty-six, s. five,
two or more justices were appointed visitors of prisons, and directed to visit and inspect three times every quarter.
They were to report in writing to quarter sessions as to the state of the jail, and as to all abuses which they might observe therein.
The most important jail act of that early period, however, was the twenty-four George the third c. fifty-four, s. four (seventeen eighty-four)
which was the first legislative attempt to compel the classification of prisoners, or their separation into classes
according to their categories or crimes.
It was made incumbent upon the justices to provide distinct places of confinement for five classes of prisoners, viz.
one. Prisoners convicted of felony. two. Prisoners committed on a charge or suspicion of felony.
three. Prisoners guilty of misdemeanors. four. Prisoners charged with misdemeanors. five. Debtors.
It was further ordered that male prisoners should be kept perfectly distinct from the females.
King's evidences were also to be lodged apart.
Infirmaries separating the sexes were also to be provided, a chapel too, and warm and cold baths.
Care also was to be taken that the prisoners shall not be kept in any apartment underground.
In an early report of the Prison Discipline Improvement Society,
published some six-and-thirty years after the promulgation of this act, the flagrant and persistent violations of it and others
which had continued through that long period, are forcibly pointed out.
In eighteen eighteen, out of five hundred and eighteen prisons in the United Kingdom,
to which a total of upwards of one hundred thousand prisoners had been committed in the year, only twenty-three prisons were divided according to law;
fifty-nine had no division whatever to separate males and females; one hundred and thirty-six had only one division for the purpose;
sixty-eight had only two divisions, and so on.
In four hundred and forty-five prisons no work of any description had been introduced for the employment of prisoners;
in the balance some work was done, but with the most meager results.
The want of room was still a crying evil.
capable of accommodating only eight thousand five hundred and forty-five persons, as many as thirteen thousand and fifty-seven were crowded.
Many of the jails were in the most deplorable condition:
incommodious, as has been stated, insecure, unhealthy, and unprovided with the printed or written regulations required by law.
To specify more particularly one or two of the worst, it may be mentioned that in the Borough Compter
the old evils of indiscriminate association still continued unchecked.
All prisoners passed their time in absolute idleness, or killed it by gambling and loose conversation.
The debtors were crowded almost inconceivably. In a space twenty feet long by six wide,
twenty men slept on eight straw beds, with sixteen rugs amongst them, and a piece of timber for a bolster.
Mr. Buxton, who found this, declared that it seemed physically impossible, but he was assured that it was true,
and that it was accomplished by "sleeping edgewise."
One poor wretch, who had slept next the wall, said he had been literally unable to move for the pressure.
In the morning the stench and heat were so oppressive that he and every one else on waking rushed unclothed into the yard;
and the turnkey told Mr. Buxton that the "smell on first opening the door was enough to knock down a horse.
The hospital was filled with infectious cases, and in one room, seven feet by nine, with closed windows,
where a lad lay ill with fever, three other prisoners, at first perfectly healthy, were lodged. Of course they were seized with the fever;
so that the culprit, in addition to his sentence,
had to endure by "the regulations of the city a disease very dangerous in its nature," and ran the risk of a lingering and painful death.
At Guildford prison, which Mr. Buxton also visited in eighteen eighteen,
there was no infirmary, no chapel, no work, no classification.
The irons, which nearly every one wore, were remarkably heavy; those double ironed could not take off their small clothes.
No prison dress was allowed, and half the inmates were without shirts or shoes or stockings.
The diet was limited to dry bread, which was of the best certainly, and a pound and a half in weight.
Matters were on much the same footing at St. Albans.
They were far worse at Bristol,
although at Mr. Buxton's visit a new jail was in process of erection, the first step towards reform since Howard's visitation in seventeen seventy-four.
In eighteen eighteen the old jail was so densely packed that it was nearly impossible to pass through the yards for the throng.
One hundred and fifty were lodged in a prison just capable of holding fifty-two.
In the crowd, all of them persons who had "no other avocation or mode of livelihood but thieving," Mr. Buxton counted eleven children
children hardly old enough to be released from the nursery.
All charged with felony were in heavy irons, without distinction of age.
All were in ill health; almost all were in rags; almost all were filthy in the extreme.
The state of the prison, the desperation of the prisoners, broadly hinted in their conversation and plainly expressed in their conduct,
the uproar of oaths, complaints, and obscenity,
the indescribable stench, presented together a concentration of the utmost misery and the utmost guilt.
It was "a scene of infernal passions and distresses," says Buxton, "which few have imagination sufficient to picture,
and of which fewer still would believe that the original is to be found in this enlightened and happy country."
There was still worse to come. Having explored the yards and adjacent day rooms, and sleeping cells, a door was unlocked,
the visitors were furnished with candles, and they descended eighteen long steps into a vault.
At the bottom was a circular space, through which ran a narrow passage, and the sides of which were fitted with barrack bedsteads.
The floor was on the level of the river, and very damp.
The smell at one o'clock of the day "was something more than can be expressed by the term disgusting."
On the dirty bedstead lay a wretched being in the throes of severe illness.
The only ventilation of this pit, this "dark, cheerless, damp, unwholesome cavern -- a dungeon in its worst sense"
was by a kind of chimney, which the prisoners kept hermetically sealed, and which had never been opened in the memory of the turnkey.
Untried persons were often lodged in this nauseous underground den,
and sometimes slept in "the pit," loaded with heavy irons for a whole year, waiting the jail delivery.
Confinement for twelve months in the Bristol jail was counted a punishment equivalent to seven years' transportation.
In this prison there was no female infirmary.
Sick women and their children remained in the ordinary wards, and propagated disease.
No prison dress was allowed; no reception-room was provided, no soap, towels, or baths.
The bedclothes consisted only of a single "very slight" rug.
The allowance of food daily to felons was a fourpenny loaf,
a price which in those days fluctuated enormously -- as much as a hundred percent in a couple of years;
but as no similar variation occurred in the prisoner's appetite, his ration was somewhat precarious.
As for the debtors, they had no allowance whatever, and were often in imminent danger of starvation.
With all this, the inmates were crowded together at night to such a degree as to excite surprise that they should escape suffocation.
There reigned through the whole edifice a chilly, damp, unwholesome atmosphere, and the effluvia from the prisoners was so nauseous
that the chaplain found it necessary to take his place before they entered chapel, as he could not otherwise have faced the smell.
It is consoling to know that there were a few brilliant exceptions to this cruel, callous neglect.
Already, as early as eighteen eighteen, a prison existed at Bury St. Edmunds which was a model for imitation to others at that time,
and which even fulfilled many of the exacting requirements of modern days.
The great principles of classification, cleanliness, and employment were closely observed.
There were eighty-four separate sleeping-cells, and unless the jail was overcrowded, every inmate passed the night alone,
and in comparative comfort, with a bed and proper bedding.
The prison stood on a dry, airy situation outside the town.
Prisoners on reception were treated as they are now-a-days -- bathed, dressed in prison clothes, and inspected by the surgeon.
No irons were worn except as a punishment.
Personal cleanliness was insisted upon, and all parts of the prison were kept scrupulously clean.
There was an infirmary, properly found and duly looked after.
No idleness was permitted among the inmates. Trades were taught, or prisoners were allowed to follow their own if suitable.
There was, besides, a mill for grinding corn, somewhat similar to a turn-spit, which prisoners turned by walking in rows.
This made exertion compulsory, and imposed hard labor as a proper punishment.
Another jail, that of Ilchester, was also worthy of all commendation. It exhibited all the good points of that at Bury.
At Ilchester the rule of employment had been carried further.
A system not adopted generally till nearly half a century later had already prevailed at Ilchester.
The new jail had been in a great measure constructed by the prisoners themselves.
Masons, bricklayers, carpenters, painters had been employed upon the buildings, and the work was pronounced excellent by competent judges.
Industrial labor had also been introduced with satisfactory results.
Blanket weaving and cloth spinning was carried on prosperously,
and all the material for prisoners' apparel was manufactured in the jail.
There were work-rooms for wool-washing, dyeing, carding, and spinning.
The looms were constantly busy. Tailors were always at work, and every article of clothing and bedding was made up within the walls.
There was a prison laundry too, where all the prisoners' linen was regularly washed.
The moral welfare of the inmates was as closely looked after as the physical.
There was an attentive chaplain, a schoolmaster, and regular religious and other instruction.
Compared with those highly meritorious institutions Newgate still showed but badly.
Its evils were inherent and irremediable, but some ameliorating measures had been introduced,
mainly through the exertions of a new governor, Mr. Brown, who succeeded Mr. Newman at Newgate in eighteen seventeen.
The most noticeable of the improvements introduced was a better regulation of dietaries within the prison.
The old haphazard system, by which meat was issued in bulk,
a week's allowance at a time, was abolished, and there was a regular scale of daily rations adopted.
The diet was now ample. It consisted of a pound and a half of bread per diem;
for breakfast a pint of gruel; for dinner half a pound of boiled meat, or a quart of soup with vegetables, on alternate days.
The food was properly prepared in the prison kitchen.
Meat was no longer issued raw, to be imperfectly cooked before a ward fire and bolted gluttonously, the whole two pounds at one sitting.
Mr. Brown confidently asserted that no jail in England now fed its inmates so well as did Newgate.
So plentiful was this dietary, that although the old permission remained in force of allowing the friends of prisoners to bring them supplies from outside,
the practice was falling into abeyance, and the prisoners seldom required private assistance to eke out their meals.
It was also claimed for the more ample and more orderly distribution of victuals, that the general health of the prisoners had greatly improved.
Mr. Brown also, much to his own credit, brought about the abandonment of the practice of ironing all prisoners as a matter of course.
In eighteen eighteen prisoners awaiting trial in Newgate, were at length relieved from this illegal infliction.
Convicts were not even compelled to wear irons, providing they behaved well.
It was found that shackles might be safely dispensed with, even in the case of the most desperate characters.
This was effected by stopping the nearly indiscriminate admission of visitors, which had hitherto prevailed all over the jail.
Ironing it will be remembered, was a distinguishing badge, so that when the jail was cleared the free might be readily known from the captive, and escapes prevented.
Under the new rule visitors were not allowed to pass into the interior of the prison, but were detained between the grating.
This change led to some discontent, until it was found that the much greater boon of relief from irons accompanied it, and the reform was quietly accepted.
Indeed the best consequences followed from the removal of irons. The prisoners were much better disposed; there were no riots, and fewer disturbances.
But nothing short of radical reform and complete reconstruction could touch the deep-seated evils of association, overcrowding, and idleness.
The first still produced deplorable results -- results to be observable for many years to come.
Mr. Buxton mentions the case of a boy whose apparent innocence and artlessness had attracted his attention.
He had been committed for an offense for which he was acquitted.
He left Newgate utterly corrupted, and after lapsing into crime, soon returned with a very different character.
Other cases of moral deterioration have already been recorded.
Some attempt was made to reduce the overcrowding, on the recommendation of the House of Commons Committee of eighteen eighteen, but this applied only a partial remedy.
The bulk of the prisoners were still left in idleness.
A few fortunate criminals, many of them kept back from transportation on purpose, who were skilled in trades, were employed at them.
Painters, plasterers, and carpenters were allowed to follow their handicrafts, with the reward of sixpence per diem and a double allowance of food.
They used their own tools, and this without any dangerous consequences as regards facilitating the escape of others,
thus disposing of the objection so long raised against the industrial employment of prisoners in Newgate.
But this boon of toil was denied to all but a very limited number.
As the Prison Discipline Society pertinently observed in a report dated eighteen twenty,
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section eight: The beginnings of prison reform.
Newgate prisoners were the victims to another most objectionable practice which obtained all over London.
Persons committed to a metropolitan jail at that time were taken in gangs, men and women handcuffed together, or linked on to a long chain,
unless they could afford to pay for a vehicle out of their own funds.
Even then they were not certain of the favor, for I find a reference to a decent and respectable woman sent to Newgate
who handed a shilling to the escort warder to provide her with a hackney coach; but this functionary pocketed the cash, and obliged the woman to walk
chained to the rest. As the miserable crew filed through the public streets, exposed to the scornful gaze of every passenger,
they were followed by a crowd of reckless boys, who jeered at and insulted them.
Many thus led in procession were in a shocking condition of dirt and misery, frequently nearly naked, and often bearing upon them
the germs, more or less developed, of contagious disease. "Caravans," the forerunners of the prison vans,
were first made use of about eighteen twenty-seven. That the need for prison reform was imperative may be gathered from the few out of many instances I have adduced,
yet there were those who, wedded to ancient ideas, were intolerant of change; they would not admit the existence of any evils.
One smug alderman, a member of the House of Commons, sneered at the ultra philanthropy of the champions of prison improvement.
Speaking on a debate on prison matters, he declared that
our prisoners have all that prisoners ought to have, without gentlemen think they ought to be indulged with Turkey carpets.
The Society for the Improvement of Prison Discipline was taxed with a desire to introduce a system
tending to divest punishment of its just and salutary terrors;
an imputation which the Society indignantly and very justly repudiated, the statement being, as they said,
refuted by abundant evidence, and having no foundation whatever in truth.
Among those whom the Society found arrayed against it was Sydney Smith,
who, in a caustic article contributed to the 'Edinburgh Review,' protested against the pampering of criminals
While fully admitting the good intentions of the Society, he condemned their ultra humanitarianism as misplaced.
He took exception to various of the proposals of the Society. He thought they leant too much to a system of indulgence and education in jails.
He objected to the instruction of prisoners in reading and writing.
A poor man who is lucky enough, he said, "to have his son committed for a felony
educates him under such a system for nothing, while the virtuous simpleton who is on the other side of the wall is paying by the quarter for these attainments."
He was altogether against too liberal a diet; he disapproved of industrial occupations in jails, as not calculated to render prisons terrible.
nothing but beating hemp and pulling oakum and pounding bricks -- no work but what was tedious, unusual."
no visiting of friends, no education but religious education, no freedom of diet,
no weavers' looms or carpenters' benches. There must be a great deal of solitude, coarse food, a dress of shame,
hard, incessant, irksome, eternal labor, a planned and regulated and unrelenting exclusion of happiness and comfort.
Undeterred by these sarcasms and misrepresentations,
the Society pursued its laudable undertaking with remarkable energy and great singleness of purpose.
The objects it had in view were set forth in one of its earliest meetings.
It sought to obtain and diffuse useful information
to suggest beneficial regulations, and circulate tracts demonstrating the advantages of classification,
constant inspection, regular employment, and humane treatment generally, with religious and moral instruction.
It earnestly advocated the appointment of female officers to take exclusive charge of female prisoners,
a much-needed and, according to our ideas, indispensable reform, already initiated by the Ladies' Committee at Newgate.
It made the subject of the newly-invented tread-wheels, or stepping-wheels, as they were at first called, its peculiar affair,
and obtained full details, from places where they had been adopted, of the nature of these new machines
the method by which they were worked, and the dietaries of the prisoners employed upon them.
Nor did it confine itself to mere verbal recommendations.
The good it tried to do took active shape in the establishment of temporary refuges -- at Hoxton for males, and in the Hackney Road for females
for the reception of deserving cases discharged from prison. The governor of Newgate and other metropolitan prisons had orders of admission to this refuge
which he could bestow on prisoners on release, and so save the better-disposed or the completely destitute from lapsing at once into crime.
The refuge, which had for its object the training of its inmates in habits of industry,
and in moral and religious duty, and which after a time sought to provide them with suitable situations, was supported entirely out of the funds of the Society.
At the time of its greatest prosperity, its annual income from donations and subscriptions was about one thousand six hundred pounds.
Another point to which the Society devoted infinite pains was the preparation of plans for the guidance of architects in the construction of prisons.
A very valuable volume published by the Society
traced the progress of prison architecture from the days when the jail was the mere annexe of the baronial or episcopal castle
or a dungeon above or below the gate of a town, to the first attempts at systematic reconstruction carried out under the advice and supervision of Howard.
It is interesting to observe that the plan of "radiation," by which the prison blocks radiated from a central hall, like spokes in a wheel
was introduced as early as seventeen ninety by Mr. Blackburn
an architect of eminence who was very largely employed in the erection of prison buildings at the close of the last century.
With some important modifications this principle of radiation is still the rule.
The Society did not limit its remarks to the description of what had already been done
but it offered suggestions for future buildings, with numerous carefully-executed drawings and designs of the model it recommended for imitation.
Experience has since shown that in some respects these plans are defective, especially in the placing of the governor's residence in the center of the prison.
It was thought that this would guarantee constant supervision and inspection, but it did nothing of the kind, and only the presence of warders on duty
is found now-a-days to be really efficacious. The main recommendations, however, are based upon common sense
and none are more commendable than that which deprecates the excessive ornamentation of the external parts of the edifice.
The new jails, as Howard says, "having pompous fronts, appear like palaces to the lower class of people, and many persons are against them on this account."
The Prison Society reproves the misdirected efforts of ambitious architects, who by a lavish and improvident expenditure of public money
sought to "rank the prisons they built among the most splendid buildings of the city or town."
Absence of embellishment is in perfect unison with the character of the establishment.
These are principles fully recognized now-a-days, and it may fairly be conceded that the Prison Discipline Society's ideal
differed little from that kept in view in the construction of the latest and best modern jails.
After a few years of active exertion the Society was rewarded by fresh legislation.
To its efforts, and their effect upon Parliament and the public mind, we must attribute the new Jail Acts of four George the fourth
cap. sixty-four, and five George the fourth cap. eighty-five
which having gone through several sessions, at last became law in eighteen twenty-three to four
By the preamble of the first-named act it was declared
but shall also tend more effectually to preserve the health
and improve the morals of the prisoners, and shall insure the proper measure of punishment to convicted offenders.
Accordingly due provision was made for the enforcement of hard labor on all prisoners sentenced to it, and for the employment of all others.
unless such ability (to work) should cease by reason of sickness, infirmity, the want of sufficient work, or from any other cause.
It was distinctly laid down that male and female prisoners should be confined in separate buildings or parts of the prison,
so as to prevent them from seeing, conversing, or holding any intercourse with each other.
Classification was insisted upon, in the manner laid down by the twenty-four George the third cap. fifty-four,
with such further separation as the justices should deem conducive to good order and discipline.
Female prisoners were in all cases to be under the charge of female officers.
Every prison containing female prisoners was to have a matron who was to reside constantly in the prison.
The religious and moral welfare of the prisoners were to be attended to,
the first by daily services, the latter by the appointment of schoolmasters and instruction in reading and writing.
Last, but not least, the use of irons was strictly forbidden, "except in cases of urgent and absolute necessity,"
and every prisoner was to be provided with a hammock or cot to himself, suitable bedding, and, if possible, a separate cell.
The second act, passed in the following year, enlarged and amended the first, and at the same time gave powers to the House
to call for information as to the observance of its provisions.
The promulgation of these two Jail Acts strengthened the hands of the Prison Discipline Society enormously.
It had now a legal and authoritative standard of efficiency to apply,
and could expose all the local authorities that still lagged behind, or neglected to comply with the provisions of the new laws.
The Society did not shrink from its self-imposed duty, but continued year after year, with unflagging energy and unflinching spirit, to watch closely
and report at length upon the condition of the prisons of the country.
For this purpose it kept up an extensive correspondence with all parts of the kingdom, and circulated queries to be answered in detail,
whence it deduced the practice and condition of every prison that replied.
Upon these and the private visitations made by various members the Society obtained the facts,
often highly damnatory, which were embodied in its annual reports.
The progress of improvement was certainly extremely slow.
It was long before the many jurisdictions imitated the few.
Jails, of which the old prison at Reading was a specimen, were still left intact.
In that prison, with its cells and yards arranged within the shell of an ancient abbey chapel,
the prisoners, without firing, bedding, or sufficient food, spent their days "in surveying their grotesque prison,
or contriving some means of escape by climbing the fluted columns which supported the Gothic arches of the aisles,
and so passing by the roof down into the garden and on to freedom.
In a county prison adjoining the metropolis, the separation between the male and female quarters was supposed to be accomplished by the erection of an iron railing;
in this same prison capital convicts were chained to the floor until execution.
In another jail not far off male and female felons still occupied the same room -- underground, and reached by a ladder of ten steps.
In others the separation between the sexes consisted in a hanging curtain
or an imaginary boundary line, and nothing prevented parties from passing to either side
but an empty regulation which all so disposed could defy.
Numbers of the jails were still unprovided with chaplains, and the prisoners never heard Divine service.
In many others there were no infirmaries, no places set apart for the confinement of prisoners afflicted with dangerous and infectious disorders.
No attempt was made to maintain discipline.
Half the jails had no code of rules properly prepared and sanctioned by the judges, according to law.
the changes necessary to bring the prisons into conformity with the recent acts were attempted, if not actually introduced into the county prisons, to which,
with a few of the more important city or borough prisons, these acts more especially applied.
Most of the local authorities embarked into considerable expenditure, determined to rebuild their jails de novo on the most approved pattern,
or to reappropriate, reconstruct, and patch up the existing prisons till they were more in accordance with the growing requirements of the times.
Religious worship became more generally the rule; chaplains were appointed, and chapels provided for them; surgeons and hospitals also.
Workshops were built at many prisons, various kinds of manufactures and trades were set on foot, including weaving, matting, shoe-making, and tailoring.
The interior of one prison was illuminated throughout with gas, -- still a novelty, which had been generally adopted in London only four years previously,
a measure which must greatly tend to discourage attempts to escape.
There were tread-wheels at most of the prisons, and regular employment thereon or at some other kind of hard labor.
In many places too where the prisoners earned money by their work, they were granted a portion of it for their own use after proper deduction for maintenance.
Only a few glaring evils still demanded a remedy.
The provision of separate sleeping cells was still quite inadequate. For instance,
in twenty-two county jails there were one thousand sixty-three sleeping cells in all (in eighteen twenty-three)
and the average daily number committed that year amounted to three thousand, nine hundred eighty-five.
The want of sleeping cells long continued a crying need.
Four years later the Prison Society reported
that in four prisons, which at one time of the year contained one thousand three hundred eight prisoners, there were only sixty-eight sleeping rooms or cells,
making an average of nineteen persons occupying each room.
At the New Prison, Clerkenwell, which had become the principal reception jail of Middlesex, and so took all the untried,
the sleeping space per head was only sixteen inches, and often as many as two hundred ninety-three men had to be accommodated on barrack beds
occupying barely three hundred ninety feet lineal
The "scenes of tumult and obscenity" in these night rooms are said to have been beyond description; a prisoner in one nocturnal riot lost an eye.
Yet to Clerkenwell were now committed the juveniles, and all who were inexperienced in crime.
Great want of uniformity in treatment in the various prisons was still noticeable
and was indeed destined to continue for another half century, in other words, until the introduction of the Prison Act of eighteen seventy-seven.
At the time of which I am writing there was great diversity of practice as regards the hours of labor.
In some prisons the prisoners worked seven hours a day, in others ten and ten and a half.
The nature of the employment varied greatly in severity, especially the tread-wheel labor.
In some county jails, as I have already said, female prisoners were placed upon the tread-wheel;
in others women were very properly exempted from it, and also from all severe labor.
Earnings were very differently appropriated. Here the prisoners were given the whole amount, there a half or a third.
Sometimes this money might be expended in the purchase of extra articles of food.
The rations varied considerably everywhere.
It was still limited to bread in some places, the allowance of which varied from one to three pounds;
in others meat, soup, gruel, beer were given.
Here and there food was not issued in kind, but a money allowance which the prisoner might expend himself.
Bedding and clothing was still denied, but only in a few jails;
in others both were supplied in ample quantities, the cost varying per prisoner from twenty shillings to five pounds.
It was plain that although the law had defined general principles of prison government,
too much discretion was still left to the magistracy to fill in the details. The legislature only recommended,
it did not peremptorily insist. Too often the letter of the law was observed, but not its spirit.
One great impediment to wide amelioration was that a vast number of small jails lay out of reach of the law.
When the new acts were introduced, numerous prisons under local jurisdiction were exempted from the operation of the law.
They were so radically bad that reform seemed hopeless, and it was thought wiser not to bring them under provisions which clearly could not be enforced.
Mr. Peel, who as Home Secretary had charge of the bill,
which became the four George the fourth cap. sixty-four, said that he had abstained from legislating for these small jurisdictions "on mature deliberation."
It is not, he said, "that I am insensible of the lamentable and disgraceful situation in which many of them are,
but I indulge a hope that many of them will contract with the counties,
that many of them will build new jails, and that when in a year or two we come to examine their situation,
we shall find but few which have not in one or other of these ways removed the grievance of which such just complaint is made.
I shall not hesitate to ask Parliament for powers to compel them to make the necessary alterations, for it is not to be endured that these local jurisdictions should remain
in the deplorable situation in which many of them now are."
At this time there were in England one hundred and seventy boroughs, cities, towns, and liberties
which possessed the right of trying criminals for various offenses.
Nearly every one of these jurisdictions had its own prison, and there were one hundred and sixty such jails in all.
Many of them consisted of one or two rooms at most.
he total number of prisoners they received during the year varied from two persons to many hundreds.
It was in these jails, withdrawn from the pressure of authority, that the new rules were invariably ignored.
The right and privilege of the borough to maintain its own place of confinement was so "ancient and indisputable,"
that for long no idea of interfering with them was entertained.
All that was urged was that the borough magistracy had no right to govern their jails
so as to corrupt those committed, "to the injury of the peace and morals of the public."
As time passed, however, these magistrates made no effort at reform.
They neither built new jails nor contracted with the counties, as had been expected, for the transfer of their prisoners.
As the Society put it in eighteen twenty-seven, "the friends to the improvement of prison discipline will regret to learn
that the jails attached to corporate jurisdictions continue to be the fruitful sources
of vice and misery, debasing all who are confined within their walls, and disseminating through their respective communities
the knowledge and practice of every species of criminality.
The Society proceeded to support this indictment by facts. It is much the old story.
The prisoners were lodged in rooms whence they could converse with passengers in the streets, and freely obtain spirits and other prohibited articles.
All descriptions of offenders congregated together in the felons' wards.
The keeper and his officers resided at a distance from the jail, and left its inmates to their own devices.
There was no decency whatever in the internal arrangements;
still no separation of the sexes, no means of ablution or other necessary services.
One borough prison consisted of nothing more than a couple of cells, about ten yards square, and absolutely nothing more.
In another borough, with a population of ten thousand, the prison was of the same dimensions.
One cell was a dungeon, and the other an "improper and unhealthy abode for any human being," with a watercourse running through it.
Most of these small jails were still in existence and in much the same state eight years later,
as is shown by the report of the Commissioners to inquire into the state of the municipal corporations in eighteen thirty-five.
An examination of this report shows how even the most insignificant township had its jail.
Thus Dinas Mwddy, in Merionethshire, had, "besides the pinfold and the stocks or crib, a little prison."
Clun, in Shropshire, had a lock-up under the town hall.
At Eye, in Suffolk, the jail was part of the poor-house; so it was at Richmond, in Yorkshire, where the master of the workhouse was also keeper of the jail.
At Godmanchester there was no jail, but a cage to secure prisoners till they could be taken before a magistrate.
Kidderminster had a prison, one damp chill room,
the only aperture through which air could be admitted being an iron grating level with the street,
through the bars of which quills or reeds were inserted, and drink conveyed to the prisoners.
the jail consisted of six cells, frequently so damp that the moisture trickled down the walls; there was not space for air or exercise,
and the prison allowance was still limited to bread and water.
Newgate through all these years continued a bye-word with the Society.
Some reforms had certainly been introduced, such as the abolition of irons, already referred to, and the establishment of male and female infirmaries.
The regular daily visitation of the chaplain was also insisted upon.
But it was pointed out in eighteen twenty-three that defective construction must always bar the way to any radical improvement in Newgate.
Without enlargement no material change in discipline or interior economy could possibly be introduced.
The chapel still continued incommodious and insufficient
female prisoners were still exposed to the full view of the males, the netting in front of the gallery being perfectly useless as a screen.
In eighteen twenty-four Newgate had no glass in its windows, except in the infirmary and one ward of the chapel yard;
and the panes were filled in with oiled paper, an insufficient protection against the weather;
and as the window-frames would not shut tight, the prisoners complained much of the cold, especially at night.
There was a diminution in the numbers in custody, due to the adoption of the practice of not committing at once to Newgate every offender for trial at the Old Bailey
but nothing had been done to improve the prison buildings.
In eighteen twenty-seven the Society was compelled to report that "no material change had taken place in Newgate since the passing of the prison laws,
and that consequently the observance of their most important provisions was habitually neglected.
It was enacted that the court of aldermen should make rules for the government of the prison, and that these should be posted publicly within the walls.
As yet no rules or regulations had been printed or prepared.
By another clause of the Jail Act, two justices were to be appointed to visit the prison at least thrice in every quarter, and "oftener if occasion required."
These justices were to inspect every part of the prison, and examine into the state and condition of prisoners.
The city justices had not fulfilled this obligation.
Idleness was still the general rule for all prisoners in Newgate, in defiance of the law.
There was no instruction of adult prisoners, in accordance with the law. The sleeping accommodation was still altogether contrary to the latest ideas.
The visits of friends was once more unreservedly allowed, and these incomers freely brought in extra provisions and beer.
Last, and worst of all, the arrangements for keeping the condemned prisoners between sentence and execution were more than unsatisfactory.
They were not confined apart from each other, but were crowded thirty or forty together in the press yard,
so that "corrupt conversation obliterated from the mind of him who is doomed to suffer every serious feeling and valuable impression."
I shall have more to say on this subject, and upon the state of Newgate generally, in the following chapter.
The Prison Society did not relax its efforts as time passed, but its leading members had other and more pressing claims upon their energies.
Mr. Buxton had succeeded to the great work which William Wilberforce had commenced, and led the repeated attacks upon slavery in British colonies
till the whole body of the slaves were manumitted in eighteen thirty-three.
In the year immediately preceding this, Parliament was too busy with the great question of its own reform to spare much time for domestic legislation.
Nevertheless a committee of the House of Commons was appointed in eighteen thirty-one to report upon the whole system of secondary punishments,
which dealt with jails of all classes, as well as transportation.
This committee animadverted strongly upon the system in force at the metropolitan jails, and more especially upon the condition of Newgate
where "prisoners before and after trial are under no efficient superintendence," and where "there was no restraint, or attempt at restraint."
Mr. Samuel Hoare was examined by this committee
and stated that in his opinion Newgate, as the common jail of Middlesex, was wholly inadequate to the proper confinement of its prisoners.
From the moment of a person's committal he was certain to be plunged deeper and deeper in guilt.
The prisoners were crowded together in the jail, contrary to the requirements of the four George the fourth
Again in eighteen thirty-five prisons and their inmates became once more the care of the senate, and the subject was taken up this time by the House of Lords.
A committee was appointed, under the presidency of the Duke of Richmond
upon the rules and discipline therein established with regard to the treatment of unconvicted as well as convicted persons."
The committee was also to report upon the manner in which sentences were carried out, and to recommend any alterations necessary in the rules
in order to insure uniformity of discipline. It met on the thirty-first March, eighteen thirty-five, and continued its sittings well into July
during which time a host of witnesses were examined, and the committee presented three separate reports,
embodying recommendations which may be said to have formed the basis of modern prison management.
It was laid down as a first and indispensable principle that uniformity of discipline should prevail everywhere,
a theory which did not become a practical fact for forty more years.
As a means of securing this uniformity,
it was suggested that the rules framed for prison government should be subjected to the Secretary of State for approval,
and not, as heretofore, to the judges of assize; that, both to check abuses and watch the progress of improvement,
inspectors of prisons should be appointed, who should visit all the prisons from time to time and report to the Secretary of State.
It was recommended that the dietaries should be submitted and approved like the rules; that convicted prisoners should not receive any food but the jail allowance;
that food and fuel should be issued in kind, and never provided by the prisoners themselves out of monies granted them.
The use of tobacco, hitherto pretty generally indulged in both by men and women,
should be strictly prohibited, "as a stimulating luxury inconsistent with any notion of strict discipline and the due pressure of just punishment."
Prison officers should not have any share in prisoners' earnings,
which should be paid into general prison funds, and no part of them handed over to the prisoners themselves.
As a means of increasing the severity of imprisonment, letters and visits from outside should not be permitted during the first six months of an imprisonment.
Various other recommendations were made as regards the appointment of chaplain and schoolmasters; the limitation of the powers of wardsmen,
or prisoners employed in positions of trust, who should not be permitted to traffic with their fellow-prisoners in any way.
The committee most of all insisted upon the entire individual separation of prisoners, except during the hours of labor,
religious worship, and instruction, as "absolutely necessary for preventing contamination,
and for securing a proper system of prison discipline.
This was the first enunciation of the system of separate confinement,
which was eventually to replace the attempted arrangement of prisoners by classes according to antecedents and crimes,
an incomplete and fallacious method of preventing contamination.
The Lords' Committee fully recognized the painful fact
that the greatest mischief followed from the intercourse which was still permitted in so many prisons; to use its words,
and the tendency to crime in offenders not entirely hardened is confirmed by the language, the suggestions, and the example
of more depraved and systematic criminals.
This committee, as well as the one preceding it, also reported in terms of strong reprobation on the small prisons and jails
still under the borough corporations. The Commons' Committee gave it as their opinion that they were in a deplorable state.
The same language was used by the commissioners appointed to inquire into the municipal corporations in eighteen thirty-five,
when speaking more particularly of the borough jails.
In these the commissioners found "additional proof of the evils of continuing the present constitution of the local tribunals.
Instances rarely occur in which the borough jails admit of any proper classification of the prisoners.
In some large towns, as at Berwick on Tweed, Southampton, and Southwark, they (the prisons) are in a very discreditable condition.
In many of the smaller boroughs they are totally unfit for the confinement of human beings.
In these places the prisoners are often without a proper supply of air and light; frequently the jails are mere dungeons under the town hall.
It was frequently stated in evidence that the jail of the borough was in so unfit a state for the reception of prisoners,
that plaintiffs were unwilling to consign the defendants against whom they had obtained execution to confinement within its walls."
The Lords' Committee on Jails were of the same opinion, and considered the prisons under corporate or peculiar jurisdiction in a very unsatisfactory condition.
They therefore recommended that the prisoners should be removed
to the county jails from such prisons as were past improvement, and that the borough funds should be charged for the accommodation.
The whole question was again dealt with in Lord John Russell's bill for the reform of the municipal corporations, and with a more liberal election of town councilors,
and the establishment of municipal institutions upon a proper footing,
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section nine: The first report of the inspector of prisons.
In the preceding chapter I have been tempted by the importance of the general question to give it prominence and precedence over the particular branch of which I am treating.
Newgate has remained rather in the background while the whole of the jails as a body were under discussion.
But this digression was necessary in order to present a more complete picture of the state of jails in the early part of the present century,
just before the public mind was first awakened to the need for thorough reform.
I shall now return to the great jail of the city of London, and give a more detailed account of its condition and inner life
as the inspectors of prisons found them in eighteen thirty-five to six.
These gentlemen were appointed in October eighteen thirty-five, owing to the strong representations of the Lords' Committee
backed up by the evidence of several influential witnesses.
Mr. Samuel Hoare, when examined, considered it indispensably necessary, to carry out whatever system might be established,
that inspectors should watch over the observance of the law. He saw no objection on the score of their probable interference with the local jurisdiction,
but he would not arm them with any authority lest their cooperation might be offensive.
Sir Frederick Roe was of the same opinion as regards the appointment, but he would give the inspectors the power of acting as well as reporting.
They should be persons, he thought, selected from the highest class; the duty was most important,
one which required discretion, judgment, and knowledge of law, with sufficient insight and experience to discover defects in prison discipline.
These considerations no doubt had weight
with those who made the selection of the first inspectors, and the two gentlemen appointed were probably the most fitted in England to be so employed.
One was Mr. William Crawford, the other the Rev. Whitworth Russell.
The first named had long been an active philanthropist, devoting himself more particularly to the reformation of juvenile criminals.
William Crawford had been one of the promoters and managers of the Philanthropic Society's farm school.
Later on he had devoted himself to the personal investigation of the prisons of the United States.
At that time the mild and intelligent prison discipline in force in Pennsylvania, the legacy of the old Quaker immigrants,
had made such prisons as Auburn a model for imitation.
Several European states had dispatched emissaries to examine and report upon them.
France had sent Misseurs Beaumont and De Tocqueville, who subsequently published several interesting works on the subject.
England was represented by Mr. Crawford, and the result of his inquiry was given to the public as an appendix to the House of Commons' Report on Secondary Punishments.
It is an able and exhaustive state paper, testifying to the keenness of the writer's perception, and his unremitting labor in pursuing his researches.
Mr. Crawford was thoroughly versed in the still imperfectly understood science of prison management, and fully qualified for his new duties.
The second inspector, the Rev. Whitworth Russell, was the chaplain of Millbank penitentiary,
the great architectural experiment which grew out of the strong representations of Jeremy Bentham and others, and was the first national recognition of the principle
that punishment must be reformatory as well as deterrent.
Messrs. Crawford and Russell proceeded to carry out their new functions with commendable energy, and without a moment's loss of time.
The ink was barely dry upon their letters of appointment before they appeared at Newgate, and commenced a searching investigation.
They attended early and late; they mustered the prisoners, examined into their condition,
took voluminous evidence from all classes of individuals, from the governor down to the convict in the condemned cells.
They visited the wards after locking-up time, and saw with their own eyes what went on.
a subject of magnitude and importance sufficient to exclude other jails, they soon narrowed their inquiry still further,
and limited it to Newgate alone. Newgate indeed became the sole theme of their first report.
The fact was that the years as they passed, nearly twenty in all, had worked but little permanent improvement in this detestable prison.
Changes introduced under pressure had been only skin deep.
Relapse was rapid and inevitable, so that the latter state of the prison was worse than the first.
The disgraceful overcrowding had been partially ended, but the same evils of indiscriminate association were still present; there was the old neglect of decency,
the same callous indifference to the moral well-being of the prisoners, the same want of employment and of all disciplinary control.
All these evils were set forth at length in the inspectors' first report.
There was no longer the faintest possible excuse for overcrowding. The numbers now committed to Newgate had sensibly diminished.
The prison had become more or less a place of detention only, harboring mainly those awaiting trial.
To these were still added an average of about fifty expecting the last penalty of the law; a certain number of transports awaiting removal to the colonies;
an occasional prisoner or two committed by the Houses of Parliament, the Courts of King's Bench, Common Pleas,
the Exchequer, the Commissioners of bankruptcy and of taxes; smugglers, and a larger number sentenced for very short terms,
and for offenses of the most varying description, by the Central Criminal Court.
The sum total thus produced was inconsiderable compared with the hundreds that had formerly filled the jail,
and the whole by proper management might have been so accommodated as to prevent overcrowding.
But incredible as it may appear, the authorities of Newgate declined to avail themselves of the advantages offered them,
and when the population fell they shut up one half the jail and crowded up the other.
Some rooms remained quite empty and unoccupied, while others were full to overflowing.
Not only were the wards thus needlessly crammed, and for no reason but the niggardliness of the corporation which refused a proper supply of bedding
but the occupants of each were huddled together indiscriminately. The inspectors found in the same wards in the chapel yard the convicted and the untried,
the felon and the misdemeanant, the sane and the insane, the old and young offender.
The classification prescribed by the Jail Act, which laid down that certain prisoners should not intermix, was openly neglected,
and "the greatest contempt shown for the law."
In another part there were men charged with and convicted of unnatural offenses shut up with lads of tender years;
minor offenders charged with small thefts or non-payment of small sums were cheek by jowl with convicts sentenced to long terms of transportation.
In the master's side yard, which had only one washing place, as many as seventy-eight prisoners, frequently more,
were associated together, "of every variety of age, habit, and delinquency, without employment, oversight, or control."
In the middle yard it was still worse.
Here, say the inspectors, "are herded together the very worst class of prisoners; certainly a more wretched combination of human beings can hardly be imagined.
We have reason to fear that poverty, ragged clothes, and an inability to pay the ward dues, elsewhere exacted for better accommodation,
consign many of the more petty and unpracticed offenders to this place,
where they inevitably meet with further contamination from the society of the most abandoned and incorrigible inmates of the jail."
No doubt the governor for the time being, Mr. Cope, was in a great measure to blame for all this, and for the want of proper classification.
I shall have occasion to speak again, and more at length, of Mr. Cope's careless and perfunctory discharge
of his many manifest duties, but I shall here confine myself to animadverting on his neglect as regards the appropriation of his prison.
He was unable to give any reason whatever for not utilizing the whole of the wards.
He saw certain rooms fill up, and yet took no steps to open others that were locked up and empty.
He blamed the construction of Newgate for the neglect of classification, and was yet compelled to confess that he had made no attempt whatever to carry it out.
The fact was, he did not keep the classification of prisoners on first arrival in his own hands, nor even in that of his officers.
A new prisoner's fate, as to location, rested really with a powerful fellow-prisoner.
The inspectors found that prisoners had their places assigned to them
by the inner gatesman, himself a convicted prisoner, and a "wardsman" or responsible head of a room.
The wardsman still exacted dues, of which more directly,
and this particular official took excellent care to select as residents for his own ward those most suitable from his own point of view.
and so numerous were his opportunities of showing favoritism, that all the prisoners may be said to be in his power.
If a man is poor and ragged, however inexperienced in crime, or however trifling may be the offense for which he has been committed
his place is assigned among the most depraved, the most experienced, and the most incorrigible offenders in the middle yard.
It must be admitted that so far but little effort had been made to counteract the evils of indiscriminate association.
It was not likely that a system which left innocent men -- for the great bulk of new arrivals were still untried
to be pitchforked by chance anywhere, into any sort of company,
within this the greatest nursery of crime in London, should exercise even the commonest care for the personal decency or comfort of the prisoners.
Their treatment was also a matter of chance. They still slept on rope mats on the floor, herded together in companies of four or more to keep one another warm
and under the scanty covering of a couple of dirty stable-rugs apiece.
So closely did they lie together, that the inspectors at their night visits found it difficult in stepping across the room to avoid treading on them.
Sometimes two mats were allotted to three sleepers. Sometimes four slept under the same bedding, and left their mats unoccupied.
The rugs used were never washed; an order existed that the bedding should be taken into the yards to be aired, but it was not very punctually obeyed.
The only convenience for personal ablutions were the pumps in the yards, and the far-off baths in the condemned or press-yard.
Water might not be taken into the ward for washing purposes.
There was some provision of clothing, but it was quite insufficient, and nothing at all was given if prisoners had enough of their own to cover their nakedness.
The inspectors paraded the prisoners, and found them generally ragged and ill-clad, squalid and filthy in the extreme;
many without stockings, and with hardly shoes to their feet;
some, who had the semblance of covering on the upper part of their feet, had no soles to the shoes, and their bare feet were on the ground.
This, too, was in the depth of the winter, and during a most inclement season.
The allowance of food was not illiberal,
but its issue was precarious, and dependent on the good will of the wardsmen, who measured out the portions to each according to his eye,
and not with weights and measures, no turnkey being present.
Too much was left to the wardsman. It was he who could issue small luxuries;
he sold tea, coffee, sugar, tobacco, although prohibited, and extra beer.
He charged a weekly sum as ward dues for the use of knives, forks, and plates
a perpetuation under another form of the old detestable custom of garnish.
He had power where his exactions were resisted of making the ward most uncomfortable for the defaulter.
He could trump up a false complaint against his fellow-prisoner, and so get him punished;
he might keep him from the fire, or give him his soup or gruel in a pail instead of a basin.
The authority of these wardsmen so improperly exalted, and so entirely unchecked, degenerated into a baneful despotism.
They bought their offices from one another, and were thus considered to have a vested interest in them.
Their original capital had been a few shillings, and for this they purchased the right to tax their fellows to the extent of pounds per week.
The wardsman had a monopoly in supplying provisions, gave dinner and breakfast at his own price, and was such complete master of the ward
that none of its inmates were suffered to make tea or coffee for themselves lest it should interfere with his sales.
He made collections when it suited him for ward purposes, to be spent as he chose, in candles and so forth.
When the wardsman was a man of some education, with some knowledge of legal chicanery gained by personal experience, he might add considerably to his emoluments
by drawing briefs and petitions for his fellows. There was a recognized charge of five shillings per brief,
for a petition of from one shilling, half pence to eight shillings, according to its length,
and by these payments a wardsman had been known to amass as much as forty pounds.
The man intrusted with this privilege was often the inner gatesman,
the prisoner official already mentioned, who held the fate of new arrivals as regards location in his hands.
It was not strange that he should sometimes misuse his power, and when prisoners were not to be cajoled into securing his legal services,
had been known to employ threats, declaring that he was often consulted by the governor as to a prisoner's character,
in view of speaking to it at the trial, and he could easily do them a good turn -- or a very bad one.
The brief-drawing gatesman and wardsman at the time of the inspectors' first visit must have been a particularly powerful personage.
He was on the most intimate and improperly familiar terms with the turnkeys,
had a key of both the master's side and middle side yards, was the only person present at the distribution of beer, and was trusted to examine,
and, if he chose, pass in, all provisions, money, clothes, and letters brought for prisoners by their friends.
All the wardsmen alike were more or less irresponsible.
The turnkeys complained bitterly that these old prisoners had more power than they themselves.
The governor himself admitted that a prisoner of weak intellect who had been severely beaten and much injured by a wardsman did not dare complain
the victim of this cruel ill-usage having "more fear of the power of the wardsman to injure him, than confidence in the governor's power to protect him."
These wardsmen, besides thus ruling the roast, had numerous special privileges, if such they can be called.
They were not obliged to attend chapel, and seldom if ever went; "prisoners," said one of them under examination, "did not like the trouble of going to chapel."
They had a standing bedstead to sleep on, and a good flock mattress; double allowance of provisions, filched from the common stock.
Nobody interfered with them or regulated their conduct. They might get drunk when so disposed, and did so frequently, alone or in company.
Evidence was given before the inspectors of eight or ten prisoners seen "giddy drunk, not able to sit upon forms."
The female wards-women were also given to intemperance.
The matron deposed to having seen the gates-woman "exceedingly drunk," and having been insulted by her.
There was no penalty attached to drunkenness.
A wardsman did not necessarily lose his situation for it. Nor was drink the only creature comfort he might enjoy.
He could indulge in snuff if a snuff-taker,
and might always smoke his pipe undisturbed; for although the use of tobacco had been prohibited since the report of the Lords Committee,
it was still freely introduced into the prison.
Probably authority would not have been so recklessly usurped by the wardsmen had not the proper officials too readily surrendered it.
The turnkeys left the prisoners very much to themselves, never entering the wards after locking-up time, at dusk, till unlocking next morning,
and then only went round to count the number.
Many of them were otherwise and improperly occupied for hours every day in menial services for the governor, cleaning his windows or grooming his horse.
One turnkey had been so employed several hours daily for nearly eleven years.
It was not strange that subordinates should neglect their duty when superiors set the example.
Nothing was more prominently brought out by the inspectors than the inefficiency of the governor at that time, Mr. Cope.
He may have erred in some points through ignorance, but in others he was clearly guilty of culpable neglect.
We have seen that he took no pains to classify and separate prisoners on reception.
This was only one of many grave omissions on his part. He did not feel it incumbent on himself to visit his prison often or see his prisoners.
The act prescribed that he should do both every twenty-four hours, but days passed without his entering the wards.
The prisoners declared that they did not see him oftener than twice a week;
one man who had been in the condemned ward for two months, said the governor only came there four times.
Again, a turnkey deposed that his chief did not enter the wards more than once a fortnight.
But it is only fair to Mr. Cope to state that he himself said he went whenever he could find time
and that he was constantly engaged attending sessions and going with drafts to the hulks.
But when he did visit, his inspections were of the most superficial character
sometimes he looked at his bolts and bars, but he never examined the cupboards, coal-boxes, or other possible hiding-places for cards
dice, dangerous implements, or other prohibited articles.
He only attended chapel once on Sunday, never on the week-day, and generally devoted the time service was in progress
to taking the descriptions of newly-arrived prisoners.
He really did not know what passed in his jail
and was surprised when the inspectors proved to him that practices of which he was ignorant, and which he admitted that he reprehended, went on without hindrance.
He was satisfied to let matters run on as in the old times, he said in his own justification; with him what was, was right,
and evils that should have been speedily rooted out remained because they had the prescription of long usage.
He kept no daily journal of occurrences, and nothing, however important, was recorded at the time.
The aldermen never called upon him to report, and left him nearly unsupervised and uncontrolled.
In his administration of discipline he was quite uncertain;
the punishments he inflicted were unequal,
and it was not the least part of the blame imputed to him that he made special favorites of particular prisoners, retaining of his own accord in Newgate,
and for years, felons who should have been sent beyond the seas.
But, indeed, his whole rule was far too mild, and under this mistaken leniency
the interior of the jail was more like a bear-garden or the noisy purlieus of a public-house than a prison.
It was the same old story -- evil constantly in the ascendant, the least criminal at the mercy of the most depraved.
Under the reckless contempt for regulations,
the apathy of the authorities, and the undue ascendancy of those who, as convicted felons, should have been most sternly repressed,
the most hardened and the oldest in vice had the best of it, while the inexperienced beginner went to the wall.
Edward Gibbon Wakefield, who spent three years in Newgate a little before the time of the inspectors' first report,
said with justice that "incredible scenes of horror occur in Newgate."
It was, moreover, in his opinion undoubtedly the greatest nursery of crime in London.
The days were passed in idleness, debauchery, riotous quarreling, immoral conversation,
gambling, indirect contravention of parliamentary rules, instruction in all nefarious processes,
lively discourse upon past criminal exploits, elaborate discussion of others to be perpetrated after release.
No provision whatever was made for the employment of prisoners, no materials were purchased, no trade instructors appointed.
There was no school for adults; only the boys were taught anything, and their instructor, with his assistant, were convicted prisoners.
Idle hands and unoccupied brains found in mischief the only means of whiling away the long hours of incarceration.
Gaming of all kinds, although forbidden by the Jail Acts, was habitually practiced.
This was admitted in evidence by the turnkeys, and was proved by the appearance of the prison tables, which bore the marks of gaming-boards deeply cut into them.
Prisoners confessed that it was a favorite occupation, the chief games being "shoving halfpence" on the table,
pitch in the hole, cribbage, dominoes, and common tossing, at which as much as four or five shillings would change hands in an hour.
But this was not the only amusement. Most of the wards took in the daily papers,
the most popular being the "Times," "Morning Herald," and "Morning Chronicle"; on Sunday the "Weekly Dispatch," "Bell's Life," and the "Weekly Messenger."
The newsman had free access to the prison; he passed in unsearched and unexamined, and, unaccompanied by an officer,
went at once to his customers, who bought their paper and paid for it themselves.
The news-vendor was also a tobacconist,
and he had thus ample means of introducing to the prisoners the prohibited but always much-coveted and generally procurable weed.
In the same way the wardsman laid in his stock to be retailed. Other light literature besides the daily journals were in circulation:
novels, flash songs, play-books, such as "Jane Shore," "Grimm's German Tales," with Cruikshank's illustrations,
and publications which in these days would have been made the subject of a criminal prosecution.
One of these, published by Stockdale, the inspectors styled "a book of the most disgusting nature."
There was also a good supply of Bibles and prayers,
the donation of a philanthropic gentleman, Captain Brown, but these, particularly the Bibles, bore little appearance of having been used.
Drink, in more or less unlimited quantities, was still to be had.
Spirits certainly were now excluded; but a potman, with full permission of the sheriffs,
brought in beer for sale from a neighboring public-house, and visited all the wards with no other escort than the prisoner gatesman.
The quantity to be issued per head was limited by the prison regulations to one pint
but no steps were taken to prevent any prisoner from obtaining more if he could pay for it.
The beer-man brought in as much as he pleased; he sold it without the controlling presence of an officer.
Not only did prisoners come again and again for a "pint," but large quantities were carried off to the wards to be drunk later in the day.
There were more varied, and at times, especially when beer had circulated freely, more uproarious diversions.
Wrestling, in which legs were occasionally broken, was freely indulged in; also such low games as "cobham,"
leap-frog, puss in the corner, and "fly the garter," for which purpose the rugs were spread out to prevent feet slipping on the floor.
The weekly introduction of food, to which I shall presently refer, formed the basis of luxurious banquets, washed down by liquor
and enlivened by flash songs and thrilling long-winded descriptions of robberies and other "plants."
There was much swearing and bad language, the very worst that could be used, from the first thing in the morning to the last thing at night.
New arrivals, especially the innocent and still guileless debutant, were tormented with rude horse-play, and assailed by the most insulting "chaff."
If any man presumed to turn in too early
he was "toed," that is to say, a string was fastened to his big toe while he was asleep, and he was dragged from off his mat,
or his bedclothes were drawn away across the room.
The ragged part of the prisoners were very anxious to destroy the clothes of the better dressed, and often lighted small pieces of cloth,
which they dropped smoldering into their fellow-prisoners' pockets.
Often the victim, goaded to madness, attacked his tormentors; a fight was then certain to follow.
These fights sometimes took place in the daytime, when a ring was regularly formed, and two or three stood by the door to watch for the officer's approach.
More often they occurred at night, and were continued to the bitter end.
The prisoners in this way administered serious punishment on one another. Black eyes and broken noses were always to be seen.
More cruel injuries were common enough, which did not result from honest hand-to-hand fights.
The surgeon's journal produced to the inspectors contained numerous entries of terrible wounds inflicted in a cowardly way.
A serious accident: one of the prisoners had a hot poker run into his eye.
A lad named Matthew White has had a wound in his eye by a bone thrown at him, which very nearly destroyed vision.
During the tumult a prisoner, who was one of the worst of the rioters, was bruised about the head and body.
Watkins' knee-joint is very severely injured.
A prisoner Baxter is in the infirmary in consequence of a severe injury to his wrist-joint.
Watkins' case, referred to above, is made the subject of another and a special report from the surgeon.
He was in the transport side, when one of his fellows, in endeavoring to strike another prisoner with a large poker, missed his aim, and struck Watkins' knee
Violent inflammation and extensive suppuration ensued, and for a considerable time amputation seemed inevitable.
After severe suffering prolonged for many months, the inflammation was subdued, but the cartilage of the knee-joint was destroyed, and he was crippled for life.
On another occasion a young man, who was being violently teased, seized a knife and stabbed his tormentor in the back.
The prisoner who used the knife was secured, but it was the wardsman, and not the officers, to whom the report was made, and no official inquiry or punishment followed.
Matters were at times still worse, and the rioting went on to such dangerous lengths as to endanger the safety of the building.
On one occasion a disturbance was raised which was not quelled until windows had been broken and forms and tables burnt.
The officers were obliged to go in among the prisoners to restore order with drawn cutlasses,
but the presence and authority of the governor himself became indispensable.
The worst fights occurred on Sunday afternoons; but nearly every night the act of locking up became, from the consequent removal of all supervision,
the signal for the commencement of obscene talk, revelry, and violence.
Other regulations laid down by the Jail Acts were still defied. One of these was that prisoners should be restricted to the jail allowance of food;
but all could still obtain as much extra, and of a luxurious kind, as their friends chose to bring them in.
Visitors were still permitted to come with supplies on given days of the week, about the only limitation being that the food should be cooked, and cold;
hot meat, poultry, and fish were also forbidden.
But the inspectors found in the ward cupboards mince-pies and other pasties, cold joints, hams, and so forth.
Many other articles were introduced by visitors, including money, tobacco, pipes, and snuff.
From the same source came the two or three strong files which the inspectors found in one ward,
together with four bradawls, several large iron spikes, screws, nails, and knives;
all of them instruments calculated to facilitate attempts at breaking out of prison,
and capable of becoming most dangerous weapons in the hands of desperate and determined men.
The nearly indiscriminate admission of visitors, although restricted to certain days, continued to be an unmixed evil.
The untried might see their friends three times a week, the convicted only once.
On these occasions precautions were supposed to be taken to exclude bad characters,
yet many persons of notoriously loose life continually obtained egress.
Women saw men if they merely pretended to be wives; even boys were visited by their sweethearts.
Decency was, however, insured by a line of demarcation, and visitors were kept upon each side of a separated double iron railing.
But no search was made to intercept prohibited articles at the gate, and there was no permanent gate-keeper,
which would have greatly helped to keep out bad characters. Some idea of the difficulty and inconvenience of these lax regulations as regards visiting,
may be gathered from the statement that as many as three hundred were often admitted on the same day
enough to altogether upset what small show of decorum and discipline was still preserved in the prison.
Perhaps the worst feature of the visiting system was the permission accorded to male prisoners "under the name of husbands, brothers, and sons"
to have access to the female side on Sundays and Wednesdays, in order to visit their supposed relations there.
On this female side, where the Ladies' Association still reigned supreme, more system and a greater semblance of decorum was maintained.
But there were evils akin to those on the male side, prominent amongst which was the undue influence accorded to prisoners.
A female prisoner kept the registers.
Wards-women were allowed much the same authority, with the same temptations to excess, and intoxication was not unknown among them and others.
The clothing was still meager and ragged: the washing places insufficient, and wanting in decency;
the pump was the only provision, and this in a place within sight of visitors, of the windows of the male turnkeys, and unprotected from the weather.
There was the same crowding in the sleeping arrangements as on the male side; the same scarcity of bedding.
It was a special evil of this part of the prison, that the devotional exercises, originally so profitable, had grown into a kind of edifying spectacle,
which numbers of well-meaning but inquisitive people were anxious to witness.
Thus, when the inspectors visited there were twenty-three strangers, and only twenty-eight prisoners.
The presence of so many strangers, many of them gentlemen, distracted the prisoners' attention, and could not be productive of much good.
The separation of the sexes was not indeed rigidly carried out in Newgate as yet.
We have seen that male prisoners visited their female relations and friends on the female side. Besides this,
the gatesman who prepared the briefs had interviews with female prisoners alone while taking their instructions; a female came alone and unaccompanied by a matron
to clean the governor's office in the male prison;
male prisoners carried coal into the female prison, when they saw and could speak or pass letters to the female prisoners;
and the men could also at any time go for tea, coffee, and sugar to Mrs. Brown's shop, which was inside the female gate.
In the bail-dock, where most improper general association was permitted, the female prisoners were often altogether in the charge of male turnkeys.
The governor was also personally responsible for gross contravention of this rule of separation,
and was in the habit of drawing frequently upon the female prison for prisoners to act as domestic servants in his own private dwelling.
Some member of the Ladies' Association observed and commented upon the fact that a "young rosy-cheeked girl" had been kept by the governor from transportation,
while older women in infirm health were sent across the seas.
His excuse was that he had given the girl his promise that she should not go, an assumption of prerogative which by no means rested with him;
but he afterwards admitted that the girl had been recommended to him by the principal turnkey, who knew something of her friends.
This woman was really his servant, employed to help in cleaning, and taken on whenever there was extra work to be done.
The governor had a great dislike, he said, to seeing strangers in his house.
This girl had been first engaged on account of the extra work entailed by certain prisoners
committed by the House of Commons, who had been lodged in the governor's own house.
The house at this time was full of men and visitors; waiters came in from the taverns with meals.
Some of the prisoners had their valets, and all these were constantly in and out of the kitchen where this female prisoner was employed.
There was reveling and roistering, as usual, with "high life below-stairs.
The governor sent down wine on festive occasions, of which no doubt the prisoner housemaid had her share.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section ten: The first report of the inspector of prisons.
Eighteen years had elapsed since the formation of the "Ladies' Association,"
and Mrs. Fry with her colleagues still labored assiduously in Newgate, devoting themselves mainly to the female prison,
although their ministrations were occasionally extended to the male side.
The inspectors paid tribute to the excellence of the motives of these philanthropic ladies, and recognized the good they did.
They had introduced "much order and cleanliness,"
had provided work for those who had hitherto passed their time in total idleness, and had made the treatment of female transports on the way to New South Wales
by their presence and their pious, disinterested efforts, to restrain the dissolute manners and vicious language of the unhappy and depraved inmates.
But it was already plain that they constituted an independent authority within the jails; they were frequently in conflict with the chaplain,
who not strangely resented the orders issued by the aldermen
that women should be frequently kept from chapel in order that they might attend the ladies' lectures and exhortations.
The admission of a crowd of visitors to assist in these lay services has already been remarked upon; as the inspectors pointed out,
it had the bad effect of distracting attention,
it tended to "dissipate reflection, diminish the gloom of the prison, and mitigate the punishment which the law has sentenced the prisoner to undergo."
It is to be feared too that although the surface was thus whitewashed and decorous, much that was vicious still festered and rankled beneath,
and that when the restraining influences of the ladies were absent, the female prisoners relapsed into immoral and uncleanly discourse.
Even in the daytime, when supervision was withdrawn, "the language used to be dreadful," says one of the women when under examination;
swearing and talking of what crimes they had committed, and how they had done it. Another witness declared she had heard the most shocking language in the yard; she said
she had never witnessed such scenes before, and hopes she never shall again -- it was dreadful!
After locking-up time, which varied, as on the male side, according to the daylight, the scenes were often riotous and disgraceful.
The poor, who could afford no luxuries, went to bed early, but were kept awake by the revelries of the rich,
who supped royally on the supplies provided from outside, and kept it up till ten or eleven o'clock.
There were frequent quarrels and fights; shoes and other missiles were freely bandied about;
and with all this "the most dreadful oaths, the worst language, too bad to be repeated," were made use of every night.
Bad as were the various parts of the jail already dealt with,
there still remained one where the general callous indifference and mismanagement culminated in cruel culpable neglect.
The condition of the capitally-convicted prisoners after sentence was still very disgraceful. The side they occupied, still known as the press-yard,
consisted of two dozen rooms and fifteen cells. In these various chambers, until just before the inspectors made their report,
all classes of the condemned, those certain to suffer, and the larger number who were nearly certain of a reprieve,
were jumbled up together, higgledy-piggledy, the old and the young, the murderer and the child who had broken into a dwelling.
All privacy was impossible under the circumstances.
At times the numbers congregated together were very great; as many as fifty and sixty, even more, were crowded indiscriminately into the press-yard.
The better-disposed complained bitterly of what they had to endure;
one man declared that the language of the condemned rooms was disgusting, that he was dying a death every day in being compelled to associate with such characters.
In the midst of the noisy and blasphemous talk no one could pursue his meditations; any who tried to pray became the sport and ridicule of his brutal fellows.
Owing to the repeated entreaties of the criminals who could hardly hope to escape the gallows, some show of classification was carried out,
and when the inspectors visited Newgate they found the three certain to die in a day-room by themselves;
in a second room were fourteen more who had every hope of a reprieve.
The whole of these seventeen had, however, a common airing-yard, and took their exercise there at the same time,
so that men in the most awful situation, daily expecting to be hanged,
were associated continually with a number of those who could look with certainty on a mitigation of punishment.
The latter, light-hearted and reckless, conducted themselves in the most unseemly fashion, and "with as much indifference as the inmates of the other parts of the prison."
They amused themselves after their own fashion; played all day long at blind-man's-buff and leap-frog, or beat each other with a knotted handkerchief,
laughing and uproarious, utterly unmindful of the companionship of men upon whom lay the shadow of an impending shameful death.
Men whose cases were dangerous, and those most seriously inclined, complained of these annoyances,
so subversive of meditation, so disturbing to the thoughts;
they suffered sickening anxiety, and wished to be locked up alone. This indiscriminate association lasted for months,
during the whole of which time the unhappy convicts who had but little hope of commutation were exposed to the mockery of their reckless associates.
The brutal callousness of the bulk of the inmates of the press-yard may be gathered from the prison punishment-book, which frequently recorded such entries as the following:
Benjamin Vines and Daniel Ward put in irons for two days for breaking the windows of the day room in the condemned cells.
Joseph Coleman put in irons for three days for striking one of the prisoners, in the same place.
There were disputes and quarrels constantly among these doomed men; it was a word and blow, an argument clenched always with a fight.
The more peaceably disposed found some occupation in making Newgate tokens,
leaden hearts, and "grinding the impressions off penny-pieces, then pricking figures or words on them to give to their friends as memorials.
Turnkeys occasionally visited the press-yard, but its occupants were under little or no control.
The chaplain, who might have been expected to make these men his peculiar care, and who at one time had visited them frequently, often several times a week,
had relaxed his efforts, because, according to his own account, he was so frequently stopped in the performance of his duties.
In his evidence before the inspectors he declared that "for years he gave his whole time to his duties, from an early hour in the morning till late in the afternoon.
He left off because he was so much interfered with and laughed at, and from seeing that no success attended his efforts, owing to the evils arising from association.
Latterly his ministrations to the condemned had been restricted to a visit on Sunday afternoons, and occasionally about once a fortnight on a week-day.
It is only fair to Mr. Cotton to add that, according to his own journal, he was unremitting in his attentions to convicts who were actually cast for death,
and the day of whose execution was fixed. He had no doubt a difficult mission to discharge;
on the one hand, the Ladies' Association, supported and encouraged by public approval, trenched upon his peculiar province;
on the other, the governor of the jail sneered at his zeal
stigmatized his often most just strictures on abuses as "a bundle of nonsense," and the aldermen, when he appealed to them for protection and countenance,
generally sided with his opponents. Nevertheless the inspectors summed up against him.
While admitting that he had had many difficulties to contend with,
and that he had again and again protested against the obstacles thrown in his way, the inspectors "cannot forbear expressing their opinion that he might have shown greater perseverance,
in the face of impediments confessedly discouraging
as regards the private teaching of prisoners; and they went on to say that "a resolved adherence, in spite of discouragements the most disheartening,
to that line of conduct which his duty imposed on him
would, it is probable, have eventually overcome the reluctance of some of the prisoners at least, and would have possessed so much moral dignity
as effectually to rebuke and abash the profane spirit of the more insolent and daring of the criminals.
The lax discipline maintained in Newgate was still further deteriorated by the presence of two other classes of prisoners who ought never to have been inmates of such a jail.
One of these were the criminal lunatics, who were at this time and for long previous continuously imprisoned there.
As the law stood since the passing of the ninth George the fourth c. forty, any two justices might remove a prisoner found to be insane, either on commitment
or arraignment, to an asylum, and the Secretary of State had the same power as regards any who became insane while undergoing sentence.
These powers were not invariably put in force, and there were in consequence many unhappy lunatics in Newgate and other jails,
whose proper place was the asylum.
At the time the Lords' Committee sat there were eight thus retained in Newgate, and a return in the appendix of the Lords' report
gives a total of thirty-nine lunatics confined in various jails, many of them guilty of murder and other serious crimes.
The inspectors in the following year, on examining the facts, found that some of these poor creatures had been in confinement for long periods:
at Newgate and York Castle as long as five years; "at Ilchester and Morpeth for seven years; at Warwick for eight years,
at Buckingham and Hereford for eleven years
at Appleby for thirteen years, at Anglesea for fifteen years, at Exeter for sixteen years, and at Pembroke
for not less a period than twenty-four years.
It was manifestly wrong that such persons, "visited by the most awful of calamities," should be detained in a common prison.
Not only did their presence tend greatly to interfere with the discipline of the prison, but their condition was deplorable in the extreme.
The lunatic became the sport of the idle and the depraved. His cure was out of the question;
he was placed in a situation "beyond all others calculated to confirm his malady and prolong his sufferings."
The matter was still further complicated at Newgate by the presence within the walls of sham lunatics. Some of those included in the category
had actually been returned as sane from the asylum to which they had been sent, and there was always some uncertainty as to who was mad and who not.
Prisoners indeed were known to boast that they had saved their necks by feigning insanity.
It was high time that the unsatisfactory state of the law as regards the treatment of criminal lunatics should be remedied
and not the least of the good services rendered by the new inspectors was their inquiry into the status of these unfortunate people, and their recommendation to improve it.
The other inmates of the prison of an exceptional character, and exempted from the regular discipline, such as it was,
were the ten persons committed to Newgate by the House of Commons in eighteen thirty-five.
These were the gentlemen concerned in the bribery case at Ipswich in eighteen thirty-five,
when a petition was presented against the return of Messrs. Adam Dundas and Fitzroy Kelly. Various witnesses, including Messrs. J. B. Dasent,
Pilgrim, Bond, and Clamp, had refused to give evidence before the House of Commons' Committee; a Speaker's warrant was issued for their arrest when they absconded.
Mr. J. E. Sparrow and Mr. Clipperton
the parliamentary agents of the members whose election was impugned, were implicated in aiding and abetting the others to abscond, and a Mr. O'Mally,
counsel for the two M.P.'s, was also concerned.
Pilgrim and Dasent were caught and given into the custody of the sergeant-at-arms, and the rest were either arrested or they surrendered.
A resolution at once passed the House without division to commit the whole to Newgate, where they remained for various terms.
Dasent and Pilgrim were released in ten days, on making due submission.
O'Mally sent in a medical certificate, declaring that the imprisonment was endangering his life, and after some question he was also released.
The rest were detained for more than a month, it being considered that they were the most guilty, as being either professional agents, who advised the others to abscond,
or witnesses who did not voluntarily come forward when the chance was given them.
Many of the old customs once prevalent in the State Side, so properly condemned and abolished,
were revived for the convenience of these gentlemen, whose incarceration was thus rendered as little like imprisonment as possible.
A certain number, who could afford the high rate of a guinea per diem, fixed by the under sheriff, were lodged in the governor's house,
slept there, and had their meals provided for them from the Sessions House or London Coffee-House.
A few others, who could not afford a payment of more than half a guinea, were permitted to monopolize a part of the prison infirmary,
where the upper ward was exclusively appropriated to their use. They also had their meals sent in, and, with the food, wine almost ad libitum.
A prisoner, one of the wardsmen, waited on those in the infirmary; the occupants of the governor's house had their own servants, or the governor's.
As a rule, visitors, many of them persons of good position, came and went all day long, and as late as nine at night;
some to the infirmary, many more to the governor's house.
There were no restraints, cards and backgammon were played, and the time passed in feasting and revelry.
Even Mr. Cope admitted that the committal of this class of prisoners to Newgate was most inconvenient,
and the inspectors expressed themselves still more strongly in reprehension of the practice.
The infirmary at this particular period epitomized the condition of the jail at large.
It was diverted from its proper uses, and, as the "place of the greatest comfort," was allotted to persons who should not have been sent to Newgate at all.
All the evils of indiscriminate association were strongly accentuated by the crowd collected within its narrow limits.
It may easily be imagined, say the inspectors, in speaking of the prison generally,
the sane and the insane, the young and the old, the trivial offender and the man about to suffer the extreme penalty of the law,
are all huddled together without discrimination, oversight, or control."
Enough has probably been extracted from this most damnatory report to give a complete picture of the disgraceful state in which Newgate still remained in eighteen thirty-five.
The inspectors, however, honestly admitted that although the site of the prison was convenient, its construction was as bad as bad could be.
Valuable space was cumbered with many long and winding passages, numerous staircases, and unnecessarily thick and cumbrous inner walls.
The wards were in some cases spacious, but they were entirely unsuited for separation or the inspection of prisoners.
The yards were narrow and confined, mainly because the ground plan was radically vicious. These were evils inseparable from the place.
But there were others remediable under a better system of management.
More attention to ventilation, which was altogether neglected and inadequate, would have secured a better atmosphere for the unhappy inmates
who constantly breathed an air heavy, and, when the wards were first opened in the morning, particularly offensive.
Again, the discipline commonly deemed inseparable from every place of durance was entirely wanting.
The primary object of committing a prisoner to jail, as the inspectors pointed out, was to deter not only the criminal himself, but others from crime,
and "to dispose him, by meditation and seclusion, to return to an honest life."
But at Newgate the convicted prisoner, instead of privation and hard fare,
and he can almost invariably procure the luxuries of his class of life, beer and tobacco, in abundance.
Instead of seclusion and meditation, his time is passed in the midst of a body of criminals of every class and degree, in riot, debauchery, and gaming,
vaunting his own adventures, or listening to those of others;
communicating his own skill and aptitude in crime, or acquiring the lessons of greater adepts. He has access to newspapers, and of course
prefers that description which are expressly prepared for his own class, and which abound in vulgar adventure in criminal enterprise, and in the histories of the police,
the jail, and the scaffold.
He is allowed intercourse with prostitutes who, in nine cases out of ten, have originally conduced to his ruin;
and his connection with them is confirmed by that devotion and generosity towards their paramours in adversity for which these otherwise degraded women are remarkable.
Having thus passed his time, he returns a greater adept in crime, with a wider acquaintance among criminals, and, what perhaps is even more injurious to him,
is generally known to all the worst men in the country; not only without the inclination, but almost without the ability of returning to an honest life."
These pungent and well-grounded strictures applied with still greater force to the unconvicted prisoner, the man who came to the prison innocent, and still uncontaminated,
to be subjected to the same baneful influences, and to suffer the same moral deterioration, whether ultimately convicted or set free.
The whole system, or more correctly the want of system, was baneful and pernicious to the last degree.
The evils of such association were aggravated by the unbroken idleness; one "evil inflamed the other;" reformation
or any kind of moral improvement was impossible; the prisoner's career was inevitably downward, till he struck the lowest depths.
Forced and constant intercourse with the most depraved individuals of his own class;
the employment of those means and agents by which the lowest passions and the most vulgar propensities of man are perpetually kept in the highest state of excitement
drink, gaming, obscene and blasphemous language; utter idleness, the almost unrestricted admission of money and luxuries;
uncontrolled conversation with visitors of the very worst description -- prostitutes, thieves, receivers of stolen goods
all the tumultuous and diversified passions and emotions which circumstances like these must necessarily generate
forbid the faintest shadow of a hope that in a soil so unfavorable for moral culture
any awakening truth, salutary exhortation, or imperfect resolutions of amendment can take root or grow.
Strong as were the foregoing remarks, the inspectors wound up their report in still more trenchant language
framing a terrible indictment against those responsible for the condition of Newgate. Their words deserve to be quoted in full.
We cannot close these remarks, say the inspectors, "without an expression of the painful feelings with which we submit to your Lordship
this picture of the existing state of Newgate
That in this vast metropolis, the center of wealth, civilization, and information;
distinguished as the seat of religion, worth, and philanthropy,
where is to be found in operation every expedient by which Ignorance may be superseded by Knowledge, Idleness by Industry, and Suffering by Benevolence;
that in the metropolis of this highly-favored country, to which the eyes of other lands turn for example, a system of prison discipline such as that enforced in Newgate
should be for a number of years in undisturbed operation, not only in contempt of religion and humanity,
but in opposition to the recorded denunciations of authority, and in defiance of the express enactments of the law,
is indeed a subject which cannot but impress every considerate mind with humiliation and sorrow.
We trust, however, that the day is at hand when this stain will be removed from the character of the city of London,
and when the first municipal authority of our land will be no longer subjected to the reproach of fostering an institution which outrages the rights and feelings of humanity,
defeats the ends of justice, and disgraces the profession of a Christian country.
The publication of this report raised a storm in the city, and the corporation was roused to make an immediate protest.
A committee of aldermen was forthwith appointed to report upon the inspectors' report,
and the result was another lengthy blue book, printed in the parliamentary papers, eighteen thirty-six,
traversing where it was possible the statements of the inspectors, and offering explanation and palliation of such evils as could not be denied.
The inspectors retorted without loss of time, reiterating their charges, and pointing out that the committee of aldermen by its own admission
justified the original allegations. It was impossible to deny the indiscriminate association; the gambling, drinking, smoking, quarreling in the jail;
the undue authority given to prisoners, the levying of garnish under another name
the neglect of the condemned convicts, the filthy condition of the wards, the insufficiency of bedding and clothing,
the misemployment of officers and prisoners by the governor.
The corporation evidently had the worst of it, and began to feel the necessity for undertaking the great work of reform.
Next year we find the inspectors expressing their satisfaction that "the full and faithful exposure which we felt it our duty to make of Newgate
has been productive of at least some advantage,
inasmuch as it has aroused the attention of those upon whom parliamentary reports and grand jury presentments had hitherto failed to make the slightest impression.
The measures of improvement introduced were mainly as follows:
the fixing of "inspection holes" in the doors and walls, so as to insure more supervision; of windows opening into the well-holes,
to give better light and ventilation; the construction of bed-places, three tiers high alongside the walls for males, two tiers for females;
the provision of dining-rooms and dining-tables.
The infirmary was enlarged, the admission of visitors limited, and the passing of articles prevented by a wire screen.
The windows were to be glazed and painted to prevent prisoners from looking out;
baths, fumigating places for clothing, wash-house, and the removal of dust-bins, completed the new arrangements in the main prison.
In the press-yard, the press-room and ward above it were parceled out into nine separate sleeping cells;
each was provided with an iron bedstead, and a small desk at which the condemned man might read or write.
But the one great and most crying evil remained unremedied.
The mischief of jail associations, say the inspectors,
is not only permitted still to exist in the prison, but is rendered more powerful than before.
In endeavoring to arrest contamination, prisoners were more closely confined, and associated in smaller numbers;
but this had the effect of throwing them into closer contact, and of making them more intimately acquainted with, more directly influential upon, one another.
In the inspectors' fourth report, dated eighteen thirty-nine,
they return to the charge, and again call the corporation to task for their mismanagement of Newgate.
Abuses and irregularities, which had been partially remedied by the reform introduced in eighteen thirty-seven, were once more in the ascendant.
In our late visits, they say, "we have seen manifest indications of a retrograde movement in this respect,
and a tendency to return to much of that laxity and remissness which formerly marked the management of this prison."
Again the following year the inspectors repeat their charge.
are the association of prisoners, and the unusual contamination to which such association gives rise.
For nearly twenty-two hours out of the twenty-four the prisoners are locked up, during which time no officer is stationed in the ward with them.
They go on to say
Newgate is only less extensively injurious than formerly because it is less crowded.
The effects of the imprisonment are to vitiate its inmates, to extend their acquaintanceship with each other,
to corrupt the prisoner charged with an offense of which he may be innocent, and to confirm in guilt the young and inexperienced offender.
The reports as the years flow on reiterate the same complaints.
Much bitterness of feeling is evidently engendered, and the corporation grows more and more angry with the inspectors.
The prison officials appear to be on the side of the inspectors, to the great dissatisfaction of the corporation, who claimed the full allegiance and support of its servants.
In a resolution passed by the Court of Aldermen on eighteenth March, eighteen forty-two,
I find it ordered "that the ordinary of Newgate be restricted from making any communications to the Home Office
or the Inspectors of Prisons, and that he be required wholly to confine himself to the performance of his duty as prescribed by Act of Parliament.
The inspectors were not to be deterred, however, by any opposition from the earnest discharge of their functions, and continued to report against Newgate.
they state that they are compelled by an imperative sense of duty to advert in terms of decided condemnation to the lamentable condition of the prisons of the city of London,
Newgate, Giltspur St. Compter, and the City Bridewell,
in which the master evil of jail association and consequent contamination still continues to operate directly to the encouragement of crime.
The plan adopted for ventilating the dining-room on the 'master's side' and that of the middle yard is very inefficient;
it consists of several circular perforations, about two inches in diameter,
slanting downwards from the top of the walls to the outside adjoining the slaughterhouses of Newgate market; and occasionally, in hot weather,
instead of ventilating the apartments, they only serve to convey the offensive effluvia arising from the decaying animal matter into the dining-rooms.
Sometimes the stench in hot weather is said to be very bad.
Many rats also come through these so-called ventilators, as they open close to the ground at the back of the prison.
At the same time the inspectors animadvert strongly upon the misconduct of prisoners and the frequency of prison punishments,
both offenses and punishments affording a sufficient index to the practices going forward; and they wind up by declaring
that a strict compliance with their duties gave them no choice "but to report matters as we found them,
and again and again to protest against Newgate as it at present exists.
No complete and permanent improvement was indeed possible while Newgate remained unchanged.
It was not till the erection of the new prison at Holloway in eighteen fifty, and the entire internal reconstruction of Newgate according to new ideas,
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section eleven: Executions, part one.
I propose to return now to the subject of Newgate executions,
which we left at the time of the discontinuance of the long-practiced procession to Tyburn.
The reasons for this change were fully set forth in a previous chapter.
The terrible spectacle was as demoralizing to the public, for whose admonition it was intended,
as the exposure was brutal and cruel towards the principal actors.
The decision to remove the scene of action to the immediate front of the jail itself
was in the right direction, as making the performance shorter and diminishing the area of display.
But the Old Bailey was not exclusively used;
at first, and for some few years after seventeen eighty-four, executions took place occasionally at a distance from Newgate.
This was partly due to the survival of the old notion that the scene of the crime ought also to witness the retribution;
partly perhaps because residents in and about the Old Bailey raised a loud protest against the constant erection of the scaffold in their neighborhood.
As regards the first, I find that in seventeen eighty-six
John Hogan, the murderer of a Mr. Odell, an attorney who resided in Charlotte Street, Rathbone Place,
was executed on a gibbet in front of his victim's house.
Lawrence Jones, a burglar, was in seventeen ninety-three ordered for execution in Hatton Garden, near the house he had robbed;
and when he evaded the sentence by suicide, his body was exhibited in the same neighborhood,
extended upon a plank on the top of an open cart, in his clothes, and fettered.
Again, as late as eighteen oh nine and eighteen twelve, Execution Dock, on the banks of the Thames, was still retained.
Here John Sutherland, commander of the British armed transport 'The Friends,' suffered on the twenty-ninth June, eighteen oh nine,
for the murder of his cabin-boy, whom he stabbed after much ill-usage on board the ship as it lay in the Tagus.
On the eighteenth December, eighteen twelve,
two sailors, Charles Palm and Sam Tilling, were hanged at the same place for the murder of their captain, James Keith
of the trading vessel 'Adventure,' upon the high seas.
They were taken in a cart to the place of execution, amidst a vast concourse of people.
Palm, as soon as he was seated in the cart,
put a quid of tobacco into his mouth, and offered another to his companion, who refused it with indignation
Some indications of pity were offered for the fate of Tilling; Palm, execration alone.
But the Old Bailey gradually, and in spite of all objections urged, monopolized the dread business of execution.
The first affair of the kind on this spot was on the third December, seventeen eighty-three,
when, in pursuance of an order issued by the Recorder to the sheriffs of Middlesex and the keeper of His Majesty's jail, Newgate,
a scaffold was erected in front of that prison for the execution of several convicts named by the Recorder.
the scaffold hung with black; and the inhabitants of the neighborhood, having petitioned the sheriffs to remove the scene of execution to the old place,
were told that the plan had been well considered, and would be persevered in.
The following twenty-third April, it is stated that the malefactors ordered for execution on the eighteenth instead
were brought out of Newgate about eight in the morning, and suspended on a gallows of a new construction.
After hanging the usual time they were taken down, and the machine cleared away in half-an-hour.
By practice the art is much improved, and there is no part of the world in which villains are hanged in so neat a manner, and with so little ceremony.
A full description of this new gallows, which was erected in front of the debtors' door, is to be found in contemporary records.
The criminals are not exposed to view till they mount the fatal stage. The last part of the stage, or that next to the jail,
is enclosed by a temporary roof, under which are placed two seats for the reception of the sheriffs, one on each side of the stairs leading to the scaffold.
Round the north, west, and south sides are erected galleries for the reception of officers, attendants, etc.
and at the distance of five feet from the same is fixed a strong railing all round the scaffold to enclose a place for the constables.
In the middle of this machinery is placed a movable platform, in form of a trap-door, ten feet long by eight wide,
on the middle of which is placed the gibbet, extending from the jail across the Old Bailey.
This movable platform is raised six inches higher than the rest of the scaffold, and on it the convicts stand;
it is supported by two beams, which are held in their place by bolts. The movement of the lever withdraws the bolts, the platform falls in;
and this, being much more sudden and regular than that of a cart being drawn away, has the effect of immediate death.
A broadsheet dated April twenty-fourth, seventeen eighty-seven, describing an execution on the newly-invented scaffold before the debtors' door,
says, "The scaffold on which these miserable people suffered is a temporary machine which was drawn out of the yard of the sessions house by horses;
it is supported by strong posts fixed into grooves made in the street;
the whole is temporary, being all calculated to take to pieces, which are preserved within the prison."
This contrivance appears to have been copied with improvements from that which had been used in Dublin at a still earlier date,
for that city claims the priority in establishing the custom of hanging criminals at the jail itself.
The Dublin "engine of death," as the gallows are styled in the account from which the following description is taken, consisted of an iron bar
parallel to the prison wall, and about four feet from it, but strongly affixed thereto with iron scroll clamps.
From this bar hang several iron loops, in which the halters are tied.
Under this bar at a proper distance is a piece of flooring or platform,
projecting somewhat beyond the range of the iron bar, and swinging upon hinges affixed to the wall.
The entrance upon this floor or leaf is from the middle window over the gate of the prison;
and this floor is supported below,
while the criminals stand upon it, by two pieces of timber, which are made to slide in and out of the prison wall through apertures made for that purpose.
When the criminals are tied up and prepared for their fate, this floor suddenly falls down, upon withdrawing the supporters inwards.
They are both drawn at once by a windlass, and the unhappy culprits remain suspended.
This mode of execution, it is alleged, gave rise to the old vulgar "chaff," "Take care, or you'll die at the fall of the leaf."
The machinery in use in Dublin is much the same as that employed at many jails now-a-days.
But the fall apart and inwards of two leaves is considered superior.
The latter is the method still followed at Newgate.
The sentences inflicted in front of Newgate were not limited to hanging.
In the few years which elapsed between the establishment of the gallows at Newgate
and the abolition of the practice of burning females for petty treason, more than one woman suffered this penalty at the Old Bailey.
One case is preserved by Catnach,
that of Phoebe Harris, who in seventeen eighty-eight was "barbariously" executed and burnt before Newgate for coining.
She is described as a well-made little woman, something more than thirty years of age, of a pale complexion and not disagreeable features.
When she came out of prison she appeared languid and terrified, and trembled greatly as she advanced to the stake,
where the apparatus for the punishment she was about to experience
seemed to strike her mind with horror and consternation, to the exclusion of all power of recollectedness in preparation for the approaching awful moment.
She walked from the debtors' door to a stake fixed in the ground about half-way between the scaffold and Newgate Street.
She was immediately tied by the neck to an iron bolt fixed near the top of the stake,
and after praying fervently for a few minutes, the steps on which she stood were drawn away, and she was left suspended.
A chain fastened by nails to the stake was then put round her body by the executioner with his assistants.
Two cart-loads of faggots were piled about her, and after she had hung for half-an-hour the fire was kindled.
The flames presently burned the halter, the body fell a few inches, and hung then by the iron chain.
The fire had not quite burnt out at twelve, in nearly four hours, that is to say.
A great concourse of people attended on this melancholy occasion.
The change from Tyburn to the Old Bailey had worked no improvement as regards the gathering together of the crowd or its demeanor.
As many spectators as ever thronged to see the dreadful show,
and they were packed into a more limited space, disporting themselves as heretofore by brutal horse-play, coarse jests, and frantic yells.
It was still the custom to offer warm encouragement or bitter disapproval, according to the character and antecedents of the sufferer.
The highwayman, whose exploits many in the crowd admired or emulated, was cheered and bidden to die game;
the man of better birth could hope for no sympathy, whatever his crime.
At the execution of Governor Wall, in eighteen oh two, the furious hatred of the mob was plainly apparent in their appalling cries.
His appearance on the scaffold was the signal for three prolonged shouts from an innumerable populace, "the brutal effusion of one common sentiment."
It was said that so large a crowd had never collected since the execution of Mrs. Brownrigg, nor had the public indignation risen so high.
Pieman and ballad-monger did their usual roaring trade amidst the dense throng.
No sooner was the "job" finished than half-a-dozen competitors appeared, each offering the identical rope for sale at a shilling an inch.
One was the "yeoman of the halter," a Newgate official, the executioner's assistant, whom Mr. J. T. Smith, who was present at the execution,
describes as "a most diabolical-looking little wretch -- Jack Ketch's head man.
The yeoman was, however, under-sold by his wife, "Rosy Emma,"
exuberant in talk and hissing hot from Pie Corner, where she had taken her morning dose of gin-and-bitters.
A little further off, says Mr. Smith, was "a lath of a fellow past three-score years and ten,
who had just arrived from the purlieus of Black Boy Alley, woebegone as Romeo's apothecary, exclaiming,
Here's the identical rope at sixpence an inch.
Mr. Smith's account of the condemned convict, whose cell he was permitted to enter, may be inserted here.
He was introduced by the ordinary, Dr. Forde, a name familiar to the reader, who met him at the felons' door
in his canonicals, and with his head as stiffly erect as a sheriff's coachman.
The ordinary "gravely uttered, 'Come this way, Mr. Smith.'
As we crossed the press yard a cock crew, and the solitary clanking of a restless chain was dreadfully horrible.
The prisoners had not risen.
They entered a "stone cold room," and were presently joined by the prisoner.
He was death's counterfeit, tall, shriveled, and pale;
and his soul shot out so piercingly through the port-holes of his head, that the first glance of him nearly petrified me
His hands were clasped, and he was truly penitent.
After the yeoman had requested him to stand up, 'he pinioned him,' as the Newgate phrase is
and tied the cord with so little feeling that the governor (Wall), who had not given the wretch his accustomed fee, observed,
You have tied me very tight, upon which Dr. Forde ordered him to slacken the cord, which he did, but not without muttering.
Thank you, sir, said the governor to the doctor, "it is of little moment."
He then made some observations to the attendant about the fire, and turning to the doctor, questioned him.
Do tell me, sir; I am informed I shall go down with great force; is it so?
After the construction and action of the machine had been explained, the doctor asked the governor what kind of men he had commanded at Goree,
where the murder for which he was condemned had been committed.
Sir, he answered, "they sent me the very riff-raff."
The poor soul then joined the doctor in prayer, and never did I witness more contrition at any condemned sermon than he then evinced.
The sheriff arrived, attended by his officers, to receive the prisoner from the keeper.
A new hat was partly flattened on his head, for, owing to its being too small in the crown, it stood many inches too high behind.
As we were crossing the press yard,
the dreadful execrations of some of the felons so shook his frame that he observed "the clock had struck;" and quickening his pace,
he soon arrived at the room where the sheriff was to give a receipt for his body, according to the usual custom.
Before the colonel had been pinioned he had pulled out two white handkerchiefs, one of which he bound over his temples so as nearly to conceal his eyes,
the other he kept between his hands.
Over the handkerchief around his brows he placed a white cap, the new hat being on top of all.
He was dressed in a mixed-colored loose coat with a black collar, swandown waistcoat, blue pantaloons, and white silk stockings.
Thus appareled he ascended the stairs at the debtors' door,
and stepped out on to the platform, to be received, as has been said, by prolonged yells.
These evidently deprived him of the small portion of fortitude he had summoned up.
He bowed his head under extreme pressure of ignominy,
and at his request the ordinary drew the cap further down over his face, when in an instant,
without waiting for any signal, the platform dropped, and he was launched into eternity.
Whenever the public attention had been specially called to a particular crime, either on account of its atrocity,
the doubtfulness of the issue, or the superior position of the perpetrator,
the attendance at the execution was certain to be tumultuous, and the conduct of the mob disorderly.
This was notably the case at the execution of Holloway and Haggerty
in eighteen oh seven, an event long remembered from the fatal and disastrous consequences which followed it.
They were accused by a confederate, who, goaded by conscience, had turned approver, of the murder of a Mr. Steele,
who kept a lavender warehouse in the city, and who had gardens at Feltham,
whither he often went to distill the lavender, returning to London the same evening.
One night he was missing
and after a long interval his dead body was discovered, shockingly disfigured, in a ditch. This was in eighteen oh two.
Four years passed without the detection of the murderers,
but in the beginning of eighteen oh seven one of them, at that time just sentenced to transportation,
made a full confession, and implicated Holloway and Haggerty.
They were accordingly apprehended and brought to trial, the informer, Hanfield by name, being accepted as king's evidence.
Conviction followed mainly on his testimony; but the two men, especially Holloway, stoutly maintained their innocence to the last.
Very great excitement prevailed in the town throughout the trial, and this greatly increased when the verdict was known.
An enormous crowd assembled to witness the execution, amounting, it was said, to the hitherto unparalleled number of forty thousand.
By eight o'clock not an inch of ground in front of the platform was unoccupied.
The pressure soon became so frightful that many would have willingly escaped from the crowd; but their attempts only increased the general confusion.
Very soon women began to scream with terror;
some, especially of low stature, found it difficult to remain standing, and several, although held up for some time by the men nearest them,
presently fell, and were at once trampled to death.
Cries of Murder! murder! were now raised, and added greatly to the horrors of the scene.
Panic became general. More women, children, and many men were borne down, to perish beneath the feet of the rest.
The most affecting and distressing scene was at Green Arbor Lane, just opposite the debtors' door of the prison.
Here a couple of piemen had been selling their wares; the basket of one of them, which was raised upon a four-legged stool, was upset.
The pieman stooped down to pick up his scattered stock, and some of the mob, not seeing what had happened, stumbled over him.
No one who fell ever rose again.
Among the rest was a woman with an infant at the breast.
She was killed, but in the act of falling she forced her child into the arms of a man near her, and implored him in God's name to save it;
the man, needing all his care for his own life, threw the child from him,
and it passed along the heads of the crowd, to be caught at last by a person who struggled with it to a cart and deposited it there in safety.
In another part seven persons met their death by suffocation.
In this convulsive struggle for bare existence people fought fiercely with one another, and the weakest, of course the women, went under.
One cart-load of spectators having broken down, some of its occupants fell off the vehicle, and were instantly trampled to death.
This went on for more than an hour, and until the malefactors were cut down and the gallows removed;
then the mob began to thin, and the streets were cleared by the city marshals and a number of constables.
The catastrophe exceeded the worst anticipations. Nearly one hundred dead and dying lay about; and after all had been removed,
the bodies for identification, the wounded to hospitals, a cart-load of shoes, hats, petticoats, and fragments of wearing apparel were picked up.
Among the dead was a sailor lad whom no one knew;
he had his pockets filled with bread and cheese, and it was generally supposed that he had come a long distance to see the fatal show.
A tremendous crowd assembled when Bellingham was executed in eighteen twelve for the murder of Spencer Percival, at that time prime minister;
but there were no serious accidents, beyond those caused by the goring of a maddened, over-driven ox which forced its way through the crowd.
Precautions had been taken by the erection of barriers, and the posting of placards at all the avenues to the Old Bailey, on which was printed,
Beware of entering the crowd! Remember thirty poor persons were pressed to death by the crowd when Haggerty and Holloway were executed!
The concourse was very great, notwithstanding these warnings.
It was still greater at Fauntleroy's execution in eighteen twenty-four, when no less than one hundred thousand persons assembled, it was said.
Every window and roof which could command a view of the horrible performance was occupied.
All the avenues and approaches, places even whence nothing whatever could be seen of the scaffold,
were blocked by persons who had overflowed from the area in front of the jail.
At Courvoisier's execution in eighteen forty it was the same, or worse.
As early as six a.m. the number assembled already exceeded that seen on ordinary occasions;
by seven a.m. the whole space was so thronged that it was impossible to move one way or the other.
Some persons were kept for more than five hours standing against the barriers, and many nearly fainted from exhaustion.
Every window had its party of occupants; the adjoining roofs were equally crowded.
High prices were asked and paid for front seats or good standing room. As much as five pounds was given for the attic story
of the Lamb's Coffee House;
two pounds was a common price for a window.
At the George public-house to the south of the drop, Sir W. Watkin Wynn, Baronet,
hired a room for the night and morning, which he and a large party of friends occupied before and during the execution;
in an adjoining house, that of an undertaker, was Lord Alfred Paget, also with several friends.
Those who had hired apartments spent the night in them, keeping up their courage with liquids and cigars.
Numbers of ladies were present, although the public feeling was much against their attendance.
One well-dressed woman fell out of a first-floor window on to the shoulders of the crowd below, but neither she nor any one else was greatly hurt.
The city authorities had endeavored to take all precautions against panic and excitement among the crowd,
and caused a number of stout additional barriers to be erected in front of the scaffold,
and although one of these gave way owing to the extraordinary pressure, no serious accident occurred.
Some years later an eye-witness published a graphic account of one of these scenes.
Soon after midnight on the Sunday night, for by this time the present practice of executing on Monday morning had been pretty generally introduced,
the crowd began to congregate in and about the Old Bailey.
Gin-shops and coffee-houses were the first to open doors, and touts began to bid for tenants for the various rooms upstairs.
Cries of "Comfortable room!" "Excellent situation!" "Beautiful prospect!" "Splendid view!" resounded on every side.
By this time the workmen might be heard busily erecting the gallows;
the sounds of hammer and saw intermingled with the broad jeers and coarse jests of the rapidly increasing mob.
One by one the huge uprights of black timber were fitted together,
until presently the huge stage loomed dark above the crowd which was now ranged round the barriers;
a throng of people whom neither rain, snow, storm, nor darkness ever hindered from attending the show.
They were mainly members of the criminal classes.
their conversation was of companions and associates of former years, long ago imprisoned, transported, hanged, while they,
hoary-headed and hardened in guilt, were still at large.
They talked of the days when the convicts were hung up a dozen or more in a row;
of those who had shown the white, and those who had died game.
The approaching ceremony had evidently no terrors for these "idolaters of the gallows."
With them were younger men and women:
the former already vowed to the same criminal career, and looking up to their elders with the respect due to successful practitioners;
the latter unsexed and brutalized by dissipation,
slipshod and slovenly, in crushed bonnet and dirty shawl, the gown fastened by a single hook,
their harsh and half-cracked voices full of maudlin, besotted sympathy for those about to die.
Above the murmur and tumult of that noisy assembly, the lowing and bleating of cattle as they were driven into the stalls and pens of Smithfield
fell with a strange unnatural sound upon the ear
Hush! the unceasing murmur of the mob now breaks into a loud deep roar,
a sound as if the ocean had suddenly broken through some ancient boundary, against which its ever restless billows had for ages battered;
the wide dark sea of heads is all at once in motion;
each wave seems trying to overleap the other as they are drawn onwards towards this outlet.
Every link in that great human chain is shaken, along the whole lengthened line has the motion jarred, and each in turn sees,
coiled up on the floor of the scaffold like a serpent, the hangman's rope!
The human hand that placed it there was only seen for a moment,
as it lay, white and ghastly, upon the black boards, and then again was as suddenly withdrawn, as if ashamed of the deed it had done.
The loud shout of the multitude once more subsided, or only fell upon the abstracted ear like the dreamy murmur of an ocean shell.
Then followed sounds more distinct and audible, in which ginger-beer, pies, fried fish, sandwiches, and fruit
were vended under the names of notorious murderers, highwaymen, and criminals,
famous in the annals of Newgate for the hardihood they had displayed in the hour of execution, when they terminated their career of crime at the gallows.
Threading his way among these itinerant vendors was seen the meek-faced deliverer of tracts, the man of good intentions, now bonneted,
now laughed at, the skirt of his seedy black coat torn across; yet,
though pulled right and left, or sent headlong into the crowd by the swing of some brutal and muscular arm,
Never once from that pale face passed away its benign and patient expression.
but ever the same form moved along in the fulfillment of his mission, in spite of all persecution.
Another fight followed the score which had already taken place; this time two women were the combatants.
Blinded with their long hair, they tore at each other like two furies; their bonnets and caps were trodden underfoot in the kennel,
and lay disregarded beside the body of the poor dog which, while searching for its master in the crowd,
was an hour before kicked to death by the savage and brutal mob.
Another deep roar, louder than any which had preceded it, broke from the multitude.
Then came the cry of 'Hats off!' and 'Down in front!' as at a theatre.
It was followed by the deep and solemn booming of the death-bell from the church of St. Sepulchre
the iron knell that rang upon the beating heart of the living man who was about to die;
and with blanched cheek, and sinking, we turned away from the scene.
In thus describing the saturnalia before the gallows I have been drawn on somewhat beyond the period with which I am at present dealing.
Let me retrace my steps, and speak more in detail of the treatment of the condemned in those bloodthirsty and brutally indifferent days,
and of their demeanor after sentence until the last penalty was paid.
One of the worst evils was the terrible and long-protracted uncertainty as to the result.
In the case of convicted murderers only was prompt punishment inflicted,
and with them indeed this dispatch amounted to undue precipitancy.
Forty-eight hours was the limit of time allowed to the unhappy man to make his peace, and during that time he was still kept on a bare allowance of bread and water.
But the murderers formed only a small proportion of the total number sentenced to death, and for the rest there was a long period of anxious suspense,
although in the long run mercy generally prevailed, and very few capitally convicted for crimes less than murder actually suffered.
Thus in the years between May first, eighteen twenty-seven, and thirtieth April, eighteen thirty-one,
no less than four hundred and fifty-one sentences of death for capital crimes were passed at the Old Bailey;
but of these three hundred and ninety-six were reversed by the king in council, and only fifty-two were really executed.
Already the severity of our criminal code, and the number of capital felonies upon the statute book, had brought a reaction;
and while the courts adhered to the letter of the law, appeals were constantly made to the royal prerogative of mercy.
This was more particularly the practice in London.
Judges on assize were satisfied with simply recording a sentence of death against offenders whom they did not think deserved the extreme penalty.
At the Old Bailey almost every one capitally convicted by a jury was sentenced to be hanged.
The result in the latter case was left in the first place to the king in council,
but there was a further appeal then, as now, to the king himself, or practically to the Home Secretary.
Neither in town or country were cases entirely taken on their own merits.
Convicted offenders might have good or bad luck; they might be arraigned when their particular crime was uncommon, and were then nearly certain to escape;
or theirs might be one of many, and it might be considered necessary to "make an example."
In this latter it might fairly be said that a man was put to death less for his own sins than for the crimes of others.
The absurdity of the system, its irregularity and cruelty, were fully touched upon by the inspectors of prisons in their first report.
They found at Newgate, under disgraceful conditions as already described,
seventeen capital convicts, upon all of whom the sentence of death had been passed. Eventually two only of the whole number suffered;
two others were sentenced to three months' imprisonment, and the balance to varying terms.
Nothing could be more strongly marked than the contrast between the ultimate destiny of different individuals all abiding the same awful doom:
on the one hand the gallows, on the other a short imprisonment.
The inspectors very properly desired to call attention to the inevitable tendency in this mode of dealing with "the most awful sanctions of the law,"
to make those sanctions an object of contemptuous mockery.
The consequences were plainly proved to the inspectors.
Capitally convicted prisoners did, as a matter of fact, "treat with habitual and inexpressible levity the sentence of death."
Of this I have treated at length in the last chapter.
The time thus spent varied considerably,
but it was seldom less than six weeks. It all depended upon the sovereign's disposition to do business.
Sometimes the Privy Council did not meet for months, and during all that time the convicts languished with hope
When the council had decided, the news was conveyed to Newgate by the Recorder, who made his "report," as it was called.
The time of the arrival of this report was generally known at Newgate,
and its contents were anxiously awaited by both convicts in the press-yard and their friends collected in a crowd outside the gates.
Sometimes the report was delayed.
On one occasion, Mr. Wakefield tells us, the Recorder, who had attended the council at Windsor, did not deliver the report till the following day.
The prisoners and their friends, therefore, were kept in a state of the most violent suspense for many hours,
during which they counted the moments -- the prisoners in their cells as usual, and their friends in the street in front of Newgate, where they passed the night.
I have heard the protracted agony of both classes described by those who witnessed it in terms so strong, that I am unwilling to repeat them.
The crowd of men and women who passed the night in front of Newgate, began, as soon as the hour was passed when they had expected the report,
to utter imprecations against the Recorder, the Secretary of State, the Council, and the King;
they never ceased cursing until the passion of anger so excited was exchanged for joy in some and grief in others.
I myself heard more than one of those whose lives were spared by that decision of the council,
afterwards express a wish to murder the Recorder for having kept them so long in suspense.
The Recorder's report generally reached Newgate late at night.
Its receipt was immediately followed by the promulgation of its contents to the persons most closely concerned,
which was done with a sort of ceremony intended to be impressive.
The whole of the convicts were assembled together in one ward, and made to kneel down.
To them entered the chaplain or ordinary of Newgate in full canonicals,
who in solemn tones communicated to each in turn the fate in store for him.
The form of imparting the intelligence was generally the same.
So-and-so, I am sorry to tell you that it is all against you; or,
A. B., your case has been taken into consideration by the king in council, and His Majesty has been mercifully pleased to spare your life.
The fatal news was not always received in the same way.
The men who were doomed often fell down in convulsions upon the floor.
Sometimes any who had had a narrow escape fainted, but the bulk of those respited looked on with unfeeling indifference.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section twelve: Executions, part two.
It is satisfactory to be able to record that some consideration was shown the capital convict actually awaiting execution.
Even so severe a critic as Mr. Wakefield states that "a stranger to the scene
would be astonished to observe the peculiar tenderness, I was going to add respect,
which persons under sentence of death obtain from all the officers of the prison.
Before sentence a prisoner has only to observe the regulations of the jail in order to remain neglected and unnoticed.
Once ordered to the cells, friends of all classes suddenly rise up; his fellow-prisoners, the turnkeys, the chaplain,
the keepers, and the sheriffs all seem interested in his fate, and he can make no reasonable request that is not at once granted by whomsoever he may address.
This rule has some, but very few, exceptions; such as where a hardened offender behaves with great levity and brutality, as if he cared nought for his life,
and thought every one anxious to promote his death.
Mr. Wakefield goes on to remark that persons convicted of forgery "excited an extraordinary degree of interest in all who approached them."
This was noticeable with Fauntleroy, who, on account of his birth and antecedents, was allowed to occupy a turnkey's room,
and kept altogether separate from the other prisoners until the day of his death.
It cannot be denied, however, that the ordinary's treatment was somewhat unfeeling, and in proof thereof
I will quote an extract from the reverend gentleman's own journal.
He seems to have improved the occasion when preaching the condemned sermon before Fauntleroy, by pointing a moral from that unhappy man's own case.
For this the chaplain was a few days later summoned before the jail committee of aldermen,
and informed that the public would not in future be admitted to hear the condemned sermon. "I was also informed," writes Mr. Cotton,
that this resolution was in consequence of their (the aldermen's) disapproving of the last discourse delivered by me,
previous to the execution of Henry Fauntleroy for uttering a forged security
in which it was said I had enlarged upon the heinous nature of his crime, and warned the public to avoid such conduct.
I was informed that this unnecessarily harassed his feelings, and that the object of such sermons was solely to console the prisoner,
and that from the time of his conviction nothing but what is consolatory should be addressed to a criminal.
One of the aldermen, moreover, informed me that the whole court of aldermen were unanimous in their opinion on this subject.
As to the exclusion of strangers on these occasions,
the experience I have had convinces me that one, and perhaps the only, good of an execution, i. e. the solemn admonition to the public,
Probably the reader will side with the aldermen against the ordinary.
This episode throws some doubt upon the tenderness and proper feeling exhibited by the chaplain towards the most deserving members of his criminal flock;
and the idea will be strengthened by the following account of the Sunday service in the prison chapel on the occasion when the condemned sermon was preached.
The extract is from Mr. E. Gibbon Wakefield's brochure, the date eighteen twenty-eight, just three years after Fauntleroy's death.
Strangers were now excluded, but the sheriffs attended in state, wearing their gold chains,
while behind their pew stood a couple of tall footmen in state liveries.
The sheriffs were in one gallery;
in the other opposite were the convicts capitally convicted who had been respited.
Down below between the galleries was the mass of the prison population;
the schoolmaster and the juvenile prisoners being seated round the communion-table, opposite the pulpit.
In the center of the chapel was the condemned pew, a large dock-like erection painted black.
Those who sat in it were visible to the whole congregation, and still more to the ordinary,
whose desk and pulpit were just in front of the condemned pew, and within a couple of yards of it.
The occupants of this terrible black pew were the last always to enter the chapel.
Upon the occasion which I am describing they were four in number; and here I will continue the narrative in Mr. Wakefield's own words:
First is a youth of eighteen, condemned for stealing in a dwelling-house goods valued above five pounds.
His features have no felonious cast;
he steps boldly with head upright, looks to the women's gallery, and smiles. His intention is to pass for a brave fellow,
but the attempt fails; he trembles, his knees knock together, and his head droops as he enters the condemned pew.
The next convict is clearly and unmistakably a villain.
He is a hardened offender, previously cast for life, reprieved, transported to Australia, and since returned without pardon.
For this offense the punishment is death.
He has, however, doubly earned his sentence, and is actually condemned for burglary committed since his arrival in England.
His look at the sheriffs and the ordinary is full of scorn and defiance.
The third convict is a sheep-stealer, a poor ignorant fellow in whose crime are mitigating circumstances,
but who is left to die on the supposition that this is not his first conviction, and still more because a good many sheep have of late been stolen by other people.
He is quite content to die;
indeed the chaplain and others have brought him firmly to believe that his situation is enviable, and that the gates of heaven are open to receive him.
The last of the four is said to have been a clergyman of the Church of England, condemned for forgery, "a miserable old man in a tattered suit of black.
Already he is half dead.
Great efforts have been made to save his life.
Friends, even utter strangers, have interceded for him, and to the last he has buoyed himself up by hope of reprieve.
Now his doom is sealed irrevocably, and he has given himself up to despair.
He staggers towards the pew, reels into it, stumbles forward, flings himself on the ground, and, by a curious twist of the spine,
buries his head under his body.
The sheriffs shudder, their inquisitive friends crane forward, the keeper frowns on the excited congregation,
the lately smirking footmen close their eyes and forget their liveries, the ordinary clasps his hands, the turnkeys cry 'Hush!'
and the old clerk lifts up his cracked voice, saying, 'Let us sing to the praise and glory of God.'
The morning hymn is sung first, as if to remind the condemned that next morning at eight a.m. they are to die.
The service proceeds. At last the burial service is reached.
The youth alone is able to read, but from long want of practice he is at a loss to find the place in his prayer-book.
The ordinary observes him, looks to the sheriffs, and says aloud, 'The service for the dead!'
The youth's hands tremble as they hold the book upside down.
The burglar is heard to mutter an angry oath.
The sheep-stealer smiles, and, extending his arms upwards, looks with a glad expression to the roof of the chapel.
The forger has never moved.
All have sung 'the Lamentation of a Sinner,' and have seemed to pray 'especially for those now awaiting the awful execution of the law.'
We come to the sermon.
The ordinary of Newgate is an orthodox, unaffected, Church of England divine,
who preaches plain, homely discourses, as fit as any religious discourse can be fit for the irritated audience.
The sermon of this day, whether eloquent or plain, useful or useless, must produce a striking effect at the moment of its delivery.
The text, without another word, is enough to raise the wildest passions of the audience
For a while the preacher addresses himself to the congregation at large, who listen attentively
except the clergyman and the burglar, the former of whom is still rolled up at the bottom of the condemned pew,
while the eyes of the latter are wandering round the chapel, and one of them is occasionally winked impudently at some acquaintance amongst the prisoners for trial.
At length the ordinary pauses, and then, in a deep tone, which, though hardly above a whisper, is audible to all, says,
'Now for you, my poor fellow mortals, who are about to suffer the last penalty of the law.'
But why should I repeat the whole?
It is enough to say that in the same solemn tone he talks about the minutest of crimes, punishments, bonds, shame,
ignominy, sorrow, sufferings, wretchedness, pangs,
childless parents, widows and helpless orphans, broken and contrite hearts, and death tomorrow morning for the benefit of society.
The dying men are dreadfully agitated.
The young stealer in a dwelling-house no longer has the least pretense to bravery. He grasps the back of the pew,
his legs give way, he utters a faint groan, and sinks on the floor.
Why does no one stir to help him? Where would be the use? The hardened burglar moves not, nor does he speak;
but his face is of an ashy paleness; and if you look carefully you may see the blood trickling from his lip,
which he has bitten unconsciously, or from rage, or to rouse his fainting courage.
The poor sheep-stealer is in a frenzy.
He throws his hands far from him, and shouts aloud, 'Mercy, good Lord! mercy is all I ask. The Lord in His mercy come!
There! there! I see the Lamb of God! Oh! how happy! Oh! this is happy!
Meanwhile the clergyman, still bent into the form of a sleeping dog,
struggles violently; his feet, legs, hands, and arms, even the muscles of his back,
move with a quick, jerking motion, not naturally, but, as it were, like the affected parts of a galvanized corpse.
Suddenly he utters a short sharp scream, and all is still.
The silence is short. As the ordinary proceeds 'to conclude,'
the women set up a yell, which is mixed with a rustling noise, occasioned by the removal of those whose hysterics have ended in fainting.
The sheriffs cover their faces, and one of their inquisitive friends blows his nose with his glove.
The keeper tries to appear unmoved, but his eye wanders anxiously over the combustible assembly.
The children round the communion-table stare and gape with childish wonder.
The two masses of prisoners for trial undulate and slightly murmur,
while the capital convicts who were lately in that black pew appear faint with emotion.
This exhibition lasts for some minutes, and then the congregation disperses,
the condemned returning to the cells: the forger carried by turnkeys; the youth sobbing aloud convulsively, as a passionate child;
the burglar muttering curses and savage expressions of defiance; whilst the poor sheep-stealer shakes hands with the turnkeys,
whistles merrily, and points upwards with madness in his look.
Mr. Wakefield winds up his graphic but somewhat sensational account by describing another religious service, which may appropriately be inserted here.
He says, "On the day of execution there is no service in the chapel of Newgate.
On the following day the capital convicts, whose companions have been hanged, are required to return thanks for their narrow escape.
The firmest disbeliever in religion, if he had not lately been irritated by taking part in such a scene as the condemned service in Newgate,
could hardly witness this ceremony without being affected. The men, who were so lately snatched from the jaws of death,
kneel, whilst the rest of the congregation sit, and the ordinary, in a tone of peculiar solemnity, says,
Almighty God, Father of all mercies, we thine unworthy servants do give thee most humble and hearty thanks
for all thy goodness and loving-kindness to us, and to all men;
particularly to those who desire now to offer up their praises and thanksgivings for thy late mercies vouchsafed unto them.
Could any one, knowing the late situation of the kneeling men, looking as they do at the empty pew,
occupied when they saw it last, but a few hours ago, by their comrades who are now dead;
could any one, not disgusted with the religious ceremonials of Newgate, witness this scene without emotion?
But what are the feelings of those who take part in it?
I have been present at the scene not less than twenty times, and have invariably observed
that many of the kneeling men or boys laughed while they knelt, pinched each other, and, when they could do so without fear of being seen by any officer of the prison,
winked at other prisoners in derision of what was taking place; and I have frequently heard men and lads who had been of the kneeling party
boast to their companions after the service that they had wiped their eyes during the thanksgiving, to make the ordinary believe they had been crying.
Although this misapplication of religious services still went on,
the outside public continued to be excluded from the Newgate chapel on the day the condemned sermon was preached.
This very proper rule was, however, set aside on the Sunday preceding Courvoisier's execution.
So many applications for admission were made to the sheriffs,
that they reluctantly agreed to open the gallery which had formerly been occupied by strangers on these occasions.
Cards were issued, and to such an extent, that although the service was not to commence till half-past ten, by nine a.m.
all the avenues to the prison gates were blocked by ticket-holders.
In spite of the throng, owing to the excellent arrangements made by the sheriffs,
no inconvenience was suffered by the congregation, among whom were Lord Adolphus Fitz Clarence, Lord Coventry,
Lord Paget, Lord Bruce, several members of the House of Commons, and a few ladies.
Contemporary accounts give a minute description of the demeanor of the convict upon this solemn occasion.
He sat on a bench before the pulpit, -- the hideous condemned pew had been swept away, -- and never once raised his eyes during the service.
In fact his looks denoted extreme sorrow and contrition,
and he seemed to suffer great inward agitation when the ordinary particularly alluded to the crime for the perpetration of which he stood condemned.
Mr. Carver, the ordinary, appears to have addressed himself directly to Courvoisier,
and to have dwelt with more emphasis than good taste upon the nature of the crime, and the necessity for repentance.
But the chaplain admitted that the solitude of the convict's cell
was more appropriate for serious reflection and profitable ministration than this exciting occasion before a large and public assembly.
So far as I can find, Courvoisier was the last condemned criminal who was thus exhibited to a crowd of morbidly curious spectators.
The atrocity of the murder no doubt attracted extraordinary attention to it.
The crowd outside Newgate on the day of execution has already been described; but there was also a select gathering of distinguished visitors within the jail.
First came the sheriffs, the under-sheriffs, and several aldermen and city officials, then Lord Powerscourt and several other peers of the realm.
Mr. Charles Kean the tragedian was also present,
drawn to this terrible exhibition by the example of his father, the more celebrated Edmund Kean, who had witnessed the execution of Thistlewood
with a view, as he himself said, "to his professional studies."
But there is little doubt that as executions became more rare they made more impression on the public mind.
Already a strong dislike to the reckless and almost indiscriminate application of the extreme penalty was apparent in all classes,
and the mitigation of the criminal code, for which Romilly had so strenuously labored, was daily more and more of an accomplished fact.
capital punishment was abolished for forgery, except in cases of forging or altering wills or powers of attorney to transfer stock.
Nevertheless, after that date no person whatever was executed for this offense.
In the same year capital punishment was further restricted, and ceased to be the legal sentence for coining,
sheep or horse stealing, and stealing in a dwelling-house.
House-breaking, as distinguished from burglary, was similarly exempted in the following year;
next, the offenses of returning from transportation, stealing post-office letters, and sacrilege were no longer punishable with death.
In eighteen thirty-seven Lord John Russell's acts swept away a number of capital offenses, including cutting and maiming, rick-burning,
Within a couple of years the number of persons sentenced to death in England had fallen from four hundred and thirty-eight in eighteen thirty-seven
to fifty-six in eighteen thirty-nine.
Gradually the application of capital punishment became more and more restricted, and was soon the penalty for murder alone.
While in London, for instance, in eighteen twenty-nine, twenty-four persons had been executed for crimes other than murder,
from eighteen thirty-two to eighteen forty-four not a single person had been executed in the metropolis except for this the gravest crime.
In eighteen thirty-seven the death penalty was practically limited to murder or attempts to murder,
and in eighteen forty-one this was accepted as the almost universally established rule.
Seven other crimes, however, were still capital by law, and so continued till the passing of the Criminal Consolidation Acts of eighteen sixty-one.
With the amelioration of the criminal code, other cruel concomitants of execution also disappeared.
In eighteen thirty-two the dissection of bodies cut down from the gallows, which had been decreed centuries previously, was abolished;
the most recent enactment in force was the ninth George the fourth cap. thirty-one, which directed the dissection of all bodies of executed murderers,
the idea being to intensify the dread of capital punishment. That such dread was not universal or deep-seated may be gathered from the fact
that authentic cases were known previous to the first cited act of criminals selling their own bodies to surgeons for dissection.
This dissection was carried out for Newgate prisoners in Surgeons' Hall, adjoining Newgate,
the site of the present Sessions House of the Old Bailey, and the operation was witnessed by students and a number of curious spectators.
Lord Ferrers' body was brought to Surgeons' Hall after execution in his own carriage and six;
after the post mortem had been carried out, the corpse was exposed to view in a first-floor room.
Pennant speaks of Surgeons' Hall as a handsome building, ornamented with Ionic pilasters, and with a double flight of steps to the first floor.
Beneath is a door for the admission of the bodies of murderers and other felons. There were other public dissecting rooms for criminals.
One was attached to Hicks' Hall, the Clerkenwell Sessions House, built out of monies provided by Sir Baptist Hicks, a wealthy alderman of the reign of James the first
Persons were still living in eighteen fifty-five who had witnessed dissections at Hicks' Hall, and
whom the horrid scene, with the additional effect of some noted criminals hanging on the walls, drove out again sick and faint,
as we have heard some relate, and with pale and terrified features, to get a breath of air.
The dissection of executed criminals was abolished soon after the discovery of the crime of burking,
with the idea that ignominy would no longer attach to an operation which ceased to be compulsory for the most degraded beings;
and that executors or persons having lawful possession of the bodies
of people who had died friendless, would voluntarily surrender them for the advancement of medical science.
Another brutal practice had nearly disappeared about the time of the abolition of dissection. This was the public exhibition of the body,
as was done in the case of Mrs. Phipoe, the murderess, who was executed in front of Newgate in seventeen ninety-eight,
and her body publicly exhibited in a place built for the purpose in the Old Bailey.
About this time I find that the bodies of two murderers, Clench and Mackay,
were publicly exposed in a stable in Little Bridge Street, near Apothecaries' Hall,
Surgeons' Hall being let to the lieutenancy of the county for the accommodation of the militia.
In eighteen eleven Williams, who murdered the Marrs in Ratcliffe Highway, having committed suicide in jail to escape hanging,
it was determined that a public exhibition should be made of the body through the neighborhood which had been the scene of the monster's crimes.
A long procession was formed, headed by constables, who cleared the way with their staves.
Then came the newly-formed horse patrol, with drawn cutlasses,
parish officers, peace officers, the high constable of the county of Middlesex on horseback, and then the body of Williams,
extended at full length on an inclined platform
erected on the cart, about four feet high at the head, and gradually sloping towards the horse, giving a full view of the body,
which was dressed in blue trousers and a blue-and-white striped waistcoat, but without a coat, as when found in the cell.
On the left side of the head the fatal mall,
and on the right the ripping chisel, with which the murders had been committed, were exposed to view.
The countenance of Williams was ghastly in the extreme, and the whole had an appearance too horrible for description.
The procession traversed Ratcliffe twice, halting for a quarter of an hour in front of the victims' dwelling,
and was accompanied throughout by "an immense concourse of persons, eager to get a sight of the murderer's remains.
All the shops in the neighborhood were shut, and the windows and tops of the houses were crowded with spectators.
Hanging in chains upon the gibbet which had served for the execution,
or on another specially erected on some commanding spot, had fallen into disuse by eighteen thirty-two.
But there was an attempt to revive it at that date, when the act for dispensing with the dissection of criminals was passed.
A clause was inserted to the effect that
the bodies of all prisoners convicted of murder should either be hung in chains, or buried under the gallows on which they had been executed,
according to the discretion of the court before whom the prisoners might be tried.
The revival of this barbarous practice caused much indignation in certain quarters,
but it was actually tried in two provincial towns, Leicester and Durham.
At the first-named the exhibition nearly created a tumult, and the body was taken down and buried,
but not before the greatest scandal had been caused by the unseemly proceedings of the crowd that flocked to see the sight. A sort of fair was held,
gaming-tables were set up, cards were played under the gibbet, to the disturbance of the public peace and the annoyance of all decent people.
At Jarrow Stake, where the Durham murderer's body was exposed, there were similar scenes, mingled with compassion for the culprit's family,
and a subscription was set on foot for them then and there at the foot of the gibbet.
Later on, after dark, some friends of the deceased stole the body and buried it in the sand, and this was the end of hanging in chains.
After this a law was passed which prescribed that the bodies of all executed murderers should be buried within the walls of the jail.
Although these objectionable practices had disappeared,
there were still many shocking incidents at executions, owing to the bungling and unskilful way in which the operation was performed.
The rope still broke sometimes, although it was not often that the horrid scene seen at Jersey at the beginning of the century was repeated.
There the hangman added his weight to that of the suspended culprit,
and having first pulled him sideways, then got upon his shoulders, so that the rope broke.
To the great surprise of all who witnessed this dreadful scene,
the poor criminal rose straight upon his feet, with the hangman on his shoulders, and immediately loosened the rope with his fingers.
After this the sheriffs sent for another rope, but the spectators interfered, and the man was carried back to jail.
The whole case was referred to the king, and the poor wretch, whose crime had been a military one, was eventually pardoned.
A somewhat similar event happened at Chester not long afterwards; the ropes by which two offenders were turned off broke a few inches from their necks.
They were taken back to jail, and were again brought out in the afternoon, by which time fresh and stronger ropes had been procured,
and the sentence was properly and completely carried out.
Other cases might be quoted,
especially that of William Snow, alias Sketch, who slipped from the gallows at Exeter and fell to the ground.
He soon rose to his feet, and hearing the sorrowful exclamations of the populace, coolly said,
Good people, do not be hurried; I am not, I can wait.
Similar cases were not wanting as regards the executions before Newgate. Others were not less horrible, although there was no failure of apparatus.
Sometimes the condemned man made a hard fight for life.
When Charles White was executed in eighteen twenty-three for arson, he arranged a handkerchief
in such a way that the executioner found a difficulty in pinioning his hands.
White managed to keep his wrists asunder, and continued to struggle with the officials for some time. Eventually he was pinioned with a cord in the usual manner.
On the scaffold he made a violent attempt to loosen his bonds, and succeeded in getting his hands free.
Then with a strong effort he pushed off the white cap, and tried to liberate his neck from the halter, which by this time had been adjusted.
The hangman summoned assistance, and with help tied the cap over White's face with a handkerchief.
The miserable wretch during the whole of this time was struggling with the most determined violence, to the great horror of the spectators.
and having got from the falling drop to the firm part of the platform, he nearly succeeded in tearing the handkerchief from his eyes.
However, the ceremony went forward, and when the signal was given the drop sank.
The wretched man did not fall with it, but jumped on to the platform, and seizing the rope with his hands, tried to avoid strangulation.
the convict was half on the platform, half hanging, and the convulsions of his body were appalling.
The crowd vociferously yelled their disapproval, and at length
the executioner forced the struggling criminal from the platform, so that the rope sustained his whole weight.
His face was visible to the whole crowd, and was fearful to behold.
Even now his sufferings were not at an end,
and his death was not compassed until the executioner terminated his sufferings by hanging on to his legs.
When Luigi Buranelli was executed in eighteen fifty-five,
through the improper adjustment of the rope his sufferings were prolonged for five minutes;
his chest heaved, and it was evident that his struggle was a fearful one.
A worse case still was that of William Bousfield, who, when awaiting execution for murder, about the same date,
had attempted to throw himself upon the fire in his condemned cell.
He was in consequence so weak when brought out for execution, that he had to be carried by four men,
two supporting his body and two his legs.
His wretched, abject condition, seated in a chair under the drop, was such as almost to unnerve the executioner Calcraft,
who bad been further upset by a letter threatening to shoot him when he appeared to perform his task.
Calcraft, the moment he had adjusted the cap and rope, ran down the steps, drew the bolt, and disappeared.
For a second or two the body hung motionless, then, with a strength that astonished the attendant officials,
Bousfield slowly drew himself up, and rested with his feet on the right side of the drop.
One of the turnkeys rushed forward and pushed him off.
Again the wretched creature succeeded in obtaining foothold, but this time on the left side of the drop.
Calcraft was forced to return, and he once more pushed Bousfield off,
who for the fourth time regained his foothold. Again he was repelled,
this time Calcraft adding his weight to the body, and the strangulation was completed.
It was stated in evidence before the Commission on Capital Punishment in eighteen sixty-four,
that Calcraft's method of hanging was very rough, much the same as if he had been hanging a dog.
There has never been much science in the system of carrying out the extreme penalty in this country; the "finisher of the law"
has come more by chance than fitness or special education to exercise his loathsome office.
Calcraft, of whom mention has just been made, was by trade a lady's shoemaker,
and before he took to hanging he was employed as a watchman at Reid's brewery in Liquorpond Street.
He was at first engaged as assistant to the executioner Tom Cheshire, but in due course rose to be chief.
He was always known as a mild-mannered man of simple tastes, much given to angling in the New River, and a devoted rabbit fancier.
He was well known in the neighborhood where he resided, and the street gamins cried "Jack Ketch" as he went along the street.
While Calcraft was in office other aspirants to fame appeared in the field.
who had been a convicted prisoner at York, but who consented to act as hangman when Calcraft was engaged, and no other functionary could be obtained.
It was not always easy to hire a hangman.
There is still extant a curious petition presented to the Treasury by Ralph Griffith, Esq., high sheriff of Flintshire,
which sets forth that the petitioner had been at great expense by sending clerks and agents to Liverpool and Shrewsbury to hire an executioner.
The man to be hanged belonged to Wales, and no Welshman would do the job.
Traveling expenses of these agents cost fifteen pounds, and another ten pounds were spent in the hire of a Shropshire man,
who deserted, and was pursued, but without success.
Another man was hired, himself a convict, whose fees for self and wife were twelve guineas.
Then came the cost of the gallows,
four pounds, twelve shillings; and finally the funeral, cart, coffin, and other petty expenses, amounting to seven pounds ten
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section thirteen: Newgate notorieties, part one.
In chapter two of the present volume I brought down the record of crime to the second decade of the present century.
I propose now to continue the subject, and to devote a couple of chapters to criminal occurrences of a more recent date,
only premising that as accounts become more voluminous I shall be compelled to deal with fewer cases,
taking in preference those which are typical and invested with peculiar interest. It is somewhat remarkable that a marked change soon comes over the Calendar.
Certain crimes, those against the person especially, diminished gradually. They became less easy or remunerative.
Police protection was better and more effective;
the streets of London were well lighted, the suburbs were more populous and regularly patrolled.
People, too, were getting into the habit of carrying but little cash about them, and no valuables but their watches or personal jewelery.
Street robberies offered fewer inducements to depredators, and evil-doers were compelled to adopt other methods of preying upon their fellows.
This led to a rapid and marked increase in all kinds of fraud;
and prominent in the criminal annals of Newgate in these later years will be found numerous remarkable instances of this class of offense --
forgeries committed systematically, and for long periods, as in the case of Fauntleroy,
to cover enormous defalcations; the fabrication of deeds, wills, and false securities
for the purpose of misappropriating funds or feloniously obtaining cash;
thefts of bullion, bank-notes, specie, and gold-dust, planned with consummate ingenuity,
eluding the keenest vigilance, and carried out with reckless daring;
jewel-boxes cleverly stolen under the very noses of owners or care-takers.
the extraordinary extension of all commercial operations led to many entirely novel and often gigantic financial frauds.
The credulity of investors, the unscrupulous dishonesty of bankers,
the slackness of supervision over wholly irresponsible agents, produced many terrible monetary catastrophes,
and lodged men like Cole, Robson, and Redpath in Newgate.
While the varying conditions of social life thus brought about many changes in the character of offenses against property,
those against the person became more and more limited to the most heinous, or those which menaced or destroyed life.
There was no increase in murder or manslaughter; the number of such crimes remained pretty constant proportionately to population.
Nor did the methods by which they were perpetrated greatly vary from those in times past.
The causes also continued much the same. Passion, revenge, cupidity, sudden ebullitions of homicidal rage,
the cold-blooded, calculating atrocity born of self-interest, were still the irresistible incentives to kill.
The brutal ferocity of the wild beast once aroused, the same means, the same weapons were employed to do the dreadful deed,
the same and happily often futile precautions taken to conceal the crime.
Pegsworth, and Greenacre, and Daniel Good merely reproduced types that had gone before, and that have since reappeared.
Esther Hibner was as inhuman in her ill-usage of the parish apprentice she killed as Martha Brownrigg had been.
Thurtell and Hunt followed in the footsteps of Billings, Wood, and Catherine Hayes.
Courvoisier might have lived a century earlier.
Hocker was found upon the scene of his crime, irresistibly attracted thither, as was Theodore Gardelle.
Now and again there seemed to be a recurrence of a murder epidemic,
as there had been before; as in the year eighteen forty-nine, a year memorable for the Rush murders at Norwich,
the Gleeson Wilson murder at Liverpool, that of the Mannings in London, and of many more.
Men like Mobbs, the miscreant known as "General Haynau" on account of his blood-thirstiness, still murdered their wives;
or like Cannon the chimney-sweeper, who savagely killed the policeman.
A not altogether new crime, however, akin to murder,
although happily never passing beyond dastardly attempts, cropped up in these times, and was often frequently repeated within a short interval.
The present Queen very soon after her accession
became the victim of the most cowardly and unmanly outrages, and the attempted murder of the sovereign by Oxford in eighteen forty
was followed in the very next year by those of Francis and of Bean in two consecutive months,
while in eighteen fifty Her Majesty was the victim of another outrage at the hands of one Pate.
These crimes had their origin too often in the disordered brains of lunatics at large, like Captain Goode.
Their perpetrators were charged with high treason, but met with merciful clemency as irresponsible beings.
But at various dates treason more distinct and tangible came to the front: attempts to levy war against the State.
The well-known Cato Street conspiracy,
which grew out of disturbed social conditions after the last French war, amidst general distress,
and when the people were beginning to agitate for a larger share of political power, was among the earliest, and to some extent the most desperate, of these.
Its ringleaders, Thistlewood and the rest, were after capture honored by committal as State prisoners to the Tower,
but they came one and all to Newgate for trial at the Old Bailey, and remained there after conviction till they were hanged.
Later on, the Chartists agitated persistently for the concession embraced in the so-called People's Charter, many of which
are by this time actually, and by more legitimate efforts, engrafted upon our Constitution.
But the Chartists sought their ends by riot and rebellion, and gained only imprisonment for their pains.
Some five hundred in all were arrested, but as only three of these were lodged in Newgate, I shall not recur to them in my narrative.
The Cato Street conspiracy would have been simply ridiculous but for the recklessness of the desperadoes who planned it.
That some thirty or more needy men should hope to revolutionize England is a sufficient proof of the absurdity of their attempt.
But they proceeded in all seriousness, and would have shrunk from no outrage or atrocity in furtherance of their foolhardy enterprise.
The massacre of the whole of the Cabinet Ministers at one stroke was to be followed by an attack
upon "the old man and the old woman," as they styled the Mansion House and the Bank of England.
At the former the "Provisional Government" was to be established,
which under Thistlewood as dictator was to rule the nation, by first handing over its capital to fire and pillage.
This Thistlewood had seen many vicissitudes throughout his strange, adventurous career. The son of a respectable Lincolnshire farmer,
he became a militia officer, and married a woman with ten thousand pounds, in which, however, she had only a life interest.
She died early, and Thistlewood, left to his own resources,
followed the profession of arms, first in the British service, and then in that of the French revolutionary Government.
It was during this period that he was said to have imbibed his revolutionary ideas.
he found himself rich in a small landed property, which he presently sold to a man who became bankrupt before he had paid over the purchase money.
After this he tried farming, but failed.
He married again and came to London, where he soon became notorious as a reckless gambler and a politician holding the most extreme views.
In this way he formed the acquaintance of Watson and others, with whom he was arraigned for treasonable practices, and imprisoned.
On his release he sent a challenge to Lord Sidmouth, the Home Secretary, and was again arrested and imprisoned.
On his second release, goaded by his fancied wrongs, he began to plot a dark and dreadful revenge,
and thus the conspiracy in which he was the prime mover took shape, and came to a head.
The Government obtained early and full information of the nefarious scheme.
One of the conspirators, by name Edwards,
made a voluntary confession to Sir Herbert Taylor one morning at Windsor; after which Thistlewood and his accomplices were closely watched,
and measures taken to arrest them when their plans were so far developed that no doubt could remain as to their guilt.
The day appointed for the murder and rising actually arrived before the authorities interfered.
It was the day on which Lord Harrowby was to entertain his colleagues at dinner in Grosvenor Square.
The occasion was considered excellent by the conspirators for disposal of the whole Cabinet at one blow,
and it was arranged that one of their number should knock at Lord Harrowby's door on the pretense of leaving a parcel,
and that when it was opened the whole band should rush in.
While a few secured the servants, the rest were to fall upon Lord Harrowby and his guests.
Hand-grenades were to be thrown into the dining-room, and during the noise and confusion the assassination of the ministers was to be completed,
the heads of Lord Castlereagh and Lord Sidmouth being carried away in a bag.
Lord Harrowby's dinner-party was postponed, but the conspirators knew nothing of it,
and those who watched his house were further encouraged in their mistake by the arrival of many carriages,
bound, as it happened, to the Archbishop of York's.
Meanwhile the main body remained at their headquarters, a ruined stable in Cato Street,
Edgeware Road, completing their dispositions for assuming supreme power after the blow had been struck.
Here they were surprised by the police, headed by a magistrate, and supported by a strong detachment of Her Majesty's Guards.
The police were the first to arrive on the spot, the Guards having entered the street at the wrong end.
The conspirators were in a loft, approached by a ladder and a trap-door, access through which could only be obtained one by one.
The first constable who entered Thistlewood ran through the body with a sword, but others quickly followed,
the lights were extinguished, and a desperate conflict ensued.
The Guards, headed by Lord Adolphus Fitz Clarence, now reinforced the police, and the conspirators gave way.
Nine of the latter were captured, with all the war material, cutlasses, pistols, hand-grenades, and ammunition.
Thistlewood and fourteen more succeeded for the moment in making their escape, but most of them were subsequently taken.
Thistlewood was discovered next morning in a mean house in White Street, Moorfields.
He was in bed with his breeches on (in the pockets of which were found a number of cartridges), the black belt he had worn at Cato Street,
The trial of the conspirators came on some six weeks later, at the Old Bailey.
Thistlewood made a long and rambling defense, the chief features of which were abuse of Lord Sidmouth, and the vilification of the informer Edwards.
Several of the other prisoners took the same line as regards Edwards,
and there seems to have been good reason for supposing that he was a greater villain than any of those arraigned.
He had been in a state of abject misery, and when he first joined "the reformers," as the Cato Street conspirators called themselves,
he had neither a bed to lie upon nor a coat to his back.
His sudden access to means unlimited was no doubt due to the profitable role he soon adopted of Government informer and spy,
and it is pretty certain that for some time he served both sides;
on the one inveigling silly enthusiasts to join in the plot, and denouncing them on the other.
The employment of Edwards, and the manner in which the conspirators were allowed to commit themselves further and further before the law was set in motion against them,
were not altogether creditable to the Government.
It was asserted, not without foundation, at these trials, that Edwards repeatedly incited the associates he was betraying
to commit outrage, to set fire to houses, throw hand-grenades into the carriages of ministers;
that he was, to use Thistlewood's words, "a contriver, instigator, and entrapper."
The Government were probably not proud of their agent, for Edwards, after the conviction had been assured, went abroad to enjoy, it was said,
an ample pension, so long as he did not return to England.
Five of the conspirators, Thistlewood, Ings, Brunt, Davidson, and Tidd, were sentenced to death,
and suffered in the usual way in front of Newgate, with the additional penalty of decapitation, as traitors, after they had been hanged.
A crowd as great as any known collected in the Old Bailey to see the ceremony, about which there were some peculiar features worth recording.
The reckless demeanor of all the convicts except Davidson was most marked. Thistlewood and Ings sucked oranges on the scaffold;
they with Brunt and Tidd scorned the ordinary's ministrations,
but Ings said he hoped God would be more merciful to him than men had been.
Ings was especially defiant. He sought to cheer Davidson, who seemed affected, crying out,
Come, old cock-of-wax, it will soon be over.
As the executioner fastened the noose, he nodded to a friend he saw in the crowd;
and catching sight of the coffins ranged around the gallows, he smiled at the show with contemptuous indifference.
He roared out snatches of a song about Death or Liberty, and just before he was turned off,
yelled out three cheers to the populace whom he faced.
He told the executioner to "do it tidy," to pull it tight, and was in a state of hysterical exaltation up to the very last.
Davidson, who was the only one who seemed to realize his awful situation, listened patiently and with thankfulness to the chaplain,
and died in a manner strongly contrasting with that of his fellows.
After the five bodies had hung for half-an-hour, a man in a mask came forward to complete the sentence.
Contemporary reports state that from the skillful manner in which he performed the decapitation,
he was generally supposed to be a surgeon.
Be this as it may, the weapon used was only an ordinary axe, which rather indicates that force, not skill, was employed.
This axe is still in existence, and is preserved at Newgate with various other unpleasant curiosities,
but is only an ordinary commonplace tool.
These were the last executions for high treason, but not the last prisoners by many who passed through Newgate charged with sedition.
Attacks upon the sovereign, as I have said, became more common after the accession of the young Queen Victoria in eighteen thirty-eight.
It was a form of high treason not unknown in earlier reigns. In seventeen eighty-six a mad woman, Margaret Nicholson,
tried to stab George the third as he was alighting from his carriage at the gate of St. James's Palace.
She was seized before she could do any mischief,
and eventually lodged in Bethlehem Hospital, where she died after forty years' detention, at the advanced age of one hundred.
Again, a soldier, by name Hatfield, who had been wounded in the head, and discharged from the army for unsoundness of mind,
fired a pistol at George the third from the pit of Drury Lane theatre in eighteen hundred.
William the fourth was also the victim of a murderous outrage on Ascot race-course in eighteen thirty-two,
when John Collins, "a person in the garb of a sailor, of wretched appearance, and having a wooden leg,"
threw a stone at the king, which hit him on the forehead, but did no serious injury.
Collins, when charged, pleaded that he had lost his leg in action, that he had petitioned without success for a pension,
and that, as he was starving, he had resolved on this desperate deed,
feeling, as he said, that he might as well be shot or hanged as remain in such a state.
He was eventually sentenced to death, but the plea of lunacy was allowed, and he was confined for life.
None of the foregoing attempts were, however, so dastardly or determined as that made by Oxford upon our present gracious Queen
two years after she ascended the throne.
The cowardly crime was probably encouraged by the fearless and confiding manner in which the Queen,
secure as it seemed in the affections of her loyal people, freely appeared in public.
Oxford, who was only nineteen at the time his offense was committed, had been born at Birmingham,
but he came as a lad to London, and took service as a pot-boy to a publican.
From this he was promoted to barman, and as such had charge of the business in various public-houses.
He left his last situation in April eighteen forty, and established himself in lodgings in Lambeth,
after which he devoted himself to pistol practice in shooting-galleries, sometimes in Leicester Square,
sometimes in the Strand, or the West End.
His acquaintances often asked his object in this, but he kept his own counsel till the tenth June.
On that day Oxford was on the watch at Buckingham Palace.
He saw Prince Albert return there from a visit to Woolwich, and then passed on to Constitution Hill,
where he waited till four p.m., the time at which the Queen and Prince Consort usually took an afternoon drive.
About six p.m. the royal carriage, a low open vehicle drawn by four horses, ridden by postilions, left the palace.
Oxford, who had been pacing backwards and forwards with his hands under the lapels of his coat, saw the carriage approach.
He was on the right or north side of the road. Prince Albert occupied the same side of the carriage, the Queen the left.
As the carriage came up to him Oxford turned, put his hand into his breast, drew a pistol, and fired at the Queen.
The shot missed, and as the carriage passed on, Oxford drew a second pistol and fired again.
The Queen saw this second movement, and stooped to avoid the shot;
the Prince too rose to shield her with his person. Again, providentially, the bullet went wide of the mark,
and the royal party drove back to Clarence House, the Queen being anxious to give the first news of the outrage and of her safety to her mother,
Meanwhile the pistol-shots had attracted the attention of the bystanders, of whom there was a fair collection, as usual, waiting to see the Queen pass.
Oxford was seized by a person named Lowe, who was at first mistaken for the assailant.
But Oxford at once assumed the responsibility for his crime, saying, "It was I. I did it. I'll give myself up.
There is no occasion to use violence. I will go with you.
He was taken into custody, and removed first to a police cell, thence committed to Newgate, after he had been examined before the Privy Council.
Oxford expressed little anxiety or concern.
He asked more than once whether the Queen was hurt, and acknowledged that the pistols were loaded with ball.
A craze for notoriety, to be achieved at any cost, was the one absorbing idea in young Oxford's disordered brain.
After his arrest he thought only of the excitement his attempt had raised, nothing of its atrocity,
or of the fatal consequences which might have ensued.
When brought to trial he hardly realized his position,
but gazed with complacency around the crowded court, and eagerly inquired what persons of distinction were present.
He smiled continually, and when the indictment was read, burst into loud and discordant fits of laughter.
These antics may have been assumed to bear out the plea of insanity set up in his defense,
but that there was madness in his family, and that he himself was of unsound mind, could not be well denied.
His father, it was proved in evidence, had been at times quite mad; and Oxford's mental state might be inferred from his own proceedings.
Among his papers was found a curious document, purporting to be the rules of an association called
Young England, which Oxford had evolved out of his own inflated self-conceit, and which had never any real corporeal existence.
Young England was a secret society, with no aim or object.
Its sworn members, known only to Oxford, and all of them mere shadows,
were bound to provide themselves with sword, rifle, dagger, and a pair of pistols;
to wear a black crape mask, to obey punctually the orders of their commander-in-chief,
and to assume any disguise, if required to go into the country on the business of the association.
The officers of the society were to be known only by "factitious names."
Thus, among the presidents were those of Gowrie, Justinian, Aloman, Colsman, Kenneth, and Godfrey;
Hannibal and Ethelred were on the council; Anthony, Augustus, and Frederic were among the generals;
Louis and Amadeus among the captains; and Hercules, Neptune, and Mars among the lieutenants of the association.
The various grades were distinguished by cockades and bows of different colors.
The society was supposed to meet regularly, and its proceedings, together with the speeches made, were duly recorded.
With Oxford's other papers were found letters from the secretary, written as it seemed by Oxford to himself, after the manner of Mr. Toots,
all of which declared their approval of the commander-in-chief.
One expressed pleasure that Oxford improved so much in speaking, and declared that his (Oxford's) speech the last time "was beautiful."
This letter went on to say that a new member had been introduced by Lt. Mars, "a fine, tall, gentlemanly young man,
and it is said that he is a military officer, but his name has not yet transpired.
Soon after he was introduced we were alarmed by a violent knocking at the door;
in an instant our faces were covered, we cocked our pistols, and with drawn swords stood waiting to receive the enemy.
While one stood over the fire with the papers, another stood with lighted torch to fire the house.
We then sent the old woman to open the door, and it proved to be some little boys who had knocked and ran away.
Another letter directed Oxford to attend an extraordinary meeting of "Young England"
in consequence of having received some information of an important nature from Hanover.
You must attend; and if your master will not give you leave, you must come in defiance of him.
No serious importance could be attached to these, the manifest inventions of a disordered intellect.
The whole of the evidence pointed so strongly towards insanity, that the jury brought in a verdict of acquittal on that ground,
and Oxford was ordered to be detained during Her Majesty's pleasure.
He went from Newgate first to Bethlehem, from which he was removed to Broadmoor on the opening of the great criminal lunatic asylum at that place.
He was released from Broadmoor in eighteen seventy-eight, and went abroad.
Within a couple of years a second attempt to assassinate the Queen was perpetrated in nearly the same spot, by a man named John Francis,
who was arrested in the very act, just as he had fired one shot.
His motives for thus imitating the dastardly crime of Oxford are shrouded in obscurity.
He could not plead insanity like his predecessor, and no attempt was made at his trial to prove him of unsound mind.
Here again probably it was partly the love of notoriety which was the incentive,
backed possibly with the hope that, as in a much more recent case,
he would be in some way provided for, he having been for some time previously in abject circumstances.
The deed was long premeditated, and would have been executed a day earlier had not his courage failed him at the last moment.
A youth named Pearson had seen him present a pistol at the Queen's carriage,
but draw it back again, exclaiming presently, "I wish I had done it."
Pearson weakly allowed Francis to go off without securing his apprehension, but later he gave full information.
The Queen was apprised of the danger, and begged not to go abroad;
but she declared she would not remain a prisoner in her own palace, and next day drove out as usual in an open barouche.
Nothing happened till Her Majesty returned to Buckingham Palace about six p.m., when, on descending Constitution Hill,
with an equerry riding close on each side of her carriage, a man who had been leaning against the palace garden wall suddenly advanced,
leveled a pistol at the Queen, and fired. He was so close to the carriage that the smoke of his pistol enveloped the face of Colonel Wylde,
one of the equerries. The Queen was untouched, and at first, it is said, hardly realized the danger she had escaped.
Francis had already been seized by a policeman named Trounce, who saw his movement with the pistol, but too late to prevent its discharge.
The prisoner was conveyed without delay to the Home Office, and there examined by the Privy Council, which had been hastily summoned for the purpose.
On searching him the pistol was found in his pocket, the barrel still warm; also some loose powder and a bullet.
There was some doubt as to whether the pistol when fired was actually loaded with ball, but the jury brought in a verdict of guilty
of the criminal intent to kill.
Francis was sentenced to be hanged, decapitated, and quartered,
the old traitor's doom, but was spared, and subsequently transported for life.
The enthusiasm of the people at the Queen's escape was uproarious, and her drive next day was one long triumphal progress.
At the Italian Opera in the evening the audience, on the Queen's appearance, greeted her with loud cheers, and called for the national anthem.
This was in May eighteen forty-two.
Undeterred by the well-merited punishment which had overtaken Francis,
a third miscreant made a similar but far less serious attempt in the month of July following.
As the Queen was driving from Buckingham Palace to the Chapel Royal,
a deformed lad among the crowd was seen to present a pistol at Her Majesty's carriage,
in the Mall, about half-way between Buckingham and St. James's Palaces.
Only one person saw the movement, a lad named Dasset, who at once collared the cripple, and taking him up to two policemen,
charged him with the offense.
The policemen treated the matter as a hoax, and allowed the culprit to make off.
Later on, however, Dasset was himself seized and interrogated,
and on his information handbills were circulated, giving the exact description of the deformed youth, who had a hump-back,
and a long, sickly, pale face, with light hair;
his nose was marked with a scar or black patch, and he was altogether of a dirty appearance.
It happened that a lad named Bean had absconded from his father's home some weeks before,
whose description, as given by his father to the police,
exactly tallied with that of the deformed person "wanted" for the assault on the Queen.
A visit to the father's residence was followed by the arrest of the son, who had by this time returned.
This son, John William Bean, was fully identified by Dasset, and presently examined by the Privy Council.
He was eventually charged with a misdemeanor, the capital charge having been abandoned, and committed for trial.
Much the same motives of seeking notoriety seem to have impelled Bean, who was perfectly sane, to his rash act;
but it was proved that the pistol was not loaded with ball,
and he was only convicted of an attempt "to harass, vex, and grieve the sovereign.
Lord Abinger sentenced him to eighteen months' imprisonment in Newgate,
but the place of durance was changed, to meet the existing law, to Millbank Penitentiary.
I shall mention briefly one more case, in which, however, there was no murderous intent, before I pass on to other crimes.
On June eighteen fifty the Queen was once more subjected to cowardly outrage, the offender being a Mr. Pate, a gentleman by birth,
who had borne the Queen's commission, first as cornet, and then lieutenant, in the tenth Hussars.
Pate was said to be an eccentric person, given to strange acts and antics, such as mixing whiskey and camphor with his morning bath-water,
and walking for choice through prickly gorse bushes.
He always kept the blinds down at his chambers in Jermyn Street; and as the St. James's clock chimed quarter-past three,
invariably went out in a cab, for which he always paid the same fare,
nine shillings, all in shillings, and no other coin.
But this was not sufficient to constitute lunacy, nor was his plea of "momentary uncontrollable impulse"
deemed valid as any palliation of his offense.
That offense was a brutal assault upon Her Majesty, whom he struck in the face with a small stick just as she was leaving Cambridge House.
The blow crushed the bonnet and bruised the forehead of the Queen, who was happily not otherwise injured.
Pate was found guilty, and sentenced to seven years' transportation, the judge, Baron Alderson, abstaining from inflicting the penalty of whipping,
which was authorized by a recent act, on account of Mr. Pate's family and position in life.
I have already remarked that as violence was more and more eliminated from crimes against the person,
frauds indicating great boldness, extensive design, and ingenuity became more prevalent.
The increase of bank forgeries, and its cause, I referred to in a previous chapter.
At one session of the Old Bailey, in eighteen twenty-one, no less than thirty-five true bills were found for passing forged notes.
But there were other notorious cases of forgery.
That of Fauntleroy the banker, in eighteen twenty-four,
caused much excitement at the time on account of the magnitude of the fraud, and the seeming probity of the culprit.
Mr. Fauntleroy was a member of a banking firm, which his father had established in conjunction with a gentleman of the name of Marsh, and others.
He had entered the house as clerk in eighteen hundred;
in eighteen oh seven, and when only twenty-two, he succeeded to his father's share in the business.
According to Fauntleroy's own case, he found at once that the firm was heavily involved,
through advances made to various builders, and that it could only maintain its credit by wholesale discounting.
Its embarrassments were greatly increased by the bankruptcy of two of its clients in the building trade,
and the bank became liable for a sum of one hundred seventy thousand pounds.
New liabilities were incurred to the extent of one hundred thousand pounds by more failures, and in eighteen nineteen,
by the death of one of the partners, a large sum in cash had to be withdrawn from the bank to pay his heirs.
During these numerous and trying difficulties -- it is Mr. Fauntleroy who speaks --
the house was nearly without resources, and the whole burthen of management falling on me, I sought resources where I could;
in other words, he forged powers of attorney, and proceeded to realize securities lodged in his bank under various names.
Among the prisoner's private papers, one was found giving full details of the stock he had feloniously sold out,
the sum total amounting to some one hundred seventy thousand pounds, with a declaration in his own handwriting to the following effect.
In order to keep up the credit of our house, I have forged powers of attorney for the above sums and parties,
and sold out to the amount here stated, and without the knowledge of my partners.
I kept up the payments of the dividends, but made no entries of such payments in my books.
The bank began first to refuse our acceptances, and to destroy the credit of our house; the bank shall smart for it.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section fourteen: Newgate notorieties, part one
Many stories were in circulation at the time of Fauntleroy's trial with regard to his forgeries. It was said that he had by means of them
sold out so large an amount of stock, that he paid sixteen thousand pounds a year in dividends to escape detection.
Once he ran a narrow risk of being found out.
A lady in the country, who had thirteen thousand pounds in the stocks, desired her London agent to sell them out.
He went to the bank, and found that no stocks stood in her name. He called at once upon Fauntleroy, his client's bankers, for an explanation,
and was told by Mr. Fauntleroy that the lady had desired him to sell out, "which I have done," added the fraudulent banker, "and here are the proceeds,"
whereupon he produced exchequer bills to the amount.
Nothing more was heard of the affair, although the lady declared that she had never instructed Fauntleroy to sell.
On another occasion the banker forged a gentleman's name while the latter was sitting with him in his private room,
and took the instrument out to a clerk with the ink not dry.
It must be added that the Bank of England, on discovering the forgeries,
replaced the stock in the names of the original holders, who might otherwise have been completely ruined.
A newspaper report of the time describes Fauntleroy as a well-made man of middle stature.
His hair, though gray, was thick, and lay smooth over his forehead.
His countenance had an expression of most subdued resignation.
The impression which his appearance altogether was calculated to make was that of the profoundest commiseration.
The crime, long carried on without detection, was first discovered in eighteen twenty,
when it was found that a sum of ten thousand pounds, standing in the name of three trustees, of whom Fauntleroy was one,
had been sold out under a forged power of attorney.
Further investigations brought other similar frauds to light,
and fixed the whole sum misappropriated at one hundred seventy thousand pounds, the first forgery dating back to eighteen fourteen.
A run upon the bank immediately followed, which was only met by a suspension of payment and the closing of its doors.
Meanwhile public gossip was busy with Fauntleroy's name,
and it was openly stated in the press and in conversation that the proceeds of these frauds had been squandered in chambering, gambling, and debauchery.
Fauntleroy was scouted as a licentious libertine, a deep and determined gamester, a spendthrift whose extravagance knew no bounds.
The veil was lifted from his private life, and he was accused of persistent immorality.
he sought to rebut these charges, which indeed were never clearly made out, and it is pretty certain that his own account of the causes which led him into dishonesty
He called many witnesses, seventeen in all, to speak of him as they had found him; and these, all respectable city merchants and business men,
declared that they had hitherto formed a high opinion of his honor, integrity, and goodness of disposition,
deeming him the last person capable of a dishonorable action.
These arguments availed little with the jury, who after a short deliberation found Fauntleroy guilty, and he was sentenced to death.
Every endeavor was used, however, to obtain a commutation of sentence. His case was twice argued before the judges on points of law,
but the result in both cases was unfavorable.
Appeals were made to the Home Secretary, and all possible political interest brought to bear, but without success.
Fauntleroy meanwhile lay in Newgate, not herded with other condemned prisoners, as the custom was,
but in a separate chamber, that belonging to one of the warders of the jail.
I find in the chaplain's journal, under date eighteen twenty-four, various entries relative to this prisoner.
Visited Mr. Fauntleroy. My application for books for him not having been attended, I had no prayer-book to give him.
Visited Mr. Fauntleroy. The sheriffs have very kindly permitted him to remain in the turnkey's room where he was originally placed; nor can I omit expressing a hope
that this may prove the beginning of a better system of confinement, and that every description of persons who may be unfortunately under sentence of death
will no longer be herded indiscriminately together.
The kindliness of the city authorities to Fauntleroy was not limited to the assignment of a separate place of durance.
As I have already said, they took the chaplain seriously to task for the bad taste shown in the condemned sermon preached before Fauntleroy.
This was on the text,
Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall," and was full of the most pointed allusions to the culprit.
Fauntleroy constantly groaned aloud while the sermon proceeded, and contemporary reports declared
that he appeared to feel deeply the force of the reverend gentleman's observations, especially when the chaplain spoke of
the great magnitude of our erring brother's offense, one of the most dangerous description in a trading community.
The sermon ended with an appeal to the dying man, exhorting him to penitence.
This "personality," and it can be called by no other name, is carefully excluded from prison pulpit utterances on the eve of an execution.
A very curious and, in its way, amusing circumstance in connection with this case was the offer of a certain Italian,
Edmund Angelini, to take Fauntleroy's place.
Angelini wrote to the Lord Mayor to this effect,
urging that Fauntleroy was a father, a citizen: "his life is useful, mine a burthen, to the State."
He was summoned to the Mansion House, where he repeated his request, crying, "Accordez moi cette grâce," with much urgency.
There were doubts of his sanity.
He wrote afterwards to the effect that the moment he had offered himself, an unknown assassin came to aim a blow at him.
Let this monster give his name; I am ready to fight him. I am still determined to put myself in the place of Mr. Fauntleroy.
If the law of this country can receive such a sacrifice, my death will render to heaven an innocent man, and to earth a repentant sinner.
Fauntleroy was not entirely dependent upon the ordinary for ghostly counsel in his extremity.
He was also attended by the Rev. Mr. Springett and the indefatigable Mr. Baker, whose name has already been mentioned.
When led out on the morning of his execution, these two last-named gentlemen each took hold of one of his arms, and so accompanied him to the scaffold.
The concourse in front of Newgate was enormous, but much sympathy was evinced for this unfortunate victim to human weakness and ruthless laws.
A report was, moreover, widely circulated, and the impression long prevailed, that he actually escaped death.
It was said that strangulation had been prevented by the insertion of a silver tube in his wind-pipe,
and that after hanging for the regulated time he was taken down and easily restored to consciousness.
Afterwards, according to the common rumor, he went abroad and lived there for many years; but the story is not only wholly unsubstantiated,
but there is good evidence to show that the body after execution was handed over to his friends and interred privately.
Some years were still to elapse before capital punishment ceased to be the penalty for forgery, and in the interval
several persons were sentenced to or suffered death for this crime.
There were two notable capital convictions for forgery in eighteen twenty-eight.
One was that of Captain Montgomery, who assumed the aliases of Colonel Wallace and Colonel Morgan.
His offense was uttering forged notes, and there was strong suspicion that he had long subsisted entirely by this fraud.
The act for which he was taken into custody was the payment of a forged ten-pound note for half-a-dozen silver spoons.
Montgomery was an adept at forgery. He had gone wrong early. Although born of respectable parents, and gazetted to a commission in the army,
he soon left the service and betook himself to dishonest ways.
His first forgery was the marvelous imitation of the signature of the Hon. Mr. Neville, M.P., who wrote an extremely cramped and curious hand.
He was not prosecuted for this fraud on account of the respectability of his family, and soon after this escape
he came to London, where he practiced as a professional swindler and cheat.
For a long time justice did not overtake him for any criminal offense, but he was frequently in Newgate and in the King's Bench for debt.
After three years' confinement in the latter prison he passed himself off as his brother, Colonel Montgomery,
a distinguished officer, and would have married an heiress had not the imposture been discovered in time.
He then took to forging bank-notes, and was arrested as I have described above.
Montgomery was duly sentenced to death, but he preferred suicide to the gallows. After sentence his demeanor was serious yet firm.
The night previous to that fixed for his execution he wrote several letters, one of them being to Edward Gibbon Wakefield, a fellow-prisoner,
and listened attentively to the ordinary, who read him the well-known address written and delivered by Dr. Dodd previous to his own execution for forgery.
But next morning he was found dead in his cell.
In one corner after much search a phial was found labeled "Prussic acid,"
which it was asserted he had been in the habit of carrying about his person ever since he had taken to passing forged notes, as an antidote against disgrace.
This phial he had managed to retain in his possession in spite of the frequent searches to which he was subjected in Newgate.
The second conviction for forgery in eighteen twenty-eight was that of the Quaker Joseph Hunton, a man of previously the highest repute in the city of London.
He had prospered in early life, was a slop-seller on a large scale at Bury St. Edmunds, and a sugar-baker in the metropolis.
He married a lady also belonging to the Society of Friends, who brought him a large fortune, which, and his own money, he put into a city firm,
that of Dickson and Co.
He soon, however, became deeply involved in Stock Exchange speculations,
and losing heavily, to meet the claims upon him he put out a number of forged bills of exchange or acceptances,
to which the signature of one Wilkins of Abingdon was found to be forged.
Hunton tried to fly the country on the detection of the fraud, but was arrested at Plymouth just as he was on the point of leaving England in the New York packet.
He had gone on board in his Quaker dress, but when captured was found in a light-green frock,
a pair of light gray pantaloons, a black stock and a foraging cap.
Hunton was put upon his trial at the Old Bailey, and in due course sentenced to death.
His defense was that the forged acceptances would have been met on coming to maturity, and that he had no real desire to defraud.
Hunton accepted his sentence with great resignation, although he protested against the inhumanity of the laws which condemned him to death.
On entering Newgate he said,
I wish after this day to have communication with nobody; let me take leave of my wife, and family, and friends. I have already suffered an execution;
my heart has undergone that horrible penalty.
He was, however, visited by and received his wife, and several members of the Society of Friends.
Two elders of the meeting sat up with him in the press yard the whole of the night previous to execution, and a third,
Mr. Sparks Moline, came to attend him to the scaffold.
He met his death with unshaken firmness, only entreating that a certain blue handkerchief,
to which he seemed fondly attached, should be used to bandage his eyes, which request was readily granted.
Hunton's execution no doubt aroused public attention to the cruelty and futility of the capital law against forgery.
A society which had already been started against capital punishment
devoted its efforts first to a mitigation of the forgery statute, but could not immediately accomplish much.
In eighteen twenty-nine the gallows claimed two more victims for this offense.
One was Richard Gifford, a well-educated youth who had been at Christ's Hospital, and afterwards in the National Debt Office.
Unfortunately he took to drink, lost his appointment, and fell from bad to worse.
Suddenly, after being at the lowest depths, he emerged, and was found by his friends living in comfort in the Waterloo Road.
His funds, which he pretended came to him with a rich wife, were really the proceeds of frauds upon the Bank of England.
He forged the names of people who held stock on the Bank books, and got the value of the stock;
he also forged dividend receipts and got the dividends. He was only six-and-twenty when he was hanged.
The other and the last criminal executed for forgery in this country was one Maynard, who was convicted of a fraud upon the Custom House.
In conjunction with two others, one of whom was a clerk in the Custom House,
and had access to the official records, he forged a warrant for one thousand nine-hundred seventy-three pounds and was paid the money by the comptroller general.
Maynard was convicted of uttering the forged document, Jones of being an accessory; the third prisoner was acquitted.
Maynard was the only one who suffered death.
This was on the last day of eighteen twenty-nine. In the following session Sir Robert Peel brought in a bill to consolidate the acts relating to forgery.
Upon the third reading of this bill Sir James Macintosh moved as an amendment that capital punishment should be abolished for all crimes of forgery,
except the forgery of wills and powers of attorney.
This amendment was strongly supported outside the House, and a petition in favor of its passing was presented,
signed by more than a thousand members of banking firms.
Macintosh's amendment was carried in the Commons, but the new law did not pass the Lords, who re-enacted the capital penalty.
Still no sentence of death was carried out for the offense, and in eighteen thirty-two
the Attorney-General introduced a bill to abolish capital punishment entirely for forgery.
It passed the Commons, but opposition was again encountered in the Lords.
This time they sent back the bill, re-enacting only the two penalties for will forging and the forging of powers of attorney;
in other words, they had advanced in eighteen thirty-two to the point at which the Lower House had arrived in eighteen thirty.
There were at the moment in Newgate six convicts sentenced to death for forging wills.
The question was whether the Government would dare to take their lives at the bidding of the House of Lords,
and in defiance of the vote of the assembly which more accurately represented public opinion. It was indeed announced that their fate was sealed;
but Mr. Joseph Hume pressed the Government hard, and obtained an assurance that the men should not be executed.
The new Forgery Act with the Lords' amendment passed into law, but the latter proved perfectly harmless,
and no person ever after suffered death for any variety of this crime.
I will include in this part of the present chapter almost one of the last instances of a crime which in time past
had invariably been visited with the death penalty, and which was of a distinctly fraudulent nature.
The abduction of Miss Turner by the brothers Wakefield bore a strong resemblance to the carrying off and forcible marrying of heiresses as already described.
Miss Turner was a school-girl of barely fifteen,
only child of a gentleman of large property in Cheshire, of which county he was actually high sheriff at the time of his daughter's abduction.
Edward Gibbon Wakefield, the prime mover in the abduction, was a barrister, not exactly briefless, but without a large practice.
He had, it was said, a good private income, and was already a widower with two children at the time of his committing the offense for which he was subsequently tried.
He had eloped with his first wife from school.
While on a visit to Macclesfield he heard by chance of Miss Turner, and that she would inherit all her father's possessions.
He thereupon conceived an idea of carrying her off and marrying her willy nilly at Gretna Green.
The two brothers started at once for Liverpool, where Miss Turner was at school with a Mrs. Daulby.
At Manchester, en route, a traveling carriage was purchased, which was driven up to Mrs. Daulby's door at eight in the morning,
and a servant hurriedly alighted from it, bearing a letter for Miss Turner.
This purported to be from the medical attendant of Mr. Turner, written at Shrigley, Mr. Turner's place of residence;
and it stated that Mrs. Turner had been stricken with paralysis.
She was not in immediate danger, but she wished to see her daughter, "as it was possible she might soon become incapable of recognizing any one."
Miss Turner, greatly agitated, accompanied the messenger who had brought this news, a disguised servant of Wakefield's,
who had plausibly explained that he had only recently been engaged at Shrigley.
The road taken was via Manchester, where the servant said a Dr. Hull was to be picked up to go on with them to Shrigley.
At Manchester, however, the carriage stopped at the Albion Hotel.
Miss Turner was shown into a private room, where Mr. Wakefield soon presented himself.
Miss Turner, not knowing him, would have left the room, but he said he came from her father, and she remained.
Wakefield, in reply to her inquiries, satisfied her that her mother was well, and that the real reason for summoning her from school
was the state of her father's affairs.
Mr. Turner was on the verge of bankruptcy. He was at that moment at Kendal, and wished her to join him there at once.
Miss Turner consented to go on, and they traveled night and day towards the north.
But at Kendal there was no Mr. Turner, and, to allay Miss Turner's growing anxiety,
Wakefield found it necessary to become more explicit regarding her father's affairs.
He now pretended that Mr. Turner was also on his way to the border, pursued by sheriffs' officers.
The fact was, Wakefield went on to say, an uncle of his had advanced Mr. Turner sixty thousand pounds, which had temporarily staved off ruin.
But another bank had since failed, and nothing could save Mr. Turner but the transfer of some property to Miss Turner, and its settlement on her,
so that it might become the exclusive property of her husband, "whoever he might be."
Wakefield added that it had been suggested he should marry Miss Turner, but that he had laughed at the idea.
Wakefield's uncle took the matter more seriously, and declared that unless the marriage came off Mr. Turner must be sold up.
Miss Turner, thus pressed, consented to go on to Gretna Green.
Passing through Carlisle, she was told that Mr. Turner was in the town, but could not show himself.
Nothing could release him from his trouble but the arrival of the marriage certificate from Gretna Green.
Filial affection rose superior to all scruples, and Miss Turner, having crossed the border, was married to Wakefield
by the blacksmith in the usual way.
Returning to Carlisle, she now heard that her father had been set free, and had gone home to Shrigley, whither they were to follow him.
They set out, but at Leeds Wakefield found himself called suddenly to Paris;
the other brother was accordingly sent on a pretended mission to Shrigley to bring Mr. Turner on to London, whither Wakefield and Miss Turner also proceeded.
On arrival, Wakefield pretended that they had missed Mr. Turner, and must follow him over to France.
The strangely-married couple thereupon pressed on to Dover, and crossed over to Calais.
The fact of the abduction did not transpire for some days.
Then Mrs. Daulby learnt that Miss Turner had not arrived at Shrigley, but that she had gone to Manchester.
Friends went in pursuit and traced her to Huddersfield and further north.
The terror and dismay of her parents were soon intensified by the receipt of a letter from Wakefield, at Carlisle, announcing the marriage.
Mr. Turner at once set off for London, where he sought the assistance of the police,
and presently ascertained that Wakefield had gone to the Continent with his involuntary bride.
An uncle of Miss Wakefield's, accompanied by his solicitor and a Bow Street runner, at once went in pursuit.
Meanwhile, a second letter turned up from Wakefield at Calais, in which he assured Mrs. Turner that Miss Turner was fondly attached to him,
and went on to say, "I do assure you, madam, that it shall be the anxious endeavor of my life to promote her happiness by every means in my power."
The game, however, was nearly up. Miss Turner was met by her uncle on Calais pier as she was walking with Wakefield.
The uncle claimed her. The husband resisted.
Monsieur le Maire was appealed to, and decided to leave it to the young lady, who at once abandoned Wakefield.
As he still urged his rights over his wife, Miss Turner cried out in protest, "No, no, I am not his wife;
he carried me away by fraud and stratagem, and forced me to accompany him to Gretna Green
By the same forcible means I was compelled to quit England, and to trust myself to the protection of this person,
whom I never saw until I was taken from Liverpool, and never want to see again.
On this Wakefield gave in.
He surrendered the bride who had never been a wife, and she returned to England with her friends, while Wakefield went on alone to Paris.
Mr. William Wakefield was arrested at Dover, conveyed to Chester, and committed to Lancaster Jail for trial at the next assizes,
when indictments were preferred against both brothers "for having carried away Ellen Turner, spinster,
then a maid and heir apparent unto her father, for the sake of the lucre of her substance; and for having afterwards unlawfully and against her will
married the said Ellen Turner.
They were tried in March of the following year, Edward Wakefield having apparently given himself up,
and found guilty, remaining in Lancaster Jail for a couple of months, when they were brought up to the court of King's Bench for judgment.
The prosecution pressed for a severe penalty. Edward Wakefield pleaded that his trial had already cost him three thousand pounds.
Mr. Justice Bayley, in summing up,
spoke severely of the gross deception practiced upon an innocent girl, and sentenced the brothers each to three years' imprisonment,
William Wakefield in Lancaster Jail, and Edward Gibbon Wakefield in Newgate, which sentences were duly enforced.
The marriage was annulled by an Act of Parliament, although Wakefield petitioned against it,
and was brought from Newgate, at his own request, to oppose the second reading of the bill.
He also wrote and published a pamphlet from the jail to show that Miss Turner had been a consenting party to the marriage, and was really his wife.
Neither his address nor his pamphlet availed much, for the bill for the divorce passed both Houses.
That Mr. Wakefield was a shrewd critic and close observer of all that went on in the Newgate of those days,
will be admitted by those who have read his book on "the punishment of death,
which was based on his jail experiences, and of which I have availed myself in the last chapter.
After their release from Lancaster and Newgate respectively, both Wakefields went abroad.
Mr. W. Wakefield served in a continental army, and rose to the rank of colonel,
after which he went to New Zealand, and held an important post in that colony.
Mr. E. G. Wakefield took part in the scheme for the colonization of North Australia, and for some years resided in that colony.
Miss Turner subsequently married Mr. Legh of Lym Hall, Cheshire.
It must not be imagined that although highway robbery was now nearly extinct, and felonious outrages in the streets were rare,
that thieves or depredators were idle or entirely unsuccessful.
Bigger "jobs" than ever were planned and attempted,
as in the burglary at Lambeth Palace, when the thieves were fortunately disappointed, the archbishop having, before he left town,
sent his plate-chests, eight in number, to the silversmith's for greater security.
The jewelers were always a favorite prey of the London thieves.
Shops were broken into, as when that of Grimaldi and Johnson, in the Strand, was robbed of watches to the value of six thousand pounds.
Where robbery with violence was intended, the perpetrators had now to adopt various shifts and contrivances to secure their victim.
No more curious instance of this ever occurred than the assault made by one Howard upon a Mr. Mullay, with intent to rob him.
The latter had advertised, offering a sum of one thousand pounds to anyone who would introduce him to some mercantile equipment.
Howard replied, desiring Mr. Mullay to call upon him in a house in Red Lion Square.
Mr. Mullay went, and a second interview was agreed upon, when a third person, Mr. Owen,
through whose interest an appointment under Government was to be obtained for Mullay, would be present.
Mr. Mullay called again, taking with him five hundred pounds in cash. Howard discovered this, and his manner was very suspicious;
there were weapons in the room -- a long knife, a heavy trap-ball bat, and a poker.
Mr. Mullay became alarmed, and as Mr. Owen did not appear, withdrew;
Howard, strange to say, making no attempt to detain him; probably because Mullay promised to return a few days later, and to bring more money.
On this renewed visit Mr. Owen was still absent, and Mr. Mullay agreed to write him a note from a copy Howard gave him.
While thus engaged, Howard thrust the poker into the fire.
Mullay protested, and then Howard, under the influence of ungovernable rage, as it seemed, jumped up,
locked the door, and attacked Mullay violently with the trap-ball bat and knife.
Mullay defended himself, and managed to break the knife, but not before he had cut himself severely.
A life and death struggle ensued. Mullay cried "Murder!"
Howard swore he would finish him, but proved the weaker of the two, and Mullay got him down on the floor.
By this time the neighbors were aroused, and several people came to the scene of the affray.
Howard was secured, given into custody, and committed to Newgate.
The defense he set up was, that Mullay had used epithets towards him while they were negotiating a business matter,
and that, being an irritable temper, he had struck Mullay, after which a violent scuffle took place.
It was, however, proved that Howard was in needy circumstances, and that his proposals to Mr. Mullay could only have originated in a desire to rob him.
He was found guilty of an assault with intent, and sentenced to transportation for fourteen years.
A more complicated and altogether most extraordinary case of assault, with intent to extort money, occurred a few years later.
It was perpetrated upon a respectable country solicitor,
Mr. Gee, of Bishop Stortford, who administered the estate of a certain Mr. Canning, deceased.
This Mr. Canning had left his widow a life interest in two thousand pounds so long as she remained unmarried.
The money went after her to her children.
Mr. Gee had invested one thousand two hundred pounds of this, and was seeking how best to place the remaining eight hundred pounds,
when he was asked to meet a Mr. Heath in London with regard to the sale of certain lands at Bishop Stortford.
An appointment was made and kept by Mr. Gee,
but on arrival he was met by a young sailor with a letter which begged Mr. Gee to go to Heath's house, as the latter was not well.
Mr. Gee went in the coach sent for him, and alighted at twenty-seven, York Street, West, Commercial Road.
The coach immediately drove off; Mr. Gee entered the house, asked for Mr. Heath, was told he would find him in the back kitchen at breakfast.
He was about to descend the stairs when three persons, one of them the young sailor,
fell upon him, and in spite of his resistance carried him into a sort of den partitioned off at the end of the back kitchen.
There he was seated on some sort of wooden bench and securely fastened.
A chain fixed to staples at his back passed round his chest under his arms, and was padlocked on the left side;
his feet were bound with cords and made fast to rings in the floor. Thus manacled, one of the party, who pretended to be Mrs. Canning's brother,
addressed him, insisting that he should forthwith sign a cheque for the eight hundred pounds of the Canning inheritance still uninvested,
and write an order sufficient to secure the surrender of the other one thousand two hundred pounds.
Mr. Gee at first stoutly refused.
Then, as they warned him that he would be kept a prisoner in total darkness in this horrible den until he agreed to their demands,
he gave in, and signed the documents thus illegally extorted.
One was a cheque for eight hundred pounds on his bankers, the other an order to Mr. Bell of Newport, Essex, requesting the surrender of a deed.
His captors having thus succeeded in their designs, left him, no doubt to realize the money.
The door of his place of durance stood open, and Mr. Gee began to consider whether he might not escape.
For three hours he struggled without success with his bonds,
but at length managed to wriggle out of the chain which confined his body, and soon loosened the ropes round his feet.
Thus free, he eluded the vigilance of two of the party, who were at dinner in the front kitchen,
and creeping out into the garden at the back, climbed the wall, and got into the street.
His first act was to send a messenger to stop the cheque and the order to Mr. Bell, his next to seek the help of the police.
Two Bow Street runners were dispatched to the house in York Street, which had evidently been taken on purpose for the outrage.
There was no furniture in the place, and the den in the kitchen had been recently and specially constructed of boards of immense strength and thickness.
It was a cell five feet by three, within another, the intervening being filled with rammed earth to deaden the sound.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section fifteen: Newgate notorieties, part three
On the arrival of the police the house was empty.
The two men on guard had gone off immediately after Mr. Gee had escaped, but they returned later in the day, and were apprehended.
Inquiries set on foot also elicited the suspicion that the person who had represented Mrs. Canning's brother
was a blind man named Edwards, who had taken this house in York Street, and who was known to be a frequent visitor at Mrs. Canning's.
A watch was set on him at her house, where he was soon afterwards arrested.
Edwards, whom Mr. Gee easily identified with the others, at once admitted that he was the prime mover of the conspiracy.
He had sought by all legal means to obtain possession of the two thousand pounds, but had failed, and had had recourse to more violent means.
It turned out that he was really married to Mrs. Canning,
both having been recognized by the clergyman who had performed the ceremony, and the assault had been committed to secure the money
which Mrs. Canning had lost by remarriage.
All three men were committed for trial, although Edwards wished to exculpate the others as having only acted under his order.
At the trial the indictment charging them with felony could not be sustained, but they were found guilty of conspiracy and assault.
Edwards was sentenced to two years' imprisonment in Newgate,
Weedon and Lecasser to twelve and six months respectively in Coldbath Fields.
At no period could thieves in London or elsewhere have prospered had they been unable to dispose of their ill-gotten goods.
The trade of fence, or receiver, therefore, is very nearly as old as the crimes which it so obviously fostered.
One of the most notorious, and for a time most successful practitioners in this illicit trade, passed through Newgate in eighteen thirty-one.
The name of Ikey Solomons was long remembered by thief and thief-taker.
He began as an itinerant street vendor at eight, at ten he passed bad money,
at fourteen he was a pickpocket and a "duffer," or a seller of sham goods.
He early saw the profits to be made out of purchasing stolen goods, but could not embark in it at first for want of capital.
He was taken up when still in his teens for stealing a pocketbook, and was sentenced to transportation, but did not get beyond the hulks at Chatham.
On his release an uncle, a slop-seller in Chatham, gave him a situation as "barker," or salesman,
at which he realized one hundred fifty pounds within a couple of years.
With this capital he returned to London and set up as a fence.
He had such great aptitude for business, and such a thorough knowledge of the real value of goods,
that he was soon admitted to be one of the best judges known of all kinds of property, from a glass bottle to a five hundred guinea chronometer.
But he never paid more than a fixed price for all articles of the same class, whatever their intrinsic value.
Thus, a watch was paid for as a watch, whether it was of gold or silver; a piece of linen as such, whether the stuff was coarse or fine.
This rule in dealing with stolen goods continues to this day, and has made the fortune of many since Ikey.
Solomons also established a system of provincial agency, by which stolen goods were passed on from London to the seaports, and so abroad.
diamonds refaced; all marks by which other articles might be identified, the selvages of linen, the stamps on shoes,
the number and names on watches, were carefully removed or obliterated after the goods passed out of his hands.
On one occasion the whole of the proceeds of a robbery from a boot shop was traced to Solomons';
the owner came with the police, and was morally convinced that it was his property,
but could not positively identify it, and Ikey defied them to remove a single shoe.
In the end the injured bootmaker agreed to buy back his stolen stock
at the price Solomons had paid for it, and it cost him about a hundred pounds to re-stock his shop with his own goods.
As a general rule Ikey Solomons confined his purchases to small articles, mostly of jewelery and plate,
which he kept concealed in a hiding-place with a trap-door just under his bed.
He lived in Rosemary Lane, and sometimes he had as much as twenty thousand pounds worth of goods secreted on the premises.
When his trade was busiest he set up a second establishment, at the head of which, although he was married,
he put another lady, with whom he was on intimate terms.
The second house was in Lower Queen Street, Islington, and he used it for some time as a depot for valuables.
But it was eventually discovered by Mrs. Solomons, a very jealous wife,
and this, with the danger arising from an extensive robbery of watches in Cheapside, in which Ikey was implicated as a receiver,
led him to think seriously of trying his fortunes in another land.
He was about to emigrate to New South Wales, when he was arrested at Islington and committed to Newgate on a charge of receiving stolen goods.
While thus incarcerated he managed to escape from custody, but not actually from jail, by an ingenious contrivance which is worth mentioning.
He claimed to be admitted to bail, and was taken from Newgate on a writ of habeas before one of the judges sitting at Westminster.
He was conveyed in a coach driven by a confederate, and under the escort of a couple of turnkeys.
Solomons, while waiting to appear in court, persuaded the turnkeys to take him to a public-house, where all might "refresh."
While there he was joined by his wife and other friends.
After a short carouse the prisoner went into Westminster, his case was heard, bail refused, and he was ordered back to Newgate.
But he once more persuaded the turnkeys to pause at the public, where more liquor was consumed.
When the journey was resumed, Mrs. Solomons accompanied her husband in the coach. Half-way to Newgate she was taken with a fit.
One turnkey was stupidly drunk, and Ikey persuaded the other, who was not much better,
to let the coach change and pass Petticoat Lane en route to the jail, where the suffering woman might be handed over to her friends.
On stopping at a door in this low street, Ikey jumped out, ran into the house, slamming the door behind him.
He passed through and out at the back, and was soon beyond pursuit.
By-and-by the turnkeys, sobered by their loss, returned to Newgate alone, and pleaded in excuse that they had been drugged.
Ikey left no traces, and the police could hear nothing of him. He had in fact gone out of the country, to Copenhagen, whence he passed on to New York.
There he devoted himself to the circulation of forged notes. He was also anxious to do business in watches,
and begged his wife to send him over a consignment of cheap "righteous" watches, or such as had been honestly obtained, and not "on the cross."
But Mrs. Solomons could not resist the temptation to dabble in stolen goods, and she was found shipping watches of the wrong category to New York.
For this she received a sentence of fourteen years' transportation, and was sent to Van Diemen's Land.
Ikey joined her at Hobart Town, where they set up a general shop, and soon began to prosper.
He was, however, recognized, and ere long an order came out from home for his arrest and transfer to England,
which presently followed, and again found himself an inmate of Newgate, waiting trial as a receiver and a prison-breaker.
He was indicted on eight charges, two only of which were substantiated, but on each of them he received a sentence of seven years' transportation.
At his own request he was reconveyed to Hobart Town, where his son had been carrying on the business.
Whether Ikey was "assigned" to his own family is not recorded, but no doubt he succeeded to his own property when the term of servitude had expired.
No doubt, on the removal of Ikey Solomons from the scene, his mantle fell upon worthy successors.
There was an increase rather than an abatement in jewel and bullion robberies in the years immediately following,
and the thieves seem to have had no difficulty in disposing of their spoil.
One of the largest robberies of its class was that effected upon the Custom House in the winter of eighteen thirty-four.
A large amount of specie was nearly always retained here in the department of the Receiver of Fines.
This was known to some clerks in the office, who began to consider how they might lay hands on a lot of cash.
Being inexperienced, they decided to call in the services of a couple of professional housebreakers,
Jordan and Sullivan, who at once set to work in a business-like way to obtain impressions of the keys of the strong room and chest.
But before committing themselves to an attempt on the latter, it was of importance to ascertain how much it usually contained.
For this purpose Jordan waited on the receiver to make a small payment, for which he tendered a fifty-pound note.
The chest was opened to give change, and a heavy tray lifted out which plainly held some four thousand pounds in cash.
Some difficulty then arose as to gaining admission to the strong room, and it was arranged that a man, May, another Custom House clerk,
should be introduced into the building, and secreted there during the night to accomplish the robbery.
May was smuggled in through a window on the esplanade behind an opened umbrella. When the place was quite deserted
he broke open the chest and stole four thousand, seven hundred pounds in notes, with a quantity of gold and some silver.
He went out next morning with the booty when the doors were re-opened, and attracted no attention.
The spoil was fairly divided; part of the notes were disposed of to a traveling "receiver," who passed over to the Continent and there cashed them easily.
This occurred in November eighteen thirty-four. The Custom House officials were in a state of consternation,
and the police were unable at first to get on the track of the thieves.
While the excitement was still fresh, a new robbery of diamonds was committed at a bonded warehouse in the immediate neighborhood, on Custom House Quay.
The jewels had belonged to a Spanish countess recently deceased, who had sent them to England for greater security on the outbreak of the first Carlist war.
At her death the diamonds were divided between her four daughters, but only half had been claimed,
and at the time of the robbery there were still six thousand pounds worth in the warehouse.
These were deposited in an iron chest of great strength on the second floor.
The thieves it was supposed had secreted themselves in the warehouse during business hours, and waited till night to carry out their plans.
Some ham sandwiches, several cigar ends, and two empty champagne bottles were found on the premises next day, showing how they had passed their time.
They had had serious work to get at the diamonds. It was necessary to force one heavy door from its hinges, and to cut through the thick panels of another.
The lock and fastenings of the chest were forced by means of a "jack," an instrument known to housebreakers,
which if introduced into a keyhole, and worked like a bit and brace, will soon destroy the strongest lock.
The thieves were satisfied with the diamonds; they broke open other cases containing gold watches and plate, but abstracted nothing.
The police were of opinion that these robberies were both the work of the same hand.
But it was not until the autumn that they traced some of the notes stolen from the Custom House to Jordan and Sullivan.
About this time also suspicion fell upon Huey, one of the clerks, who was arrested soon afterwards, and made a clean breast of the whole affair.
There was a hunt for the two well-known house-breakers, who were eventually heard of at a lodging in Kennington.
But they at once made tracks, and took up their residence under assumed names in a tavern in Bloomsbury.
The police lost all trace of them for some days, but at length Sullivan's brother was followed from the house in Kennington to the above-mentioned tavern.
Both the thieves were now apprehended, but only a small portion of the lost property was recovered,
notwithstanding a minute search through the room they had occupied.
After their arrest, Jordan's wife and Sullivan's brother came to the inn, and begged to be allowed to visit this room;
but their request, in spite of their earnest entreaties,
was refused, at the instigation of the police. A few days later a frequent guest at the tavern arrived, and had this same room allotted to him.
A fire was lit in it, and the maid in doing so threw a lot of rubbish, as it seemed, which had accumulated under the grate, on top of the burning coals.
By-and-by the occupant of the room noticed something glittering in the center of the fire, which, to inspect more closely, he took out with the tongs.
It was a large gold brooch set in pearls, but a portion of the mounting had melted with the heat.
The fire was raked out, and in the ashes were found seven large and four dozen small brilliants, also seven emeralds,
one of them of considerable size.
A part of the "swag" stolen from the bonded warehouse was thus recovered, but it was supposed that a number of the stolen notes had perished in the fire.
The condign punishment meted out to these Custom House robbers had no deterrent effect seemingly.
Within three months, three new and most mysterious burglaries were committed at the West End, all in houses adjoining each other.
One was occupied by the Portuguese ambassador, who lost a quantity of jewelery from an escritoire, and his neighbors lost plate and cash.
Not the slightest clue to these large affairs was ever obtained, but it is probable that they were "put up" jobs, or managed with the complicity of servants.
The next year twelve thousand sovereigns were cleverly stolen in the Mile End Road.
The gold-dust robbery of eighteen thirty-nine, the first of its kind, was cleverly and carefully planned with the assistance of a dishonest employee.
A young man named Caspar, clerk to a steam-ship company,
learnt through the firm's correspondence that a quantity of gold-dust
brought in a man-of-war from Brazil had been transhipped at Falmouth for conveyance to London.
The letter informed him of the marks and sizes of the cases containing the precious metal,
and he with his father arranged that a messenger should call for the stuff with forged credentials, and anticipating the rightful owner.
The fraudulent messenger, by the help of young Caspar, established his claim to the boxes, paid the wharfage dues, and carried off the gold-dust.
Presently the proper person arrived from the consignees, but found the gold-dust gone.
The police were at once employed, and after infinite pains they discovered the person, one Moss, who had acted as the messenger.
Moss was known to be intimate with the elder Caspar,
father of the clerk to the steam-ship company, and these facts were deemed sufficient to justify the arrest of all three.
They also ascertained that a gold-refiner,
Solomons, had sold bar gold to the value of one thousand two hundred pounds to certain bullion dealers.
Solomons was not straightforward in his replies as to where he got the gold, and he was soon placed in the dock with the Caspars and Moss.
and implicated "Money Moses," another Jew, for the whole affair had been planned and executed by members of the Hebrew persuasion.
Money Moses had received the stolen gold-dust from Moss' father-in-law, Davis, or Isaacs, who was never arrested,
and passed it on to Solomons by his daughter, a widow named Abrahams.
Solomons was now also admitted as a witness, and his evidence, with that of Moss, secured the transportation of the principal actors in the theft.
In the course of the trial it came out that almost every one concerned except the Caspars had endeavored to defraud his accomplices.
Moss peached because he declared he had been done out of the proper price of the gold-dust; but it was clear that he had tried to appropriate the whole of the stuff,
instead of handing it or the price of it back to the Caspars.
Money Moses and Mrs. Abrahams imposed upon Moss as to the price paid by Solomons;
Mrs. Abrahams imposed upon her father by abstracting a portion of the dust and selling it on her own account;
Solomons cheated the whole lot by retaining half the gold in his possession, and only giving an I. O. U. for it,
which he refused to redeem on account of the row about the robbery.
Moses, it may be added, was a direct descendant of Ikey Solomons.
He was ostensibly a publican,
and kept the Black Lion in Vinegar Yard, Drury Lane, where secretly he did business as one of the most daring and successful fencers ever known in the metropolis.
His arrest and conviction cast dismay over the whole gang of receivers, and for a time seriously checked the nefarious traffic.
It may be added that prison life did not agree with "Money Moses"; a striking change came over his appearance while in Newgate.
Before his confinement he had been a sleek round person, addicted obviously to the pleasures of the table.
He did not thrive on prison fare,
now more strictly meager, thanks to the inspectors and the more stringent discipline, and before he embarked for Australia to undergo his fourteen years,
he was reported to have fallen away to a shadow.
Having brought down the records of great frauds, forgeries, and thefts from about eighteen twenty-five to eighteen forty,
I will now retrace my steps and give some account of the more remarkable murders during that period.
No murder has created greater sensation and horror throughout England than that of Mr. Weare by Thurtell, Hunt, and Probert.
As this was accomplished beyond the limits of the metropolis, and its perpetrators arraigned at Hertford,
where the principal actor suffered death, the case hardly comes within the limits of my subject.
But Probert, who turned king's evidence, and materially assisted conviction,
was tried at the Old Bailey the following year for horse-stealing, and hanged in front of Newgate.
The murder was still fresh in the memory of the populace, and Probert was all but lynched on his way to jail.
According to his statement, when sentenced to death, he had been driven to horse-stealing by the execration which had pursued him after the murder.
Every door had been closed against him, every hope of future support blasted.
Since the calamitous event," he went on, "that happened at Hertford, I have been a lost man."
The event which he styles calamitous we may well characterize as one of the most deliberately atrocious murders on record.
Thurtell was a gambler, and Weare had won a good deal of money from him.
Weare was supposed to carry a "private bank" about with him in a pocket in his under waistcoat.
To obtain possession of this, Thurtell with his two associates resolved to kill him.
The victim was invited to visit Probert's cottage in the country near Elstree.
Thurtell drove him down in a gig, "to be killed as he traveled," in Thurtell's own words.
The others followed, and on overtaking Thurtell, found he had done the job alone in a retired part of the road known as Gill's Hill Lane.
The murderer explained that he had first fired a pistol at Weare's head, but the shot glanced off his cheek.
Then he attacked the other's throat with a penknife, and last of all drove the pistol barrel into his forehead.
After the murder the villains divided the spoil, and went on to Probert's cottage, and supped off pork-chops brought down on purpose.
During the night they sought to dispose of the body by throwing it into a pond, but two days later had to throw it into another pond.
Meanwhile the discovery of pistol and knife spattered with human blood and brains
raised the alarm, and suspicion fell upon the three murderers, who were arrested.
The crime was brought home to Thurtell by the confession of Hunt,
one of his accomplices, who took the police to the pond, where the remains of the unfortunate Mr. Weare were discovered, sunk in a sack weighted by stones.
Probert was then admitted as a witness, and the case was fully proved against Thurtell, who was hanged in front of Hertford Jail.
Hunt, in consideration of the information he had given, escaped death, and was sentenced to transportation for life.
Widespread horror and indignation was evoked throughout the kingdom by the discovery of the series
of atrocious murders perpetrated in Edinburgh by the miscreants Burke and Hare,
the first of whom has added to the British language a synonym for illegal suppression.
The crimes of these inhuman purveyors to medical science do not fall within the limits of this work.
But Burke and Hare had their imitators further south,
and of these Bishop and Williams, who were guilty of many peculiar atrocities, ended their murderous careers in front of the debtors' door at Newgate.
Bishop, whose real name was Head, married a half-sister of Williams'. Williams was a professional resurrectionist, or body-snatcher,
a trade almost openly countenanced when "subjects" for the anatomy schools were only to be got by rifling graves, or worse.
Bishop was a carpenter, but having been suddenly thrown out of work, he joined his brother-in-law in his line of business.
Bishop got weary of the dangers and fatigues of exhumation, and proposed to Williams that instead of disinterring they should murder their subjects.
Bishop confessed that he was moved to this by the example of Burke and Hare.
They pursued their terrible trade for five years without scruple and without detection.
Eventually the law overtook them, but almost by accident.
They presented themselves about noon one day at the dissecting room of King's College Hospital, accompanied by a third man,
an avowed "snatcher" and habitué of the Fortune of War, a public-house in Smithfield frequented openly by men of this awful profession.
This man, May, asked the porter at King's College if "he wanted anything?" the euphemism for offering a body.
The porter asked what he had got, and the answer was, a male subject.
Reference was made to Mr. Partridge, the demonstrator in anatomy,
and after some haggling they agreed on a price, and in the afternoon the snatchers brought a hamper which contained a body in a sack.
The porter received it, but from its freshness became suspicious of foul play.
Mr. Partridge was sent for, and he with some of the students soon decided that the corpse had not died a natural death.
The snatchers were detained, the police sent for, and arrest followed as a matter of course.
An inquest was held on the body, which was identified as that of an Italian boy,
Carlo Ferrari, who made a living by exhibiting white mice about the streets,
and the jury returned a verdict of willful murder against persons unknown, expressing a strong opinion that Bishop,
Williams, and May had been concerned in the transaction.
Meanwhile, a search had been made at Nova Scotia Gardens, Bethnal Green, where Bishop and Williams lived.
At first nothing peculiar was found; but at a second search the back-garden ground was dug up,
and in one corner, at some depth, a bundle of clothes were unearthed, which, with a hairy cap,
were known to be what Ferrari had worn when last seen.
In another portion of the garden more clothing, partly male and partly female, was discovered,
plainly pointing to the perpetration of other crimes.
These facts were represented before the police magistrate
who examined Bishop and his fellows, and further incriminating evidence adduced, to the effect that the prisoners had bartered for a coach to carry "a stiff 'un";
they had also been seen to leave their cottage, carrying out a sack with something heavy inside. On this they were fully committed to Newgate for trial.
This trial came off in due course at the Central Criminal Court, where the prisoners were charged on two counts,
one that of the murder of the Italian boy, the other that of a boy unknown.
The evidence from first to last was circumstantial,
but the jury, after a short deliberation, did not hesitate to bring in a verdict of guilty, and all three were condemned to death.
Shortly before the day fixed for execution, Bishop made a full confession, the bulk of which bore the impress of truth,
although it included statements that were improbable and unsubstantiated.
He asserted that the victim was a Lincolnshire lad, and not an Italian boy, although the latter was fully proved.
According to the confession, death had been inflicted by drowning in a well, whereas the medical evidence all pointed to violence.
It was, however, pretty clear that this victim, like preceding ones, had been lured to Nova Scotia Gardens, and there drugged with a large dose of laudanum.
While they were in a state of insensibility the murder was committed.
Bishop's confession was endorsed by Williams, and the immediate result was the respite of May.
A very painful scene occurred in Newgate when the news of his escape from death was imparted to May.
He fainted, and the warrant of mercy nearly proved his death-blow. The other two looked on at his agitation with an indifference amounting to apathy.
The execution took place a week or two later, in the presence of such a crowd as had not been seen near Newgate for years.
I will close this chapter with a brief account of another murder,
the memory of which is still fresh in the minds of Londoners, although half a century has passed since it was committed.
The horror with which Greenacre's crime struck the town was unparalleled since the time when Catherine Hayes slew her husband.
There were many features of resemblance in these crimes.
The decapitation and dismemberment, the bestowal of the remains in various parts of the town, the preservation of the head in spirits of wine,
in the hope that the features might some day be recognized, were alike in both.
The murder in both cases was long a profound mystery. In this which I am now describing,
a bricklayer found a human trunk near some new buildings in the Edgeware Road, one morning in the last week of eighteen thirty-six.
The inquest on these remains, which medical examination showed to be those of a female,
returned a verdict of willful murder against some person unknown.
On the seventh July, eighteen thirty-seven,
the lockman of "Ben Jonson lock," in Stepney Fields, found a human head jammed into the lock gates.
Closer investigation proved that it belonged to the trunk already discovered on the second February.
A further discovery was made in an osier bed near Cold Harbor Lane, Camberwell,
where a workman found a bundle containing two human legs, in a drain.
These were the missing members of the same mutilated trunk,
and there was now evidence sufficient to establish conclusively that the woman thus collected piecemeal had been barbarously done to death.
But the affair still remained a profound mystery. No light was thrown upon it till, towards the end of March,
a Mr. Gay of Goodge Street came to view the head, and immediately recognized it as that of a widowed sister, Hannah Brown,
who had been missing since the previous Christmas Day.
The murdered individual was thus identified. The next step was to ascertain where and with whom she had last been seen.
This brought suspicion on to a certain James Greenacre,
whom she was to have married, and in whose company she had left her own lodgings to visit his in Camberwell.
The police wished to refer to Greenacre, but as he was not forthcoming,
a warrant was issued for his apprehension, which was effected at Kennington on the twenty-fourth March.
A woman named Gale, who lived with him, was arrested at the same time. The prisoners were examined at the Marylebone police court.
Greenacre, a stout, middle-aged man, wrapped in a brown greatcoat, assumed an air of insolent bravado;
but his despair must have been great, as was evident from his attempt to strangle himself in the station-house.
Suspicion grew almost to certainty as the evidence was unfolded.
Mrs. Brown was a washer-woman, supposed to be worth some money; hence Greenacre's offer of marriage.
She had realized all her effects, and brought them with her furniture to Greenacre's lodgings. The two when married were to emigrate to Hudson's Bay.
Whether it was greed or a quarrel that drove Greenacre to the desperate deed remains obscure.
They were apparently good friends when last seen together at a neighbor's, where they seemed "perfectly happy and sociable, and eager for the wedding day."
But Greenacre in his confession pretended that he and his intended had quarreled over her property or the want of it,
and that in a moment of anger he knocked her down.
He thought he had killed her, and in his terror began at once to consider how he might dispose of the body and escape arrest.
While she was senseless, but really still alive, he cut off her head, and dismembered the body in the manner already described.
It is scarcely probable that he would have gone to this extremity if he had had no previous evil intention,
and the most probable inference is that he inveigled Mrs. Brown to his lodgings with the set purpose of taking her life.
His measures for the disposal of the corpus delicti remind us of those taken by Mrs. Hayes and her associates,
or of Gardelle's frantic efforts to conceal his crime.
The most ghastly part of the story is that which deals with his getting rid of the head.
This, wrapped up in a silk handkerchief,
he carried under his coat-flaps through the streets, and afterwards on his cap in a crowded city omnibus.
It was not until he left the bus, and walked up by the Regent's Canal, that he conceived the idea of throwing the head into the water.
Another day elapsed before he got rid of the rest of the body,
all of which, according to his own confession, made no doubt with the idea of exonerating Mrs. Gale, he accomplished without her assistance.
On the other hand, it was adduced in evidence that Mrs. Gale had been at his lodgings the very day after the murder,
and was seen to be busily engaged in washing down the house with bucket and mop.
Greenacre, when tried at the Old Bailey, admitted that he had been guilty of manslaughter.
While conversing with Mrs. Brown, he declared the unfortunate woman was rocking herself to and fro in a chair;
as she leant back he put his foot against the chair, and so tilted it over.
Mrs. Brown fell with it, and Greenacre, to his horror, found that she was dead.
But the medical evidence was clear that the decapitation had been effected during life, and the jury, after a short deliberation,
without hesitation brought in a verdict of willful murder.
The woman Gale was also found guilty, but sentence of death was only passed on Greenacre.
The execution was, as usual, attended by an immense concourse, and Greenacre died amidst the loudest execrations.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section sixteen: Newgate notorieties continued, part one.
As the century advanced crimes of fraud increased.
They not only became more numerous, but they were on a wider scale.
The most extensive and systematic robberies were planned and carried out so as long to escape detection.
One of the earliest of the big operators in fraudulent finance was Edward Beaumont Smith,
who was convicted in eighteen forty-one of uttering false exchequer bills to an almost fabulous amount.
A not entirely novel kind of fraud, but one carried out on a larger scale than heretofore,
came to light in this same year, eighteen forty-one.
This was the willful shipwreck and casting away of a vessel which, with her supposed cargo, had been heavily insured.
The 'Dryad' was a brig owned principally by two persons named Wallace, one a seaman, the other merchant.
She was freighted by the firm of Zulueta and Co. for a voyage to Santa Cruz.
Her owners insured her for a full sum of two thousand pounds, after which the Wallaces insured her privily
with other underwriters for a second sum of two thousand pounds.
After this, on the faith of forced bills of lading, the captain, Loose by name,
being a party to the intended fraud, they obtained further insurances on goods never shipped.
It was fully proved in evidence that when the Dryad sailed she carried nothing but the cargo belonging to Zulueta and Co.
Yet the Wallaces pretended to have put on board quantities of flannels, cloths, cotton prints,
beef, pork, butter, and earthenwares, on all of which they effected insurances.
Loose had his instructions to cast away the ship on the first possible opportunity, and from the time of his leaving Liverpool
he acted in a manner which excited the suspicions of the crew.
The larboard pump was suffered to remain choked up, and the long-boat was fitted with tackles and held ready for use at a moment's notice.
The ship, however, met with exasperatingly fine weather, and it was not until the captain reached the West India Islands
that he got a chance of accomplishing his crime.
At a place called the Silver Keys he ran the ship on the reef.
But another ship, concluding that he was acting in ignorance, rendered him assistance.
The 'Dryad' was got off, repaired, and her voyage renewed to Santa Cruz.
He crept along the coast close in shore, looking for a quiet spot to cast away the ship,
and at last, when within fifteen miles of port, with wind and weather perfectly fair, he ran her on to the rocks.
Even then she might have been saved, but the captain would not suffer the crew to act. Nearly the whole of the cargo was lost as well as the ship.
The captain and crew, however, got safely to Jamaica, and so to England; the captain dying on the voyage home.
The crime soon became public.
Mate, carpenter, and crew were eager to disavow complicity, and voluntarily gave information.
The Wallaces were arrested, committed to Newgate, and tried at the Old Bailey.
The case was clearly proved against them, and both were sentenced to transportation for life.
While lying in Newgate, awaiting removal to the convict ship, both prisoners made full confessions.
According to their own statements the loss of the 'Dryad' was only one of six intentional shipwrecks with which they had been concerned.
The crime of fraudulent insurance they declared was very common, and the underwriters must have lost great sums in this way.
The merchant Wallace said he had been led into the crime by the advice and example of a city friend who had gone largely into this nefarious business;
this Wallace added that his friend had made several voyages with the distinct intention of superintending the predetermined shipwrecks.
The other Wallace, the sailor, also traced his lapse into crime to evil counsel.
He was an honest sea-captain, he said, trading from Liverpool, where once he had the misfortune to be introduced to a man of wealth,
the foundations of which had been laid by buying old ships on purpose to cast them away.
This person made much of Wallace, encouraged his attentions to his daughter,
and tempted him to take to fraudulent insurance as a certain method of achieving fortune.
Wallace's relations warned him against his Liverpool friend,
but he would not take their advice, and developing his transactions, ended as we have seen.
A clergyman nearly a century later followed in the steps of Dr. Dodd, but did not under more humane laws lose his life.
The Rev. W. Bailey, LL.D., was convicted at the Central Criminal Court, in February eighteen forty-three, of forgery.
A notorious miser, Robert Smith, had recently died in Seven Dials, where he had amassed a considerable fortune.
But among the charges on the estate he left
was a promissory note for two thousand eight hundred seventy-five pounds, produced by Dr. Bailey, and purporting to be signed by Smith.
The executors to the estate disputed the validity of this document.
Miss Bailey, the doctor's sister, in whose favor the note was said to have been given,
then brought an action against the administrators, and at the trial Dr. Bailey swore that the note had been given him by Smith.
The jury did not believe him, and the verdict was for the defendants.
Subsequently Bailey was arrested on a charge of forgery, and after a long trial found guilty. His sentence was transportation for life.
A gigantic conspiracy to defraud was discovered in the following year, when a solicitor named William Henry Barber,
Joshua Fletcher a surgeon, and three others were charged with forging wills for the purpose of obtaining unclaimed stock in the funds.
There were two separate affairs.
In the first a maiden lady, Miss Slack,
who was the possessor of two separate sums in consols, neglected through strange carelessness on her own part and that of her friends
to draw the dividends on more than one sum.
The other, remaining unclaimed for ten years, was transferred at the end of that time to the commissioners for the reduction of the National Debt.
Barber, it was said, became aware of this,
and that he gained access to Miss Slack on pretense of conveying to her some funded property left her by an aunt.
By this means her signature was obtained; a forged will was prepared bequeathing the unclaimed stock to Miss Slack;
a note purporting to be from Miss Slack was addressed to the governor of the Bank of England, begging that the said stock might be handed over to her,
and a person calling herself Miss Slack duly attended at the bank, where the money was handed over to her in proper form.
A second will, also forged, was propounded at Doctors Commons as that of a Mrs. Hunt of Bristol.
Mrs. Hunt had left money in the funds which remained unclaimed, and had been transferred, as in Miss Slack's case.
Here again the money, with ten years' interest, was handed over to Barber and another calling himself Thomas Hunt, an executor of the will.
It was shown that the will must be a forgery,
as its signature was dated eighteen twenty-nine, whereas Mrs. Hunt actually died in eighteen oh six.
A third similar fraud to the amount of two thousand pounds was also brought to light.
Fletcher was the moving spirit of the whole business. It was he who had introduced Barber to Miss Slack,
and held all the threads of these intricate and nefarious transactions.
Barber and Fletcher were both transported for life, although Fletcher declared that Barber was innocent, and had no guilty knowledge of what was being done.
Barber was subsequently pardoned, but was not replaced on the rolls as an attorney till eighteen fifty-five,
when Lord Campbell delivered judgment on Barber's petition, to the effect that
the evidence to establish his (Barber's) connivance in the frauds was too doubtful for us to continue his exclusion any longer.
Banks and bankers continued to be victimized.
the Bank of England was defrauded of a sum of eight thousand pounds by one of its clerks, Burgess, in conjunction with an accomplice named Elder.
Burgess fraudulently transferred consols to the above amount, standing in the name of Mr. Oxenford, to another party.
A person, Elder of course, who personated Oxenford, attended at the bank to complete the transfer and sell the stock.
Burgess, who was purposely on leave from the bank, effected the sale, which was paid for with a cheque for nearly the whole amount on Lubbock's Bank.
Burgess and Elder proceeded in company to cash this, but as they wanted all gold,
the cashier gave them eight Bank of England notes for one thousand pounds each, saying that they could get so much specie nowhere else.
Thither Elder went alone, provided with a number of canvas and one large carpet-bag.
But when the latter was filled with gold it was too heavy to lift,
and Elder had to be assisted by two bank porters, who carried it for him to a carriage waiting near the Mansion House.
The thieves, for Elder was soon joined by Burgess, drove together to Ben Caunt's, the pugilist's, public-house in St. Martin's Lane,
where the cash was transferred from the carpet-bag to a portmanteau.
The same evening both started for Liverpool, and embarking on board the mail steamer 'Britannia,' escaped to the United States.
Burgess' continued absence was soon noticed at the bank.
Suspicions were aroused when it was found that he had been employed in selling stock for Mr. Oxenford, which developed into certainty
as soon as that gentleman was referred to.
Mr. Oxenford having denied that he had made any transfer of stock, the matter was at once put into the hands of the police.
A smart detective, Forrester, after a little inquiry,
established the fact that the man who had personated Mr. Oxenford was a horse-dealer named Joseph Elder, an intimate acquaintance of Burgess'.
Forrester next traced the fugitives to Liverpool,
and thence to Halifax, whither he followed them, accompanied by a confidential clerk from the bank.
At Halifax Forrester learnt that the men he wanted had gone on to Boston, thence to Buffalo and Canada, and back to Boston.
He found them at length residing at the latter place, one as a landed proprietor, the other as a publican.
Elder, the former, was soon apprehended at his house, but he evaded the law by hanging himself with his pocket-handkerchief.
The inn belonging to Burgess was surrounded
but he escaped through a back door on to the river, and rowed off in a boat to a hiding-place in the woods.
Next day a person betrayed him for the reward, and he was soon captured.
The proceeds of the robbery were lodged in a Boston bank,
but four hundred sovereigns were found on Elder, while two hundred more were found in Burgess' effects.
Burgess was eventually brought back to England, tried at the Central Criminal Court, and sentenced to transportation for life.
Within a month or two the bank of Messrs. Rogers and Co., Clement's Lane, was broken into.
Robberies as daring in conception as they were boldly executed were common enough.
One night a quantity of plate was stolen from Windsor Castle; another time Buckingham Palace was robbed.
Of this class was the ingenious yet peculiarly simple robbery effected at the house of Lord Fitzgerald in Belgrave Square.
The butler, on the occasion of a death in the family, when the house was in some confusion, arranged with a burglar to come in,
and with another carry off the plate-chest in broad daylight, and as a matter of business. No one interfered or asked any questions.
The thief walked into the house in Belgrave Square, and openly carried off the plate-chest, deposited it in a light cart at the door, and drove away.
Howse, the steward, accused the other servants, but they retorted, declaring that he had been visited by the thief the day previous,
whom he had shown over the plate closet.
Howse and his accomplice were arrested; the former was found guilty and sentenced to fifteen years, but the latter was acquitted.
Stealing plate was about this period the crime of a more aristocratic thief.
The club spoons and other articles of plate were long a source of profitable income to a gentleman named Ashley,
who belonged to five good London clubs --
the Junior United Service, the Union, Reform, Colonial, and Erechtheum clubs.
When one of these clubs was taken in at the Army and Navy, that establishment also suffered.
Suspicion fell at length upon Ashley, who was seen to handle the forks and spoons at table in a strange manner.
A watch was set on his house, in Allington Street, Pimlico,
and one day a police constable tracked him to a silversmith's in Holborn Hill,
where Ashley produced four silver spoons, and begged that his initials might be engraved upon them.
Ashley was arrested as he left the shop; the spoons were impounded, and it was found that the club monogram had been erased from them.
On a search of the prisoner's lodgings in Allington Street, a silver fork was found,
a number of pawnbrokers' duplicates, and three small files. It was proved at the trial that Ashley had asked his landlady for brick-dust and leather,
and it was contended that these with the files were used to alter the marks on the plate.
At most of the clubs the servants had been mulcted to make good lost plate, which had no doubt been stolen by the prisoner.
Several pawnbrokers were subpoenaed and obliged to surrender plate, to the extent in some cases of a couple of dozen of spoons or forks,
which the various club secretaries identified as the property of their respective clubs.
Ashley was the son of an army agent and banker,
and many witnesses were brought to attest to his previous good character, but he was found guilty and sentenced to seven years' transportation.
A robbery of a somewhat novel kind was executed in rather a bungling fashion by Ker, a sea-captain,
whose ship brought home a mixed cargo from Bahia and other ports.
Part of the freight were four hundred rough diamonds valued at four thousand pounds.
These packages were consigned to Messrs. Shroeder of London; and as it was known that they were to arrive in Ker's ship,
one of the owners had met her at Deal, but the captain had already absconded with the packages of precious stones in his pocket.
Ker came at once to London, and, by the help of the landlord of a public-house in Smithfield and others, disposed of the whole of the diamonds.
A Jew named Benjamin effected the sale to certain merchants named Blogg and Martin,
who declared that the rough diamond market was in such a depressed condition that they could only afford to give one thousand seven fifty pounds for stones worth
The circumstances of this purchase of brilliants from a stranger at such an inadequate price was strongly commented upon at Ker's trial.
The moment it was discovered that the diamonds had disappeared, the affair was taken up by the police.
Forrester, the detective who had pursued and captured Burgess at Boston, tracked Ker to France, and following him there, eventually captured him
at Montreuil. He was arraigned at the Old Bailey, and the case fully proved. His sentence was seven years' transportation.
The gravest crimes continued at intervals to inspire the town with horror, and concentrate public attention upon the jail of Newgate,
and the murderers immured within its walls.
Courvoisier's case made a great stir. There was unusual atrocity in this murder of an aged, infirm gentleman,
a scion of the ducal house of Bedford, by his confidential valet and personal attendant.
Lord William Russell lived alone in Norfolk Street, Park Lane. He was a widower, and seventy-three years of age.
One morning in May his lordship was found dead in his bed with his throat cut.
The fact of the murder was first discovered by the housemaid,
who, on going down early, was surprised to find the dining-room in a state of utter confusion;
the furniture turned upside down, the drawers of the escritoire open and rifled,
a bundle lying on the floor, as though thieves had been interrupted in the act.
The housemaid summoned the cook, and both went to call the valet, Courvoisier,
who came from his room ready dressed, a suspicious circumstance, as he was always late in the morning.
The housemaid suggested that they should see if his lordship was all right, and the three went to his bedroom.
While Courvoisier opened the shutters, the housemaid, approaching the bed, saw that the pillow was saturated with blood.
The discovery of the murdered man immediately followed. The neighborhood was alarmed, the police sent for, and a close inquiry forthwith commenced.
That Lord William Russell had committed suicide was at once declared impossible.
It was also clearly proved that no forcible entry had been made into the house;
the fresh marks of violence upon the door had evidently been made inside, and not from outside;
moreover, the instruments, poker and chisel, by which they had no doubt been effected,
were found in the butler's pantry, used by Courvoisier.
The researches of the police soon laid bare other suspicious facts.
The bundle found in the dining-room contained, with clothes, various small articles of plate and jewelery which a thief would probably have put into his pocket.
Upstairs in the bedroom a rouleaux box for sovereigns had been broken open,
also the jewel-box and note-case, from the latter of which was abstracted a ten-pound note known to have been in the possession of the deceased.
His lordship's watch was gone.
Further suspicion was caused by the position of a book and a wax candle by the bedside.
The latter was so placed that it could throw no light on the former, which was a 'Life of Sir Samuel Romilly.'
The intention of the real murderer to shift the crime to burglars was evident although futile,
and the police, feeling convinced that the crime had been committed by some inmate of the house,
took Courvoisier into custody, and placed the two female servants under surveillance.
The valet's strange demeanor had attracted attention from the first.
He had hung over the body in a state of dreadful agitation, answering no questions, and taking no part in the proceedings.
Three days later a close search of the butler's pantry produced fresh circumstantial evidence.
Behind the skirting board several of his lordship's rings were discovered;
near it was his Waterloo medal, and the above-mentioned ten-pound note.
Further investigation was rewarded by the discovery in the pantry of a split gold ring, used by Lord William to carry his keys on;
next, and in the same place, a chased gold key;
and at last his lordship's watch was found secreted under the leads of the sink.
All this was evidence sufficient to warrant Courvoisier's committal for trial;
but still he found friends, and a liberal subscription was raised among the foreign servants in London to provide funds for his defense.
Courvoisier, when put on his trial, pleaded not guilty;
but on the second day the discovery of fresh evidence, more particularly the recovery of some of Lord William's stolen plate,
induced the prisoner to make a full confession of his crime to the lawyers who defended him.
This placed them in a position of much embarrassment. To have thrown up their brief would have been to have secured Courvoisier's conviction.
Mr. Phillips, who led in the case, went to the other extreme,
and in an impassioned address implored the jury not to send an innocent man to the gallows.
It will be remembered that the question whether Mr. Phillips had not exceeded the limits usually allowed to counsel was much debated at the time.
The jury without hesitation found Courvoisier guilty, and he was sentenced to death.
The prisoner's demeanor had greatly changed during the trial.
Coolness amounting almost to effrontery gave way to hopeless dejection.
On his removal to Newgate after sentence,
he admitted that he had been justly convicted, and expressed great anxiety that his fellow-servants should be relieved from all suspicion.
Later in the day he tried to commit suicide by cramming a towel down his throat, but was prevented.
Next morning he made a full confession in presence of his attorney, and the governor, Mr. Cope.
In this he gave as the motives of his crime a quarrel he had with his master, who threatened to discharge him without a character.
Lord William, according to the valet, was of a peevish, difficult temper;
he was annoyed with his man for various small omissions and acts of forgetfulness, and on the night of the murder had taken Courvoisier to task rather sharply.
Finally, on coming downstairs after bed-time, Lord William had found Courvoisier in the dining-room.
What are you doing here? asked his lordship.
You can have no good intentions; you must quit my service tomorrow morning.
This seems to have decided Courvoisier,
who took a carving-knife from the sideboard in the dining-room, went upstairs to Lord William's bedroom, and drew the knife across his throat.
He appeared to die instantly, said the murderer, in conclusion.
His account of his acts and movements after the deed
varied so considerably in the several documents he left behind, that too much reliance cannot be placed upon his confession.
His last statement contains the words, "The public now think I am a liar, and they will not believe me when I say the truth."
This was no doubt the case, but this much truth his confession may be taken to contain:
that Courvoisier was idle, discontented, ready to take offense, greedy of gain;
that he could not resist the opportunity for robbery offered him by his situation at Lord William Russell's; that when vexed with his master
he did not shrink from murder, both for revenge and to conceal his other crimes.
Courvoisier wished to commit suicide in Newgate, but was prevented by the vigilant supervision to which he was subjected while in jail.
The attempt was to have been made by opening a vein and allowing himself to bleed to death.
The Sunday night before his execution he would not go to bed when ordered.
The governor insisted, but Courvoisier showed great reluctance to strip.
The order was, however, at length obeyed, and the whole of the prisoner's clothes were minutely searched.
In the pocket of the coat Mr. Cope, the governor, found a neatly-folded cloth, and asked what it was for.
Courvoisier admitted that he had intended to bind it tightly round his arm and bleed himself to death in the night.
The next inquiry was how he hoped to open a vein. "With a bit of sharpened stick picked out of the ordinary firewood."
Where is it? asked the governor.
The prisoner replied that he had left it in the mattress of which he had just been deprived.
The bed was searched, but no piece of sharpened wood was found. It was thought that it might have been lost in changing the mattresses.
The cloth above referred to belonged to the inner seam of his trousers, which he had managed to tear out.
There is nothing to show that Courvoisier really contemplated self-destruction.
A murder which reproduced many of the features of that committed by Greenacre soon followed, and excited the public mind even more than that of Courvoisier's.
Daniel Good's crime might have remained long undiscovered but for his own careless stupidity.
He was coachman to a gentleman at Roehampton. One day he went into a pawnbroker's at Wandsworth, and bought a pair of breeches on credit.
At the same time he was seen to steal and secrete a pair of trousers. The shop-boy gave information.
Good was followed to his stables by a policeman, but obstinately denied the theft.
The policeman insisted on searching the premises, at which Good displayed some uneasiness.
This increased when the officer, accompanied by two others, a neighbor and a bailiff, entered one of the stables.
Good now offered to go to Wandsworth and satisfy the pawnbroker.
Just at this moment, however, the searchers found concealed under two trusses of hay a woman's headless and dismembered trunk.
At the constable's cry of alarm Good rushed from the stable and locked the door behind him.
Some time elapsed before the imprisoned party could force open the doors, and by then the fugitive had escaped.
Medical assistance having been summoned, it was ascertained how the dismemberment had been effected.
At the same time an overpowering odor attracted them to the adjoining harness-room, where the missing remains were raked out
half consumed in the ashes of a wood fire.
In the same room a large axe and saw were found covered with blood.
Inquiry into the character of Good exposed him as a loose liver, who "kept company" with several women.
One called his sister, but supposed to be his wife, had occupied a room in South Street, Manchester Square,
with a son of Good's by a former wife. Another wife, real or fictitious, existed in Spitalfields,
and evidence was given of close relation between Good and a third woman, a girl named Butcher, residing at Woolwich.
The victim was the first of these three.
Good had told her, much to her perturbation, that she was to move from South Street to Roehampton, and one day he fetched her.
They were seen together on Barnes Common, and again in Putney Park Lane, where they were talking loud and angrily.
The poor creature was never seen again alive.
The actual method of the murder was never exactly ascertained.
Good himself remained at large for some weeks. He had tramped as far as Tunbridge, where he obtained work as a bricklayer's laborer;
he there gave satisfaction for industry, but he was taciturn, and would hold no converse with his fellows.
The woman where he lodged noticed that he was very restless at night, moaning and sighing much. Detection came unexpectedly.
He was recognized by an ex-policeman who had known him at Roehampton, and immediately arrested.
In his effects were found the clothes he had on at the time of his escape from the stables, and under the jacket he was wearing
was a piece of a woman's calico apron stained with blood, which he had used to save the pressure on his shoulder by the hod.
Good was committed to Newgate, and tried at the Central Criminal Court before a crowded court.
He made a rambling defense, ending by saying,
Good ladies and gentlemen all, I have a great deal more to say, but I am so bad I cannot say it.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section seventeen: Newgate notorieties continued, part two.
Hocker's murder is in its way interesting, as affording another proof of the extraordinary way in which the culprit returned to the scene of his guilt.
The cries of his victim, a Mr. Delarue,
brought passers-by and policemen to the spot, a lonely place near a dead wall beyond Belsize Hall, Hampstead,
but too late to give substantial aid.
While the body lay there still warm, battered and bleeding from the cruel blows inflicted upon him by his cowardly assailant, a man came by singing.
He entered into conversation with the policemen, and learnt, as it seemed for the first time, what had happened.
His remark was, "It is a nasty job;" he took hold of the dead hand, and confessed that he felt "queer" at the shocking sight.
This sight was his own handiwork,
yet he could not overcome the strange fascination it had for him, and remained by the side of the corpse till the stretcher came.
Even then he followed it as far as Belsize Lane.
It was here that the others engaged in their dismal office in removing the dead first got a good look at the stranger's face.
He wanted a light for a cigar, and got it from a lantern which was lifted up and fully betrayed his features.
It was noticed that he wore a mackintosh. Next day the police, in making a careful search of the scene of the murder,
picked up a coat-button, which afterwards played an important part in the identification of the murderer.
A letter, which afforded an additional clue, was also found in the pocket of the deceased. Still it was many weeks before any arrest was made.
In the mean time the police were not idle.
It came out by degrees that the person who had been seen in Belsize Lane on the night the body was found was a friend of the deceased.
His name was Hocker; he was by trade a ladies' shoemaker; and it was also ascertained that after the day of the murder he was flush of money.
He was soon afterwards arrested on suspicion, and a search of his lodgings brought to light several garments saturated with blood;
a coat among them much torn and stained, with three buttons missing, one of which corresponded with that picked up at Hampstead.
The letter found in the pocket of the deceased was sealed with a wafer marked F,
and many of the same sort were found in the possession of the accused. This was enough to obtain a committal,
after several remands; but the case contained elements of doubt, and the evidence at the trial was entirely circumstantial.
A witness deposed to meeting Hocker, soon after the cries of murder were heard,
running at a dog-trot into London, and others swore that they plainly recognized him as the man seen soon afterwards in the lane.
A woman whom he called on the same evening declared he had worn a mackintosh, his coat was much torn, there was a stain of blood on his shirt-cuff,
and he was in possession, the first time to her knowledge, of a watch.
This was Delarue's watch, fully identified as such, which Hocker told his brother Delarue had given him the morning of the murder.
These were damnatory facts which well supported the prosecution.
The prisoner made an elaborate defense, in which he sought to vilify the character of deceased
as the seducer of an innocent girl to whom he (Hocker) had been fondly attached.
When her ruin was discovered her brother panted for revenge.
Hocker, whose skill in counterfeiting handwriting was known, was asked to fabricate a letter making an assignation with Delarue
in a lonely part of Hampstead.
Hocker and the brother went to the spot, where the latter left him to meet his sister's seducer alone.
Soon afterwards Hocker heard cries of "murder,"
and proceeding to where they came from, found Delarue dead, slain by the furious brother.
Hocker was so overcome, feeling himself the principal cause of the tragedy,
that he rushed to a slaughterhouse in Hampstead and purposely stained his clothes with blood.
Such an extravagant defense did not weigh with judge or jury;
the first summed up dead against the prisoner, and the latter, after retiring for ten minutes, found him guilty.
Hocker's conduct in Newgate while under sentence of death was most extraordinary.
He drew up several long statements, containing narratives purely fictitious, imputing crimes to his victim, and repeating his line of defense
that Delarue had suffered by the hands of imaginary outraged brothers acting as the avengers of females deeply injured by him.
Hocker made several pretended confessions and revelations, all of which were proved to be absolutely false by the police on inquiry.
His demeanor was a strange compound of wickedness, falsehood, and deceit.
But at the fatal hour his hardihood forsook him, and he was almost insensible when taken out of his cell for execution.
Restoratives were applied, but he was in a fainting condition when tied, and had to be supported by the assistant executioner
while Calcraft adjusted the noose.
There was an epidemic of murder in the United Kingdom about eighteen forty-eight to nine.
In November of the first-named year occurred the wholesale slaughter of the Jermys in their house, Stanfield Hall, by the miscreant Rush.
a maidservant, Sarah Thomas, murdered her mistress, an aged woman, by beating out her brains with a stone.
Next year John Gleeson Wilson, at Liverpool, murdered a woman, Ann Henrichson, also a maidservant and two children;
while in Ireland a wife dashed out her husband's brains with a hammer.
London did not escape the contagion, and prominent among the detestable crimes of the period stands that of the Mannings at Bermondsey.
These great criminals suffered at Horsemonger Lane Jail, but they were tried at the Central Criminal Court, and were for some time inmates of Newgate.
Their victim was a man named Patrick O'Connor, a Custom-House gauger, who had been a suitor of Marie de Roux before she became Mrs. Manning.
Marie de Roux up to the time of her marriage had been in service as lady's maid to Lady Blantyre, daughter of the Duchess of Sutherland,
and Manning hoped to get some small Government appointment through his wife's interest.
He had failed in this as well as in the business of a publican, which he had at one time adopted.
After the marriage a close intimacy was still maintained between O'Connor and the Mannings.
He lived at Mile End, whence he walked often to call at three, Minver Place, Bermondsey, the residence of his old love.
O'Connor was a man of substance. He had long followed the profitable trade of a money-lender,
and by dint of usurious interest on small sums advanced to needy neighbors, had amassed as much as eight thousand pounds or ten thousand pounds.
His wealth was well known to "Maria," as he called Mrs. Manning, who made several ineffectual attempts to get money out of him.
At last this fiendish woman made up her mind to murder O'Connor and appropriate all his possessions.
Her husband, to whom she coolly confided her intention,
a heavy brutish fellow, was yet aghast at his wife's resolve, and tried hard to dissuade her from bad purpose.
In his confession after sentence he declared that she plied him well with brandy at this period,
and that during the whole time he was never in his right senses.
Meanwhile this woman, unflinching in her cold, bloody determination, carefully laid all her plans for the consummation of the deed.
One fine afternoon in August, O'Connor was met walking in the direction of Bermondsey.
He was dressed with particular care, as he was to dine at the Mannings and meet friends, one a young lady.
He was seen afterwards smoking and talking with his hosts in their back parlor, and never seen again alive.
It came out in the husband's confession that Mrs. Manning induced O'Connor to go down to the kitchen to wash his hands, that she followed him to the basement,
that she stood behind him as he stood near the open grave she herself had dug for him,
and which he mistook for a drain, and that while he was speaking to her she put the muzzle of a pistol close to the back of his head and shot him down.
She ran upstairs, told her husband, made him go down to look at her handiwork, and as O'Connor was not quite dead,
Manning gave the coup de grace with a crowbar.
After this Mrs. Manning changed her dress and went off in a cab to O'Connor's lodgings,
which, having possessed herself of the murdered man's keys, she rifled from end to end.
Returning to her own home, where Manning meantime had been calmly smoking and talking to the neighbors over the basement wall,
the corpse lying just inside the kitchen all the while, the two set to work to strip the body and hide it under the stones of the floor.
This job was not completed till the following day, as the hole had to be enlarged, and the only tool they had was a dust-shovel.
A quantity of quicklime was thrown in with the body to destroy all identification.
This was on a Thursday evening.
For the remainder of that week and part of the next the murderers stayed in the house, and occupied the kitchen, close to the remains of their victim.
On the Sunday Mrs. Manning roasted a goose at this same kitchen fire, and ate it with relish in the afternoon.
This cold-blooded indifference after the event was only outdone by the premeditation of this horrible murder.
The hole must have been excavated and the quicklime purchased quite three weeks before O'Connor met his death,
and during that time he must frequently have stood or sat over his own grave.
Discovery of the murder came in this wise. O'Connor, a punctual and well-conducted official, was at once missed at the London Docks.
On the third day his friends began to inquire for him,
and at their request two police officers were sent to Bermondsey to inquire for him at the Mannings, with whom it was well known that he was very intimate.
The Mannings had seen or heard nothing of him, of course. As O'Connor still did not turn up, the police after a couple of days returned to Minver Place.
The house was empty, bare and stripped of all its furniture, and its former occupants had decamped.
The circumstance was suspicious, and a search was at once made of the whole premises.
In the back kitchen one of the detectives remarked that the cement between certain stones looked lighter than the rest, and on trying it with a knife,
he found that it was soft and new, while elsewhere it was set and hard.
The stones were at once taken up;
beneath them was a layer of fresh mortar, beneath that a lot of loose earth, amongst which a stocking was turned up, and presently a human toe.
Six inches lower the body of O'Connor was uncovered.
He was lying on his face, his legs tied up to his hips so as to allow of the body fitting into the hole.
The lime had done its work so rapidly that the features would have been indistinguishable but for the prominent chin and a set of false teeth.
The corpse settled all doubts, and the next point was to lay hands upon the Mannings.
It was soon ascertained that the wife had gone off in a cab with a quantity of luggage.
Part of this she had deposited to be left till called for at one station, while she had gone herself to another, that at Euston Square.
At the first the boxes were impounded, opened, and found to contain many of O'Connor's effects.
At the second exact information was obtained of Mrs. Manning's movements. She had gone to Edinburgh.
A telegraphic message, then newly adapted to the purposes of criminal detection,
advised the Edinburgh police of the whole affair, and within an hour an answer was telegraphed, stating that Mrs. Manning was in custody.
She had been to brokers to negotiate the sale of certain foreign railway stock, with which they had been warned from London not to deal,
and they had given information to the police.
Her arrest was planned, and, when the telegram arrived from London, completed.
An examination of her boxes disclosed a quantity of O'Connor's property.
Mrs. Manning was transferred to London and lodged in the Horsemonger Lane Jail, where her husband soon afterwards joined her.
He had fled to Jersey, where he was recognized and arrested.
Each tried to throw the blame on the other; Manning declared his wife had committed the murder, Mrs. Manning indignantly denied the charge.
The prisoners were in due course transferred to Newgate, to be put upon their trial at the Central Criminal Court.
A great number of distinguished people assembled as usual at the Old Bailey on the day of trial.
The Mannings were arraigned together; the husband standing at one of the front corners of the dock, his wife at the other end.
Manning, who was dressed in black, appeared to be a heavy, bull-necked, repulsive-looking man, with a very fair complexion and light hair.
Mrs. Manning was not without personal charms;
her face was comely, she had dark hair and good eyes, and was above the middle height, yet inclined to be stout.
She was smartly dressed in a plaid shawl, a white lace cap;
her hair was dressed in long crepe bands. She had lace ruffles at her wrist, and wore primrose-colored kid gloves.
The case rested upon the facts which have been already set forth, and was proved to the satisfaction of the jury, who brought in a verdict of guilty.
Manning, when sentence of death was passed on him, said nothing;
but Mrs. Manning, speaking in a foreign accent, addressed the court with great fluency and vehemence.
She complained that she had no justice; there was no law for her, she had found no protection either from judges, the prosecutor, or her husband.
She had not been treated like a Christian, but like a wild beast of the forest. She declared that the money found in her possession had been sent her from abroad;
that O'Connor had been more to her than her husband, that she ought to have married him.
It was against common sense to charge her with murdering the only friend she had in the world;
the culprit was really her husband, who killed O'Connor out of jealousy and revengeful feelings.
When the judge assumed the black cap
Mrs. Manning became still more violent, shouting, "No, no, I will not stand it! You ought to be ashamed of yourselves!"
and would have left the dock had not Mr. Cope, the governor of Newgate, restrained her.
After judgment was passed she repeatedly cried out Shame!
and stretching out her hand, she gathered up a quantity of the rue which, following ancient custom dating from the days of the jail fever,
was strewn in front of the dock, and sprinkled it towards the bench with a contemptuous gesture.
On being removed to Newgate from the court Mrs. Manning became perfectly furious.
She uttered loud imprecations, cursing judge, jury, barristers, witnesses, and all who stood around.
They had to handcuff her by force against the most violent resistance, and still she raged and stormed,
shaking her clenched and manacled hands in the officers' faces.
From Newgate the Mannings were taken in separate cabs to Horsemonger Lane Jail.
On this journey her manner changed completely. She became flippant, joked with the officers, asked how they liked her "resolution" in the dock,
and expressed the utmost contempt for her husband, whom she never intended to acknowledge or speak to again.
Later her mood changed to abject despair.
On reaching the condemned cell she threw herself upon the floor and shrieked in an hysterical agony of tears.
After this, until the day of execution, she recovered her spirits, and displayed reckless effrontery,
mocking at the chaplain, and turning a deaf ear to the counsels of a benevolent lady who came to visit.
Now she abused the jury, now called Manning a vagabond,
and through all ate heartily at every meal, slept soundly at nights, and talked with cheerfulness on almost any subject.
Nevertheless, she attempted to commit suicide by driving her nails, purposely left long, into her throat.
She was discovered just as she was getting black in the face.
Manning's demeanor was more in harmony with his situation, and the full confession he made
elucidated all dark and uncertain points in connection with the crime.
The actual execution, which took place at another prison than Newgate, is rather beyond the scope of this work.
But it may be mentioned that the concourse was so enormous that it drew down the well-merited and trenchant disapproval of Charles Dickens,
who wrote to the 'Times,' saying that he believed "a sight so inconceivably awful
as the wickedness and levity of the immense crowd collected at the execution this morning could be imagined by no man,
and presented by no heathen land under the sun.
faded in my mind before the atrocious bearing, looks, and language of the assembled spectators.
When I came upon the scene at midnight, the shrillness of the cries and howls that were raised from time to time,
denoting that they came from a concourse of boys and girls already assembled in the best places, made my blood run cold.
It will be in the memory of many that Mrs. Manning appeared on the scaffold in a black satin dress, which was bound tightly round her waist.
This preference brought the costly stuff into disrepute, and its unpopularity lasted for nearly thirty years.
I will briefly describe one or two of the more remarkable murders in the years immediately following, then pass on to another branch of crime.
Robert Marley at the time of his arrest called himself a surgical instrument maker.
It was understood also that he had served in the army as a private, and had, moreover, undergone a sentence of transportation.
But it was supposed that he had been once in a good position, well born, and well educated.
When lying under sentence of death in Newgate, he was visited by a lady, a gentlewoman in every sense of the word, who was said to be his sister.
His determined addiction to evil courses had led to his being cast off by his family,
and he must have been at the end of his resources when he committed the crime for which he suffered.
His offense was the murder of Richard Cope,
a working jeweler, shopman to a Mr. Berry of Parliament Street. It was Cope's duty to stay in the shop till the last, close the shutters,
secure the stock of watches and jewelry, then lock up the place and take on the keys to Mr. Berry's private house in Pimlico.
Cope, a small man, crippled, and of weakly constitution, was alone in the shop about nine:thirty.
the shutters were up, and he was preparing to close, when Marley entered and fell upon him with a life-preserver,
meaning to kill him and rifle the shop.
The noise of the struggle was heard outside in the street,
and bystanders peeped in through the shutters, but no one entered or sought to interfere in what seemed only a domestic quarrel.
Lerigo, was also attracted by the noise of the row, but after walking a few paces he felt dissatisfied, and returned to the spot.
Pushing the shop-door open, he saw Marley finishing his murderous assault.
Lerigo turned for assistance to take the man into custody.
Marley, disturbed, picked up a cigar and parcel from the counter, then ran out, pursued by Lerigo only.
Marley ran along the street, down into Cannon Row
then into Palace Yard, where the waterman of the cab-tank, in obedience to Lerigo's shouts, collared the fugitive.
Escorted by his two captors, Marley was taken back into Parliament Street to the jeweler's shop.
The policemen were now in possession;
two of them supported Cope, who was still alive, although insensible, and Marley was apprehended. The evidence against him was completed
by his identification by Cope in Westminster Hospital, who survived long enough to make a formal deposition before Mr. Jardine,
the police magistrate, that Marley was the man who had beaten him to death.
Marley at his trial was undefended, and the sheriffs offered him counsel; but he declined. The witnesses against him all spoke the truth, he said;
there was no case to make out; why waste money on lawyers for the defense? His demeanor was cool and collected throughout;
he seemed while in Newgate to realize thoroughly that there was no hope for him, and was determined to face his fate bravely.
After sentence, the Newgate officers who had special charge of him noticed that he slept well and ate well, enjoying all his meals.
One of them went into his cell just at dinner-time;
the great clock of St. Sepulchre's close by was striking the hour, and Marley, who had his elbows on the table,
with his head resting on his hands, looked up and observed calmly, "Go along, clock; come along, gallows."
On the dread morning he came out to execution quite gaily, and tripped up the stairs to the scaffold.
His captors, it may be added (Lerigo and Allen), were warmly commended by the judge for their courage and activity.
The former was given a reward of twenty and the latter of ten pounds.
A murderous assault on a police constable, which so nearly ended fatally that the culprit was sentenced to death, although not executed,
was perpetrated in eighteen fifty-two. The case was accompanied with the most shocking brutality.
Cannon, by trade a chimney-sweep, had long been characterized by the bitterest hatred of the police force,
and had been repeatedly sentenced to imprisonment for most desperate and ferocious attacks upon various constables. His last victim was Dwyer,
a fine young officer who had been summoned to take Cannon into custody when the latter was drunk and riotous in front of a public-house.
Dwyer found Cannon bleeding profusely from a wound in the head, and persuaded him to go to a doctor's.
They walked together quietly for some little distance, then Cannon, without the slightest warning,
threw the constable on his back, and violently assaulted him by jumping on his chest and stomach,
and by getting his hand inside Dwyer's stock, with the idea of strangling him.
Dwyer managed to overpower his assailant, and got to his feet; but Cannon butted at him with his head, and again threw him to the ground,
after which he kicked his prostrate foe in the most brutal and cowardly manner, and until he was almost senseless, and bruised from head to foot.
Once more Dwyer got to his feet, and managed, by drawing his staff, to keep Cannon at bay until a second constable came to his aid.
All this time not one of a numerous body of bystanders offered to assist the policeman in his extremity.
On the contrary, many of them encouraged the brutal assailant in his savage attack.
To Cannon's infinite surprise, he was indicted for attempt to murder, and not for a simple assault, and found guilty.
The judge, in passing sentence of death, told him he richly deserved the punishment.
As Dwyer survived, Cannon escaped the death sentence, which was commuted to penal servitude for life.
A handsome sum was subscribed for the injured constable, who was disabled for life.
Only a few have vied with Cannon in fiendish cruelty and brutality.
One of these was Mobbs, who lived in the Minories,
generally known by the soubriquet of "General Haynau," a name execrated in England about this time.
Mobbs systematically ill-used his wife for a long space of time, and at last cut her throat.
For this he was executed in front of Newgate in eighteen thirty-three.
the French refugee, was a murderer of the same description, who dispatched his victim with a loaded cane, after which, to secure his escape,
he shot an old soldier who had attempted to detain him. He was convicted and executed.
He died impenitent, declaring that he had no belief, and that it was idle to ask forgiveness of God.
I want forgiveness of man; I want those doors (of the prison) opened.
Barthelemy was generally supposed to have been a secret agent of the French police.
I will now pass to grave but less atrocious crimes.
In eighteen fifty occurred the first of a series of gigantic frauds,
which followed each other at no long intervals, which had a strong family likeness, and originated all of them to make money easily,
without capital, and at railroad speed.
Walter Watts was an inventor, a creator, who struck an entirely new and original line of crime.
Employed as a clerk in the Globe Assurance,
he with unusual quickness of apprehension discovered and promptly turned to account an inexcusably lax system of management,
which offered peculiar chances of profit to an ingenious and unscrupulous man.
It was the custom in this office to make the banker's passbook the basis of the entries in the company's ledgers.
Thus, when a payment was made by the company, the amount disbursed was carried to account in the general books from its entry in the passbook,
and without reference to or comparison with the documents in which the payment was claimed.
This passbook, when not at the bank, was in the exclusive custody of Watts.
The cheques drawn by the directors also passed through his hands; to him too they came back to be verified and put by,
after they had been cashed by the bank.
In this way Watts had complete control over the whole of the monetary transactions of the company.
He could do what he liked with the passbook, and by its adoption, as described as the basis of all entries,
there was no independent check upon him if he chose to tamper with it.
This he did to an enormous extent,
continually altering, erasing, and adding figures to correspond with and cover the abstractions he made of various cheques as they were drawn.
It seems incredible that this passbook, which when produced in court
was a mass of blots and erasures, should not have created suspicion of foul play either at the bank or at the company's board.
Implicit confidence appears to have been placed in Watts, who was the son of an old and trusted employee, and, moreover, a young man of plausible address.
In the West End he was a man of fashion, with a town house, a house at Brighton, and a cellar full of good wine at both.
He rode a priceless hack in Rotten Row, or drove down to Richmond in a mail phaeton and pair.
He played high, and spent his nights at the club, or in joyous and dissolute company.
When other pleasures palled he took a theatre, and posed as a munificent patron of the dramatic art.
Under his auspices several "stars" appeared on the boards of the Marylebone theatre,
and later he became manager of the newly rebuilt Olympic at Wych Street.
No one cared too closely to inquire into the sources of wealth. Some said he was a fortunate speculator in stocks,
others that he had had extraordinary luck as a gold-digger. Had his West End and little-informed associates followed him into the city,
whither he was taken every morning in a smart brougham, they would have seen him alight from it in Cornhill,
and walk forward on foot to enter as a humble and unpretending employee the doors of the Globe Assurance office.
Nevertheless, in this position, through the culpable carelessness which left him unfettered, he managed between eighteen forty-four
and eighteen fifty to embezzle and apply to his own purposes some seventy-one thousand pounds.
The detection of these frauds came while he was still prominently before the world as the lessee of the Olympic.
Rumors were abroad that serious defalcations had been discovered in one of the insurance offices,
but it was long before the public realized that the fraudulent clerk and the great theatrical manager were one and the same person.
Watts's crime was discovered by the secretary of the Globe Company, who came suddenly upon the extensive falsification of the passbook.
An inquiry was at once set on foot, and the frauds were traced to Watts.
The latter, when first taxed with his offense, protested his innocence boldly, and positively denied all knowledge of the affair;
and he had so cleverly destroyed all traces that it was not easy to bring home the charge.
But it was proved that Watts had appropriated one cheque for fourteen hundred pounds,
which he had paid into his own bankers, and on this he was committed to Newgate for trial.
There were two counts in the indictment: one for stealing a cheque value fourteen hundred pounds, the second for stealing a bit of paper value one penny.
The jury found him guilty of the latter only, with a point of law reserved. This was fully argued before three judges,
and not for the slight offense as it appeared on the record.
The sentence of the court, one of ten years' transportation, struck the prisoner with dismay.
He had been led to suppose that twelve months' imprisonment was the utmost the law could inflict, and he broke down utterly under the unexpected blow.
That same evening he committed suicide in Newgate.
The details of the suicide were given at the inquest. Watts had been in ill-health from the time of his first arrest.
In Giltspur Street Compter, where he was first lodged
he showed symptoms of delirium tremens, and admitted that he had been addicted to the excessive use of stimulants.
His health improved, but was still indifferent when he was brought up for sentence, and he was an occupant of the Newgate infirmary.
He returned from court in a state of gloomy dejection,
and in the middle of the night one of the fellow-prisoners who slept in the same ward noticed that he was not in his bed.
This man got up to look for him, and found him hanging from the bars of a neighboring room.
He had made use of a piece of rope cut out from the sacking of his bedstead, and had tied his feet together with a silk pocket-handkerchief.
The prison officers were called, but Watts was quite cold and stiff when he was cut down.
Strange to say, a second suicide occurred in Newgate the same night,
that of a prize-fighter named Donovan, tried the same day, and convicted of manslaughter.
Sentence of death had been recorded against Donovan, who, like Watts, had seemingly been overcome with sudden despair.
In eighteen fifty-three a second case of gigantic fraud alarmed and scandalized the financial world.
It outshone the defalcations of Watts.
Nothing to equal the excitement caused by the forgeries of Robert Ferdinand Pries had been known before in the city of London.
He was a corn merchant who operated largely in grain.
So enormous were his transactions, that they often affected the markets, and caused great fluctuations in prices.
These had been attributed to political action; some thought that the large purchases in foreign grains, effected at losing prices,
were intended by the protectionists to depress the wheat market, and secure the support of the farmers at the forthcoming election;
others, that Napoleon the third, but recently proclaimed Emperor of the French, wished to gain the popularity necessary to secure the people.
Few realized that these mysterious operations were the "convulsive attempt" of a ruined and dishonest speculator to sustain his credit.
Pries, although enjoying a high reputation in the city, had long been in a bad way.
His extensive business had been carried on by fraud.
His method was to obtain advances twice over on the same bills of lading or corn warrants. The duplicates were forged.
In this way he obtained vast sums from several firms, and one to which he was indebted upwards of fifty thousand pounds subsequently stopped payment.
Pries at length was discovered
through a dishonored cheque for three thousand pounds, paid over as an installment of eighteen thousand pounds owing for an advance on warrants.
Inquiries were instituted when the cheque was protested, which led to the discovery of the forgeries.
Pries was lodged in Newgate, tried at the Old Bailey, and transported for life.
Another set of frauds, which resembled those of Pries in principle, although not in practice, were soon afterwards discovered.
proposed to gain the capital he needed for business purposes by raising money on dock warrants for imported goods which had no real existence.
When such goods arrived they were frequently left at a wharf, paying rent until it suited the importer to remove them.
The dock warrant was issued by the wharfinger as certificate that he held the goods.
The warrant thus represented money, and was often used as such, being endorsed and passed from hand to hand as other negotiable bills.
Cole's plan was to have a wharf of his own, nominally occupied by a creature trading as Maltby and Co.
Goods would be landed at this wharf;
Maltby and Co. would issue warrants on them deliverable to the importer, and the goods were then passed to be stored in neighboring warehouses.
The owners of the latter would then issue a second set of warrants on these goods, in total ignorance of the fact that they were already pledged.
Cole quickly raised money on both sets of warrants. He carried on this game for some time with great success,
and so developed his business that in one year his transactions amounted to a couple of millions of pounds.
He had several narrow escapes.
Once a warrant-holder sent down a clerk to view certain goods, and the clerk found that these goods had already a "stop" upon them, or were pledged.
Cole escaped by throwing the blame on a careless partner, and at once removed the "stop."
Again, some of the duplicate and fictitious warrants were held by a firm which suspended payment, and there was no knowing into whose hands they might fall.
Cole found out where they were, and redeemed them at a heavy outlay, thus obtaining business relations with the firm that held them,
which were soon developed, much to that firm's subsequent anger and regret.
Last of all, the well-known bankers Overend and Gurney, whose own affairs created much excitement some years later,
wishing to verify the value of warrants they held, and sending to Maltby and Co.'s wharf, found out half the truth.
These bankers, wishing for more specific information,
asked Davidson and Gordon, a firm with which Cole was closely allied, whether the warrants meant goods or nothing.
They could not deny that the latter was the truth, and were forthwith stigmatized by Mr. Chapman, Overend and Gurney's representative, as rogues.
Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section eighteen: Newgate notorieties continued, part three.
The course of the swindlers was by no means smooth, but it was not till eighteen fifty-four that suspicion arose that anything was wrong.
A firm which held a lot of warrants suddenly demanded the delivery of the goods they covered.
The goods having no existence, Cole of course could not deliver them.
About this time Davidson and Gordon, the people above-mentioned,
who had fraudulent warrants out of their own to the extent of one hundred fifty thousand pounds, suspended payment and absconded.
This affected Cole's credit, and ugly reports were in circulation charging him with the issue of simulated warrants.
These indeed were out to the value of three hundred sixty-seven thousand, eight hundred pounds.
Cole's difficulties increased more and more; warrant-holders came down upon him demanding to realize their goods.
Maltby, who had bolted, was pursued and arrested, to end his life miserably by committing suicide in a Newgate cell.
Cole too was apprehended, and in due course tried at the Central Criminal Court.
He was found guilty, and sentenced to the seemingly inadequate punishment of four years' transportation.
Davidson and Gordon were also sentenced to imprisonment.
A more distressing case stands next on the criminal records --
the failure and subsequent sentence of the bankers Messrs. Strahan, Paul, and Bates,
for the fraudulent disposal of securities lodged in their hands. This firm was one of the oldest banking establishments in the kingdom,
and dated back to the Commonwealth, when, under the title of Snow and Walton, it carried on business as pawnbrokers.
The Strahan of the firm which came to grief was a Snow who changed his name for a fortune of two hundred thousand pounds;
he was a man esteemed and respected in society and the world of finance, incapable as it was thought of a dishonest deed.
Sir John Dean Paul had inherited a baronetcy from his father, together with an honored name;
he was himself a prominent member of the Low Church, of austere piety, active in all good works.
Mr. Bates had been confidential managing clerk, and was taken into the firm not alone as a reward for long and faithful service
but that he might strengthen it by his long experience and known business capacity.
The bank enjoyed an excellent reputation, it had a good connection, and was supposed to be perfectly sound.
Moreover, the partners were sober, steady men, who paid unremitting attention to business.
Yet even so early as the death of the first Sir John Paul,
the bank was insolvent, and instead of starting on a fresh life with a new name, it should then and there have closed its doors.
In December eighteen fifty-one the balance sheet showed a deficiency of upwards of seventy thousand pounds.
The bank had been conducted on false principles;
it had assumed enormous responsibilities -- on one side by the ownership of the Mostyn collieries, a valueless property,
and on the other by backing up
an impecunious and rotten firm of contractors with vast liabilities and pledged to impossible works abroad.
The engagements of the bank on these two heads amounting to nearly half a million of money,
produced immediate embarrassment and financial distress.
The bank was already insolvent,
and the partners had to decide between suspending payment or continuing to hold its head above water by flagitious processes.
They chose, unhappily for themselves, the latter alternative.
Money they must have, and money they raised to meet their urgent necessities upon the balances and securities deposited with them by their customers.
This borrowing continued, and on such a scale that their paper was soon at a discount,
and the various discount houses would not advance sufficient sums to relieve the necessities of the bank.
Then it was that instead of merely pledging securities, the bank sold them outright, and thus passed the Rubicon of fraud.
This went on for some time, and might never have been discovered had some good stroke of luck provided any of the partners
with money enough to retrieve the position of the bank. But that passed from bad to worse;
the firm's paper went down further and further in value; an application to the Committee of Bankers for assistance was peremptorily refused,
then came a run on the bank, and it was compelled to stop payment.
Its debts amounted to three-quarters of a million, and the dividend it eventually paid was three and twopence in the pound.
But worse than the bankruptcy was the confession made by the partners in the court.
They admitted that they had made away with many of the securities entrusted to their keeping.
Following this, warrants were issued for their arrest,
the specific charge being the unlawful negotiation of Danish bonds and other shares belonging to the Rev. Dr. Griffiths of Rochester
to the value of twenty thousand pounds.
Bates was at once captured in Norfolk Street, Strand.
Police officers went down at night to Nutfield, near Reigate, and arrested Sir John Paul, but allowed the prisoner to sleep there.
Next morning they only just saved the train to town, and left Sir John behind on the platform, but he subsequently surrendered himself.
Mr. Strahan was arrested at a friend's house in Bryanston Square.
All three were tried at the Central Criminal Court, and sentenced to fourteen years' transportation, passing some time in Newgate en route.
Bates, the least guilty, was pardoned in eighteen fifty-eight.
Two cases of extensive embezzlement which were discovered almost simultaneously, those of Robson and Redpath,
will long be remembered both within and without the commercial world.
They both reproduced many of the features of the case of Watts, already described,
but in neither did the sums misappropriated reach quite the same high figure.
But neither Robson nor Redpath would have been able to pursue their fraudulent designs with success had they not, like Watts,
been afforded peculiar facilities by the slackness of system and the want of methodical administration in the concerns by which they were employed.
Robson was of humble origin, but he was well educated, and he had some literary abilities.
His proclivities were theatrical, and he was the author of several plays,
one at least of which, 'Love and Loyalty,' with Wallack in a leading part, achieved a certain success.
He began life as a law-writer, earning thereby some fifteen or eighteen shillings a week;
but the firm he served got him a situation as clerk in the office of the Great Northern Railway,
whence he passed to a better position under the Crystal Palace Company.
He now married, although his salary was only a pound a week; but he soon got on.
He had a pleasant address, showed good business aptitudes, and quickly acquired the approval of his superiors.
Within a year he was advanced to the post of chief clerk in the transfer department, at a salary of one hundred fifty pounds a year.
His immediate chief was a Mr. Fasson, upon whose confidence he gained so rapidly, through his activity, industry, and engaging manners,
that ere long the whole management of the transfer department was entrusted to him.
Some time elapsed before Robson succumbed to temptation.
He was not the first man of loose morality and expensive tastes
who preferred to risk his future reputation and liberty to the present discomfort of living upon narrow means.
The temptation was all the greater because the chances of successful fraud lay ready to hand.
Shares in the company were represented by certificates, which often enough never left the company's, or more exactly Robson's, hands.
He conceived the idea of transferring shares, bogus shares from a person who held none, to any one who would buy them in the open market.
He took it for granted that the certificates representing these bogus shares, and which practically did not exist, would never be called for.
This ingenious method of raising funds he adopted and carried on without detection,
till the defalcations from fraudulent transfers and fraudulent issues combined amounted to twenty-seven thousand pounds.
With the proceeds of these flagitious frauds Robson feasted and made merry.
He kept open house at Kilburn Priory;
entertained literary, artistic, and dramatic celebrities; had a smart "turn out," attended all the race-meetings, and dressed in the latest fashion.
To his wife, poor soul, he made no pretense of fidelity, and she enjoyed only so much of his company as was necessarily spent
in receiving guests at home, or could be spared from two rival establishments in other parts of the town.
To account for his revenues he pretended to have been very lucky on the Stock Exchange, which was at one time true to a limited extent,
and to have succeeded in other speculations.
When his friends asked why he, a wealthy man of independent means, continued to slave on as a clerk on a pittance,
he replied gaily that his regular work at the Crystal Palace office was useful as a sort of discipline, and kept him steady.
All this time his position was one of extreme insecurity. He was standing over a mine which at any moment might explode.
The blow fell suddenly, and when least expected. One morning Mr. Fasson asked casually for certain certificates,
whether representing real or fictitious shares does not appear; but they were certificates connected in some way with Robson's long practiced frauds
and he could not produce them. His chief asked sternly where they were.
Robson said they were at Kilburn Priory.
Let us go to Kilburn for them together, said Mr. Fasson, growing suspicious.
They drove there, and Robson on arrival did the honors of his house, rang for lunch to gain time,
but at Mr. Fasson's pressing demands went upstairs to fetch the certificates.
He came back to explain that he had mislaid them.
Mr. Fasson, more and more ill at ease, would not accept this subterfuge, and declared they must be found.
Robson again left him, but only to gather together hastily all the money and valuables on which he could lay his hands, with which he left the house.
Mr. Fasson waited and waited for his subordinate to re-appear, and at last discovered his flight.
A reward was forthwith offered for Robson's apprehension.
Meanwhile the absconding clerk had coolly driven to a favorite dining-place in the West End,
where a fish curry and a brace of partridges were set before him,
and he discussed the latter with appetite, but begged that they would never give him curry again, as he did not like it.
After dinner he went into hiding for a day or two,
then, accompanied by a lady, not Mrs. Robson, he took steamer and started for Copenhagen.
But the continental police had been warned to look out for him, and two Danish inspectors got upon his track,
followed him over to Sweden, and arrested him at Helsingfors.
Thence he was transferred to Copenhagen and surrendered in due course to a London police officer.
Little more remains to be said about Robson. He appears to have accepted his position, and to have at once resigned himself to his fate.
When brought to trial he took matters very coolly, and at first pleaded "Not Guilty," but subsequently withdrew the plea.
paid him the compliment of describing him as "a young man of great intelligence, considerable powers of mind,
and possessed of an education very much beyond the rank of life to which he originally belonged."
Robson was found guilty, and sentenced to two terms of transportation, one for twenty and one for fourteen years.
Newgate officers who remember Robson still describe him as a fine young man, who behaved well as a prisoner,
but who had all the appearance of a careless, thoughtless, happy-go-lucky fellow.
In many respects the embezzlement of which Leopold Redpath was guilty closely resembled that of Robson,
but it was based upon more extended and audacious forgeries.
Redpath's crime arose from his peculiar and independent position as registrar of stock of the Great Northern Railway Company.
This offered him great facilities for the creation of artificial stock, its sale from a fictitious holder, and transfer to himself.
All the signatures in the transfer were forged. Not only did he thus transfer and realize "bogus" stock
but he bought bona fide amounts, and increased their value by altering the figures,
by inserting say one before five hundred, and thus making it
fifteen hundred pounds, which larger amount was duly carried to his credit on the register, and entered upon the certificates of transfer.
By these means Redpath misappropriated vast sums during a period extending over ten years.
The total amount was never exactly made out, but the false stock created and issued by him was estimated at two hundred twenty thousand pounds.
Even when the bubble burst Redpath, who had lived at the rate of twenty thousand a year,
had assets in the shape of land, house, furniture, pictures, and objets d'art to the value of fifty thousand pounds.
He began in a very small way.
First a lawyer's clerk, he then got an appointment in the Peninsular and Oriental Company's office;
afterwards he set up as an insurance broker on his own account, but presently failed.
an open-handed, unthinking charity which gave freely to the poor and needy the money which belonged to his creditors.
After his bankruptcy he obtained a place as clerk in the Great Northern Railway office,
from which he rose to be assistant registrar, with the special duties of transferring shares.
He soon proved his ability, and by unremitting attention mastered the whole work of the office.
Later on he became registrar, and in this more independent position
developed to a colossal extent the frauds he had already practiced as a subordinate.
Now he launched out into great expenditure, took a house in Chester Terrace, and became known as a Maecenas and patron of the arts.
He had a nice taste in bric-à-brac, and was considered a good judge of pictures.
Leading social and artistic personages were to be met with at his house, and his hospitality was far famed.
The choicest wines, the finest fruits,
peas at ten shillings a quart, five-guinea pines, and early asparagus were to be found on his table.
But his chief extravagance, his favorite folly, was the exercise of an ostentatious benevolence.
The philanthropy he had displayed in a small way when less prosperous became now a passion.
His name headed every subscription list; his purse was always open.
Not content with giving where assistance was solicited, he himself sought out deserving cases and personally afforded relief.
When the crash came there were pensioners and other recipients of his bounty who could not believe
that so good a man had really been for years a swindler and a rogue.
Down at Weybridge, where he had a country place, his name was long remembered with gratitude by the poor.
During the days of his prosperity he was a governor of Christ's Hospital,
of the St. Ann's Society, and one of the supporters and managers of the Patriotic Fund.
In his person he was neat and fastidious;
he patronized the best tailors, and had a fashionable coiffeur from Hanover Square daily to curl his hair.
There was something dramatic in Redpath's detection
Just after Robson's frauds had agitated the minds of all directors of companies, the chairman of the Great Northern (Mr. Denison)
was standing at a railway station talking to a certain well-known peer of the realm.
Redpath passed and lifted his hat to his chairman; the latter acknowledged the salute.
But the peer rushed forward and shook Redpath warmly by the hand.
What do you know of our clerk? asked Mr. Denison of his lordship. "Only that he is a capital fellow, who gives the best dinners and balls in town."
Redpath had industriously circulated reports that he had prospered greatly in speculation;
but the chairman of the Great Northern could not realize that a clerk of the company could honestly be in the possession of unlimited wealth.
It was at once decided at the board to make a thorough examination of all his books.
Redpath was called in and informed of the intended investigation. He tried to stave off the evil hour by declaring that everything was perfectly right;
but finding he could not escape, he said he would resign his post, and leaving the boardroom, disappeared.
The inquiry soon revealed the colossal character of the frauds.
Warrants were issued for Redpath's arrest, but he had flown to Paris.
Thither police officers followed, only to find that he had returned to London.
A further search discovered him at breakfast at a small house in the New Road.
He was arrested, examined before a police magistrate, and committed to Newgate.
Great excitement prevailed in the city and the West End when Redpath's defalcations were made public.
The Stock Market was greatly affected, and society, more especially that which frequents Exeter Hall, was convulsed.
The Central Criminal Court, when the trial came on,
was densely crowded, and many curious eyes were turned upon the somewhat remarkable man who occupied the dock.
He is described by a contemporary account as a fresh-looking man of forty years of age, slightly bald, inclined to embonpoint,
and thoroughly embodying the idea of English respectability.
His manner was generally self-possessed, but his face was marked with "uneasy earnestness,"
and he looked about him with wayward, furtive glances.
When the jury found a verdict of guilty he remained unmoved. He listened without emotion to the judge's well-merited censures,
and received his sentence of transportation for life without much surprise.
Redpath passed away into the outer darkness of a penal colony, where he was still living a year or two back
But his name lingers still in this country as that of the first swindler of his time,
and the prototype of a class not uncommon in our later days
that of dishonest rogues who assume piety and philanthropy as a cloak for their misdeeds.
In Newgate Redpath is remembered by the prison officer as a difficult man to deal with.
From the moment of his reception he gave himself great airs, as a martyr and a man heavily wronged.
By-and-by, when escape seemed hopeless, and after sentence, he suddenly degenerated into the lowest stamp of criminal,
and behaved so as to justify a belief that he had been a jail-bird all his life.
It has been already remarked in these pages that with changed social conditions came a great change in the character of crimes.
Highway robberies, for instance, had disappeared, if we except the spasmodic and severely repressed outbreak of "garotting,"
which at one time spread terror throughout London. Thieves preferred now to use ingenuity rather than brute force.
It was no longer possible to stop a coach or carriage, or rob the postman who carried the mail.
The improved methods of locomotion had put a stop to these depredations. People traveled in company, as a rule;
only when single and unprotected were they in any danger of attack, and that but rarely.
There were still big prizes, however, to tempt the daring, and none appealed more to the thievish instinct than the custom of transmitting gold by rail.
The precious metal was sent from place to place carefully locked up and guarded, no doubt;
but were the precautions too minute, the vigilance too close to be eluded or overcome?
This was the question which presented itself to the fertile brain of one Pierce,
who had been concerned in various "jobs" of a dishonest character, and who for the moment was a clerk in a betting office.
He laid the suggestion before Agar, a professional thief, who was of opinion it contained elements of success.
But the collusion and active assistance of employees of the railway carriers were indispensable, and together
they sounded one Burgess, a guard on the South-Eastern Railway, a line by which large quantities of bullion were sent to the Continent.
Burgess detailed the whole system of transmission.
The gold, packed in an iron-bound box, was securely lodged in safes locked with patent Chubbs.
Each safe had three sets of double keys, all held by confidential servants of the company.
One pair was with the traffic superintendent in London, another with an official in Folkestone,
a third with the captain of the Folkestone and Boulogne boat.
At the other side of the Channel the French railway authorities took charge.
The safes while on the line en route between London and Folkestone were in the guard's van.
This was an important step, and they might easily be robbed some day when Burgess was the guard, provided only that they could be opened.
The next step was to get impressions and fabricate false keys.
A new accomplice was now needed within the company's establishment, and Pierce looked about long before he found the right person.
At last he decided to enlist one Tester, a clerk in the traffic department, whom he thought would prove a likely tool.
The four waited patiently for their opportunity,
which came when the safes were sent to Chubbs' to be repaired; and Chubbs sent them back, but only with one key,
in such a way that Tester had possession of this key for a time.
He lent it to Agar for a brief space, who promptly took an impression on wax. But the safes had a double lock;
the difficulty was to get a copy of the second key.
This was at length effected by Agar and Pierce.
After hanging about the Folkestone office for some time, they saw at last that the key was kept in a certain cupboard.
Still watching and waiting for the first chance, they seized it when the clerks left the office empty for a moment.
Pierce boldly stepped in, found the cupboard unlocked; he removed the key, handed it to Agar outside,
who quickly took the wax impression, handed it back to Pierce; Pierce replaced it, left the office, and the thing was done.
After this nothing remained but to wait for some occasion when the amount transmitted would be sufficient to justify the risks of robbery.
It was Tester's business, who had access to the railway company's books, to watch for this.
Meanwhile the others completed their preparations with the utmost care.
A weight of shot was bought and stowed in carpet bags ready to replace exactly the abstracted gold.
Courier bags were bought to carry the "stuff" slung over the shoulders;
and last, but not least, Agar frequently traveled up and down the line to test the false keys he had manufactured with Pierce's assistance.
Burgess admitted him into the guard's van, where he fitted and filed the keys till they worked easily and satisfactorily in the locks of the safe.
One night Tester whispered to Agar and Pierce, "All right," as they cautiously lounged about London Bridge.
The thieves took first-class tickets, handed their bags full of shot to the porters, who placed them in the guard's van.
Just as the train was starting Agar slipped into the van with Burgess, and Pierce got into a first-class carriage.
Agar at once got to work on the first safe.
opened it, took out and broke into the bullion box, removed the gold, substituted the shot from a carpet bag,
re-fastened and re-sealed the bullion box, and replaced it in the safe.
At Redhill Tester met the train and relieved the thieves of a portion of the stolen gold.
At the same station Pierce joined Agar in the guard's van, and there were now three to carry on the robbery.
The two remaining safes were attacked and nearly entirely despoiled in the same way as the first, and the contents transferred to the courier bags.
The train was now approaching Folkestone, and Agar and Pierce hid themselves in a dark part of the van.
At that station the safes were given out, heavy with shot, not gold; the thieves went on to Dover, and by-and-by,
with Ostend tickets previously procured, returned to London without mishap, and by degrees disposed of much of the stolen gold.
The theft was discovered at Boulogne, when the boxes were found not to weigh exactly what they ought. But no clue was obtained to the thieves,
and the theft might have remained a mystery but for the subsequent bad faith of Pierce to his accomplice Agar.
The latter was ere long arrested on a charge of uttering forged cheques, convicted, and sentenced to transportation for life.
When he knew that he could not escape his fate,
he handed over to Pierce a sum of three thousand pounds, his own, whether rightly or wrongly acquired never came out,
together with the unrealized part of the bullion, amounting in all to some fifteen thousand pounds,
and begged his accomplice to invest it as a settlement on a woman named Kay, by whom he had had a child.
Pierce made Kay only a few small payments, then appropriated the rest of the money.
Kay, who had been living with Agar at the time of the bullion robbery,
went to the police in great fury and distress, and disclosed all she knew of the affair.
Agar too, in Newgate, heard how Pierce had treated him, and at once readily turned approver.
As the evidence he gave incriminated Pierce, Burgess, and Tester, all three were arrested and committed to Newgate for trial.
The whole strange story, the long incubation and the elaborate accomplishment of the plot,
came out at the Old Bailey, and was acknowledged to be one of the most extraordinary on record.
Scarcely had the conviction of these daring and astute thieves been assured, than another gigantic fraud was brought to light.
The series of boldly-conceived and cleverly-executed forgeries in which James Townshend Saward, commonly called "Jem the Penman,"
has probably no parallel in the annals of crime. Saward himself is a striking and in some respects an unique figure in criminal history.
A man of birth and education, a member of the bar, and of acknowledged legal attainments, his proclivities were all downward.
Instead of following an honorable profession, he preferred to turn his great natural talents and ready wits to the most nefarious practices.
He was known to the whole criminal fraternity as a high-class receiver of stolen goods, a negotiator more especially of stolen paper,
cheques and bills, of which he made a particular use.
He dealt too in the precious metals, when they had been improperly acquired,
and it was to him that Agar, Pierce, and the rest applied when seeking to dispose of their stolen bullion.
But Saward's operations were mainly directed to the fabrication and uttering of forged cheques.
His method was comprehensive and deeply laid.
Burglars brought him the cheques they stole from houses, thieves what they got in pocketbooks.
Cheques blank and canceled were his stock-in-trade. The former he filled up by exact imitation of the latter, signature and all.
When he could get nothing but the blank cheque, he set in motion all sorts of schemes for obtaining signatures, such as
commencing sham actions, and addressing formal applications, merely for the reply.
One stroke of luck which he turned to great account
was the return from transportation of an old "pal" and confederate, who brought with him some bills of exchange.
Saward's method of negotiating the cheques was equally well planned.
Like his great predecessor Old Patch, he never went to a bank himself, nor did any of his accomplices.
The bearer of the cheque was always innocent and ignorant of the fraudulent nature of the document he presented.
In order to obtain messengers of this sort, Saward answered advertisements of persons seeking employment,
and when these presented themselves, entrusted them as a beginning with the duty of cashing cheques.
A confederate followed the emissary closely,
not only to ensure fair play and the surrender of the proceeds if the cheque was cashed, but to give timely notice if it was not,
so that Saward and the rest might make themselves scarce.
As each transaction was carried out from a different address, and a different messenger always employed,
the forgers always escaped detection. But fate overtook two of the gang,
partly through their own carelessness, when transferring their operations to Yarmouth.
One named Hardwicke assumed the name of Ralph, and, to obtain commercial credit in Yarmouth, paid in two hundred fifty pounds to a Yarmouth bank
as coming from a Mr. Whitney.
He forgot to add that it was to be placed to Ralph's credit, and when he called as Ralph,
he was told it was only at Mr. Whitney's disposal, and that it could be paid to no one else.
Hardwicke, or "Ralph," appealed to Saward in his difficulty
and that clever schemer sent an elaborate letter of instructions how to ask for the money.
But while Hardwicke was in communication with Saward, the bank was in communication with London
and the circumstances were deemed sufficiently suspicious to warrant the arrest of the gentlemen at Yarmouth on a charge of forgery and conspiracy.
Saward's letter to Hardwicke fell into the hands of the police and compromised him.
While Hardwicke and Atwell were in Newgate awaiting trial, active search was made for Saward,
who was at length taken in a coffee-shop near Oxford Street, under the name of Hopkins. He resisted at first, and denied his identity,
but on being searched, two blank cheques of the London and Westminster Bank were found in his pocket.
He then confessed that he was the redoubtable Jem Saward, or Jem the Penman, and was conveyed to a police-court, and thence to Newgate.
At his trial Atwell and Hardwicke, two of his chief allies and accomplices, turned approvers,
and the whole scheme of systematic forgery was laid bare.
The evidence was corroborated by that of many of the victims who had acted as messengers,
and others who swore to the meetings of the conspirators and their movements. Saward was found guilty,
and the judge, in passing sentence on him of transportation for life, expressed deep regret that "the ingenuity, skill, and talent,
which had received so perverted and mistaken direction,
had not been guided by a sense of virtue, and directed to more honorable and useful pursuits.
The proceeds of these forgeries amounted, it was said, to some thousands per annum.
Saward spent all his share at low gaming houses, and in all manner of debaucheries.
He was in person a short, square-built man of gentlemanly address, sharp and shrewd in conversation and manner.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section nineteen: Later Records
The old notion always prevailed that Newgate was impregnable, so to speak, from within,
and that none of its inmates could hope to escape from its secure precincts.
Yet the jail, in spite of its fortress-like aspect, was by no means really safe.
Year after year prisoners determined to get free, and occasionally succeeded in their efforts.
The inspectors' reports mention many cases of evasion accomplished.
There were others less successful.
Charles Thomas White, awaiting execution for arson, made a desperate effort to escape from Newgate in eighteen twenty-seven.
He had friends and auxiliaries inside the jail and out. The cell he occupied was near the outer wall,
and had he but been able to remove its iron bars, he might have descended into Newgate Street by means of a rope ladder.
The ladder was actually made, of black sewing-thread firmly and closely interwoven. But White could not remove the bars;
the instruments needed for the purpose never reached him.
It was noticed that he was most anxious to receive a pair of shoes for which he had asked, and when they arrived they were closely examined.
Sewn in between the upper and lower leathers several spring saws were found, which would have easily cut through any bars.
White, when taxed with his attempt, admitted that the accusation was true, and spoke "with pride and satisfaction of the practicability of his scheme."
There is an attempt at escape mentioned in Mr. Wakefield's book, which might have been an intended suicide.
John Williams, a young fellow only twenty-three years of age, awaited execution in eighteen twenty-seven for stealing in a dwelling-house.
On the very morning on which he was to suffer he eluded the vigilance, such as it was, of his officers
and climbed up the pipe of a cistern in the corner of the press yard; some thought with the idea of drowning himself.
He never reached the cistern, but fell back into the yard, injuring his legs severely.
Although his execution was imminent, a surgeon attended to his wounds, and he was carried more dead than alive to the scaffold.
the wounds broke open and bled profusely while the last dread penalty was being performed, to the manifest excitement and indignation of the crowd.
A more daring and skilful escape was effected in eighteen thirty-six by the chimney-sweep Henry Williams,
who, while detained in the press-yard as a capital convict, under sentence of death for burglary,
managed to get away in the very same spot where his namesake had nine years before so miserably failed.
and would certainly have been impossible to any one less nimble than a chimney-sweep, trained under the old system to ascend the most intricate flues.
Even after Williams had got out, persons were disposed to disbelieve that the escape had been accomplished in the manner indicated;
they preferred to credit it to carelessness or collusion from officers of the jail.
Yet from the circumstantial account given by Williams after recapture, there can be little doubt that he got away as will be described.
Williams as a capital convict was lodged in the press-yard or condemned ward.
He had access to the airing yard, and there was for hours no kind of supervision.
In one corner of the airing yard stood a cistern at some height from the ground;
the wall beneath and above it was "rusticated," in other words, the granite surface had become roughened, and offered a sort of foothold.
About fifty feet from the ground level, and above the cistern, a revolving chevaux-de-frise of iron was fixed,
with only a short interval between it and the wall, supported by a horizontal iron railing with upright points;
in the wall above the chevaux-de-frise projected a series of iron spikes sharp enough to forbid further ascent.
Williams surveyed these formidable obstacles to evasion, and calmly proceeded to surmount them.
His first task was to gain the top of the cistern; this he effected by keeping his back to one side of the angle,
and working with his hands behind him, while he used his bare feet like claws upon the other side of the wall angle.
The condition of the stone surface just mentioned assisted him in this, and he managed to get beyond the cistern to the railing below the chevaux-de-frise.
The least slip now would have been fatal to him. But he could not thrust his body in through the narrow space left by the chevaux-de-frise,
and was compelled to work along the railing round three-quarters of the square of the yard,
and at length reached a point opposite the top of the building containing the condemned wards. This had been a perilous and painful task;
the spikes of the railing penetrated his flesh and made progression slow and difficult.
But the worst part of the business was to jump from this irksome foothold of the iron grating on to the top of the building just mentioned,
a distance of eight or nine feet.
He had here completed his ascent.
His next job was to descend outside Newgate.
he passed to the top of the ordinary's residence, hoping to find an open sky-light by which he might enter and so work downstairs.
If the worst came to the worst, he intended to have gone down some chimney, as he had often done before in the way of business.
But he did not like the risk of entering a room by the fireplace, and the chances of detection it offered.
He traversed vainly all the roofs in Newgate Street,
running a great risk of discovery as he passed by a lot of workmen at Tyler's manufactory in Warwick Square, which had formerly been the College of Physicians.
As his coat was an encumbrance, he left it on the top of the third house in Newgate Street, and thus in shirt-sleeves, barefoot and bareheaded,
he worked along to the roofs in Warwick Lane.
Here he came upon a woman on the leads hanging out clothes to dry.
Williams concealed himself behind a chimney till she had re-entered her garret,
and then following her down a step ladder into the house, told his story, appealed to and won her compassion.
She suffered him to pass downstairs.
Below he met another woman and a girl, both of whom were terrified at his appearance, but
when he explained that he was running away from the gallows they left him the road clear.
To walk out into the street was an easy affair, and he was now free, with one and fourpence in his pocket and a shirt and trousers for all his clothing.
Denied admission everywhere as a ragged, half-naked beggar,
he tramped across London Bridge to Wandsworth, where he refreshed himself with a pint of strong ale, the first sustenance he had taken since his escape,
and continued his march to Kingston, where he slept soundly under a hedge till next morning.
Entering a town, he obtained employment at once as a chimney-sweep
from a widow woman, who gave him "bub and grub," or food and one-and-sixpence, for every nine days' work.
Dissatisfied with this remuneration, he again took to the road, and tramped into Hampshire,
where he presently committed a burglary at Lymington, was caught, and lodged in Winchester Jail.
Mr. Cope, the governor of Newgate, having been communicated with, proceeded to Winchester, where he at once identified Williams.
The success, although very short-lived, which attended him, no doubt inspired other inmates of Newgate to follow his example.
It was for some time after this a constant practice to go up the chimneys in the hopes of escaping by the flue.
Even then, however, irons across barred the ascent after a certain distance, and in no one case did a fugitive get clear away.
A man named Lears, under sentence of transportation for an attempt at murder on board ship, got up part of the way,
but had to come down again covered with soot and filth just as the officers entered the ward.
Lears was rewarded by being obliged to wear cross irons on his legs, a punishment rarely inflicted in Newgate,
and probably one of the few cases of a recurrence, but under proper safeguards and limitations, to the old system of chains.
On another occasion Mr. Cope the governor came in and missed a man.
The ward was one short of its number. What had become of the fellow?
the fugitive, uncomfortably ensconced in the flue, came down of his own accord, like Colonel Colt's raccoon.
After this great iron guards, just as are to be seen in lunatic asylums,
were fixed over the fireplaces, and the prisoners had no longer access to the chimneys.
Among the escapes still remembered was one in eighteen forty-nine, accomplished by a man who had been employed
working at the roof of the chapel on the female side.
He was engaged in whitewashing and cleaning; the officer who had him in charge left him on the stairs leading to the gallery.
Taking advantage of being unobserved, he got out through the roof on to the leads, and traveled along them towards Number one, Newgate Street.
He stepped in at a garret window, coolly walked downstairs, and entered the bar.
They asked him how he had cut his hand, which was bleeding, and he said he had done it while working up on the roof.
No further notice was taken of him; no one seemingly suspected that he was a prisoner, and he was suffered to walk off without let or hindrance.
In eighteen fifty-three three men escaped in company from one of the wards in the middle yard.
They were penal servitude men, their names Bell, Brown, and Barry, and they were awaiting transfer to Leicester,
which with Wakefield was utilized as a receptacle for convicts not going to Western Australia,
or any of the new establishments at home, at Portland, Dartmoor, or elsewhere.
These men managed to cut a hole in the ceiling of the ward near the iron cage on the landing, and so got access to the roof.
At that time rope mats were still used as beds.
One of the three, shamming ill, remained all day in his ward, where he employed himself unraveling the rope from the sleeping-mats.
By evening he manufactured a good long length,
and after all was quiet the three got on to the roof through the hole, and so on to Tyler's manufactory close by,
whence they let themselves down into the street by the rope.
These men were all in prison dress at the time of their escape, but one of their number, Bell, sent back his clothes a few days later by parcel's delivery,
with a civil note to the governor, saying he had no further use for them. All three fugitives were recaptured,
Brown almost at once; then Barry, who was taken at the East End in a public-house where he had arranged to meet a pal.
The Newgate officers obtained information of this, and went to the spot, where they effected the capture,
but not till they had had an exciting chase down the street.
The third, Bell, remained longest at large. He too was run into at a lodging in the Kingsland Road.
The officers dropped on to him while he was still in bed, but as they came upstairs he jumped up and hid in a cupboard.
All three after recapture passed on, as originally intended, to Leicester, where they did their "bit" and were released;
but only to be taken soon afterwards for a fresh offense, and again pass through Newgate with sentences of penal servitude.
A later case was still more remarkable, as it was effected after the alteration of the prison and its reconstruction on the newest lines.
A sailor, Krapps by name, occupied one of the upper cells in the new block.
The doors, through incomplete knowledge of prison needs, were not, as now, sheeted with iron.
The prisoner had nothing to deal with but wooden panels, and by dint of cutting and chopping he got both the lower panels out.
Through the aperture he crept out on to the landing at the dead of night, and so down into the central space of the building.
Under superior orders all the doors and gates of this block were left open at night, to allow the night watchman to pass freely to all parts.
This was considered safer than intrusting him with keys.
Krapps walked at once into the yard and across to the female side, where he found some of the washing still hanging out to dry.
He made a strong rope with several of the sheets; then, returning to the male yard,
got hold of the step ladder used in lighting the gas, and which under our more careful supervision would have been, as now-a-days, chained up.
Cutting the cord which fastened the two legs of the step ladder, he opened them out and made one long length;
with this, placed against the wall near the chevaux-de-frise, he made an escalade.
The top of the wall was gained without difficulty.
Along this Krapps crawled, and then dropped down on to the cook-house.
He now put in requisition the rope made of the sheets, and with its help lowered himself into the street.
Down below were market-carts waiting for daylight, and among them Krapps found a refuge and friends.
The first intimation of his escape was afforded by the police, who informed the prison authorities next day that a rope was hanging down from the cook-house roof.
Nothing more was heard of Krapps. The curious thing in his case was that his offense was a trifling one;
he was still untried, but would almost certainly have escaped with a minor penalty, say of three or four months' imprisonment.
There is, however, no explanation of the motives which prompt prisoners to attempt escapes.
Cases well authenticated have been known of men who had all but completed their sentences, and for whom the prison gates would open within a few days,
who yet faced extraordinary risks to advance their enlargement by only a few hours.
On the other hand, at the great convict establishments, such is the moral restraint of a systematic discipline,
that numbers of men, "lifers," and others with ten, fourteen, or twenty years to do, can be trusted to work out of doors without bolts and bars
at a distance from the prison.
The last escape from Newgate was only three years ago, and occurred just before the final closing of the prison.
No report of it was made public, as the man was almost immediately recaptured.
He was at work under the supervision of the artisan warder of the prison,
who permitted him to go up on to the roof of the old wards, in order to throw water for flushing purposes down a shoot.
He was out of sight while so employed, and remained so long absent that the warder, becoming uneasy, went in search of him.
Encouraged by the shouts and signals of some workmen employed on a building outside, the prisoner made one of the most marvellous jumps on record,
from the building he was on to a distant wall, with a drop of sixty feet between.
Then he ran along the coping of the wall towards its angle with Tyler's manufactory, and dropped down on to the gridiron below.
This was not strong enough to carry him, and he fell through.
Suicides and executions were, however, always the most effectual methods of making exit from durance.
Suicides at Newgate were numerous enough, but they seldom possessed any novel or unusual features;
prison suicides seldom do, except as regards ingenuity and determination.
Only great resolution indeed, persisted in to the bitter end,
would make death a certainty, so limited and imperfect are the means generally available.
When a bit of rope carefully secreted,
braces, shoe-strings, shirt torn into strips are the only instruments, and a bar or small hook
at no elevation affords the only drop, strangulation would seldom supervene but for the resolution of the miserable felo de se.
One curious instance of a suicide carried out under the most adverse and extraordinary circumstances may be quoted.
It was that of a "Long Firm" swindler, by name Johnson,
who contrived to hang himself from a hammock hook only eighteen inches from the ground.
The noose was one of his hammock straps, which he buckled round his throat.
Having carefully spread out a blanket on the floor just below the hammock as it lay suspended,
he fastened one end of the strap above mentioned to the hook, and then fell down.
He might have saved himself at any moment by merely extending an arm; but he lay there patiently till death supervened.
When discovered next morning, quite dead, it was found that the strap actually did not touch his throat;
three fingers might have been inserted between it and the flesh; the pressure was all on the arteries behind the ears,
and surgical opinion stated that the stoppage of circulation was the cause of death.
Probably dissolution came as easily and almost without pain.
A laudable desire to invest executions with more and more solemnity and decorum gained ground as they became more rare.
As more humane principles were introduced into prison management,
greater attention was paid to the capital convicts, and the horrors of their situation while awaiting sentence
were as far as possible mitigated and toned down. But there was little improvement in the ceremony itself.
There were still untoward accidents occasionally at executions, and even the chief practitioner of recent times, Calcraft,
was not always to be trusted to do his fell work efficiently.
I may be permitted to digress for a moment to give a few particulars concerning the last officially appointed hangman of the city of London.
After Calcraft's resignation no successor was really appointed.
Marwood, whose name is so familiar with the present generation,
had no official status, and was merely an operator selected by the Corporation, and who, on the strength of it,
contracted with sheriffs and conveners to work by the job.
But Calcraft regularly succeeded Foxen, who followed Botting, and Dennis, the actor in the seventeen eighty riots.
Calcraft was born at Baddow, in Essex, in eighteen hundred;
he was a shoemaker by trade, and settled in London after his marriage in eighteen twenty-five.
The story goes, that about eighteen twenty-eight
his attention was drawn early one morning to a man who leant against a lamp-post in Finsbury Square, coughing violently.
Calcraft, who, in spite of the dreadful calling he subsequently followed, was always reputed a kindly man,
invited the man with the cough to enter a neighboring house and try a little peppermint for it.
The other accepted, and they got into conversation.
He told Calcraft that he was Foxen the executioner, and that he was that moment on his way to Newgate to hang a man,
but that his cough was getting so much the master of him that he feared he would not be able to carry on his duties much longer.
I have no idea who the sheriffs will get to do the work after me, said Foxen, adding that his assistant, Tom Cheshire,
was given to drink, and not to be trusted.
I think I could do that sort of job, said Calcraft, on the spur of the moment.
Foxen asked him his name and address, and went away.
Calcraft thought no more of what had occurred till the next sessions at the Old Bailey, when the sheriffs sent for him,
and offered him the post of executioner for the city of London and Middlesex.
He accepted, having at first Tom Cheshire as his assistant, then for a time, when Cheshire was dismissed for drunkenness, a man named Osborne.
After that he worked alone.
I cannot find that Calcraft was sworn in when appointed, or any exact information when the old forbidding ceremony ceased to be practiced.
It was customary to make the executioner take the Bible in his hand, and swear solemnly that he would dispatch every criminal condemned to die,
without favoring father or mother or any other relation or friend.
When he had taken the oath he was dismissed with the words, "Get thee hence, wretch!"
Calcraft's emoluments were a guinea per week, and an extra guinea for every execution.
He got besides half-a-crown for every man he flogged, and an allowance to provide cats or birch rods.
For acting as executioner of Horsemonger Lane Jail
he received a retaining fee of five pounds, five shillings, with the usual guinea for each job;
he was also at liberty to engage himself in the country, where he demanded and was paid ten pounds on each occasion.
It was not always easy to get a hangman so cheap, as I have already indicated on a previous page.
The onus and responsibility of carrying out the sentence is personal to the sheriff. A good story is told illustrating this.
Some wags in Scotland seized Calcraft and kept him in durance the night before the execution.
Meanwhile the convener or sheriff was in despair, expecting that, failing the executioner, he would have to do the job himself.
But, fortunately for him, just at the last moment Calcraft was set free.
Calcraft's salary was more than the proverbial "thirteenpence halfpenny -- hangman's wages."
The origin of this expression dates, it is said, from the time when the Scottish mark,
a silver coin bearing the same relation to the Scottish pound that an English shilling does to an English pound, was made to pass current in England.
The mark was valued at thirteenpence halfpenny, or rather more than the shilling, which from time immemorial had been the hangman's wages.
That very ancient perquisite the convict's clothes was never claimed by Calcraft, and it may be doubted whether he was entitled to it.
On one particular occasion, however, he got them. A gentleman whose sins brought him to the gallows at Maidstone
wished to do Calcraft a good turn, and sent to his London tailor for a complete new suit, in which he appeared at his execution.
He expressly bequeathed them to Calcraft, who was graciously pleased to accept them.
On another occasion an importunate person begged Calcraft eagerly to claim his right to the clothes, and give them to him.
Calcraft consented, got and bestowed the clothes, only to find that the person he had obliged exhibited them publicly.
It may be added that of late years the clothes in which a convict has suffered are invariably burnt.
Capital convicts go to the gallows in their own clothing, and not in prison dress, unless the former is quite unfit to be worn.
Calcraft shared the odium which his office, not strangely, has always inspired. But he was admitted into the jail,
which his predecessors were not, and who were paid their wages over the gate to obviate the necessity for letting them enter.
To this curious etiquette was due the appointment of an official whose office has long since disappeared, "the yeoman of the halter,"
whose business it was to provide the rope and do the pinioning, and who was paid a fee of five shillings.
They did not dislike Calcraft, however, at Newgate. He was an illiterate, simple-minded man, who scarcely remembered what executions he had performed.
He kept no record of them, and when asked questions, referred to the officers of the jail.
His nature must have been kindly.
When he came to the prison for his wages his grandchildren often accompanied him, affectionately clinging to his hands;
and he owned a pet pony which would follow him about like a dog.
he was not unskilful, but he proceeded entirely by rule of thumb, leaving the result very much to chance and the strength of the rope.
He was so much in favor of short drops that his immediate successor, Marwood, stigmatized him as "short-drop" man.
Marwood being, on the other hand, in favor of giving a man as much rope as possible.
With Calcraft's method there were undoubtedly many failures, and it was a common custom for him to go below the gallows
just to steady their legs a little; in other words, to add his weight to that of the hanging bodies.
Marwood till latterly seemed to have done his work more effectually, and has been known to give as much as six feet fall.
This generally produces instantaneous death, although cases where complete fracture of the spinal cord occurred are said to be rare.
Calcraft served the city of London till eighteen seventy-four, when he was pensioned at the rate of twenty-five shillings per week.
The last execution at which he acted was that of Godwin, on the twenty-fifth May, eighteen seventy-four.
Marwood, who succeeded him, and who died while these sheets were in the press, was a Lincolnshire man, a native of Horncastle,
who first took to the work from predilection, and the idea of being useful in his generation, as he himself assured the writer of these pages.
Until the time of his death he kept a small shop close to the church in Horncastle.
Over the door, in gilt letters, were the words "Crown Office"; in the window was a pile of official envelopes, ostentatiously displayed,
while round about were shoe-strings, boot-laces, and lasts. Marwood, strange to say, followed the same trade as Calcraft.
Marwood was proud of his calling, and when questioned as to whether his process was satisfactory, replied that he heard "no complaints."
The strange competition amongst hundreds to succeed Marwood is a strange fact too recently before the public to need mention here.
It may, however, be remarked that the wisdom of appointing any regular hangman is very open to question,
and must be strongly deprecated on moral grounds, as tending to the utter degradation of one individual.
Possibly such changes may be introduced into the method of execution
that the ceremony may be made more mechanical, thus rendering the personal intervention of a skilled functionary unnecessary.
Executions long continued to be in public, in spite of remonstrance and reprobation.
The old prejudices, such as that which enlisted Dr. Johnson on the side of the Tyburn procession, still lingered and prevented any change.
It was thought that capital punishment would lose its deterrent effect if it ceased to be public,
and the raison d'être of the penalty, which in principle so many opposed, would be gone.
This line of argument prevailed over the manifest horrors of the spectacle. These increased as time passed.
The graphic and terrible account given by Charles Dickens of the awful scene before Horsemonger Lane Jail, at the execution of the Mannings,
has already been quoted. Again, the concourse of people collected in front of Newgate to witness the execution,
simultaneously, of the five pirates, part of the mutinous crew of the 'Flowery Land,' was greater than on any previous occasion.
It was a callous, careless crowd of coarse-minded, semi-brutalized folk, who came to enjoy themselves.
Few, if any, showed any feeling of terror, none were impressed with the solemnity, or realized the warning which the sight conveyed.
The upturned faces of the eager spectators resembled those of the 'gods' at Drury Lane on Boxing Night;
the crowd had come to witness a popular and gratuitous public performance -- better than a prize-fight or a play.
No notion that they were assisting at a vindication of the law filled the minds of those present with dread.
On the contrary, the prevailing sentiment was one of satisfaction at the success of the spectacle.
The remarks heard amongst the crowd were of coarse approval.
The reply evinced equal satisfaction, and the speaker, with a profane oath, declared that he would like to act as Jack Ketch to the whole lot.
To the disgrace of the better-educated and better-bred public, executions could still command the attendance of curious aristocrats from the West End.
At Müller's execution there was great competition for front seats,
and the windows of the opposite houses, which commanded a good view, as usual fetched high prices.
As much as twenty-five pounds was paid for a first-floor front on this occasion.
Never, indeed, had an execution been more generally patronized.
This is proved by contemporary accounts, especially one graphic and realistic article which appeared in the 'Times,'
and which contributed in no small degree to the introduction of private executions. A great crowd was expected, and a great crowd came.
They collected over night in the bright light of a November moon.
There were well-dressed and ill-dressed, old men and lads, women and girls.
Rain fell heavily at intervals, but did not thin the concourse.
to do them mere justice, there was at least till then a half-drunken ribald gaiety among the crowd that made them all akin."
There were preachers among the crowd, but they could not get a patient hearing.
Then one struck up the hymn of the Promised Land, and the refrain was at once taken up with a mighty chorus --
Oh, my! Think I've got to die.
This was presently superseded by a fresh catch --
Müller, Müller, He's the man, till a diversion was created by the appearance of the gallows, which was received with continuous yells.
As day broke the character of the crowd was betrayed.
There were but few women, except of the most degraded sort; the men were mostly young men --
sharpers, thieves, gamblers, betting men, the outsiders of the boxing ring,
bricklayers' laborers, dock workmen, German artisans and sugar-bakers
with the rakings of cheap singing-halls and billiard-rooms, the fast young men of London.
But all, whether young or old, men or women, seemed to know nothing, feel nothing, to have no object but the gallows, and to laugh,
curse, or shout, as in this heaving and struggling forward they gained or lost in their strong efforts to get nearer where Müller was to die.
The actual execution made some impression.
The crowd was for a moment awed and stilled by the quiet rapid passage from life to death!
But before "the slight slow vibrations of the body had well ended,
robbery and violence, loud laughing, oaths, fighting, obscene conduct, and still more filthy language reigned round the gallows far and near.
Such too the scene remained with little change or respite till the old hangman (Calcraft) slunk again along the drop,
amid hisses and sneering inquiries of what he had had to drink that morning.
He, after failing once to cut the rope, made a second attempt more successfully, and the body of Müller disappeared from view.
It was preposterous to claim for such a scene as this that it conveyed any great moral lesson, or had any deterring influence.
Numbers of humane and thoughtful persons had long been convinced of this.
Already the urgent necessity for abolishing public executions had been brought before the House of Commons by Mr. Hibbert,
and the question, as part of the whole subject of capital punishment, had been referred to a royal commission in January eighteen sixty-four.
Full evidence was taken on all points, and on that regarding public executions there was a great preponderance of opinion towards their abolition,
yet the witnesses were not unanimous.
Some of the judges would have retained the public spectacle; the ordinary of Newgate was not certain that public executions were not the best.
that any secrecy in the treatment of the condemned would invest them with a new and greater interest, which was much to be deprecated.
Foreign witnesses, too, were in favor of publicity.
On the other hand, Lords Cranworth and Wensleydale recommended private executions; so did Mr. Spencer Walpole, M.P.
Sir George Grey thought there was a growing feeling in favor of executions within the prison precincts.
Colonel (now Sir Edmund) Henderson was strongly in favor of them,
based on his experience of them in Western Australia. He not only thought them likely to be more deterrent,
but believed that a public ceremony destroyed the whole value of an execution.
Other officials, great lawyers, governors of prisons, and chaplains supported this view.
The only doubts expressed were as to the sufficiency of the safeguards, as to the certainty of death and its subsequent publication.
But these, it was thought, might be provided by the admission of the press and the holding of a coroner's inquest.
Duly impressed with the weight of evidence in favor of abolition,
the commission recommended that death sentences should be carried out within the jail, under such regulations as might be considered necessary
to prevent abuse, and satisfy the public that the law had been complied with.
But it is curious to note that there were several dissentients among the commissioners to this paragraph of the report.
The judge of the Admiralty Court, the Right Hon. Stephen Lushington, the Right Hon. James Moncrieff,
Lord Advocate, Mr. Charles Neate, Mr. William Ewart, and last, but not least, Mr. John Bright
declared that they were not prepared to agree to the resolution respecting private executions.
Nevertheless, in the very next session
a bill was introduced by Mr. Hibbert, M.P., and accepted by the Government, providing for the future carrying out of executions within prisons.
It was read for the first time in March eighteen sixty-six, but did not become law till eighteen sixty-eight.
The last public execution in front of Newgate was that of the Fenian Michael Barrett,
who was convicted of complicity in the Clerkenwell explosion, intended to effect the release of Burke and Casey
from Clerkenwell prison, by which many persons lost their lives.
Unusual precautions were taken upon this occasion, as some fresh outrage was apprehended.
There was no interference with the crowd, which collected as usual, although not to the customary extent.
But Newgate and its neighborhood was carefully held by the police, both city and metropolitan.
In the houses opposite the prison numbers of detectives mixed with the spectators;
inside the jail was Colonel Frazer, the chief commissioner of the city police, and at no great distance, although in the background,
troops were held in readiness to act if required. Everything passed off quite quietly, however,
and Calcraft, who had been threatened with summary retribution if he executed Barrett, carried out the sentence without mishap.
The sufferer was stolid and reticent to the last.
The first private execution under the new law took place within the precincts of Maidstone Jail.
The sufferer was a porter on the London, Chatham, and Dover railway, sentenced to death for shooting the station-master at Dover.
The ceremony, which was witnessed by only a few officials and representatives of the press, was performed with the utmost decency and decorum.
a fact duly advertised as completed by the hoisting of the black flag over the jail,
had undoubtedly a solemn, impressive effect upon those outside.
The same was realized in the first private execution within Newgate,
that of Alexander Mackay, who murdered his mistress at Norton Folgate by beating her with a rolling-pin and furnace-rake,
and who expiated his crime on the eighth September, eighteen sixty-eight.
A more marked change from the old scene can hardly be conceived. Instead of the roar of the brutalized crowd,
the officials spoke in whispers; there was but little moving to and fro.
Almost absolute silence prevailed until the great bell began to toll its deep note, and broke the stillness with its regular and monotonous clangour,
and the ordinary, in a voice trembling with emotion, read the burial service aloud.
Mackay's fortitude, which had been great,
broke down at the supreme moment before the horror of the stillness, the awful impressiveness of the scene in which he was the principal actor.
No time was lost in carrying out the dread ceremony; but it was not completed without some of the officials turning sick, and the moment it was over,
all who could were glad to escape from the last act of the ghastly drama at which they had assisted.
Private executions at their first introduction were not popular with the Newgate officials, and for intelligible reasons.
The change added greatly to the responsibilities of the governor and his subordinates. Hitherto the public had seemed to assist at the ceremony;
the moment too that the condemned man had passed through the debtors' door on to the scaffold the prison had done with him,
and the great outside world shared in the completion of the sacrifice.
This feeling was the stronger because
all the ghastly paraphernalia, the gallows itself and the process of erecting and removing it, rested with the city architect, and not with the prison officials.
Moreover, after the execution, under the old system, the latter had only to receive the body for burial after it had been cut down by the hangman,
and placed decently in a shell by the workmen who removed the gallows.
Under the new system the whole of the arrangements from first to last fell upon the officers.
It was they who formed the chief part of the small select group of spectators;
upon them devolved the painful duty of cutting down the body and preparing for the inquest.
All that the hangman, whoever he may be, does under the new regime is to unhook the halter and remove the pinioning straps.
The interment in a shell filled with quicklime in the passage-way leading to the Old Bailey is also a part of the duty of the prison officials.
and for the greater security of prisoners it is roofed in with iron bars which gives it, at least overhead, the aspect of a huge cage.
Underfoot and upon the walls roughly cut into the stones, are single initial letters, the brief epitaphs of those who lie below.
As this burial-ground leads to the adjacent Central Criminal Court, accused murderers, on going to and returning from trial,
literally walked over what, in case of conviction, would be their own graves.
The older officers, with several of whom I have conversed, have thus had unusual opportunities of watching the demeanor of murderers both before trial
All as a rule, unless poignant remorse has brought a desire to court their richly-merited retribution, are buoyed up
with hope to the last. There is always the chance of a flaw in the indictment, of a missing witness, or extenuating circumstances.
Even when in the condemned cell, with a shameful death within measurable distance,
many cling still to life, expecting much from the intercession of friends or the humanitarianism of the age.
All almost without exception sleep soundly at night, except the first after sentence,
when the first shock of the verdict and the solemn notification of the impending blow keeps nearly all awake, or at least disturbs their night's rest.
But the uneasiness soon wears off. The second night sleep comes readily, and is sound;
many of the most abandoned murderers snore peacefully their eight hours, even on the night immediately preceding execution.
All too have a fairly good appetite, and eat with relish, up to the last moment.
A few go further, and are almost gluttonous.
Giovanni Lanni, the Italian boy who murdered a Frenchwoman in the Haymarket,
and was arrested on board ship just as he was about to leave the country, had a little spare cash, which he devoted entirely to the purchase of extra food.
He ate constantly and voraciously after sentence, as though eager to cram as many meals as possible into the few hours still left him to live.
Jeffrey, who murdered his own child, an infant of six, by hanging him in a cellar in Seven Dials,
called for a roast duck directly he entered the condemned cell.
The request was not granted, as the old custom of allowing capital convicts whatever they asked for in the way of food has not been the rule in Newgate.
The diet of the condemned is the ordinary diet of the prison,
but to which additions are sometimes made, chiefly of stimulants, if deemed necessary, by the medical officer of the jail.
The craving for tobacco which so dominates the habitual smoker often leads the convicted to plead hard for a last smoke.
Wainwright was allowed a cigar the night before execution, which he smoked in the prison yard, walking up and down with the governor, Mr. Sydney Smith.
Wainwright's demeanor was one of reckless effrontery steadily maintained to the last.
His conversation turned always upon his influence over the weaker sex, and the extraordinary success he had achieved.
No woman could resist him, he calmly assured Mr. Smith that night as they walked together, and he recounted his villanies one by one.
His effrontery was only outdone by his cool contempt for the consolations of religion.
The man who had made a pious life a cloak for his misdeeds, the once exemplary young man and indefatigable Sunday School teacher,
went impenitent to the gallows. The only sign of feeling he showed was in asking to be allowed to choose the hymns on the Sunday
the condemned sermon was preached in the prison chapel, and this was probably only that he might hear the singing of a lady with a magnificent voice
who generally attended the prison services.
During the singing of these hymns Wainwright fainted, but whether from real emotion or the desire to make a sensation was never exactly known.
On the fatal morning he came gaily out of his cell,
nodded pleasantly to the governor, who stood just opposite, and then walked briskly towards the execution shed, smiling as he went along.
There was a smile on his face when it was last seen, and just as the terrible white cap was drawn over it.
Wainwright's execution was within the jail, but only nominally private.
No less than sixty-seven persons were present, admitted by special permission of the sheriff.
Rumour even went so far as to assert that among the spectators were several women, disguised in male habiliments;
but the story was never substantiated, and we may hope that it rested only on the idle gossip of the day.
Many, like Wainwright, were calm and imperturbable throughout their trying ordeal.
Catherine Wilson, the poisoner, was reserved and reticent to the last, expressing no contrition, but also no fear --
a tall, gaunt, repulsive-looking woman, who no more shrank from cowardly, secret crimes than from the penalty they entailed.
Kate Webster, who was tried at the Central Criminal Court, and passed through Newgate, although she suffered at Wandsworth,
is remembered at the former prison as a defiant,
brutal creature who showed no remorse, but was subject to fits of ungovernable passion, when she broke out into language the most appalling.
The man Marley displayed fortitude of a less repulsive kind. He acknowledged his guilt from the first.
When the sheriff offered him counsel for his defense, he declined, saying he wished to make none -- "the witnesses for the prosecution spoke the truth."
During the trial and after sentence he remained perfectly cool and collected.
When visited one day in the condemned cell, just as St. Sepulchre's clock was striking, he looked up and said laughingly, "Go along, clock;
He tripped up the chapel-stairs to hear the condemned sermon, and came out with cheerful alacrity on the morning he was to die.
Some condemned convicts converse but little with the warders who have them unceasingly in charge.
Others talk freely enough on various topics, but principally upon their own cases.
When vanity is strongly developed there is the keen anxiety to hear what is being said about them outside.
One was vexed to think that his victims had a finer funeral than he would have.
The only subject another showed any interest in was the theatres and the new pieces that were being produced. A third, Christian Satler,
laughed and jested with the officers about "Jack Ketch," who, through the postponement of the execution, would lose his Christmas dinner.
When they brought in the two watchers to relieve guard one night, Sattler said,
Two fresh men! May I speak to them? Yes! I must caution you, he went on to the warders, "not to go to sleep, or I shall be off through that little hole,"
pointing to an aperture for ventilating the cell. On the morning of execution he asked how far it was to the gallows, and was told it was quite close.
that the convict's clothes were still the executioner's perquisite.
Often the convicts give way to despair. They are too closely watched to be allowed to do themselves much mischief, or suicides would probably be more frequent.
But it is neither easy to obtain the instruments of self-destruction nor to elude the vigilance of their guard.
The man, Bousfield, however, whose execution was so sadly bungled,
made a determined effort to burn himself to death by throwing himself bodily on to the fire in the condemned ward.
He was promptly rescued from his perilous condition, but not before his face and hands were badly scorched.
They were still much swollen when he was led out to execution.
Miller, the Chelsea murderer, who packed his victim's body in a box, and tried to send it by parcels delivery, tried to kill himself,
but ineffectively, by running his head against his cell wall.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section twenty: Newgate Notorieties, part one.
As these records draw to a close, the crimes I chronicle become so much more recent in date that they will be fresh in the memory of most of my readers.
Nevertheless, in order to give completeness to the picture
I have attempted to draw of crime in connection with Newgate, from first to last, I must make some mention, in this my penultimate chapter,
of some of the most heinous offenses of modern times.
The crime of poisoning has always been viewed with peculiar loathing and terror in this country.
It will be remembered that as far back as the reign of Henry the eighth a new and most cruel penalty was devised for the punishment of the Bishop of Rochester's cook,
who had poisoned his master and many of his dependents.
Sir Thomas Overbury was undoubtedly poisoned by Lord Rochester in the reign of James the first,
and it is hinted that James himself nearly fell a victim to a nefarious attempt of the Duke of Buckingham.
But secret poisoning on a wholesale scale such as was practiced in Italy and France was happily never popularized in England.
The well-known and lethal aqua Toffania,
so called after its inventress, a Roman woman named Toffana, and which was so widely adopted by ladies anxious to get rid of their husbands,
was never introduced into this country. Its admission was probably checked by the increased vigilance at the custom houses,
the necessity for which was urged by Mr. Addison, when Secretary of State, in seventeen seventeen.
The cases of poisoning in the British calendars are rare, nor indeed was the guilt of the accused always clearly established.
It is quite possible that Catherine Blandy, who poisoned her father at the instigation of her lover,
was ignorant of the destructive character of the powders, probably arsenic, which she administered.
Captain Donellan, who was convicted of poisoning his brother-in-law, Sir Theodosius Broughton, and executed for it,
would probably have had the benefit in these days of the doubts raised at his trial.
A third case, more especially interesting to us as having passed through Newgate,
was that of Eliza Fenning, who was convicted of an attempt to poison a whole family
by putting arsenic in the dumplings she had prepared for them. The charge rested entirely on circumstantial evidence,
and as Fenning, although convicted and executed, protested her innocence in the most solemn manner to the last,
the justice of the sentence was doubted at the time.
Yet it was clearly proved that the dumplings contained arsenic, that she, and she alone, had made the dough,
that arsenic was within her reach in the house,
that she had had a quarrel with her mistress, and that the latter with all others who tasted the dumplings were similarly attacked, although no one died.
The crime of poisoning is essentially one which will be most prevalent in a high state of civilization,
when the spread of scientific knowledge places nefarious means at the disposal of many,
instead of limiting them, as in the days of the Borgias and Brinvilliers, to the specially informed and unscrupulously powerful few.
The first intimation conveyed to society of the new terror which threatened it was in the arrest and arraignment of William Palmer,
a medical practitioner, charged with doing to death persons who relied upon his professional skill.
The case contained elements of much uncertainty, and yet it was so essential,
in the interests and for the due protection of the public, that the fullest and fairest inquiry should be made,
that the trial was transferred to the Central Criminal Court,
under the authority of an Act passed on purpose, known as the Trial of offenses Act, and sometimes as Lord Campbell's Act.
That the administration of justice should never be interfered with by local prejudice or local feeling
is obviously of paramount importance, and the powers granted by this Act have been frequently put in practice since.
The trial of Catherine Winsor, the baby farmer,
was thus brought to the Central Criminal Court from Exeter assizes, and that of the Stauntons from Maidstone.
Palmer's trial caused the most intense excitement.
The direful suspicions which surrounded the case filled the whole country with uneasiness and misgiving,
and the deepest anxiety was felt that the crime, if crime there had been, should be brought home to its perpetrator.
The Central Criminal Court was crowded to suffocation.
Great personages occupied seats upon the bench;
the rest of the available space was allotted by ticket, to secure which the greatest influence was necessary.
People came to stare at the supposed cold-blooded prisoner;
with morbid curiosity to scan his features and watch his demeanor through the shifting, nicely-balanced phases of his protracted trial.
Palmer, who was only thirty-one at the time of his trial, was in appearance short and stout, with a round head
covered rather scantily with light sandy hair.
His skin was extraordinarily fair, his cheeks fresh and ruddy; altogether his face, though commonplace, was not exactly ugly;
there was certainly nothing in it which indicated cruel cunning or deliberate truculence.
His features were not careworn, but rather set, and he looked older than his age.
Throughout his trial he preserved an impassive countenance, but he clearly took a deep interest in all that passed.
Although the strain lasted fourteen days, he showed no signs of exhaustion, either physical or mental.
On returning to jail each day he talked freely and without reserve to the warders in charge of him, chiefly on incidents in the day's proceedings.
He was confident to the very last that it would be impossible to find him guilty;
even after sentence, and until within a few hours of execution, he was buoyed up with the hope of reprieve.
The conviction that he would escape had taken so firm a hold of him,
that he steadily refused to confess his guilt, lest it should militate against his chances.
In the condemned cell he frequently repeated, quote, I go to my death a murdered man, end quote.
He made no distinct admissions even on the scaffold; but when the chaplain at the last moment exhorted him to confess,
he made use of the remarkable words, quote, If it is necessary for my soul's sake to confess this murder,
I ought also to confess the others: I mean my wife and my brother's. End quote.
Yet he was silent when specifically pressed to confess that he had killed his wife and his brother.
Palmer was ably defended, but the weight of evidence was clearly with the prosecution, led by Sir Alexander Cockburn,
and public opinion at the termination of the trial coincided with the verdict of the jury.
Originally a doctor in practice at Rugeley, in Staffordshire, he had gradually withdrawn from medicine, and devoted himself to the turf;
but his sporting operations did not prosper, and he became a needy man, always driven to desperate straits for cash.
To meet his liabilities, he raised large sums on forged bills of acceptance drawn upon his mother, a woman of some means,
In eighteen fifty-four he owed a very large sum of money, but he was temporarily relieved by the death of his wife,
whose life he had insured for thirteen thousand pounds.
There is every reason to suppose that he poisoned his wife to obtain possession of this sum upon her death.
His brother was supposed to have been his next victim, upon whose life he had also effected an insurance for another thirteen thousand pounds.
The brother too died conveniently, but the life office took some exception to the manner of the death, and hesitated to disburse the funds claimed by Palmer.
Palmer tried to get a new insurance on the life of a hanger-on, one Bates, but no office would accept it, no doubt greatly to Bates's longevity.
Meanwhile the bill discounters who held the forged acceptances, with other promissory notes, began to clamor for payment, and talk of issuing writs.
Palmer, alive to the danger he ran of a prosecution for forgery, should the fraud he had committed be brought to light,
sought about for a fresh victim to supply him with funds.
He fixed upon a sporting friend, Mr. John Parsons Cook, who had been in luck at Shrewsbury races, both as a winner and a backer,
whom he persuaded to go and stay at Rugeley in an hotel just opposite his own house.
It was there that Cook was first taken ill with violent retchings and vomitings, all dating from visits of Palmer, who brought him medicines and food.
Palmer's plan was to administer poison in quantities insufficient to cause death, but enough to produce illness which would account for death.
For this purpose he gave, or there was the strongest presumption that he gave,
antimony, which caused Cook's constant sickness.
Quantities of antimony were found in the body after death.
While Cook lay ill, Palmer in his name pocketed the proceeds of the Shrewsbury settling,
and so got the money for which he was prepared to barter his soul.
The last act now approached, and in order to avoid the detection of this last fraud, Palmer laid his plans for disposing of Cook.
He decided to use strychnia, or the vegetable poison otherwise known as nux vomica;
and one of the many links in the long chain of evidence was an entry in a book of Palmer's to the effect that Quote.
strychnia kills by causing tetanic fixing of the respiratory muscles. End quote.
The purchase by Palmer of strychnia was proved.
The night he bought it, Cook, who had been taking certain pills under medical advice, not Palmer's, was seized with violent convulsions.
He had swallowed his pills as usual, at least Palmer had administered them
whether the ordinary or his own pills will never be known, except as may be inferred from the results, which indicate that he had taken the latter.
Cook recovered this time; it was probably Palmer's intention that he should recover, wishing to encourage the supposition that Cook was in a bad way.
Next night Cook had a second and a more violent attack.
That day Palmer had bought more strychnia, and had called in a fresh doctor.
The second attack was fatal, and ended in Cook's death from tetanus.
This tetanus, according to the prosecution, was produced by strychnia, and followed the administration of pills by Palmer
prescribed nominally by the fresh doctor, for which Palmer had substituted his own.
fearful paroxysms and cramps, ending in suffocation by the tetanic rigor which caught the muscles of the chest.
After Cook's death his stepfather, who was much attached to him, came to Rugeley.
He was struck with the appearance of the corpse, which was not emaciated, as after a long disease ending in death;
while the muscles of the fingers were tightly clenched, not open, as usual in a corpse.
He said nothing, but began to feel uneasy when he found that Cook's betting-book was missing, and that Palmer put it forward
that his friend had died greatly embarrassed, with bills to the amount of four thousand pounds out in his name.
Palmer too showed an indecent haste in preparing the body for interment, and in obtaining the usual certificate.
After this the step-father insisted upon a post-mortem, which was conducted somewhat carelessly.
The intestines were, however, preserved and sent for analysis,
but it was proved that Palmer tried hard to get possession of the jar containing them,
and even sought to upset the vehicle by which they were being conveyed a part of the way to London.
The examination of the stomach betrayed the presence of antimony in large quantities, but no strychnia,
and it was on the entire absence of the latter that the defense was principally based when Palmer was brought to trial.
All the circumstances were so suspicious that he could not escape the criminal charge.
He had already been arrested on a writ issued at the instance of the money-lenders, and an action had been commenced against Mrs. Palmer on her acceptances.
It came out at once that these had been forged, and the whole affair at once took the ugliest complexion.
A government prosecution was instituted, and Palmer was brought to Newgate for trial at the Central Criminal Court.
There was not much reserve about him when there.
He frequently declared before and during the trial that it would be impossible to find him guilty.
He never actually said that he was not guilty, but he was confident he would not be convicted.
He relied on the absence of the strychnia.
But the chain of circumstantial evidence was strong enough to satisfy the jury, who agreed to their verdict in an hour.
At the last moment Palmer tossed a bit of paper over to his counsel, on which he had written, quote, I think there will be a verdict of Not Guilty, end quote.
Even after the death sentence had been passed upon him he clung to the hope that the Government would grant him a reprieve.
To the last, therefore, he played the part of a man wrongfully convicted, and did not abandon hope
even when the high sheriff had told him there was no possibility of a reprieve, and within a few hours of execution.
He suffered at Stafford in front of the jail.
Within a few weeks occurred the Leeds poisoning case, in which the murderer undoubtedly was inspired by the facts made public at Palmer's trial.
Dove, a fiendish brute, found from the evidence in that case that he could kill his wife, whom he hated,
with exquisite torture, and with a poison that would leave, as he thought, no trace.
In the latter hope he was happily disappointed. But as this case is beyond my subject, I merely mention it as one of the group already referred to.
Three years later came the case of Dr. Smethurst,
presenting still greater features of resemblance with Palmer's, for both were medical men, and both raised difficult questions of medical jurisprudence.
In both the jury had no doubt as to the guilt of the accused, only in Smethurst's case the then Home Secretary, Sir George Cornewall Lewis,
could not divest his mind of serious doubt, and of which the murderer got the benefit.
Smethurst's escape may have influenced the jury in the Poplar poisoning case,
which followed close on its heels, although in that the verdict of "Not Guilty" was excusable, as the evidence was entirely circumstantial.
There was no convincing proof that the accused had administered the poison, although beyond question that poison had occasioned the death.
Dr. Smethurst was long an inmate of Newgate, and was tried at the Central Criminal Court.
He had all the characteristics of the poisoner -- the calm deliberation,
the protracted dissimulation, as with unshrinking, relentless wickedness the deadly work is carried on to the end.
Smethurst's victim was a Miss Bankes, with whom he had contracted a bigamous marriage.
He had met her at a boarding-house, where he lived with his own wife, a person of "shady" antecedents,
and whom he left without scruple to join Miss Bankes.
The latter seems to have succumbed only too willingly to his fascinations, and to have as readily agreed to marry him,
in spite of the existence of the other Mrs. Smethurst.
Probably the doctor had told her the story he brought forward when tried for bigamy, namely,
that Mrs. Smethurst had no right to the name, but had a husband of her own, one Johnson, alive -- a story subsequently disproved.
Miss Bankes seems to have counted upon some species of whitewashing, no less than the repudiation of the other marriage,
and told her sister as much when they last met.
For some months Smethurst and Miss Bankes lived together as man and wife, first in London, and then at Richmond.
She had a little fortune of her own, some one thousand seven hundred pounds or one thousand eight hundred pounds,
and a life-interest in five thousand pounds, a fact on which Smethurst's counsel dwelt with much weight,
as indicating a motive for keeping her alive rather than killing her.
But probably the lump sum was the bait, or perhaps Smethurst wished to return to his temporarily deserted first wife.
Whatever the exact cause which impelled him to crime, it seems certain that he began to give her some poison,
either arsenic or antimony, or both, in small quantities,
with the idea of subjecting her to the irritant poison slowly but surely until the desired effect, death, was achieved.
As she became worse and worse, Smethurst called in the best medical advice in Richmond,
but was careful to prime them with his facts and lead them if possible to accept his diagnosis of the case.
Smethurst was found guilty by the jury, and sentenced to death.
But a long public discussion followed, and in consequence he was reprieved.
The Home Secretary, in a letter to the Lord Chief Baron, stated that, quote, although the facts are full of suspicion against Smethurst,
there is not absolute and complete evidence of his guilt. End quote.
Smethurst was therefore given a free pardon for the offense of murder,
but he was subsequently again tried for bigamy, and sentenced to twelve months' imprisonment.
Catherine Wilson was a female poisoner who did business wholesale.
She was tried in April eighteen sixty-two on suspicion of having attempted to poison a neighbor with oil of vitriol.
The circumstances were strange. Mrs. Wilson had gone to the chemist's for medicine,
and on her return had administered a dose of something which burnt the mouth badly, but did not prove fatal.
Wilson was acquitted on this charge, but other suspicious facts cropped up while she was in Newgate.
It appeared that several persons with whom she was intimate had succumbed suddenly.
In all cases the symptoms were much the same,
vomiting, violent retching, purging, such as are visible in cholera, and all dated from the time when she knew a young man named Dixon,
who had been in the habit of taking colchicum for rheumatism. Mrs. Wilson heard then casually from a medical man
that it was a very dangerous medicine, and she profited by what she had heard.
Soon afterwards Dixon died, showing all the symptoms already described.
Soon afterwards a friend, Mrs. Atkinson, came to London from Westmoreland, and stayed in Mrs. Wilson's house.
She was in good health on leaving home, and had with her a large sum of money.
While with Mrs. Wilson she became suddenly and alarmingly ill, and died in great agony.
Her husband, who came up to town, would not allow a post-mortem, and again Mrs. Wilson escaped.
Mrs. Atkinson's symptoms had been the same as Dixon's. Then Mrs. Wilson went to live with a man named Taylor,
who was presently attacked in the same way as the others, but, but, thanks to the prompt administration of remedies, he recovered.
After this came the charge of administering oil of vitriol, which failed, as has been described.
Last of all Mrs. Wilson poisoned her landlady, Mrs. Soames, under precisely the same conditions as the foregoing.
Here, however, the evidence was strong and sufficient.
It was proved that Mrs. Wilson had given Mrs. Soames something peculiar to drink,
that immediately afterwards Mrs. Soames was taken ill with vomiting and purging,
and that Mrs. Wilson administered the same medicine again and again.
The last time Mrs. Soames showed great reluctance to take it, but Wilson said it would certainly do her good.
This mysterious medicine Wilson kept carefully locked up, and allowed no one to see it,
but its nature was betrayed when this last victim also died.
The first post-mortem indicated death from natural causes,
but a more careful investigation attributed it beyond doubt to over-doses of colchicum.
Dr. Alfred Taylor, the great authority and writer on medical jurisprudence, corroborated this, and in his evidence on the trial
fairly electrified the court by declaring it his opinion that many deaths, supposed to be from cholera, were really due to poison.
This fact was referred to by the judge in his summing up,
who said that he feared it was only too true that secret poisoning was at that time very rife in the metropolis.
Wilson was duly sentenced to death, and suffered impenitent, hardened, and without any confession of her guilt.
Although murder by insidious methods had become more common, cases where violence of the most deadly and determined kind was offered
had not quite disappeared. I will mention two cases of this class, one accompanied with piracy on the high seas,
the other perpetrated in a railway-carriage, and showing the promptitude with which criminals accept and utilize altered conditions of life,
more particularly as regards locomotion.
The first case was that of the 'Flowery Land,'
which left London for Singapore on the twenty-eighth July, eighteen sixty-three, with a cargo of wine and other goods.
Her captain was John Smith;
the first and second mates, Karswell and Taffir; there were two other Englishmen on board, and the rest of the crew were a polyglot lot,
most of them, as was proved by their subsequent acts, blackguards of the deepest dye.
Six were Spaniards, or rather natives of Manilla, and men of color; one was a Greek, another a Turk;
there were also a Frenchman, a Norwegian (the carpenter), three Chinamen, a "Sclavonian," and a black on board.
Navigation and discipline could not be easy with such a nondescript crew.
The captain was kindly but somewhat intemperate, the first mate a man of some determination,
and punishment such as rope's-ending and tying to the bulwarks had to be applied to get the work properly done.
The six Spaniards, the Greek, and the Turk were in the same watch,
eight truculent and reckless scoundrels, who, brooding over their fancied wrongs, and burning for revenge,
hatched amongst them a plot to murder their officers and seize the ship.
The mutiny was organized with great secrecy, and broke out most unexpectedly in the middle of the night.
A simultaneous attack was made upon the captain and the first mate.
The latter had the watch on deck.
One half of the mutineers fell upon him unawares with handspikes and capstan-bars.
He was struck down, imploring mercy, but they beat him about the head and face
till every feature was obliterated, and then, still living, flung him into the sea.
Meanwhile the captain, roused from his berth,
came out of the cabin, was caught near the 'companion' by the rest of the mutineers, and promptly dispatched with daggers.
His body was found lying in a pool of blood in a night-dress, stabbed over and over again in the left side.
The captain's brother, a passenger on board the 'Flowery Land,' was also stabbed to death and his body thrown overboard.
The second mate, who had heard the hammering of the capstan-bars and the handspikes, with the first mate's and captain's agonized cries, had come out,
verified the murderers, and then shut himself up in his cabin.
He was soon summoned on deck, but as he would not move, the mutineers came down and stood in a circle round his berth.
Leon, or Lyons, who spoke English,
when asked said they would spare his life if he would navigate the ship for them to the River Plate or Buenos Aires.
Taffir, the second mate, agreed, but constantly went in fear of his life for the remainder of the voyage;
and although the mutineers spared him, they ill-treated the Chinamen, and cut one badly with knives.
Immediately after the murder cases of champagne, which formed part of the cargo, were brought on deck and broached;
the captain's cabin ransacked, his money and clothes divided amongst the mutineers, as well as much of the merchandise on board.
Leon wished to make every one on board share and share alike, so as to implicate the innocent with the guilty;
but Vartos, or Watto, the Turk, would not allow any but the eight mutineers to have anything.
The murders were perpetrated on the tenth September, and the ship continued her voyage for nearly three weeks, meeting and speaking one ship only.
On the second October they sighted land, ten miles distant;
the mutineers took command of the ship, put her about till night-fall, by which time they had scuttled her, got out the boats, and all left the ship.
The rest of the crew were also permitted to embark, except the Chinamen, one of whom was thrown into the water and drowned,
while the other two were left to go down in the ship, and were seen clinging to the tops until the waters closed over them.
The boats reached the shore on the fourth October. Leon had prepared a plausible tale to the effect that they belonged to an American ship
from Peru bound to Bordeaux, which had foundered at sea;
that they had been in the boats five days and nights, but that the captain and others had been lost.
The place at which they landed was not far from the entrance to the River Plate.
A farmer took them in for the night, and drove them next day to Rocha, a place north of Maldonado.
Taffir, the mate, finding there was a man who could speak English at another place twenty miles off,
repaired there secretly, and so gave information to the Brazilian authorities.
The mutineers were arrested, the case inquired into by a naval court-martial,
and the prisoners eventually surrendered to the British authorities, brought to England, and lodged in Newgate.
Their trial followed at the Central Criminal Court.
Eight were arraigned at the same time: six Spaniards, Leon, Blanco, Duranno, Santos, and Marsolino;
Vartos the Turk, and Carlos the Greek.
Seven were found guilty of murder on the high seas, and one, Carlos, acquitted.
Two of the seven, Santos and Marsolino, were reprieved, and their sentences commuted to penal servitude for life;
the remaining five were executed in one batch.
They were an abject, miserable crew, cowards at heart; but some, especially Lopez, continued bloodthirsty to the last.
Lopez took a violent dislike to the officer of the ward in charge of them, and often expressed a keen desire to do for him.
They none of them spoke much English except Leon, commonly called Lyons.
After condemnation, as the rules now kept capital convicts strictly apart, they could not be lodged in the two condemned cells,
and they were each kept in an ordinary separate cell of the newly-constructed block, with the "traps," or square openings in the cell door,
let down. A full view of them was thus at all times obtainable by the officers who, without intermission, day and night patrolled the ward.
On the morning of execution the noise of fixing the gallows in the street outside awoke one or two of them.
Lyons asked the time, and was told it was only five.
Ah! he remarked, "they will have to wait for us then till eight."
When the warder went in to call him he asked for his clothes. He was told he would have to wear his own.
Then he wanted to know when the policemen would arrive, and was told none would come.
The convicts were pinioned one by one and sent singly out to the gallows.
As the first to appear would have some time to wait for his fellows, a difficult and painful ordeal,
the seemingly most courageous was selected to lead the way.
This was Duranno; but the sight of the heaving mass of uplifted, impassioned faces
was too much for his nerves, and he so nearly fainted that he had to be seated in a chair.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section twenty-one: Newgate Notorieties, part two.
In July eighteen sixty-four occurred the murder of Mr. Briggs, a gentleman advanced in years and chief clerk in Robarts' bank.
As the circumstances under which it was perpetrated were somewhat novel,
and as some time elapsed before the discovery and apprehension of the supposed murderer,
the public mind was greatly agitated by the affair for several months. The story of the murder must be pretty familiar to most of my readers.
Mr. Briggs left the bank one afternoon as usual, dined with his daughter at Peckham,
then returned to the city to take the train from Fenchurch Street home, traveling by the North London Railway.
He lived at Hackney, but he never reached it alive.
When the train arrived at Hackney station, a passenger who was about to enter one of the carriages found the cushions soaked with blood.
Inside the carriage was a hat, a walking-stick, and a small black leather bag.
About the same time a body was discovered on the line near the railway-bridge by Victoria Park.
It was that of an aged man, whose head had been battered in by a life-preserver.
There was a deep wound just over the ear, the skull was fractured, and there were several other blows and wounds on the head.
Strange to say, the unfortunate man was not yet dead, and he actually survived more than four-and-twenty hours.
His identity was established by a bundle of letters in his pocket, which bore his full address:
T. Briggs, Esq., Robarts and Co., Lombard Street.
The friends of Mr. Briggs were communicated with, and it was ascertained that when he left home the morning of the murderous attack,
he wore gold-rimmed eye-glasses and a gold watch and chain.
The stick and bag were his, but not the hat.
A desperate and deadly struggle must have taken place in the carriage, and the stain of a bloody hand marked the door.
The facts of the murder and its object, robbery, were thus conclusively proved.
It was also easily established that the hat found in the carriage had been bought at Walker's, a hatter's in Crawford Street,
Marylebone; while within a few days Mr. Briggs' gold chain was traced to a jeweler's in Cheapside,
Mr. Death, who had given another in exchange for it to a man supposed to be a foreigner.
More precise clues to the murderer were not long wanting; indeed the readiness with which they were produced and followed up
showed how greatly the publicity and wide dissemination of the news regarding murder facilitate the detection of crime.
In little more than a week a cabman came forward and voluntarily made a statement which at once drew suspicion to a German, Franz Müller,
who had been a lodger of his. Müller had given the cabman's little daughter a jeweler's cardboard box bearing the name of Mr. Death.
A photograph of Müller shown the jeweler was identified as the likeness of the man who had exchanged Mr. Briggs' chain.
Last of all, the cabman swore that he had bought the very hat found in the carriage for Müller at the hatter's, Walker's of Crawford Street.
This fixed the crime pretty certainly upon Müller, who had already left the country, thus increasing suspicion under which he lay.
There was no mystery about his departure; he had gone to Canada, by the 'Victoria' sailing ship, starting from the London docks, and bound to New York.
Directly the foregoing facts were established, a couple of detective officers, armed with a warrant to arrest Müller,
and accompanied by Mr. Death the jeweler and the cabman, went down to Liverpool and took the first steamer across the Atlantic.
This was the 'City of Manchester,' which was expected to arrive some days before the 'Victoria,' and did so.
The officers went on board the 'Victoria' at once, Müller was identified by Mr. Death, and the arrest was made.
In searching the prisoner's box, Mr. Briggs' watch was found wrapped up in a piece of leather,
and Müller at the time of his capture was actually wearing Mr. Briggs' hat, cut down and somewhat altered.
The prisoner was forthwith extradited and sent back to England, which he reached with his escort on the seventeenth September the same year.
His trial followed at the next sessions of the Central Criminal Court, and ended in his conviction.
The case was one of circumstantial evidence, but, as Sir Robert Collyer the Solicitor-General pointed out,
it was the strongest circumstantial evidence which had ever been brought forward in a murder case.
It was really evidence of facts which could not be controverted or explained away.
There was the prisoner's poverty, his inability to account for himself on the night of the murder, and his possession of the property of the murdered man.
An alibi was set up for the defense, but not well substantiated, and the jury without hesitation returned a verdict of guilty.
Müller protested after sentence of death had been passed upon him that he had been convicted on a false statement of facts.
He adhered to this almost to the very last. His case had been warmly espoused by the Society for the Protection of Germans in this country,
and powerful influence was exerted both here and abroad to obtain a reprieve.
Müller knew that any confession would ruin his chances of escape.
His arguments were specious and evasive when pressed to confess. "Why should man confess to man?" he replied;
man cannot forgive man, only God can do so. Man is therefore only accountable to God.
But on the gallows, when the cap was over his eyes and the rope had been adjusted round his neck, and within a second of the moment when he would be launched into eternity,
he whispered in the ear of the German pastor who attended him on the scaffold,
While in the condemned cell he conversed freely with the warders in broken English or through an interpreter.
He is described as not a bad-looking man, with a square German type of face,
blue eyes which were generally half closed, and very fair hair.
He was short in stature, his legs were light for the upper part of his body, which was powerful, almost herculean.
It is generally supposed that he committed the murder under a sudden access of covetousness and greed.
He saw Mr. Briggs' watch-chain, and followed him instantly into the carriage, determined to have it at all costs.
His crime under this aspect of it was less premeditated, and less atrocious therefore, than that of Lefroy.
One other curious murder may be added to the two foregoing.
Christian Sattler was by birth a German.
He had led a wild life; had left his native land and enlisted first in the French army in Algeria,
afterwards in the British German Legion raised for the Crimean War.
At the disbandment of the force, as he was without resources, he turned his attention to hotel robberies, by which he lived for some years.
He at length stole a carpet-bag containing valuables, and fled to Hamburgh.
Thither, he was pursued by a detective officer,
Inspector Thain, who, being unable to obtain his extradition legally, had him inveigled on board an English steamer,
where the arrest was made.
Sattler was ironed for safe custody,
a proceeding which he vehemently resented, and begged that they might be removed, as the handcuffs hurt his wrists.
The inspector said that they could not be removed till he reached England.
This reply of his contained no promise of immediate release.
Sattler probably misunderstood, and he declared that the police officer had broken faith with him, having, moreover, stated that
while at sea the captain of the ship was responsible for the security of the prisoner.
As Sattler brooded over his wrongs, his rage got the upper hand, and he resolved to wreak it upon Thain.
Although manacled, he managed to get a pistol from his chest and load it.
The next time Thain entered his cabin he fired at him point-blank, and lodged three bullets in his breast.
The unfortunate man survived till he landed, but died in Guy's Hospital.
Sattler was tried for murder and convicted;
his defense being that he had intended to commit suicide, but that, on the appearance of this officer who had wronged him,
he had yielded to an irresistible impulse to kill him.
Sattler was a very excitable although not an ill-tempered man.
While in Newgate awaiting trial he frequently tried to justify his murder by declaring that the police officer had broken faith with him.
He would shoot any man or any policeman like a dog, or any number of them, who had treated him in that way.
His demeanor immediately preceding his execution I have referred to in the last chapter.
Several cases of gigantic fraud, rivaling any already recorded, were brought to light between eighteen fifty-six and eighteen seventy-three.
I propose next to describe the leading features of the most important of these.
Another case of long-continued successful forgery was brought to light two years after the convictions of Saward and his accomplices.
This conspiracy was cleverly planned, but had scarcely so many ramifications as that of Saward. Its originators were a couple of men,
Wagner and Bateman, who had already been convicted of systematic forgery, and sentenced to transportation, but they had been released on ticket-of-leave
As a blind for their new frauds, they set up as law-stationers in York Buildings, Adelphi, and at once commenced their nefarious traffic.
Forged cheques and bills were soon uttered in great numbers, as well as base coin.
The police suspecting the house in York Buildings, put a watch on the premises, which they kept up for more than a year,
and thus obtained personal knowledge of all who passed in and out, but without obtaining any direct evidence.
At length a man was caught in the act of passing a forged cheque at the Union Bank,
and recognized as one of the frequenters of the bogus law-stationers. His arrest led to that of others.
Among them was a man named Chandler, formerly a bill discounter by profession, who by degrees, to meet his extravagant expenditure,
took to appropriating the bills intrusted to him, and so lost his business, after which he became a clerk to Messrs. Wagner and Bateman.
Chandler while in Newgate turned informer, and betrayed the whole conspiracy.
Besides his employers, a jeweler named Humphreys was in the "swim," at whose shop in Red Lion Square was discovered a quantity of base gold
and silver coins, with all the latest appliances for coining, including those of electroplating;
also a furniture dealer and one or two more commonplace rogues. The arch villain was never taken into custody.
He, like Saward, was an artist in penmanship.
He was a German named Kerp,
eighty years of age, who had spent his whole life in imitating other people's signatures, and had acquired the most consummate skill in the practice.
His copies were generally pronounced indistinguishable from and as good as the originals.
The aged but wary Kerp, the moment the plot was discovered, vanished, and was never more heard of.
Much the same plan was adopted by these forgers as by Saward to get their cheques cashed.
They advertised for clerks, and employed the most likely of the applicants by sending them to the bank.
It was one of these, Glendinning, who had allowed himself to be utilized for some time in this way, whose capture led to the breaking up of the gang.
The principals in this conspiracy, Wagner and Bateman, were sentenced to penal servitude for life,
the others to twenty and ten years.
It was stated in evidence that the monies obtained by these forgeries amounted to eight thousand pounds or ten thousand pounds,
and that the forged cheques which had been presented, but refused, amounted to double the sum.
Wagner, after conviction, offered to reveal, for a reward of three thousand pounds
a system which had long been in practice of defrauding the Exchequer of vast sums by means of forged stamps.
His offer was not, however, accepted.
A more elaborate plot in many ways, more secretly, more patiently prepared than the preceding, or indeed than any in the calendar,
was the case of the forgeries upon the Bank of England discovered in eighteen sixty-three,
but not before the forged paper had been put in circulation for more than a couple of years. In eighteen sixty-one,
a man named Burnett came with his wife and took up his residence at Whitchurch, Hampshire, at no great distance from Laverstock,
where are Messrs. Portal's mills for the manufacture of bank-note paper.
Burnett had only just come out of jail after completing a sentence of penal servitude.
His object in visiting Whitchurch was to undermine the honesty of some workman in the mills;
and he eventually succeeded, his wife making the first overtures, in persuading a lad named Brown to steal some of the bank paper.
Brown took several sheets, and then was detected by Brewer, a fellow-workman of superior grade,
who threatened to betray the theft. But Brewer, either before or after this, succumbed to temptation,
and stole paper on a much larger scale than Brown.
All that was taken was handed over to Burnett, or a "woman in black" whom Brown met by appointment at Waterloo station.
To facilitate his operations, Brewer obtained a false master key from Burnett,
which gave him access to all parts of the mills, the packing-room included.
In this part of the mills a large quantity of bank-note paper was kept at the period of the robbery,
and in the states known as "water-leaf" and "sized," which are the penultimate processes of manufacture.
One more remains, that of "glazing," without which no paper is issued for engraving.
None of the stolen paper was glazed, and this was an important clue to the subsequent discovery of the crime.
Some time in eighteen sixty-two, a large deficiency in stock of bank paper unglazed was discovered at the mills.
Soon afterwards the inspectors of bank-notes at the Bank of England detected the presentation at the bank of spurious notes on genuine paper.
The two facts taken in conjunction
led to the employment of the police, and the offer of a reward of fifteen hundred pounds for the detection of the offenders.
By this time Brown alone had stolen three or four hundred sheets,
each containing two notes, many of the sheets suitable for engraving any kind of note from one thousand pounds downwards.
The amount of Brewer's abstractions (who was eventually acquitted) was never exactly estimated.
Suspicion appears to have rested on Brown, who had left Laverstock,
and he was soon approached by the police. Almost directly he was questioned he made a clean breast of the whole affair.
The next step was to take the principals, and under such circumstances as would insure their conviction.
A watch was set on Burnett, who was followed to the shop of one Buncher, a butcher in Strutton Ground.
Buncher was then tracked to North Kent Terrace, New Cross, where a Mr. and Mrs. Campbell resided,
with whom he did business in exchanging the false notes.
The police officers now taxed Mrs. Campbell with complicity, and frightened her into collusion.
With her assistance on a certain day a couple of bricks were taken out of the wall dividing her front and back parlors;
the officers ensconced themselves in the latter, and waited for Buncher's expected visit.
He came to complete a sale of forged notes, and he wanted a couple of hundred pounds for what he had.
Mrs. Campbell offered him less, and there was an altercation, in the course of which Buncher became very violent, and at length,
after using much intemperate language, he left the place in a huff.
In the course of his remarks, however, he said,
I am the man that has got all the bank paper; I have thirty thousand pounds now, and the Bank of England cannot stop it.
This was all the police wanted to know.
They next watched Buncher, and found that he paid frequent visits to Birmingham.
They also discovered that through the intermediacy of one Robert Cummings, well known as a reputed coiner,
he had been introduced to a man named Griffiths, an engraver and copper-plate printer.
Griffiths was an unusually clever and skilful workman,
who had devoted all his talent and all his energies for some seventeen years to the fabrication of false bank-notes.
On a certain day, the twenty-seventh October, eighteen sixty-two, the two were arrested simultaneously;
Buncher in London, and Griffiths in Birmingham.
Nothing was found in Buncher's premises in Strutton Ground, which were thoroughly searched,
but proofs of Griffiths' guilt were at once apparent on entering his work-room.
In one corner was a printing-press actually in use, and on it were twenty-one forged Bank of England notes, without date or signature.
On the bed were twenty forged ten-pound notes complete and ready for use, and twenty-five five-pound notes.
Mother plates for engraving the body of the notes lay about, and other plates for various processes.
More than this, Griffiths took the police to a field where, in a bank, a number of other plates were secreted.
Griffiths afterwards admitted that he had been employed in defrauding the bank since eighteen forty-six,
and the prominent part he played secured for him on conviction the heaviest sentence of the law.
This was penal servitude for life, Buncher's sentence being twenty-five, and Burnett's twenty years.
Cummings, who had introduced Buncher to Griffiths, was also tried for being in possession of stolen bank paper for improper purposes.
But as there was no independent corroboration of the informer's evidence, according to the custom of the British law,
the case was considered not proved, and he was acquitted.
On his return to Newgate to be finally discharged, Cummings jumped up the stairs and fairly danced for joy.
But he was not long at large; he was too active an evil-doer
and was perpetually in trouble. Commencing life as a resurrection man, when that trade failed through the change in the law,
and no more bodies were to be bought
he devoted his energies to coining and forgery, and in the latter line was a friend and associate of Saward's.
One narrow escape he had, however, before he abandoned his old business.
A Bow Street officer saw him leaving London in the evening by Camberwell Green, accompanied by two other men.
It was well known that they were resurrectionists, and a strict watch was kept at all the turnpike gates on the southern roads leading into London.
An officer was placed for this purpose at New Cross, Camberwell, and Kennington gates.
Presently "Old Bob" drove up to Camberwell Gate in the same cart in which he had been seen to start.
The officers rushed out to detain him. "What have you got here? We must search the cart," they cry.
By all means, replies Bob, and a close investigation follows, without any detection of the corpse concealed.
Bob was therefore allowed to pass on.
But they had the body, all the same; it had been dressed up in decent clothes and made to stand upright in the cart.
With the police officers it had passed muster as a living member of the party.
Cummings was repeatedly "run in" for the offense of coining and uttering bad money, whether coin or notes.
His regular trade, followed before he took to the life of resurrectionist, was that of an engraver.
He was a notorious criminal,
an habitual offender in his own particular line, one who would stick at no trifles to evade detection or escape capture.
It is told of "Bob" Brennan, an official specially employed for years by the Mint
to watch and prosecute coiners, that he received information that coining was carried on by Cummings and others at a place in Westminster.
He went there with a posse of officers and forced his way upstairs to the first floor,
where the coiners, unexpectedly disturbed, fell an easy prey.
But the police nearly paid the penalty of capture with their lives.
Proceeding cautiously down the stairs, they found that the flooring at the bottom had been taken up.
Where it had lain was a yawning gulf or trap sufficient to do for the whole body of police engaged in the capture.
Cummings was caught shortly afterwards.
He was a tall, slender man, with a long face and iron-gray hair.
The community of coiners of which he was so notorious a member
were a low lot, the lowest among criminals except, perhaps, the 'smashers,' or those who passed the counterfeit money.
It was not easy to detect coiners, or bring home their guilt to them.
Those who manufactured and those who passed had no direct dealings with each other.
The false coin was bought by an agent from an agent, and dealings were carried on secretly at the "Clock House" in Seven Dials.
The annals of fraudulent crime probably contain nothing
which in dramatic interest can compare with the conviction of William Roupell for forgery.
As the case must still be well remembered by the present generation, it will be necessary to give here only the briefest summary.
William Roupell was the eldest but illegitimate son of a wealthy man who subsequently married Roupell's mother, and had further legitimate issue.
William was brought up as an attorney, and became in due course his father's man of business.
As such he had pretty general control over his father's estates and affairs.
he instructed certain solicitors to prepare a deed of gift as from his father, conveying to him estates near Kingston.
The old gentleman's signature to this deed of gift was a forgery,
but upon this forged and false conveyance William Roupell, who had already embarked upon a career of wild extravagance,
obtained a mortgage of seven thousand pounds.
In eighteen fifty-six the father died.
It had been supposed up to this date that he had willed his property, amounting in all to upwards of two hundred thousand pounds,
but after the funeral William Roupell produced another and a later will,
leaving everything to the widow, and constituting William sole executor.
This will was a deliberate forgery.
Five or six years later, William Roupell minutely described how he had effected the fraud.
The day his father died he got the keys of his private bureau, opened it, and took out the authentic will.
After reading it, and finding this unfavorable to himself, he resolved to carry out his deliberate plan,
namely, to suppress it and substitute another.
He himself prepared it on a blank form which he had brought with him on purpose.
To this fraudulent instrument he appended forged signatures, and in due course obtained probate.
As he possessed nearly unbounded influence over his mother, her accession to the property meant that William could dispose of it as he pleased.
He embarked forthwith in a career of the wildest extravagance, and ere long he had parted in his mother's name with most of the landed estates.
One large item of his expenditure was a contested election at Lambeth, which he gained at a cost of ten thousand pounds.
No fortune could stand the inroads he made into his mother's money,
and in eighteen sixty-two he was obliged to fly the country, hopelessly and irretrievably ruined.
His disappearance gave color and substance to evil reports already in circulation that the will and conveyance above referred to
were fictitious documents. His next brother, who should have inherited under the authentic will,
forthwith brought an ejectment on the possessor of lands purchased on the authority of the forged conveyance and will.
The case was tried at Guildford Assizes, and caused intense excitement,
the hardship to the holders of these lands being plain, should the allegations of invalidity be made good.
The effect of establishing the forgeries would be to restore to the Roupell family lands for which a price had already been paid
in all good faith to another, but a criminal member of the family.
At first the case was contested hotly, but, to the profound astonishment of every one inside and outside the court,
William Roupell himself was brought as a principal witness to clench the case by a confession altogether against himself.
He told his story with perfect coolness and self-possession, but in a grave and serious tone.
Every word he uttered was said with consideration, and sometimes with a long pause,
but at the same time with an air of the most entire truthfulness and candor.
He confessed himself a perjurer in having sworn to the false will, and a wholesale forger, having manufactured no less than ten false signatures
to deeds involving on the whole some three hundred fifty thousand pounds.
For these crimes William Roupell was tried at the Central Criminal Court on the twenty-fourth September, eighteen sixty-two.
He declined to plead, but a plea of "Not Guilty" was recorded.
The case was easily and rapidly disposed of.
Roupell made a long statement more in exculpation than in his defense.
He complained that he had at first been the dupe of others, and admitted that he had too readily fallen astray.
But while repudiating the charges made against him of systematic extravagance and immorality,
he confessed that his whole life had been a gigantic mistake, and he was ready to make what atonement he could.
Mr. Justice Byles, in passing sentence, commented severely upon the commission of such crimes by a man in Roupell's position in life,
and passed the heaviest sentence of the law, transportation for life.
Roupell received the announcement with a cheerful countenance,
and left the dock with evident satisfaction and relief at the termination of a most painful ordeal.
Roupell was quiet and submissive while in Newgate, unassuming in manner, and ready to make the best of his position.
He carried this character with him into penal servitude, and after enduring the full severity of his punishment for several years,
was at length advanced to the comparative ease of a post much coveted by convicts, that of hospital nurse.
His uniform good conduct gained him release from Portland on ticket-of-leave in eighteen eighty-two, just twenty years after his conviction.
A daring and cleverly-planned robbery of diamonds was that of the Tarpeys, man and wife,
from an assistant of Loudon and Ryder's, the jewelers in Bond Street. The trick was an old one.
The assistant called with the jewels on approbation at a house specially hired for the purpose in the West End,
and was rendered insensible by chloroform, after which he was bound and the precious stones stolen.
Mrs. Tarpey was almost immediately captured and put on her trial, but she was acquitted on the plea that she had acted under the coercion of her husband.
Tarpey was caught through his wife,
who was followed, disguised, and with her hair dyed black, to a house in the Marylebone Road, where she met her husband.
On Tarpey's defense it was stated that the idea of the theft had been suggested to him by a novel, at a time he had lost largely on the turf.
The first plot was against Mr. Harry Emmanuel, but he escaped, and the attempt was made upon Loudon and Ryder.
The last great case of fraud upon the Bank of England will fitly close this branch of the criminal records of Newgate.
This was the well and astutely devised plot of the brothers Bidwell,
assisted by Macdonell and Noyes, all of them citizens of the United States, by which the bank lost upwards of one hundred thousand pounds.
The commercial experience of these clever rogues was cosmopolitan.
Their operations were no less worldwide.
In eighteen seventy-one they crossed the Atlantic,
and by means of forged letters of credit and introduction from London, obtained large sums from continental banks, in Berlin,
Dresden, Bordeaux, Marseilles, and Lyons.
With this as capital they came back to England via Buenos Aires,
and Austin Bidwell opened a bona fide credit in the Burlington or West End branch of the Bank of England,
to which he was introduced by a well-known tailor in Saville Row.
After this the other conspirators traveled to obtain genuine bills and master the system of the leading houses at home and abroad.
When all was ready, Bidwell first "refreshed his credit" at the Bank of England, as well as disarmed suspicion,
by paying in a genuine bill of Messrs. Rothschilds' for forty-five hundred pounds, which was duly discounted.
Then he explained to the bank manager
that his transactions at Birmingham would shortly be very large, owing to the development of his business there in the alleged manufacture of Pullman cars.
The ground thus cleared, the forgers poured in from Birmingham numbers of forged acceptances,
all of which were discounted to the value of one hundred two thousand, two hundred seventeen pounds.
The fraud was rendered possible by the absence of a check usual in the United States.
There such bills would be sent to the drawer to be initialed, and the forgery would have been at once detected.
It was the discovery of this flaw in the banking system which had encouraged the Americans to attempt this crime.
Time was clearly an important factor in the fraud, hence the bills were sent forward in quick succession.
Long before they came to maturity the forgers hoped to be well beyond arrest. They had, moreover, sought to destroy all clue.
The sums obtained by Bidwell in the name of "Warren" at the Bank of England
were lodged at once by drafts to "Horton," another alias, in the Continental Bank.
For these cash was obtained in notes; the notes were exchanged by one of the conspirators for gold at the Bank of England, and again the same day
a second conspirator exchanged the gold for notes. But just as all promised well, the frauds were detected through the carelessness of the forgers.
They had omitted to insert the dates in certain bills.
The bills were sent as a matter of form to the drawer to have the date added, and the forgery was at once detected.
Noyes was seized without difficulty, as it was a part of the scheme that he should act as the dupe, and remain on the spot in London till all the money was obtained.
Through Noyes the rest of the conspirators were eventually apprehended. Very little if any of the ill-gotten proceeds, however, was ever recovered.
Large sums, as they were realized, were transmitted to the United States, and invested in various American securities,
where probably the money still remains.
The prisoners, who were committed to Newgate for trial,
had undoubtedly the command of large funds while there, and would have readily disbursed it to effect their enlargement.
A plot was soon discovered,
deep laid, and with many ramifications, by which some of the Newgate warders were to be bribed to allow the prisoners to escape from their cells at night.
Certain friends of the prisoners were watched, and found to be in communication with these warders,
to whom it was said one hundred pounds apiece had been given down as the price of their infidelity.
Further sums were to have been paid after the escape;
and one warder admitted that he was to have one thousand pounds more paid to him, and to be provided with a passage to Australia.
The vigilance of the Newgate officials, assisted by the city police, completely frustrated this plot.
A second was nevertheless set on foot,
in which the plan of action was changed, and the freedom of the prisoners was to be obtained by means of a rescue from the dock during the trial.
An increase of policemen on duty sufficed to prevent any attempt of this kind.
Nor were these two abortive efforts all that were planned.
A year or two after, when the prisoners were undergoing their life sentences of penal servitude,
much uneasiness was caused at one of the convict prisons by information that bribery on a large scale was again at work amongst the officials.
But extra precautions and close supervision have so far proved effectual, and the prisoners are still in custody after a lapse of ten years.
I propose to end at this point the detailed account of the more prominent criminal cases which lodged their perpetrators in Newgate.
The most recent affairs are still too fresh in the public mind to need more than a passing reference.
Few of the Newgate notorieties of late years show any marked peculiarities;
their crimes follow in the lines of others already found, and often more than once, in the calendars.
Violent passions too easily aroused prompted the Frenchwoman Marguerite Dixblanc
to murder her mistress, Madame Riel, in Park Lane, as Courvoisier, the Swiss, had been tempted to murder Lord William Russell.
Greed in the latter case was a secondary motive;
it was the principal incentive with Kate Webster, that fierce and brutal female savage who took the life of her mistress at Richmond.
Webster, it may be mentioned here, was one of the worst prisoners ever remembered in Newgate
most violent in temper, and addicted to the most frightful language.
Webster's devices for disposing of the body of her victim will call to mind those of Theodore Gardelle,
of Good, and Greenacre, and Catherine Hayes.
Greed in another form led the Stauntons to make away with Mrs. Patrick Staunton, murdering her with devilish cruelty by slow degrees.
The judge, Sir Henry Hawkins, in passing sentence
characterized this as a crime more black and hideous than any in the criminal annals of the country.
But it was scarcely worse than that of Mrs. Brownrigg, or that of the Meteyards, both of whom did their helpless apprentices to death.
It was to effect the rupture of an irksome tie that led Henry Wainwright to murder Harriet Lane deliberately and in cold blood.
In this case the tie was unsanctified, but it was not more inconvenient than that which urged Greenacre to a similar crime.
In cold-blooded premeditation it rivaled that of the Mannings.
As in that case, the grave had been dug long in anticipation, and the chloride of lime purchased to destroy the corpse.
Henry Wainwright's attempt to get rid of the body was ingenious, but not original,
and the circumstances which led to detection were scarcely novel proofs of the old adage that murder will out.
Henry Wainwright's impassioned denial of his crime, even after it had been brought fully home to him, has many parallels in the criminal records.
His disclaimer, distinct and detailed on every point, was intended simply for effect.
He might swear he was not the murderer, that he never fired a pistol in his life,
and that, in spite of the verdict of the jury, "he left the dock with a calm and quiet conscience;"
but there was no doubt of his guilt, as the Lord Chief Justice told him, while expressing great regret at his rash assertion.
Wainwright's demeanor after sentence has been described in the last chapter.
Doubts were long entertained whether Thomas Wainwright,
who was convicted as an accessory after the fact, had not really taken an active part in the murder.
But a conversation overheard between the two brothers in Newgate satisfactorily exonerated Thomas Wainwright.
Poisoning has still its victims.
Christina Edmunds had resort to strychnia, the same lethal drug that Palmer used;
her object being first to dispose of the wife of a man for whom she had conceived a guilty passion,
then to divert suspicion from herself by throwing it on a confectioner, whose sweetmeats she bought,
tampered with, and returned to the shop.
The trial of Miss Edmunds was transferred to the Central Criminal Court under Lord Campbell's Act, already referred to.
It will be remembered that she made a statement which led to the empaneling of a jury of matrons, who decided that there was no cause for an arrest of judgment.
Kate Webster followed the same course; but these pleas of pregnancy are not common now-a-days.
Although sentence of death was passed on Edmunds, it was commuted to penal servitude for life;
but she eventually passed into Broadmoor Lunatic Asylum, where she busies herself with watercolor drawing.
The still more recent cases of poisoning which have occurred were not connected with Newgate.
The mysterious Bravo case, that of Dr. Lamson, and that of Kate Dover
unhappily show that society is more than ever at the mercy of the insidious and unscrupulous administration of poisonous drugs.
A case reproducing many of the features of the 'Flowery Land' occurred twelve years later, when the crew of the 'Lennie'
mutinied, murdered the captain and mates, sparing the steward only on condition that he would navigate the ship to the Mediterranean.
The mutineers were of the same stamp as the crew of the 'Flowery Land'
foreigners, vindictive, reckless, and truculent ruffians, easily moved to murderous rage.
The 'Lennie's' men were all Greeks, except one known as French Peter,
who was the ringleader, and who had long been an habitual criminal, a reputed murderer, and certainly an inmate more than once of a French bagne.
Conviction was obtained through the evidence of the steward and two of the least culpable of the crew.
In Newgate the 'Lennie' mutineers were extremely well behaved.
Resolute, determined-looking men, their courage broke down in confinement.
They paid close attention to the counsels of the archimandrite, and died quite penitent. A story is told of one of them, "Big Harry,"
the wildest and most cut-throat looking of the lot, which proves that he could be grateful for kindness, and was not all bad.
He had steadfastly refused to eat meat on some religions scruples, and for the same reason would not touch soup.
He was glad, therefore, to get an extra allowance of bread,
and to show his gratitude to the warder who procured this privilege for him, he made him a present.
It was his own handiwork -- a bird pecking at a flower;
the whole manufactured while in the condemned cell of the crumb of bread made into paste.
The flower had berries also of bread fixed on stems made from the fiber drawn from the stuffing of his mattress,
and the bird's legs were a couple of teeth broken off the prisoner's comb.
Of the lesser criminals, forgers, thieves, swindlers, Newgate continued to receive its full share up to the last.
But there were few cases so remarkable as the great ones already recorded.
Mr. Bamell Oakley made a rich harvest for a time, and was said at the time of his trial
to have obtained as much as forty thousand pounds by false and fraudulent pretenses.
Messrs. Swindlehurst, Saffery, and Langley cleared a large profit
by swindling the Artisans' Dwellings Company; and Madame Rachel passed through Newgate on her way to Millbank
convicted of obtaining jewelery under the false pretense of making silly women "beautiful for ever."
The greatest causes célèbre, however, of recent times were the turf frauds by which the Comtesse de Goncourt was swindled
out of large sums in sham sporting speculations. The conviction of the principals in this nefarious transaction,
Benson, the two Kurrs, Bale, and Murray, led to strange revelations of dishonest practices amongst the detective police,
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume two. By Arthur Griffiths. Section twenty-two. Newgate Reformed.
The time at length approached when a radical and complete change was to come over the old city jail.
It was impossible for Newgate to escape for ever the influences pressing so strongly towards prison reform.
Elsewhere the spirit had been more or less active, although not uniformly or always to the same extent.
There had been a pause in legislation, except of a permissive kind. The second and third Victoria, cap. fifty-six
laid it down that individuals might be confined separately and apart in single cells.
By other acts local authorities were empowered to construct new jails or hire accommodation in the district;
but no steps had been taken in Parliament to enforce a better system of discipline,
or to insist upon the construction of prisons on the most approved plan.
As regards the first, however, Sir James Graham, when Home Secretary in eighteen forty-three,
had appointed a committee of prison inspectors, presided over by the Under Secretary of State, to draw up rules and dietaries,
which were then recommended to and generally adopted by the visiting justices all over the kingdom.
As regards the second, the Government had set a good example, and in deciding upon the erection of Pentonville prison
had embarked on a considerable expenditure in order to provide a model prison for general imitation.
The first stone of Pentonville prison was laid on the tenth April, eighteen forty, by the Marquis of Normanby,
then Home Secretary, and the prison, which contained five hundred and twenty cells, was occupied on the twenty-first December, eighteen forty-two.
This building was a costly affair. The site was uneven, and had to be leveled;
moreover, the gross expenditure was increased "partly from its being considered necessary, as it was a national prison,
to make a great archway, and to make the character of it more imposing than if it had been situated in the country, and had been an ordinary prison.
Up to the twenty-first December, eighteen forty-two,
with the additions made to that date, the total expenditure amounted to nearly ninety thousand pounds, or about one hundred eighty pounds per cell.
On the other hand, it must be admitted
that this was an experimental construction, and that too strict a limitation of outlay would have militated seriously against the usefulness of the building.
Nor must it be overlooked that this, the first model prison, although obtained at a considerable cost, became actually what its name implied.
Pentonville has really been the model on which all subsequent prison construction has been based. All prisons at home and abroad are but variations,
of course with the added improvements following longer experience, of the pattern originated by the architectural genius of Sir Joshua Jebb.
The internal arrangements of the new model were carefully supervised by a body of distinguished men, among which were many peers, Lord John Russell,
Mr. Shaw-Lefevre, the Speaker of the House of Commons, Sir Benjamin Brodie,
Major Jebb, R.E., and the two prison inspectors, Messrs. Crawford and Russell, with whose names the reader is already familiar.
Major, afterwards Sir Joshua Jebb,
was the moving spirit among these commissioners, and he is now generally recognized as the originator of modern prison architecture.
The movement thus laudably initiated by the Government soon spread to the provinces.
Some jurisdictions, greatly to their credit, strove at once to follow the lead of the central authority.
Within half-a-dozen years no less than fifty-four new prisons were built on the Pentonville plan, others were in progress,
and the total number of separate cells provided amounted to eleven thousand odd.
This list included Wakefield, Leeds, Kirkdale, Manchester, Birmingham, and Dublin.
Liverpool was building a new prison with a thousand cells, the county of Surrey one with seven hundred.
The cost in each varied considerably, the general average being from one hundred twenty pounds to one hundred thirty pounds per cell.
At Pentonville the rate was higher, but there the expense had been increased by the site,
the difficulty of access, and the admitted necessity of giving architectural importance to this the national model prison.
Other jurisdictions were less prompt to recognize their responsibilities, the city of London among the number, as I shall presently show at length.
These were either satisfied with a makeshift, and modified existing buildings, without close regard to their suitability, or for a long time did nothing at all.
Among the latter were notably the counties of Cheshire, Lincolnshire, Norfolk, Suffolk, Nottinghamshire, the East and North Ridings of Yorkshire.
The south and west of England were also very laggard, and many years were still to elapse before the prisons in these parts were properly reconstituted.
Not less remarkable than this diverse interpretation of a manifest duty
was the variety of views as regards the discipline to be introduced in these new prisons. The time was one
when thoughtful people who concerned themselves closely with social questions were greatly exercised as to the best system of treating the inmates of a jail.
A new and still imperfectly understood science had arisen,
the principles of which were debated by disputants of widely opposite opinions with an earnestness that sometimes bordered upon acrimony.
One school were strongly in favor of the continuous separation of prisoners,
the other supported the theory of labor in association, but under a stringent rule of silence, with isolation only at night.
Both systems came to us from the United States. The difference was really more in degree than in principle,
and our modern practice has prudently tried to steer between the two extremes, accepting as the best system a judicious combination of both.
But about eighteen fifty the two sides were distinctly hostile, and the controversy ran high.
High authorities were in favor of continuous separation.
Colonel Jebb preferred it; Messrs. Crawford and Whitworth Russell were convinced that the complete isolation of criminals from one another
was the true basis of a sound system of prison discipline.
Prison chaplains of experience and high repute, such as Messrs. Field, Clay, Kingsmill, Burt, and Osborne, also advocated it.
It was claimed for it that it was more deterrent;
that in districts where it was the rule, evil-doers especially dreaded coming under its irksome conditions.
Another argument was, that it afforded more hope of the reformation of criminals.
The system of associated labor in silence had also its warm supporters,
who maintained that under this system prisoners were more industrious and more healthy
that their condition was more natural, and approximated more nearly to that of daily life.
Better industrial results were obtained from it, and instruction in trades was easier, and prisoners were more likely to leave jail
with the means of earning an honest livelihood if so disposed.
The opposing champions were not slow to find faults and flaws in the system they condemned.
Separation was injurious to health, mental or physical, said one side; men broke down when subjected to it for more than a certain period,
and it was unsafe to fix this limit above twelve months, although some rash advocates were in favor of eighteen months, some indeed of two years.
The other side retorted that the system of associated labor was most costly, so many officers being required to maintain the discipline of silence;
moreover, it was nearly impossible to prevent communication and mutual contamination.
It is scarcely necessary to follow the controversy further. I have only introduced the subject as showing how little as yet the State
was impressed with the necessity for authoritative interference.
The legislature was content to let local jurisdictions experimentalize for themselves; with the strange, anomalous result,
that a thief or other criminal might be quite differently treated according as he was incarcerated on one side or another of a border line.
This variety was often extended to all branches of prison economy.
There was an absolute want of uniformity in dietaries; in some prisons it was too liberal, in others too low.
The amount of exercise varied from one or two hours daily to half the working day.
The cells inhabited by prisoners were of very varying dimensions;
some were not sufficiently ventilated, others were warmed artificially, and were unwholesomely close.
The use of gas or some other means of lighting might be adopted, but more often was dispensed with.
In a great number of prisons no provision was made for the education of prisoners, in some others there was a sufficient staff of schoolmasters and instructors.
The discipline also varied greatly, from the severely penal to the culpably lax.
The greatest pains might be taken to secure isolation,
the prisoners might be supervised and watched at every step, and made liable to punishment for a trifling breach of an irksome code of regulations,
or they might herd together or communicate freely as in the old worst days. They might see each other when they liked, and converse sotto voce,
or make signs; or the chances of recognizing or being recognized were reduced to a minimum by the use of a mask.
There was no general rule of employment. Hard labor was often not insisted upon in separate confinement;
sometimes it embraced the tread-wheel or the newly-invented instruments known as cranks, which ground air.
The alternative between labor or idleness, or the selection of the form of labor,
were mere matters of chance, and decided according to the views of the local magistracy.
They were approved of and employed at some prisons, at others objected to because they were unproductive,
and because the machine was often so imperfect that the amount of effort could not be exactly regulated.
Opinions differed greatly with regard to the tread-wheel; some authorities advocated it as a very severe and irksome punishment,
which was yet under full control, and might be made to work corn-mills or prove otherwise productive;
other authorities as strongly condemned it as brutalizing, unequal in its operation, and altogether a "deplorable invention."
This want of uniformity in prison discipline became ere long an acknowledged evil pressing for some remedy,
and the question was once more taken up in the House of Commons. In eighteen forty-nine Mr. Charles Pearson, M.P.,
moved for a committee to report upon the best means of securing some uniform system which should be "punitive, reformatory, and self-supporting;"
but the session was far advanced, and the matter was relegated to the following year.
In eighteen fifty Sir George Grey brought forward a new motion to the same effect,
which was promptly carried, with the additional instruction to the committee to suggest any improvements.
The latter had reference more especially to a proposal emanating from Mr. Charles Pearson himself.
That gentleman had come to the conclusion that the ordinary and hackneyed methods of treatment were practically inefficacious,
and that a new system of prison discipline should be introduced.
His plan was to devote the whole labor of prisoners sentenced to any term between three months and four years to agriculture.
District prisons were to be established for this purpose, each of which would be in the heart of a farm of a thousand acres.
The prisoners were to cultivate the land and raise sufficient produce for their own support.
Mr. Pearson backed up his recommendations by many sound arguments.
Field labor, he urged, and with reason, was a very suitable employment;
healthful, easily learnt, and well adapted to the circumstances of unskilled laborers.
Such excellent returns might be counted upon, that a margin of profit would be left after the cost of the prisons had been defrayed.
The scheme was no doubt fascinating, and in many respects feasible;
but Mr. Pearson overlooked some points in which a more practical mind would have foreseen difficulty, and perhaps forecasted failure.
In his proposal he dwelt much upon the humanizing effects of healthful open-air toil,
anticipating the best results from a system which made earnings, and indeed release, dependent upon the amount of work done.
That industry might thus be stimulated and encouraged was probable enough,
and later experience has fully proved the advantage of a judicious system of gratuities for labor;
but Mr. Pearson hardly considered the converse sufficiently, and
omitted the fact that he might have to deal with that persistent idleness which is not an unknown characteristic of the criminal class.
The hope of reward might do much, but no system of penal discipline is complete unless it can also count upon the fear of punishment.
Mr. Pearson seems to have taken for granted that all prisoners would behave well in his district prisons.
On that account he made no provision to insure safe custody,
thinking perhaps that prisoners so well disposed would cheerfully remain in jail of their own accord.
But an open farm of a thousand acres would have offered abundant chances of escape, which some at least would have attempted, probably with success.
The creation of an expensive staff for supervision,
or the still more costly process of walling in the whole farm, would have greatly added to the charges of these establishments.
I have lingered too long perhaps over Mr. Pearson's proposal, but some reference was indispensable to a scheme
which marked the growth of public interest in prison affairs, and which was the germ of the new system
since admirably developed in the convict prisons of this country.
Mr. Pearson and the committee of eighteen fifty have the more claim on our consideration, because,
in the inquiry which followed, attention was again attracted to Newgate.
The condition of that prison in eighteen fifty may be gathered from the pages of the report. Not much had been done to remedy the old defects;
radical improvement was generally considered impossible. The great evil, however, had been sensibly diminished.
There was no longer, or at worst but rarely, and for short periods, the same overcrowding.
This was obviated by the frequent sessions of the Central Criminal Court, and the utilization of the two subsidiary prisons in Giltspur Street and Southwark.
The prison population of Newgate was still subject to great fluctuations, but it seldom rose above two hundred and fifty or three hundred
at the most crowded periods, or just before the sessional jail delivery; and at its lowest it fell sometimes to fifty or sixty.
These numbers would have still further decreased, and the jail would have been almost empty, but for the misdemeanants who were still sent to Newgate
at times on long terms of imprisonment, and for the transports, whom the Home Office were often, as of old, slow to remove.
The old wards, day rooms and sleeping rooms combined, of which the reader has already heard so much,
now seldom contained more than ten or a dozen each. Some sort of decorum was maintained among the occupants in the day-time.
the indiscriminate visitation of friends, and the almost unlimited admission of extra food, these more glaring defects had disappeared.
But reformation was only skin deep. Below the surface many of the old evils still rankled.
There was as yet no control over the prisoners after locking-up time;
this occurred in summer at eight, but in the winter months it took place at dusk, and was often as early as four or five.
The prisoners were still left to themselves till next morning's unlocking,
and they spent some fourteen or fifteen hours in total darkness, and almost without check or control.
Captain Williams, who was the inspector of prisons for the home district in succession to Messrs. Crawford and Russell,
stated in evidence that he was visiting Newgate one night, when he heard a great disturbance in one of the day and sleeping rooms,
and on entering it found the prisoners engaged in kicking bundles of wood from one end of the ward to the other.
Some attempt at supervision was exercised by the night watchman stationed on the leads, who might hear what went on inside.
If any disturbance reached his ears, he reported the case to the governor, who next morning visited the ward in fault, and asked for the culprit.
The enforcement of discipline depended upon the want of honor among thieves.
Unless the guilty prisoner was given up, the whole ward was punished, either by the exclusion of visitors or the deprivation of fire,
sharp tests which generally broke down the fidelity of the inmates of the ward to one another.
Later on a more efficacious but still imperfect method of supervision was introduced. Iron cages, which are still to be seen in Newgate,
were constructed on the landings, ensconced in which warders spent the night, on duty, and alert to watch the sleepers below,
and check by remonstrance or threat of punishment all who broke the peace of the prison.
These disciplinary improvements were, however, only slowly and gradually introduced.
Other changes affecting the condition and proper treatment of prisoners were not made until the inspector had urged and recommended them.
Thus the wards, which, as I have said, were left in complete darkness, were now to be lighted with gas; and after this most salutary addition,
the personal superintendence of night officers, as already described, became possible.
The rule became general as regards the prison dress; hitherto clothing had been issued only to such as were destitute or in rags, and all classes of prisoners,
those for trial, and those sentenced for short terms or long
wore no distinguishing costume, although its use was admitted, not only for cleanliness, but as a badge of condition, and a security against escape.
Renewed recommendations to provide employment resulted in the provision of a certain amount of oakum for picking,
and one or two men were allowed to mend clothes and make shoes. The rules made by the Secretary of State were hung up in conspicuous parts of the prison;
more officers were appointed, as the time of so many of those already on the staff was monopolized by attendance at the Central Criminal Court.
Another custom which had led to disorder was abolished;
prisoners who had been acquitted were not permitted to return to the prison to show their joy and receive the congratulations of their unfortunate fellows.
The Corporation seems to have introduced these salutary changes without hesitation.
It was less prompt apparently in dealing with structural alterations and improvements.
Well-founded complaints had been made of the want of heating appliances in the jail.
The wards had open fires, but the separate cells were not warmed at all.
A scheme for heating the whole prison with hot-water pipes, after the system now generally adopted elsewhere, was considered,
and abandoned because of the expense. As to the entire reconstruction of Newgate, nothing had been done as yet.
This, with a scheme for limiting the jail to untried prisoners, had been urgently recommended by Lord John Russell in eighteen thirty.
His letter to the Corporation, under date fourth June,
is an interesting document, and shows that even at that date the Government contemplated the erection of a model prison.
Lord John Russell, commenting upon the offer of the Corporation to improve Newgate,
provided it was henceforth used only for untried prisoners, suggested that Newgate should be entirely reconstructed, and the new building adopted as a model.
The Corporation had agreed to spend twenty thousand pounds on alterations, but sixty thousand pounds would suffice to reconstruct.
Lord John, with great fairness, admitted that the whole of this burthen could not be imposed upon the city
seeing that since the establishment of the Central Criminal Court, Newgate received prisoners for trial from several counties,
and he was therefore prepared to submit to Parliament a proposal that half the cost of reconstruction should be borne by public funds.
He forwarded plans prepared by the inspectors of prisons, not for blind adoption, but as a guide.
This plan was on the principle of cellular separation, a system, according to Lord John Russell, desirable in all prisons,
but in a metropolitan prison absolutely essential. The Corporation in reply demurred rather to accepting strict separation as a rule,
feeling that it approached too nearly to solitary confinement.
The court was, however, prepared to consider Lord John Russell's proposal with regard to the cost of rebuilding;
but as the plan was "confessedly experimental, for the benefit of the country generally, the amount for which the city should be responsible should be distinctly limited
not to exceed a certain sum to be agreed upon.
A proviso was also made that the magistrates should continue to exercise full control over the new jail,
free from any other interference than that of the inspectors on the part of Government.
No doubt wiser counsels prevailed with Lord John Russell,
and on a more mature consideration he realized that the limited area of the existing Newgate site,
and the costliness of enlarging it, forbade all idea of entirely reconstructing the jail so as to constitute it a model prison.
It would be far better to begin at the beginning,
to select a sufficiently spacious piece of ground, and erect a prison which from foundations to roofs should be in conformity with the newest ideas.
The preference given to the Pentonville system destroyed all hopes of a complete reformation of Newgate.
But the condition of the great city jail was evidently considered a reproach by the city authorities, and a year after the opening of the new "model" at Pentonville,
a serious effort was made to reconstruct Newgate.
In eighteen forty-five the Jail Committee brought forward a definite proposal to purchase ground in the immediate vicinity for the erection of a new jail.
This jail was nominally to replace the Giltspur Street Compter,
The site of which was to be sold to Christ's Hospital, but the intention was of course to embody and absorb old Newgate in the new construction.
The proposal made was to purchase some fifty thousand square feet between Newgate, Warwick Lane, and the Sessions House,
the situation having been proved by long experience to be salubrious.
But when this suggestion was brought before the court of aldermen, various amendments were proposed.
It was urged that the area selected for purchase must be excessively costly to acquire, and still quite inadequate for the city needs.
The Home Secretary had laid it down that at least five acres would be indispensable, and such an area it was impossible to obtain within the limits of the city.
Now for the first time the Tuffnell estate in Holloway was mentioned.
The Corporation owned lands there covering from nineteen to twenty acres.
Why not move the city prison bodily into this more rural spot, with its purer air and greater breathing space?
Eventually Holloway was decided upon as a site for the new city prison.
The necessary preliminaries took some time, but the contracts for the new building were completed in eighteen forty-nine, when the works were commenced.
The prison was to contain four hundred and four prisoners, and the estimated expenditure was seventy-nine thousand pounds.
It was to accommodate only the convicted prisoners sentenced to terms short of penal servitude, and after its completion
the uses of Newgate were narrowed almost entirely to those of a prison of detention.
It was intended as far as possible that, except awaiting trial, no prisoner should find himself relegated to Newgate.
This principle became more and more generally the rule, although it has never been punctiliously observed. Now and again
misdemeanants have found their way into Newgate, and within the last few years one offender against the privileges of the House of Commons.
With the reduction of numbers to be accommodated, there was ample space in Newgate for its reconstruction on the most approved modern lines.
the erection of a wing or large block of cells was commenced within the original walls of the prison, and upon the north or male side.
This block contained one hundred and thirty cells, embracing every modern improvement;
it also contained eleven reception cells, six punishment cells, and a couple of cells for condemned criminals.
This block was completed in eighteen fifty-nine, after which the hitherto unavoidable and long-continued promiscuous association of prisoners
In eighteen sixty-one a similar work was undertaken to provide separate cellular accommodation for the female inmates of Newgate,
and by the following year forty-seven new cells had been built on the most approved plan.
During this reconstruction the female prisoners were lodged in Holloway,
and when it was completed, both sides of the prison were brought into harmony with modern ideas.
The old buildings were entirely disused, and the whole of the inmates of Newgate were kept constantly in separate confinement.
With the last re-edification of Newgate, a work executed some seven centuries after the first stone of the old jail was laid,
the architectural records of the prison end. Nothing much was done at Newgate in the way of building, outside or in, after eighteen sixty-two.
The Act for private executions led to the erection of the gallows shed in the exercising yard, and at the flank of the passage from the condemned cells.
The first "glass house," or room in which prisoners could talk in private with their attorneys, but yet be seen by the warder on the watch, had been constructed
and others were subsequently added.
But no structural alterations were made from the date first quoted until the time of closing the prison in eighteen eighty-one.
But in the interval very comprehensive and, I think it must be admitted, salutary changes were successively introduced into the management of prisons.
Newgate naturally shared in any advantages due to these reforms. I propose, therefore, to refer to them in the concluding pages of this work,
and thus bring the history of prison discipline down to our own times.
The last inquiry into the condition and management of our jails and houses of correction was that made by the Lords' Committee in eighteen sixty-three.
The inquiry was most searching and complete, and the committee spoke plainly in its report.
It animadverted strongly on "the many and wide differences as regards construction, labor, diet, and general discipline"
which existed in the various prisons,
leading to an inequality, uncertainty, and inefficiency of punishment productive of the most prejudicial results.
The varieties in construction were still very marked.
In many prisons the prisoners were still associated, and, from the want of a sufficient number of cells, the principle of separation was still greatly neglected.
Yet this principle, as the committee pointed out, "must now be accepted as the foundation of prison discipline,"
while its rigid maintenance was in its opinion vital to the efficiency of the jails.
Even where cells had been built
they were frequently below the standard size, and were therefore not certified for occupation as was required by law.
Great numbers were not lighted at night, and were without means by which their inmates could communicate, in case of urgent necessity, with their keepers.
Still greater were the differences with regard to employment. The various authorities held widely different opinions as to what constituted hard labor.
Here the tread-wheel was in use, there cellular cranks, or hard-labor machines.
Both, however, varied greatly in mechanism and in the amount of energy they called forth,
while the former was intended for the congregate labor of a number, and the latter, as its name implies, imposed continuous solitary toil.
At other prisons "shot-drill," the lifting and carrying of heavy round shot, was the favorite method of inflicting penal labor.
With these differences were others as opposed concerning industrial occupation.
The jail authorities often gave the highest, possibly undue, importance to the value of remunerative employment,
and sought to make profitable returns from prisoners' labor the test of prison efficiency. In this view the committee could not coincide,
and it was decidedly of opinion that in all short sentences the hard labor of the tread-wheel, crank, and so forth should be the invariable rule.
In dietaries, again, the same wide diversity of practice obtained.
The efforts made by Sir James Graham years before to introduce uniformity in this particular had failed of effect.
The Secretary of State's suggested scale of diet had seldom been closely followed.
In some places the dietary was too full, in others too meager. Its constituents were not of the most suitable character.
More animal food was given than was necessary.
Vegetables, especially the potato, that most valuable anti-scorbutic, was too often omitted.
In a word, the value of diet as a part of penal discipline was still insufficiently recognized.
The prisons were still far from inflicting the three punishments, hard labor, hard fare, and a hard bed
which Sir Joshua Jebb told the committee he considered the proper elements of penal discipline.
It is interesting to note here
that the committee of eighteen sixty-three fully endorsed Sir Joshua's recommendations as regards a "hard bed," and recommended that
during short sentences, or the earlier stages of a long confinement,
the prisoners should be made to dispense with the use of a mattress, and should sleep on planks.
This suggestion was adopted in the Act of eighteen sixty-five, which followed the committee's report, and of which more directly.
Clause ninety-two, Schedule one of that act authorized the use of plank beds, which were adopted in many prisons.
They are now the universal rule,
introduced, as was erroneously supposed, by the prison commissioners appointed under the Prison Act of eighteen seventy-seven.
Their origin it will be seen dates back much further than that.
Beds might well be made hard and their use strictly limited.
According to this committee of eighteen sixty-three, beds in the smaller and most carelessly conducted prisons formed a large element in the life of a prisoner.
In one jail fifteen hours were spent in bed out of the twenty-four. This was in keeping with other grave defects and omissions.
The minor borough prisons were the worst blot on the still dark and imperfect system.
They were very numerous, very imperfect in construction and management, and they were very little required.
In them, according to the committee, the old objectionable practices were still in full force.
There was unrestrained association of untried and convicted, juvenile with adult prisoners, vagrants, misdemeanants, felons.
There were dormitories without light, control, or regulation at night,
which warders, dreading assault, were afraid to enter after dark, even to check rioting and disturbance.
Prisoners still slept two in a bed.
In one prison the bedsteads had been removed lest the prisoners should break them up and convert them into weapons of offense.
The prison buildings were in many places out of repair; other houses often overlooked them.
A single officer was the only custodian and disciplinary authority in the jail.
Complete idleness was tolerated; there was neither penal labor nor light employment.
The prisoners inter-communicated freely, and exercised the most injurious, corrupting influences upon one another.
The total want of administration was very marked,
but in one prison it was such that the prisoners' food was supplied daily from the neighboring inn, and the innkeeper's bill constituted the only accounts kept.
The committee might well suggest the abolition of these jails, or their amalgamation with the larger county establishments in their immediate neighborhood.
Some idea of the comparative uselessness of these small borough prisons was conveyed by some figures quoted by the committee.
In eighteen sixty-two there were in all one hundred and ninety-three jails in England and Wales;
of these, sixty-three gave admittance during the entire year to less than twenty-five prisoners;
twenty-two others received between eleven and twenty-five;
fourteen received less than eleven and more than six;
while twenty-seven received less than six prisoners, and were in some instances absolutely tenantless.
The result of the recommendation of the committee of eighteen sixty-two was the Prison Act of eighteen sixty-five,
the penultimate of such enactments, many of the provisions of which still remain in force.
The main object of this act was to compass that uniformity in discipline and treatment generally
which had long been admitted as indispensable, and had never as yet been properly obtained.
The legislature was beginning to overcome its disinclination to interfere actively or authoritatively
with the local jurisdictions, although still very leniently disposed.
However, it now laid down in plain language and with precise details the requirements of a good jail system.
The separation of prisoners in cells duly certified by the inspectors was insisted upon,
also their constant employment in labor appropriate to their condition.
Hard labor of the first and second class was carefully defined.
The former, which consisted principally of the tread-wheel, cranks, capstans, shot-drill,
was to be the rule for all convicted prisoners throughout the early stages of their detention;
while the latter, which included various forms of industrial employment,
was the boon to which willing industry extending over a long period established a certain claim.
The infliction of punishment more or less uniform was thus aimed at.
On the other hand, new and careful regulations were framed to secure the moral and material well-being of the inmates of the jails.
The law made it imperative that every prison should have a prison chapel, and that daily and Sunday services should be held.
The chaplain's duties were enlarged, and the principle of toleration accepted to the extent of securing to all prisoners
the ministrations of ministers of their own form of belief.
Steps were taken to provide the illiterate with secular instruction.
No less close was the care as regards preservation of health.
Stringent rules were prescribed for the prison surgeons;
every prison was ordered to keep up an infirmary, and the medical supervision was to be strict and continuous.
Dietaries were drawn up for adoption on the recommendation of a committee of experts.
Baths were provided, ablutions ordered, and all appliances to insure personal cleanliness.
The administration of good government was to be watched over by the local magistracy, certain of whom, styled visiting justices,
were elected to inspect the prisons frequently, to examine the prisoners, hear complaints, and check abuses.
Under them the governor or jailer was held strictly responsible.
The books and journals he was to keep were minutely specified, and his constant presence in or near the jail was insisted upon.
His disciplinary powers were defined by the act, and his duties,
both in controlling his subordinates and in protecting the prisoners from petty tyranny and oppression, every one of whom he was to see once every twenty-four hours.
But discipline was to be maintained if necessary by punishment,
while decency and good order were to be insured by the strict prohibition of gambling and drunkenness.
The latter was rendered nearly impossible by the penalties imposed on persons bringing spirituous liquors into the jail.
The old custom, so fruitful of the worst evils, of keeping a tap inside the prison was made illegal.
So was the employment of prisoners in any position of trust or authority;
they were not to be turnkeys or assistant turnkeys, neither wardsman nor yardsman, overseer,
monitor, or schoolmaster, nor to be engaged in the service of any officer of the prison.
The Act of eighteen sixty-five also encouraged and empowered the local authorities to "alter, enlarge, or rebuild" their prisons.
They might raise funds for this purpose, provided a certificate for the necessity for the new works was given, either by the recorder
chairman of quarter sessions, or even by a couple of justices.
Every facility was promised. The sanction of the Secretary of State would not be withheld if plans and estimates were duly submitted,
and they met with the approval of his professional adviser, the surveyor-general of prisons.
The funds necessary would be advanced by the Public Works Loan Commissioners, and the interest might be charged against the county or borough rates.
Nor were these the only inducements offered. Where local authorities were indisposed to set their prisons in order,
or hesitated to embark upon any considerable expenditure to alter or rebuild,
they were at liberty to hire suitable cell accommodation from any neighbors who might have it to spare; the only proviso,
That no such contract was valid between one jurisdiction and another unless the Secretary of State was satisfied that the prison it was intended to use
came up in all respects to modern requirements.
But the act was not limited to permissive legislation. Its provisions and enactments were backed up by certain penalties.
The Secretary of State was empowered to deal rather summarily with "inadequate" prisons, in other words,
with those in which there was no separation, no proper enforcement of hard labor, no chapel, infirmary, and so forth.
He could in the first place withhold the government grant in aid of prison funds by refusing the certificate to the Treasury upon which the allowance was paid.
This he might do on the representation of the inspector of prisons,
who was bound to report any deficiencies and abuses he might find at his periodical visits. The Secretary of State might go further.
Where the local authority had neglected to comply with the provisions of the eighteen sixty-five Act for four consecutive years,
he could close the "inadequate" prison, by declaring it unfit for the reception of prisoners.
His order would at the same time specify some neighboring and more satisfactory prison which the local authority would be compelled to utilize instead,
and with the concurrence of the other authority, and on payment. A few provisos governed these rather extensive powers.
It was necessary, for instance, to give due notice when the government grant was to be withdrawn,
and with the warning a copy of the particular defects and allegations was to be sent to the local authority.
The latter too was to be laid before the House of Commons.
In the same way, six months' notice was required in cases where the closing of a prison was contemplated;
but if these conditions were observed, the Secretary of State could deal sharply enough with the defaulting jurisdictions.
Yet the law was seldom if ever enforced.
It was practically inoperative as regards the penalties for neglect. It was no doubt as irksome and inconvenient to the Secretary of State
to avail himself of his powers, as it was difficult to bring home the derelictions of duties and evasion of the acts. Too much was left to the inspectors.
It was nearly impossible for them to exercise a very close supervision over the whole of the prisons of the country.
There were only two of them, and they could not visit each prison more than once in each year, sometimes not oftener than once in eighteen months.
The task imposed upon them, tending as it did to the imposition of a fine upon the local authorities, was not a pleasant one,
and it is not strange if they did not very frequently hand up the offenders to the reproof and correction of the Secretary of State.
As the almost inevitable consequence, while the more glaring defects in prison management disappeared,
matters went on after the eighteen sixty-five Act much the same as they had done before. Districts differed greatly in the attention they paid to prison affairs.
In one part the most praiseworthy activity prevailed,
in another there was half-heartedness, even apathy and an almost complete contempt for the provisions of the act.
As the years passed, great want of uniformity continued to prevail throughout the prisons of the United Kingdom.
The whole question assumed sufficient importance to become a part of the Government program when Lord Beaconsfield took office in eighteen seventy-four.
The Home Secretary in that administration,
Mr. (now Sir Richard) Cross, having applied himself vigorously to the task of reorganizing the whole system, became convinced
that no complete reform could be accomplished so long as the prisons were left under the jurisdiction of the local authorities.
The Prisons Bill of eighteen seventy-six contemplated the transfer of the prisons to Government.
This bill, reintroduced in eighteen seventy-seven, became law that year, after which the whole of the prisons, including Newgate,
passed under the more direct control of the State.
Since then a strong central authority has labored steadfastly to compass concentration,
to close useless prisons, and to insure that uniformity of system which all thoughtful persons had long admitted to be of paramount importance
in the administration of prisons.
Three years after the advent of the prison commissioners, it was decided that Newgate was an excessively costly and redundant establishment.
It was only filled at the periods when the sessions of the Central Criminal Court were in progress;
at others an expensive staff was maintained with little or nothing to do.
At a short distance stood another prison of detention, that of Clerkenwell,
with spare accommodation sufficient to receive all prisoners who were then committed to Newgate. These arguments were unanswerable.
Accordingly, it was ordered by Sir William Harcourt, the present Secretary of State, that Newgate should cease to be used as a regular prison,
and it is now, except during sessions or when the gallows is in requisition, practically and for ever closed.
Marion Harland's Cookery for Beginners. Bread Sponge and Breakfast Breads.
Bread raised with what is known to bakers as a “sponge,” requires more time and a trifle more work than the simpler form for which I have just already given directions.
But it keeps fresh longer, is softer and more nutritious, and a second-rate brand of flour thus treated produces a better loaf
than when mixed up with yeast and water only.
Sponge-making is, therefore, an important if not an essential accomplishment in a cook, be she novice or veteran.
Three potatoes of fair size, peeled and boiled mealy.
Five tablespoonfuls of yeast. One tablespoonful of white sugar.
Three cups of lukewarm water in which the potatoes were boiled, strained through a coarse cloth.
One heaping cup of sifted flour.
Put the potatoes into a large bowl or tray and mash them to powder with a potato beetle, or a wooden spoon.
While still hot, mix in the sugar and butter, beating all to a lumpless cream.
Add a few spoonfuls at a time, the potato-water alternately with the flour by the handful,
beating the batter smooth as you go on until all of the liquid and flour has gone in.
Beat hard one minute before pouring in the yeast.
it is well to stir into the yeast a bit of soda no larger than a grain of corn already wet up in a teaspoonful of boiling water.
Now whip up the batter with a wooden spoon for another minute, and the sponge is made.
Throw a cloth over the bowl and set by for five or six hours to rise.
If you intend to bake in the forenoon, make the sponge at bedtime. If in the afternoon, early in the morning.
When the sponge is light sift a quart and a cup of flour into a bowl or tray with two teaspoonfuls of salt.
Into a hollow, like a crater in the middle of the flour, empty your sponge-bowl, and work the flour down into it.
Wash out the bowl with a little lukewarm water and add this to the dough. If it should prove too soft, work in, cautiously, a little more flour.
If too stiff, warm water, a spoonful at a time until you can handle the paste easily. The danger is in getting it too stiff. Now.
knead and set for risings first and second, as you have already been instructed. This sponge will be found especially useful in making Graham Bread.
One quart of Graham flour, one cup of white flour.
One half cup of Indian meal. One half cup of molasses. Two teaspoonfuls of salt. Soda, the size of a pea.
Half the quantity of sponge given in preceding receipt.
Warm water for rinsing bowl -- about half a cup.
Put the brown or Graham flour unsifted into the bread-bowl.
Sift into it white flour, meal and salt, and stir up well while dry.
Into the “crater” dug out in the middle, pour the sponge, warm water, the molasses, and soda dissolved in hot water.
Knead as you would white bread, and set aside for the rising.
It will not swell so fast as the white, so give yourself more time for making it.
When light, knead well and long;
make into two loaves, then put into well-greased pans and leave for an hour, or until it becomes more than twice the original size of the dough.
Take care that it does not burn in baking. The molasses renders it liable to scorching.
The oven must be steady, but not so hot as for white bread, nor will the Graham bread be done quite so soon as that made of bolted flour.
Turn the pans once while baking, moving them as gently as possible.
If rudely shaken or jarred, there will be heavy streaks in loaves.
Graham bread is wholesome and sweet, and ought to be eaten frequently in every family, particularly by young people whose bones and teeth are in forming.
The phosphates which the process of “bolting” removes to a large extent from white flour, go directly to the manufacture of bone,
and these also tend to nourish and strengthen the brain.
After mixing your bread in the morning either with sponge or with yeast, divide the kneaded dough into two portions.
Mould one into a round ball, and set aside for a loaf as already directed.
Make a hole in the middle of the other batch and pour into it a tablespoonful of butter, just melted, but not hot.
Close the dough over it, dust your hands and kneading-board with flour and work in the shortening until the dough is elastic and ceases to be sticky.
Put it into a floured bowl, cover with a cloth and set away out of draught and undue heat, for three hours.
Knead it again, then, and wait upon its rising for another three hours. The dough should be as soft as can be handled.
When it is light for the second time flour your board, rubbing in the flour and blowing lightly away what does not adhere to the surface.
Toss the lump dough upon it and knead thoroughly for five minutes.
Flour a rolling-pin and roll the dough into a sheet not more than half an inch thick.
Cut this into round cakes with a biscuit-cutter or a sharp-edged tumbler and fold, not quite in the middle,
in the form of turnovers, pinching the corners of the fold pretty hard to hinder the flap of dough from flying up as the rising proceeds.
Rub the bottom and sides of a baking-pan with sweet lard or butter. Do this with a bit of clean soft rag or tissue-paper,
visiting every corner of the pan, but not leaving thick layers and streaks of grease after it.
Arrange the rolls in regular rows in the pan about a quarter of an inch apart.
Cover with a cloth and set nearer the fire than you dared trust the dough, and let them rise for an hour.
Peep under the cloth two or three times to see whether they rise evenly, and turn the pan around once that all may be equally exposed to the heat.
When the time is up and the rolls are puffy and promising, set them in a pretty quick oven and bake half an hour,
turning the pan once in this time, and covering with clean -- never printed -- paper, should they brown too fast.
Break the rolls apart from one another and eat warm. They are also good cold, and if the directions be followed implicitly, very good always.
Graham Rolls are made by treating the dough mixed for Graham bread as above and following the foregoing receipt in every section, but allowing more time for rising and baking.
They are even better when cold than hot.
Two cups of fresh milk slightly warmed.
One quart and a cup of flour sifted.
One even tablespoonful of white sugar.
One even teaspoonful of salt.
Bit of soda as large as a pea, dissolved in hot water.
One tablespoonful of butter, just melted, not hot.
Yolk of one egg beaten light.
Sift the flour, salt and sugar into a bowl,
hollow the heap in the center and pour in the milk, working down the flour into the liquid with a spoon or your hands until it is thoroughly melted.
Into a second hollow pour the yeast and knead thoroughly for fifteen minutes.
Wrap bowl and biscuit in a thick cloth and set to rise where it will neither become chilled nor sour over night.
Study the temperature in different parts of the kitchen and kitchen closets to the end of finding the best places for raising dough and sponge.
Do all this at bedtime. Early in the morning turn out the dough upon a floured board, work it for a minute into manageable shape;
drill several finger-holes in it and fill them with the melted butter, the dissolved soda and the beaten yolk of egg.
Pinch the dough hard to stop the mouths of these cavities,
and knead for ten minutes, carefully at first, lest the liquids should be wasted, and more boldly when they are absorbed by the paste.
Roll out into a sheet half an inch thick with a floured rolling-pin; cut into round cakes, set these closely together in a well-greased pan;
prick each with a fork and let them rise near the fire for half an hour, covered with a light cloth.
Bake from twenty to twenty-five minutes in a quick oven, turning the pan around once, quickly and lightly.
Break apart from one another and pile on a plate, throwing a clean doily or a small napkin over them. Break open at table.
Hot rolls and muffins should never be cut.
One word with regard to getting up early in order to give dough a chance for the second rising.
It is not a wholesome practice for any woman -- least of all a young girl to be out of bed two hours before she eats her breakfast.
Studying upon an empty stomach provokes dyspepsia and injures the eyes.
Active exercise in like circumstances tempts debility and disease.
Yet our bread and rolls must be looked after at the proper time.
Have yourself called on biscuit mornings an hour earlier than usual.
Rise, wash face and hands, rinse the mouth out and brush back the hair.
Put on stockings and slippers, such underclothing as may be needed to prevent cold, a wrapper and the kitchen apron.
Cover your hair entirely with a handkerchief or sweeping cap.
Before beginning operations downstairs eat a half-slice of dry bread or a biscuit.
You will not relish it, but take it all the same to appease the empty, discontented stomach.
Having made out your rolls and tucked them up snugly for the final rise, return to your chamber for a comfortable bath and toilet.
When habited for the day in all except the outer gown, collar, etc., slip on the wrapper again and run down to put the biscuits in the oven.
Unless it is too hot, they will get no harm while you finish dressing in ten minutes, just in season to turn the pan.
From the beginning of your apprenticeship in housewifery, learn how to "dovetail" your duties neatly into one another.
A wise accommodation of parts and angles, and compactness in the adjustment of "must-be-dones"
are better than mere personal strength in the accomplishment of such tasks as fall to women to perform.
Master these, and do not let them master you.
Weave the little duties in and under and among what seem to be the greater.
While your bread is taking a three hours’ rise, you are free in body and mind for other things.
The grand secret of keeping house well and without worry, lies in the art of packing and fitting different kinds of work and in picking up the minutes.
Other things besides rising dough get on quite as well without your standing by to watch them.
The Fireside Chats of Franklin Delano Roosevelt, by Franklin D Roosevelt, Section six.
Three months have passed since I talked with you shortly after the adjournment of the Congress.
Tonight I continue that report, though, because of the shortness of time, I must defer a number of subjects to a later date.
Recently the most notable public questions that have concerned us all
have had to do with industry and labor and with respect to these, certain developments have taken place which I consider of importance.
I am happy to report that after years of uncertainty, culminating in the collapse of the spring of nineteen thirty-three,
we are bringing order out of the old chaos
with a greater certainty of the employment of labor at a reasonable wage and of more business at a fair profit.
These governmental and industrial developments hold promise of new achievements for the nation.
Men may differ as to the particular form of governmental activity
with respect to industry and business, but nearly all are agreed that private enterprise in times such as these
but also our processes of civilization.
The underlying necessity for such activity
is indeed as strong now as it was years ago when Elihu Root said the following very significant words:
Instead of the give and take of free individual contract,
the tremendous power of organization has combined great aggregations of capital in enormous industrial establishments
working through vast agencies of commerce and employing great masses of men in movements of production
and transportation and trade, so great in the mass that each individual concerned in them is quite helpless by himself.
The relations between the employer and the employed, between the owners of aggregated capital and the units of organized labor,
between the small producer, the small trader, the consumer,
and the great transporting and manufacturing and distributing agencies,
all present new questions for the solution of which the old reliance upon the free action of individual wills appears quite inadequate.
And in many directions, the intervention of that organized control which we call government
seems necessary to produce the same result of justice and right conduct
which obtained through the attrition of individuals before the new conditions arose.
It was in this spirit thus described by Secretary Root
that we approached our task of reviving private enterprise in March, nineteen thirty-three.
Our first problem was, of course, the banking situation because, as you know, the banks had collapsed.
Some banks could not be saved but the great majority of them, either through their own resources or with government aid,
have been restored to complete public confidence.
This has given safety to millions of depositors in these banks.
Closely following this great constructive effort we have, through various federal agencies,
saved debtors and creditors alike in many other fields of enterprise, such as loans on farm mortgages and home mortgages;
loans to the railroads and insurance companies and, finally, help for home owners and industry itself.
In all of these efforts the government has come to the assistance of business
and with the full expectation that the money used to assist these enterprises will eventually be repaid.
I believe it will be.
The second step we have taken in the restoration of normal business enterprise
has been to clean up thoroughly unwholesome conditions in the field of investment.
In this we have had assistance from many bankers and businessmen,
most of whom recognize the past evils in the banking system, in the sale of securities, in the deliberate encouragement of stock gambling,
in the sale of unsound mortgages and in many other ways in which the public lost billions of dollars.
They saw that without changes in the policies and methods of investment
there could be no recovery of public confidence in the security of savings.
The country now enjoys the safety of bank savings under the new banking laws,
the careful checking of new securities under the Securities Act
and the curtailment of rank stock speculation through the Securities Exchange Act.
I sincerely hope that as a result
people will be discouraged in unhappy efforts to get rich quick by speculating in securities.
The average person almost always loses.
Only a very small minority of the people of this country believe in gambling as a substitute for the old philosophy of Benjamin Franklin
that the way to wealth is through work.
In meeting the problems of industrial recovery the chief agency of the government has been the National Recovery Administration.
Under its guidance, trades and industries covering over ninety percent of all industrial employees
have adopted codes of fair competition, which have been approved by the President.
Under these codes, in the industries covered, child labor has been eliminated.
The work day and the work week have been shortened.
Minimum wages have been established and other wages adjusted toward a rising standard of living.
The emergency purpose of the N.R.A. was to put men to work and since its creation more than four million persons have been reemployed,
in great part through the cooperation of American business brought about under the codes.
Benefits of the Industrial Recovery Program have come,
not only to labor in the form of new jobs, in relief from overwork and in relief from underpay,
but also to the owners and managers of industry because,
together with a great increase in the payrolls, there has come a substantial rise in the total of industrial profits
a rise from a deficit figure in the first quarter of nineteen thirty-three
to a level of sustained profits within one year from the inauguration of N.R.A.
Now it should not be expected that even employed labor and capital would be completely satisfied with present conditions.
Employed workers have not by any means all enjoyed a return to the earnings of prosperous times,
although millions of hitherto underprivileged workers are today far better paid than ever before.
Also, billions of dollars of invested capital have today a greater security of present and future earning power than before.
This is because of the establishment of fair, competitive standards and because of relief from unfair competition
in wage cutting which depresses markets and destroys purchasing power.
But it is an undeniable fact that the restoration of other billions of sound investments to a reasonable earning power
could not be brought about in one year.
There is no magic formula,
no economic panacea, which could simply revive over-night the heavy industries and the trades dependent upon them.
Nevertheless the gains of trade and industry, as a whole, have been substantial.
In these gains and in the policies of the administration there are assurances that hearten all forward- looking men and women
with the confidence that we are definitely rebuilding our political and economic system on the lines laid down by the New Deal
lines which as I have so often made clear, are in complete accord with the underlying principles of orderly popular government
which Americans have demanded since the white man first came to these shores.
We count, in the future as in the past, on the driving power of individual initiative
and the incentive of fair private profit,
strengthened with the acceptance of those obligations to the public interest which rest upon us all.
We have the right to expect that this driving power will be given patriotically and whole-heartedly to our nation.
We have passed through the formative period of code making in the National Recovery Administration
and have effected a reorganization of the N.R.A.
suited to the needs of the next phase, which is, in turn, a period of preparation for legislation which will determine its permanent form.
In this recent reorganization we have recognized three distinct functions:
first, the legislative or policy making function;
second, the administrative function of code making and revision; and, third, the judicial function, which includes enforcement,
consumer complaints and the settlement of disputes between employers and employees and between one employer and another.
We are now prepared to move into this second phase, on the basis of our experience in the first phase
under the able and energetic leadership of General Johnson.
we shall watch carefully the working of this new machinery for the second phase of N.R.A.,
modifying it where it needs modification and finally making recommendations to the Congress,
in order that the functions of N.R.A. which have proved their worth may be made a part of the permanent machinery of government.
Let me call your attention to the fact that the national Industrial Recovery Act
gave businessmen the opportunity they had sought for years to improve business conditions through what has been called self-government in industry.
If the codes which have been written have been too complicated,
if they have gone too far in such matters as price fixing and limitation of production,
let it be remembered that so far as possible, consistent with the immediate public interest of this past year
and the vital necessity of improving labor conditions,
the representatives of trade and industry were permitted to write their ideas into the codes.
It is now time to review these actions as a whole to determine through deliberative means in the light of experience,
from the standpoint of the good of the industries themselves, as well as the general public interest,
whether the methods and policies adopted in the emergency
have been best calculated to promote industrial recovery and a permanent improvement of business and labor conditions.
There may be a serious question as to the wisdom of many of those devices to control production,
or to prevent destructive price cutting which many business organizations have insisted were necessary,
or whether their effect may have been to prevent that volume of production which would make possible lower prices and increased employment.
Another question arises as to whether in fixing minimum wages on the basis of an hourly or weekly wage
we have reached into the heart of the problem which is to provide such annual earnings for the lowest paid worker as will meet his minimum needs.
We also question the wisdom of extending code requirements suited to the great industrial centers and to large employers,
to the great number of small employers in the smaller communities.
During the last twelve months our industrial recovery has been to some extent retarded by strikes,
including a few of major importance.
I would not minimize the inevitable losses to employers and employees and to the general public through such conflicts.
But I would point out that the extent and severity of labor disputes during this period
has been far less than in any previous, comparable period.
When the businessmen of the country were demanding the right to organize themselves adequately to promote their legitimate interests;
when the farmers were demanding legislation which would give them opportunities and incentives to organize themselves for a common advance,
it was natural that the workers should seek and obtain a statutory declaration of their constitutional right
to organize themselves for collective bargaining as embodied in Section seven (a) of the national Industrial Recovery Act.
Machinery set up by the federal government has provided some new methods of adjustment.
Both employers and employees must share the blame of not using them as fully as they should.
The employer who turns away from impartial agencies of peace,
who denies freedom of organization to his employees, or fails to make every reasonable effort at a peaceful solution of their differences,
is not fully supporting the recovery effort of his government.
The workers who turn away from these same impartial agencies and decline to use their good offices to gain their ends
are likewise not fully cooperating with their government.
It is time that we made a clean-cut effort to bring about that united action of management and labor,
which is one of the high purposes of the Recovery Act.
We have passed through more than a year of education.
Step by step we have created all the government agencies necessary to insure, as a general rule, industrial peace,
with justice for all those willing to use these agencies whenever their voluntary bargaining fails to produce a necessary agreement.
There should be at least a full and fair trial given to these means of ending industrial warfare;
and in such an effort we should be able to secure for employers and employees and consumers
the benefits that all derive from the continuous, peaceful operation of our essential enterprises.
Accordingly, I propose to confer within the coming month
with small groups of those truly representative of large employers of labor and of large groups of organized labor,
in order to seek their cooperation in establishing what I may describe as a specific trial period of industrial peace.
From those willing to join in establishing this hoped-for period of peace,
I shall seek assurances of the making and maintenance of agreements, which can be mutually relied upon,
under which wages, hours and working conditions
may be determined and any later adjustments shall be made either by agreement or, in case of disagreement,
through the mediation or arbitration of state or federal agencies.
I shall not ask either employers or employees permanently to lay aside the weapons common to industrial war.
But I shall ask both groups to give a fair trial to peaceful methods of adjusting their conflicts of opinion and interest,
and to experiment for a reasonable time with measures suitable to civilize our industrial civilization.
Closely allied to the N.R.A.
is the program of Public Works provided for in the same Act and designed to put more men back to work,
both directly on the public works themselves, and indirectly in the industries supplying the materials for these public works.
To those who say that our expenditures for public works and other means for recovery are a waste that we cannot afford,
I answer that no country, however rich, can afford the waste of its human resources.
Demoralization caused by vast unemployment is our greatest extravagance.
Morally, it is the greatest menace to our social order.
Some people try to tell me that we must make up our minds that for the future we shall permanently have millions of unemployed
just as other countries have had them for over a decade.
What may be necessary for those countries is not my responsibility to determine.
But as for this country, I stand or fall by my refusal to accept as a necessary condition of our future
a permanent army of unemployed.
we must make it a national principle that we will not tolerate a large army of unemployed and that we will arrange our national economy
to end our present unemployment as soon as we can and then to take wise measures against its return.
I do not want to think that it is the destiny of any American to remain permanently on relief rolls.
Those, fortunately few in number, who are frightened by boldness and cowed by the necessity for making decisions,
complain that all we have done is unnecessary and subject to great risks.
Now that these people are coming out of their storm cellars, they forget that there ever was a storm.
They would have you believe that England has made progress out of her depression by a do-nothing policy, by letting nature take her course.
England has her peculiarities and we have ours
but I do not believe any intelligent observer can accuse England of undue orthodoxy in the present emergency.
Did England let nature take her course? No.
Did England hold to the gold standard when her reserves were threatened?
Has England gone back to the gold standard today?
Did England hesitate to call in ten billion dollars of her war bonds bearing five percent interest,
to issue new bonds therefore bearing only three and one half percent interest,
thereby saving the British treasury one hundred and fifty million dollars a year in interest alone?
And let it be recorded that the British bankers helped.
Is it not a fact that ever since the year nineteen oh nine,
Great Britain in many ways has advanced further along lines of social security than the United States?
Is it not a fact that relations between capital and labor on the basis of collective bargaining are much further advanced in Great Britain
than in the United States?
It is perhaps not strange that the conservative British press has told us with pardonable irony
that much of our New Deal program is only an attempt to catch up with English reforms that go back ten years or more.
Nearly all Americans are sensible and calm people.
We do not get greatly excited nor is our peace of mind disturbed, whether we be businessmen or workers or farmers,
by awesome pronouncements concerning the unconstitutionality of some of our measures of recovery and relief and reform.
We are not frightened by reactionary lawyers or political editors.
All of these cries have been heard before.
More than twenty years ago, when Theodore Roosevelt and Woodrow Wilson were attempting to correct abuses in our national life,
the great Chief Justice White said:
There is great danger it seems to me to arise from the constant habit which prevails where anything is opposed or objected to,
of referring without rhyme or reason to the Constitution as a means of preventing its accomplishment, thus creating the general impression
that the Constitution is but a barrier to progress instead of being the broad highway through which alone true progress may be enjoyed.
In our efforts for recovery
we have avoided on the one hand the theory that business should and must be taken over into an all-embracing government.
We have avoided on the other hand
the equally untenable theory that it is an interference with liberty to offer reasonable help when private enterprise is in need of help.
The course we have followed fits the American practice of government -- a practice of taking action step by step,
of regulating only to meet concrete needs -- a practice of courageous recognition of change.
I believe with Abraham Lincoln, that "The legitimate object of government is to do for a community of people
whatever they need to have done but cannot do at all or cannot do so well for themselves in their separate and individual capacities."
I am not for a return to that definition of liberty under which for many years a free people were being gradually regimented
into the service of the privileged few.
I prefer and I am sure you prefer that broader definition of liberty under which we are moving forward to greater freedom,
to greater security for the average man than he has ever known before in the history of America.
The Fireside Chats of Franklin Delano Roosevelt, by Franklin D Roosevelt, Section seven.
Since my annual message to the Congress on January fourth, last, I have not addressed the general public over the air.
In the many weeks since that time the Congress has devoted itself to the arduous task of formulating legislation necessary to the country's welfare.
It has made and is making distinct progress.
Before I come to any of the specific measures, however, I want to leave in your minds one clear fact.
The administration and the Congress are not proceeding in any haphazard fashion in this task of government.
Each of our steps has a definite relationship to every other step.
The job of creating a program for the nation's welfare is, in some respects, like the building of a ship.
At different points on the coast where I often visit they build great seagoing ships.
When one of these ships is under construction and the steel frames have been set in the keel,
it is difficult for a person who does not know ships to tell how it will finally look when it is sailing the high seas.
It may seem confused to some, but out of the multitude of detailed parts that go into the making of the structure
the creation of a useful instrument for man ultimately comes.
It is that way with the making of a national policy. The objective of the nation has greatly changed in three years
Before that time individual self- interest and group selfishness were paramount in public thinking.
The general good was at a discount.
Three years of hard thinking have changed the picture.
cause of clearer thinking and a better understanding, are considering the whole rather than a mere part relating to one section or to one crop,
or to one industry, or to an individual private occupation.
That is a tremendous gain for the principles of democracy.
The overwhelming majority of people in this country know how to sift the wheat from the chaff in what they hear and what they read.
They know that the process of the constructive rebuilding of America cannot be done in a day or a year,
but that it is being done in spite of the few who seek to confuse them and to profit by their confusion.
Americans as a whole are feeling a lot better -- a lot more cheerful than for many, many years.
The most difficult place in the world to get a clear open perspective of the country as a whole is Washington.
I am reminded sometimes of what President Wilson once said:
So many people come to Washington who know things that are not so,
and so few people who know anything about what the people of the United States are thinking about.
That is why I occasionally leave this scene of action for a few days
to go fishing or back home to Hyde Park, so that I can have a chance to think quietly about the country as a whole.
To get away from the trees, as they say, "and to look at the whole forest."
This duty of seeing the country in a long-range perspective
is one which, in a very special manner, attaches to this office to which you have chosen me.
Did you ever stop to think that there are, after all, only two positions in the nation
that are filled by the vote of all of the voters -- the President and the Vice-President?
That makes it particularly necessary for the Vice- President and for me to conceive of our duty toward the entire country.
I speak, therefore, tonight, to and of the American people as a whole.
My most immediate concern is in carrying out the purposes of the great work program just enacted by the Congress.
Its first objective is to put men and women now on the relief rolls to work and, incidentally,
to assist materially in our already unmistakable march toward recovery.
I shall not confuse my discussion by a multitude of figures. So many figures are quoted to prove so many things.
Sometimes it depends upon what paper you read and what broadcast you hear.
Therefore, let us keep our minds on two or three simple, essential facts in connection with this problem of unemployment.
It is true that while business and industry are definitely better our relief rolls are still too large.
However, for the first time in five years the relief rolls have declined instead of increased during the winter months.
The simple fact is that many million more people have private work today than two years ago today or one year ago today,
and every day that passes offers more chances to work for those who want to work.
In spite of the fact that unemployment remains a serious problem
here as in every other nation, we have come to recognize the possibility and the necessity of certain helpful remedial measures.
These measures are of two kinds.
The first is to make provisions intended to relieve, to minimize, and to prevent future unemployment;
the second is to establish the practical means to help those who are unemployed in this present emergency.
Our social security legislation is an attempt to answer the first of these questions; our Works Relief program, the second.
The program for social security now pending before the Congress is a necessary part of the future unemployment policy of the government.
While our present and projected expenditures for work relief are wholly within the reasonable limits of our national credit resources,
it is obvious that we cannot continue to create governmental deficits for that purpose year after year.
We must begin now to make provision for the future.
That is why our social security program is an important part of the complete picture.
It proposes, by means of old age pensions,
to help those who have reached the age of retirement to give up their jobs and thus give to the younger generation greater opportunities for work
and to give to all a feeling of security as they look toward old age.
The unemployment insurance part of the legislation
will not only help to guard the individual in future periods of lay-off against dependence upon relief,
but it will, by sustaining purchasing power, cushion the shock of economic distress.
Another helpful feature of unemployment insurance is the incentive it will give to employers to plan more carefully
in order that unemployment may be prevented by the stabilizing of employment itself.
Provisions for social security, however, are protections for the future.
Our responsibility for the immediate necessities of the unemployed has been met by the Congress
through the most comprehensive work plan in the history of the nation.
Our problem is to put to work three and one-half million employable persons now on the relief rolls.
It is a problem quite as much for private industry as for the government.
We are losing no time getting the government's vast work relief program underway,
and we have every reason to believe that it should be in full swing by autumn.
In directing it, I shall recognize six fundamental principles:
one. The projects should be useful.
Projects shall be of a nature that a considerable proportion of the money spent will go into wages for labor.
Projects will be sought which promise ultimate return to the federal treasury of a considerable proportion of the costs.
Funds allotted for each project should be actually and promptly spent and not held over until later years.
In all cases projects must be of a character to give employment to those on the relief rolls.
six. Projects will be allocated to localities or relief areas in relation to the number of workers on relief rolls in those areas.
I next want to make it clear exactly how we shall direct the work.
I have set up a Division of Applications and Information
to which all proposals for the expenditure of money must go for preliminary study and consideration.
After the Division of Applications and Information has sifted those projects,
they will be sent to an Allotment Division composed of representatives of the more important governmental agencies
charged with carrying on work relief projects.
The group will also include representatives of cities, and of labor, farming, banking and industry.
This Allotment Division will consider all of the recommendations submitted to it
and such projects as they approve will be next submitted to the President who under the Act is required to make final allocations.
The next step will be to notify the proper government agency
in whose field the project falls, and also to notify another agency which I am creating -- a Progress Division.
This Division will have the duty of coordinating the purchases of materials and supplies
and of making certain that people who are employed will be taken from the relief rolls.
It will also have the responsibility of determining work payments in various localities,
of making full use of existing employment services and to assist people engaged in relief work
to move as rapidly as possible back into private employment when such employment is available.
Moreover, this Division will be charged with keeping projects moving on schedule.
I have felt it to be essentially wise and prudent to avoid, so far as possible,
the creation of new governmental machinery for supervising this work.
The national government now has at least sixty different agencies with the staff
and the experience and the competence necessary to carry on the two hundred and fifty or three hundred kinds of work that will be undertaken.
These agencies, therefore, will simply be doing on a somewhat enlarged scale the same sort of things that they have been doing.
This will make certain that the largest possible portion of the funds allotted
will be spent for actually creating new work and not for building up expensive overhead organizations here in Washington.
For many months preparations have been under way.
The allotment of funds for desirable projects has already begun.
The key men for the major responsibilities of this great task already have been selected.
I well realize that the country is expecting before this year is out to see the "dirt fly", as they say, in carrying on the work,
and I assure my fellow citizens that no energy will be spared in using these funds effectively
to make a major attack upon the problem of unemployment.
Our responsibility is to all of the people in this country.
This is a great national crusade to destroy enforced idleness which is an enemy of the human spirit
Our attack upon these enemies must be without stint and without discrimination.
No sectional, no political distinctions can be permitted.
It must, however, be recognized that when an enterprise of this character is extended over more than three thousand counties throughout the nation,
there may be occasional instances of inefficiency, bad management, or misuse of funds.
When cases of this kind occur,
there will be those, of course, who will try to tell you that the exceptional failure is characteristic of the entire endeavor.
It should be remembered that in every big job there are some imperfections.
There are chiselers in every walk of life; there are those in every industry who are guilty of unfair practices;
every profession has its black sheep, but long experience in government has taught me
that the exceptional instances of wrong-doing in government are probably less numerous than in almost every other line of endeavor.
The most effective means of preventing such evils in this Works Relief program will be the eternal vigilance of the American people themselves.
I call upon my fellow citizens everywhere to cooperate with me
in making this the most efficient and the cleanest example of public enterprise the world has ever seen.
It is time to provide a smashing answer for those cynical men who say that a democracy cannot be honest and efficient.
If you will help, this can be done.
I, therefore, hope you will watch the work in every corner of this Nation.
Feel free to criticize. Tell me of instances where work can be done better, or where improper practices prevail.
Neither you nor I want criticism conceived in a purely fault-finding or partisan spirit,
but I am jealous of the right of every citizen to call to the attention of his or her government
examples of how the public money can be more effectively spent for the benefit of the American people.
I now come, my friends, to a part of the remaining business before the Congress.
It has under consideration many measures which provide for the rounding out of the program of economic and social reconstruction
with which we have been concerned for two years.
I can mention only a few of them tonight, but I do not want my mention of specific measures
to be interpreted as lack of interest in or disapproval of many other important proposals that are pending.
The National Industrial Recovery Act expires on the sixteenth of June.
After careful consideration, I have asked the Congress to extend the life of this useful agency of government.
As we have proceeded with the administration of this Act,
we have found from time to time more and more useful ways of promoting its purposes.
No reasonable person wants to abandon our present gains
we must continue to protect children,
to enforce minimum wages, to prevent excessive hours,
to safeguard, define and enforce collective bargaining, and, while retaining fair competition,
to eliminate so far as humanly possible, the kinds of unfair practices by selfish minorities which unfortunately
did more than anything else to bring about the recent collapse of industries.
There is likewise pending before the Congress
legislation to provide for the elimination of unnecessary holding companies in the public utility field.
I consider this legislation a positive recovery measure.
Power production in this country is virtually back to the nineteen twenty-nine peak.
The operating companies in the gas and electric utility field are by and large in good condition, but
under holding company domination the utility industry has long been hopelessly at war within itself and with public sentiment.
By far the greater part of the general decline in utility securities had occurred before I was inaugurated.
The absentee management of unnecessary holding company control
has lost touch with, and has lost the sympathy of, the communities it pretends to serve.
Even more significantly it has given the country as a whole an uneasy apprehension of overconcentrated economic power.
A business that loses the confidence of its customers and the goodwill of the public cannot long continue to be a good risk for the investor.
This legislation will serve the investor by ending the conditions which have caused that lack of confidence and goodwill.
It will put the public utility operating industry on a sound basis for the future,
both in its public relations and in its internal relations.
This legislation will not only in the long run result in providing lower electric and gas rates to the consumer,
but it will protect the actual value and earning power of properties now owned by thousands of investors
who have little protection under the old laws against what used to be called frenzied finance.
It will not destroy values.
Not only business recovery, but the general economic recovery of the nation will be greatly stimulated by the enactment of legislation
designed to improve the status of our transportation agencies.
There is need for legislation providing for the regulation of interstate transportation by buses and trucks,
for the regulation of transportation by water, for the strengthening of our Merchant Marine and Air Transport,
for the strengthening of the Interstate Commerce Commission to enable it to carry out a rounded conception of the national transportation system
in which the benefits of private ownership are retained while the public stake in these important services is protected by the public's government.
Finally, the reestablishment of public confidence in the banks of the nation
is one of the most hopeful results of our efforts as a Nation to reestablish public confidence in private banking.
We all know that private banking actually exists by virtue of the permission of and regulation by the people as a whole,
Wise public policy, however, requires not only that banking be safe
but that its resources be most fully utilized in the economic life of the country
To this end it was decided more than twenty years ago
that the government should assume the responsibility of providing a means by which the credit of the nation might be controlled,
not by a few private banking institutions, but by a body with public prestige and authority.
The answer to this demand was the Federal Reserve System.
Twenty years of experience with this system have justified the efforts made to create it,
but these twenty years have shown by experience definite possibilities for improvement.
Certain proposals made to amend the Federal Reserve Act deserve prompt and favorable action by the Congress.
They are a minimum of wise readjustments of our Federal Reserve System in the light of past experience and present needs.
These measures I have mentioned are, in large part, the program which under my constitutional duty I have recommended to the Congress.
They are essential factors in a rounded program for national recovery.
They contemplate the enrichment of our national life
by a sound and rational ordering of its various elements and wise provisions for the protection of the weak against the strong.
Never since my inauguration in March, nineteen thirty-three, have I felt so unmistakably the atmosphere of recovery.
But it is more than the recovery of the material basis of our individual lives.
It is the recovery of confidence in our democratic processes and institutions.
We have survived all of the arduous burdens and the threatening dangers of a great economic calamity.
We have in the darkest moments of our national trials retained our faith in our own ability to master our destiny.
Fear is vanishing and confidence is growing on every side,
renewed faith in the vast possibilities of human beings to improve their material and spiritual status
through the instrumentality of the democratic form of government.
That faith is receiving its just reward.
For that we can be thankful to the God who watches over America.
The Fireside Chats of Franklin Delano Roosevelt, by Franklin D Roosevelt, Section nine.
March nine, nineteen thirty-seven. Part one.
Last Thursday I described in detail certain economic problems which everyone admits now face the nation.
For the many messages which have come to me after that speech, and which it is physically impossible to answer individually,
I take this means of saying "thank you."
Tonight, sitting at my desk in the White House, I make my first radio report to the people in my second term of office.
I am reminded of that evening in March, four years ago, when I made my first radio report to you.
We were then in the midst of the great banking crisis.
Soon after, with the authority of the Congress,
we asked the nation to turn over all of its privately held gold, dollar for dollar, to the government of the United States.
Today's recovery proves how right that policy was.
But when, almost two years later, it came before the Supreme Court its constitutionality was upheld only by a five-to-four vote.
The change of one vote would have thrown all the affairs of this great Nation back into hopeless chaos.
In effect, four Justices ruled that the right under a private contract
to exact a pound of flesh was more sacred than the main objectives of the Constitution to establish an enduring Nation.
In nineteen thirty-three you and I knew that we must never let our economic system get completely out of joint again
that we could not afford to take the risk of another great depression.
We also became convinced that the only way to avoid a repetition of those dark days was to have a government with power to prevent
and to cure the abuses and the inequalities which had thrown that system out of joint.
We then began a program of remedying those abuses and inequalities -- to give balance and stability to our economic system
to make it bomb-proof against the causes of nineteen twenty-nine.
Today we are only part-way through that program
and recovery is speeding up to a point where the dangers of nineteen twenty-nine are again becoming possible,
not this week or month perhaps, but within a year or two.
National laws are needed to complete that program.
Individual or local or state effort alone cannot protect us in nineteen thirty-seven any better than ten years ago.
It will take time -- and plenty of time -- to work out our remedies administratively even after legislation is passed.
To complete our program of protection in time, therefore,
we cannot delay one moment in making certain that our national government has power to carry through.
Four years ago action did not come until the eleventh hour.
It was almost too late.
If we learned anything from the depression
we will not allow ourselves to run around in new circles of futile discussion and debate, always postponing the day of decision.
The American people have learned from the depression.
For in the last three national elections
an overwhelming majority of them voted a mandate that the Congress and the President begin the task of providing that protection
not after long years of debate, but now.
The courts, however, have cast doubts on the ability of the elected Congress to protect us against catastrophe
by meeting squarely our modern social and economic conditions.
We are at a crisis in our ability to proceed with that protection.
It is a quiet crisis. There are no lines of depositors outside closed banks.
But to the far-sighted it is far-reaching in its possibilities of injury to America.
I want to talk with you very simply about the need for present action in this crisis
the need to meet the unanswered challenge of one-third of a Nation ill-nourished, ill-clad, ill-housed.
Last Thursday I described the American form of government as a three horse team provided by the Constitution to the American people
so that their field might be plowed.
The three horses are, of course, the three branches of government -- the Congress, the Executive and the courts.
Two of the horses are pulling in unison today; the third is not.
Those who have intimated that the President of the United States is trying to drive that team
overlook the simple fact that the President, as Chief Executive, is himself one of the three horses.
It is the American people themselves who are in the driver's seat.
It is the American people themselves who want the furrow plowed.
It is the American people themselves who expect the third horse to pull in unison with the other two.
I hope that you have re-read the Constitution of the United States in these past few weeks.
Like the Bible, it ought to be read again and again.
It is an easy document to understand when you remember that it was called into being
because the Articles of Confederation under which the original thirteen States tried to operate after the Revolution
showed the need of a national government with power enough to handle national problems.
In its Preamble, the Constitution states that it was intended to form a more perfect Union and promote the general welfare;
and the powers given to the Congress to carry out those purposes can be best described by saying
that they were all the powers needed to meet each and every problem which then had a national character
and which could not be met by merely local action.
But the framers went further.
Having in mind that in succeeding generations many other problems then undreamed of would become national problems
they gave to the Congress the ample broad powers "to levy taxes
and provide for the common defense and general welfare of the United States.
That, my friends, is what I honestly believe
to have been the clear and underlying purpose of the patriots who wrote a federal constitution to create a national government
with national power, intended as they said, "to form a more perfect union
for ourselves and our posterity.
For nearly twenty years there was no conflict between the Congress and the Court.
Congress passed a statute which, in eighteen oh three, the Court said violated an express provision of the Constitution.
The Court claimed the power to declare it unconstitutional and did so declare it.
But a little later the Court itself admitted
that it was an extraordinary power to exercise and through Mr. Justice Washington laid down this limitation upon it:
It is but a decent respect due to the wisdom, the integrity and the patriotism of the legislative body,
by which any law is passed,
to presume in favor of its validity until its violation of the Constitution is proved beyond all reasonable doubt.
But since the rise of the modern movement for social and economic progress through legislation,
the Court has more and more often and more and more boldly
asserted a power to veto laws passed by the Congress and state legislatures in complete disregard of this original limitation.
In the last four years the sound rule of giving statutes the benefit of all reasonable doubt has been cast aside.
The Court has been acting not as a judicial body, but as a policy-making body.
When the Congress has sought to stabilize national agriculture, to improve the conditions of labor,
to safeguard business against unfair competition,
to protect our national resources, and in many other ways, to serve our clearly national needs,
the majority of the Court has been assuming the power to pass on the wisdom of these acts of the Congress
and to approve or disapprove the public policy written into these laws.
That is not only my accusation.
It is the accusation of most distinguished justices of the present Supreme Court.
I have not the time to quote to you all the language used by dissenting justices in many of these cases.
But in the case holding the Railroad Retirement Act unconstitutional, for instance,
Chief Justice Hughes said in a dissenting opinion that the majority opinion was "a departure from sound principles,"
and placed "an unwarranted limitation upon the commerce clause."
And three other justices agreed with him.
In the case of holding the A.A.A. unconstitutional,
Justice Stone said of the majority opinion that it was a "tortured construction of the Constitution."
And two other justices agreed with him.
In the case holding the New York Minimum Wage Law unconstitutional, Justice Stone said
that the majority were actually reading into the Constitution their own "personal economic predilections," and that
if the legislative power is not left free to choose the methods of solving the problems of poverty,
subsistence, and health of large numbers in the community, then
government is to be rendered impotent.
And two other justices agreed with him.
In the face of these dissenting opinions, there is no basis for the claim made by some members of the Court
that something in the Constitution has compelled them regretfully to thwart the will of the people.
In the face of such dissenting opinions, it is perfectly clear that, as Chief Justice Hughes has said,
We are under a Constitution, but the Constitution is what the judges say it is.
The Court in addition to the proper use of its judicial functions has improperly set itself up as a third house of the Congress
a super-legislature, as one of the justices has called it
reading into the Constitution words and implications which are not there, and which were never intended to be there.
reached the point as a nation where we must take action to save the Constitution from the Court and the Court from itself.
We must find a way to take an appeal from the Supreme Court to the Constitution itself.
We want a Supreme Court which will do justice under the Constitution -- not over it.
In our courts we want a government of laws and not of men.
I want -- as all Americans want -- an independent judiciary as proposed by the framers of the Constitution.
That means a Supreme Court that will enforce the Constitution as written
that will refuse to amend the Constitution by the arbitrary exercise of judicial power -- amended by judicial say-so.
It does not mean a judiciary so independent that it can deny the existence of facts which are universally recognized.
How then could we proceed to perform the mandate given us?
It was said in last year's Democratic platform,
If these problems cannot be effectively solved within the Constitution,
we shall seek such clarifying amendment as will assure the power to enact those laws,
adequately to regulate commerce, protect public health and safety, and safeguard economic security.
In other words, we said we would seek an amendment only if every other possible means by legislation were to fail.
When I commenced to review the situation with the problem squarely before me,
I came by a process of elimination to the conclusion that, short of amendments,
the only method which was clearly constitutional, and would at the same time carry out other much needed reforms,
was to infuse new blood into all our courts.
We must have men worthy and equipped to carry out impartial justice.
But, at the same time, we must have judges who will bring to the courts a present-day sense of the Constitution
judges who will retain in the courts the judicial functions of a court,
and reject the legislative powers which the courts have today assumed.
In forty-five out of the forty-eight states of the Union, judges are chosen not for life but for a period of years.
In many states judges must retire at the age of seventy.
Congress has provided financial security
by offering life pensions at full pay for federal judges on all courts who are willing to retire at seventy.
In the case of Supreme Court justices, that pension is twenty thousand dollars a year.
But all federal judges, once appointed,
can, if they choose, hold office for life, no matter how old they may get to be.
The Fireside Chats of Franklin Delano Roosevelt, by Franklin D Roosevelt
Section ten. March nine, nineteen thirty-seven. Part two.
It is simply this: whenever a judge or justice of any federal court
has reached the age of seventy and does not avail himself of the opportunity to retire on a pension,
a new member shall be appointed by the President then in office,
with the approval, as required by the Constitution, of the Senate of the United States.
That plan has two chief purposes.
By bringing into the judicial system a steady and continuing stream of new and younger blood, I hope, first,
to make the administration of all federal justice speedier and, therefore, less costly;
secondly, to bring to the decision of social and economic problems younger men who have had personal experience and contact
with modern facts and circumstances under which average men have to live and work.
This plan will save our national Constitution from hardening of the judicial arteries.
The number of judges to be appointed would depend wholly on the decision of present judges now over seventy,
or those who would subsequently reach the age of seventy.
If, for instance, any one of the six justices of the Supreme Court now over the age of seventy should retire as provided under the plan,
no additional place would be created.
Consequently, although there never can be more than fifteen, there may be only fourteen, or thirteen, or twelve.
And there may be only nine.
There is nothing novel or radical about this idea.
It seeks to maintain the federal bench in full vigor.
It has been discussed and approved by many persons of high authority
ever since a similar proposal passed the House of Representatives in eighteen sixty-nine.
Why was the age fixed at seventy?
Because the laws of many states, the practice of the Civil Service, the regulations of the Army and Navy,
and the rules of many of our universities and of almost every great private business enterprise,
commonly fix the retirement age at seventy years or less.
The statute would apply to all the courts in the federal system.
There is general approval so far as the lower federal courts are concerned.
The plan has met opposition only so far as the Supreme Court of the United States itself is concerned.
If such a plan is good for the lower courts it certainly ought to be equally good for the highest court from which there is no appeal.
Those opposing this plan have sought to arouse prejudice and fear by crying that I am seeking to "pack" the Supreme Court
and that a baneful precedent will be established.
What do they mean by the words "packing the Court"?
Let me answer this question with a bluntness that will end all honest misunderstanding of my purposes.
If by that phrase "packing the Court" it is charged that I wish to place on the bench spineless puppets
who would disregard the law and would decide specific cases as I wished them to be decided, I make this answer:
that no President fit for his office would appoint,
and no Senate of honorable men fit for their office would confirm, that kind of appointees to the Supreme Court.
But if by that phrase the charge is made
that I would appoint and the Senate would confirm justices worthy to sit beside present members of the Court
who understand those modern conditions,
that I will appoint justices who will not undertake to override the judgment of the Congress on legislative policy,
that I will appoint justices who will act as justices and not as legislators
if the appointment of such justices can be called "packing the Courts,"
then I say that I and with me the vast majority of the American people favor doing just that thing -- now.
Is it a dangerous precedent for the Congress to change the number of the justices? The Congress has always had, and will have, that power.
The number of justices has been changed several times before,
in the administration of John Adams and Thomas Jefferson -- both signers of the Declaration of Independence
Andrew Jackson, Abraham Lincoln and Ulysses S. Grant.
I suggest only the addition of justices to the bench
in accordance with a clearly defined principle relating to a clearly defined age limit.
Fundamentally, if in the future, America cannot trust the Congress it elects to refrain from abuse of our Constitutional usages
democracy will have failed far beyond the importance to it of any king of precedent concerning the judiciary.
We think it so much in the public interest to maintain a vigorous judiciary
that we encourage the retirement of elderly judges by offering them a life pension at full salary.
Why then should we leave the fulfillment of this public policy to chance
or make independent on upon the desire or prejudice of any individual justice?
It is the clear intention of our public policy to provide for a constant flow of new and younger blood into the judiciary.
Normally every President appoints a large number of district and circuit court judges and a few members of the Supreme Court.
Until my first term practically every President of the United States has appointed at least one member of the Supreme Court.
President Taft appointed five members and named a Chief Justice;
President Wilson, three; President Harding, four, including a Chief Justice; President Coolidge, one;
President Hoover, three, including a Chief Justice.
Such a succession of appointments should have provided a Court well-balanced as to age.
But chance and the disinclination of individuals to leave the Supreme bench
have now given us a Court in which five justices will be over seventy-five years of age before next June
Thus a sound public policy has been defeated.
I now propose that we establish by law an assurance against any such ill-balanced court in the future.
I propose that hereafter, when a judge reaches the age of seventy,
a new and younger judge shall be added to the court automatically.
In this way I propose to enforce a sound public policy by law
instead of leaving the composition of our federal courts, including the highest,
to be determined by chance or the personal indecision of individuals.
If such a law as I propose is regarded as establishing a new precedent,
is it not a most desirable precedent?
Like all lawyers, like all Americans, I regret the necessity of this controversy.
But the welfare of the United States, and indeed of the Constitution itself, is what we all must think about first.
Our difficulty with the Court today rises not from the Court as an institution but from human beings within it.
But we cannot yield our constitutional destiny to the personal judgment of a few men who, being fearful of the future,
would deny us the necessary means of dealing with the present.
This plan of mine is no attack on the Court;
it seeks to restore the Court to its rightful and historic place in our constitutional government
and to have it resume its high task of building anew on the Constitution "a system of living law."
The Court itself can best undo what the Court has done.
I have thus explained to you the reasons that lie behind our efforts to secure results by legislation within the Constitution.
I hope that thereby the difficult process of constitutional amendment may be rendered unnecessary. But,
let us examine the process.
There are many types of amendment proposed.
Each one is radically different from the other.
There is no substantial groups within the Congress or outside it who are agreed on any single amendment.
It would take months or years to get substantial agreement upon the type and language of the amendment.
It would take months and years thereafter to get a two-thirds majority in favor of that amendment in both Houses of the Congress.
Then would come the long course of ratification by three-fourths of all the states.
No amendment which any powerful economic interests or the leaders of any powerful political party have had reason to oppose
has ever been ratified within anything like a reasonable time.
And thirteen states which contain only five percent of the voting population can block ratification
even though the thirty- five states with ninety-five percent of the population are in favor of it.
A very large percentage of newspaper publishers, Chambers of Commerce,
Bar Association, Manufacturers' Associations, who are trying to give the impression that they really do want a constitutional amendment
would be the first to exclaim as soon as an amendment was proposed
Oh! I was for an amendment all right, but this amendment you proposed is not the kind of amendment that I was thinking about.
I am therefore, going to spend my time, my efforts and my money
to block the amendment, although I would be awfully glad to help get some other kind of amendment ratified.
Two groups oppose my plan on the ground that they favor a constitutional amendment.
The first includes those who fundamentally object to social and economic legislation along modern lines.
This is the same group who during the campaign last Fall tried to block the mandate of the people.
Now they are making a last stand.
And the strategy of that last stand is to suggest the time-consuming process of amendment in order to kill off by delay
the legislation demanded by the mandate.
To them I say: I do not think you will be able long to fool the American people as to your purposes.
The other groups is composed of those who honestly believe the amendment process is the best
and who would be willing to support a reasonable amendment if they could agree on one.
To them I say: we cannot rely on an amendment as the immediate or only answer to our present difficulties.
When the time comes for action,
you will find that many of those who pretend to support you will sabotage any constructive amendment which is proposed.
Look at these strange bed-fellows of yours.
When before have you found them really at your side in your fights for progress?
And remember one thing more.
Even if an amendment were passed, and even if in the years to come it were to be ratified,
its meaning would depend upon the kind of justices who would be sitting on the Supreme Court bench.
An amendment, like the rest of the Constitution,
is what the justices say it is rather than what its framers or you might hope it is.
This proposal of mine will not infringe in the slightest upon the civil or religious liberties so dear to every American.
My record as Governor and President proves my devotion to those liberties.
You who know me can have no fear that I would tolerate the destruction by any branch of government of any part of our heritage of freedom.
The present attempt by those opposed to progress to play upon the fears of danger to personal liberty
brings again to mind that crude and cruel strategy tried by the same opposition
to frighten the workers of America in a pay-envelope propaganda against the Social Security Law.
The workers were not fooled by that propaganda then. The people of America will not be fooled by such propaganda now.
I am in favor of action through legislation:
First, because I believe that it can be passed at this session of the Congress.
Second, because it will provide a reinvigorated
liberal-minded judiciary necessary to furnish quicker and cheaper justice from bottom to top.
Third, because it will provide a series of federal courts willing to enforce the Constitution as written,
and unwilling to assert legislative powers by writing into it their own political and economic policies.
During the past half century the balance of power between the three great branches of the federal government,
has been tipped out of balance by the courts in direct contradiction of the high purposes of the framers of the Constitution.
It is my purpose to restore that balance.
You who know me will accept my solemn assurance that in a world in which democracy is under attack,
I seek to make American democracy succeed.
You and I will do our part.
The Science: History of the Universe, Volume five.
Edited by Francis Rolt-Wheeler. Biology. Chapter seven. Organic Functions. Part One.
The facts dealing with the physiology of organisms, the activities associated with that which we call life
are often designated Organic Functions.
The terms animal physiology, plant physiology and human physiology are in common use and often suggest to the lay reader
that the functions or workings of the organs of plants, animals or man are quite distinct,
so much so as to require discussion in different treatises.
This is true only as a matter of detail,
for in the past fifty years it has been made evident that in general principles all living things are fundamentally similar.
One of the most important summaries of this similarity
is Huxley's famous essay, "The Border Territory Between the Animal and Vegetable Kingdoms," written in eighteen seventy-six,
In the second edition of the "Regne Animal," published in eighteen twenty-eight,
Cuvier devotes a special section to the Division of Organized Beings into Animals and Vegetables,
in which the question is treated with that comprehensiveness of knowledge and clear critical judgment which characterize his writings
and justify biologists in regarding them as representative expressions of the most extensive, if not the profoundest, knowledge of his time.
He affirms that living beings have been subdivided from the earliest times into animated beings, which possess sense and motion,
and inanimated beings, which are devoid of these functions and simply vegetable.
Although the roots of plants direct themselves toward moisture and their leaves toward air and light,
although the parts of some plants exhibit oscillating movements without any perceptible cause and the leaves of others retract when touched,
yet none of these movements justify the ascription to plants of perception of will.
From the mobility of animals Cuvier, with his characteristic partiality for teleological reasoning,
reduces the necessity of the existence in them of an alimentary cavity, or reservoir of food,
whence their nutrition may be drawn by vessels, which are a sort of internal roots; and, in the presence of this alimentary cavity
he naturally sees the primary and the most important distinction between animals and plants,
Following out his teleological argument, Cuvier remarks that the organization of this cavity
and its appurtenances must needs vary according to the nature of the aliment and the operations which it has to undergo
before it can be converted into substances fitted for absorption,
while the atmosphere and the earth supply plants with juices ready prepared and which can be absorbed immediately.
As the animal body required to be independent of heat and of the atmosphere,
there were no means by which the motion of its fluids could be produced by internal causes.
Hence arose the second great distinctive character of animals, or the circulatory system, which is less important than the digestive,
since it was unnecessary, and therefore is absent, in the more simple animals.
Animals further needed muscles for locomotion and nerves for sensibility.
Hence, says Cuvier, it was necessary that the chemical composition of the animal body should be more complicated than that of the plant;
and it is so, inasmuch as an additional substance -- nitrogen -- enters into it as an essential element;
while in plants nitrogen is only accidentally joined with the three other fundamental constituents of organic beings
he afterward affirms that nitrogen is peculiar to animals, and herein he places the third distinction between the animal and the plant.
The soil and the atmosphere supply plants with water composed of hydrogen and oxygen
and carbonic acid containing carbon and oxygen.
They retain the hydrogen and the carbon, exhale the superfluous oxygen and absorb little or no nitrogen.
The essential character of vegetable life is the exhalation of oxygen, which is effected through the agency of light.
Animals, on the contrary, derive their nourishment either directly or indirectly from plants.
They get rid of the superfluous hydrogen and carbon and accumulate nitrogen.
The relations of plants and animals to the atmosphere are therefore inverse.
The plant withdraws water and carbonic acid from the atmosphere, the animal contributes both to it.
Respiration -- that is, the absorption of oxygen and the exhalation of carbonic acid
is the specially animal function of animals and constitutes their fourth distinctive character.
Thus wrote Cuvier in eighteen twenty-eight.
But in the fourth and fifth decades of this century
the greatest and most rapid revolution which biological science has ever undergone was effected by the application of the modern microscope
to the investigation of organic structure,
by the introduction of exact and easily manageable methods of conducting the chemical analysis of organic compounds and finally
by the employment of instruments of precision for the measurement of the physical forces which are at work in the living economy.
That the semi-fluid contents (which we now term protoplasm) of the cells of certain plants,
such as the Charae, are in constant and regular motion was made out by Bonaventura Corti a century ago;
but the fact, important as it was, fell into oblivion and had to be rediscovered by Treviranus in eighteen oh seven.
Robert Brown noted the more complex motions of the protoplasm in the cells of Tradescantia in eighteen thirty-one,
and now such movements of the living substance of plants are well known to be some of the most widely prevalent phenomena of vegetable life.
Agardh and other of the botanists of Cuvier's generation who occupied themselves with the lower plants had observed that,
under particular circumstances, the contents of the cells of certain water-weeds were set free and moved about with considerable velocity
and with all the appearances of spontaneity as locomotive bodies,
which, from their similarity to animals of simple organization, were called "zoospores."
Even as late as eighteen forty-five, however, a botanist of Schleiden's eminence dealt very skeptically with these statements,
and his skepticism was the more justified since Ehrenberg in his elaborate and comprehensive work on the infusoria,
had declared the greater number of what are now recognized as locomotive plants to be animals.
At the present day, writes Huxley,
innumerable plants and free plant cells are known to pass the whole or part of their lives in an actively locomotive condition,
in nowise distinguishable from that of one of the simpler animals, and
while in this condition their movements are, to all appearances, as spontaneous -- as much the product of volition -- as those of such animals.
Hence the teleological argument for Cuvier's first diagnostic character
the presence in animals of an alimentary cavity, or internal pocket, in which they can carry about their nutriment
has broken down, so far, at least, as his mode of stating it goes. And
with the advance of microscopic anatomy, the universality of the fact itself among animals has ceased to be predicable.
Many animals of even complex structure which live parasitically within others are wholly devoid of an alimentary cavity.
Their food is provided for them,
not only ready cooked but ready digested, and the alimentary canal, become superfluous, has disappeared, and, again,
the males of most Rotifers have no digestive apparatus.
Finally amid the lowest forms of animal life the speck of gelatinous protoplasm, which constitutes the whole body,
has no permanent digestive cavity or mouth, but takes in its food anywhere and digests, so to speak, all over its body.
But although Cuvier's leading diagnosis of the animal from the plant will not stand a strict test,
it remains one of the most constant of the distinctive characters of animals.
And if we substitute for the possession of an alimentary cavity the power of taking solid nutriment into the body and there digesting it,
the definition so changed will cover all animals, except certain parasites,
and the few and exceptional cases of non-parasitic animals which do not feed at all.
On the other hand, the definition thus amended will exclude all ordinary vegetable organisms.
Cuvier himself practically gives up his second distinctive mark when he admits that it is wanting in the simpler animals.
The third distinction is based on a completely erroneous conception of the chemical differences
and resemblances between the constituents of animal and vegetable organisms, for which Cuvier is not responsible,
as it was current among contemporary chemists.
It is now established that nitrogen is as essential a constituent of vegetable as of animal living matter
and that the latter is, chemically speaking, just as complicated as the former.
Starchy substances, cellulose and sugar,
once supposed to be exclusively confined to plants, are now known to be regular and normal products of animals.
Amylaceous and saccharine substances are largely manufactured, even by the highest animals.
Cellulose is widespread as a constituent of the skeletons of the lower animals
and it is probable that amyloid substances are universally present in the animal organism, though not in the precise form of starch.
Moreover, although it remains true that there is an inverse relation between the green plant in sunshine and the animal,
in so far as under these circumstances the green plant
decomposes carbonic acid and exhales oxygen while the animal absorbs oxygen and exhales carbonic acid,
yet the exact researches of the modern chemical investigators of the physiological processes of plants have clearly demonstrated the fallacy
of attempting to draw any general distinction between animals and vegetables on this ground. In fact, the difference vanishes with the sunshine,
even in the case of the green plant, which in the dark absorbs oxygen and gives out carbonic acid like any animal.
On the other hand, those plants, such as the fungi,
which contain no chlorophyll and are not green, are always, so far as respiration is concerned, in the exact position of animals.
They absorb oxygen and give out carbonic acid.
Thus, by the progress of knowledge, Cuvier's fourth distinction between the animal and the plant
has been as completely invalidated as the third and second, and even the first can be retained only in a modified form
But has the advance of biology simply tended to break down old distinctions without establishing new ones?
With a qualification, to be considered presently, the answer to this question is undoubtedly in the affirmative.
The famous researches of Schwann and Schleiden in eighteen thirty-seven and the following years
founded the modern science of histology or that branch of anatomy which deals with the ultimate visible structure of organisms as revealed by the microscope,
and from that day to this the rapid improvement of methods of investigation and the energy of a host of accurate observers
have given greater and greater breadth and firmness to Schwann's great generalization
that a fundamental unity of structure obtains in animals and plants,
and that, however diverse may be the fabrics or tissues of which their bodies are composed, all these varied structures result
from the metamorphosis of morphological units (termed cells in a more general sense than that in which the word "cells" was at first employed),
which are not only similar in animals and in plants respectively,
but present a close resemblance when those of animals and those of plants are compared together.
The contractility which is the fundamental condition of locomotion," continues Huxley,
has not only been discovered to exist far more widely among plants than was formerly imagined,
but in the plants the act of contraction has been found to be accompanied,
as Dr. Burdon Sanderson's interesting investigations have shown, by a disturbance of the electrical state of the contractile substance
comparable to that which was found by Du Bois Reymond to be a concomitant of the activity of ordinary muscle in animals. Again,
I know of no test by which the reaction of the leaves of the Sundew and of other plants to stimuli, so fully and carefully studied by Mr. Darwin,
can be distinguished from those acts of contraction following upon stimuli, which are called "reflex" in animals.
On each lobe of the bi-lobed leaf of Venus flytrap are three delicate filaments which stand out at right angles from the surface of the leaf.
Touch one of them with the end of a fine human hair
and the lobes of the leaf instantly close together in virtue of an act of contraction of part of their substance,
just as the body of a snail contracts into its shell when one of its "horns" is irritated.
The reflex action of the snail is the result of the presence of a nervous system in the animal.
A molecular change takes place in the nerve of the tentacle,
is propagated to the muscles by which the body is retracted, and causing them to contract, the act of retraction is brought about.
Of course the similarity of the acts does not necessarily involve the conclusion that the mechanism by which they are effected is the same
but it suggests a suspicion of their identity which needs careful testing.
The results of inquiries into the structure of the nervous system of animals
converge toward the conclusion that the nerve fibers, which have been regarded as ultimate elements of nervous tissue,
are not such, but are simply the visible aggregations of vastly more attenuated filaments,
the diameter of which dwindles down to the limits of our present microscopic vision,
greatly as these have been extended by modern improvements of the microscope, and that a nerve is, in its essence,
nothing but a linear tract of specially modified protoplasm between two points of an organism
one of which is able to affect the other by means of the communication so established.
Hence it is conceivable that even the simplest living being may possess a nervous system.
And the question whether plants are provided with a nervous system or not thus acquires a new aspect and presents the histologist and physiologist
with a problem of extreme difficulty, which must be attacked from a new point of view and by the aid of methods which have yet to be invented.
Thus it must be admitted, he says again, "that plants may be contractile and locomotive;
that, while locomotive, their movements may have as much appearance of spontaneity as those of the lowest animals,
and that many exhibit actions comparable to those which are brought about by the agency of a nervous system in animals.
And it must be allowed to be possible that further research may reveal the existence of something comparable to a nervous system in plants.
So that I know not where we can hope to find any absolute distinction between animals and plants, unless we return to their mode of nutrition
and inquire whether certain differences of a more occult character than those imagined to exist by Cuvier,
and which certainly hold good for the vast majority of animals and plants, are of universal application.
A bean may be supplied with water in which salts of ammonia and certain other mineral salts are dissolved in due proportion,
with atmospheric air containing its ordinary minute dose of carbonic acid and with nothing else but sunlight and heat.
Under these circumstances, unnatural as they are, with proper management, the bean will thrust forth its radicle and its plumule;
the former will grow down into roots, the latter grow up into the stem and leaves of a vigorous bean-plant,
and this plant will, in due time, flower and produce its crop of beans just as if it were grown in the garden or in the field.
The weight of the nitrogenous protein compounds,
of the oily, starchy, saccharine and woody substances contained in the full-grown plant and its seeds
will be vastly greater than the weight of the same substances contained in the bean from which it sprang.
But nothing has been supplied to the bean save water, carbonic acid, ammonia, potash, lime,
iron and the like in combination with phosphoric, sulphuric and other acids.
Neither protein, nor fat, nor starch, nor sugar, nor any substance in the slightest degree resembling them has formed part of the food of the bean.
But the weights of the carbon, hydrogen, oxygen, nitrogen, phosphorus, sulfur and other elementary bodies contained in the bean-plant
and in the seeds which it produces are exactly equivalent to the weights of the same elements which have disappeared from the materials supplied to the bean during its growth.
Whence it follows that the bean has taken in only the raw materials of its fabric and has manufactured them into bean-stuffs.
The bean has been able to perform this great chemical feat by the help of its green coloring matter, or chlorophyll,
for it is only the green parts of the plant which, under the influence of sunlight, have the marvelous power of decomposing carbonic acid,
setting free the oxygen and laying hold of the carbon which it contains.
In fact, the bean obtains two of the absolutely indispensable elements of its substance from two distinct sources.
The watery solution, in which its roots are plunged, contains nitrogen but no carbon;
the air, to which the leaves are exposed, contains carbon,
but its nitrogen is in the state of a free gas, in which condition the bean can make no use of it,
and the chlorophyll is the apparatus by which the carbon is extracted from the atmospheric carbonic acid, the leaves being the chief laboratories
The Science: History of the Universe, Volume five. Edited by Francis Rolt-Wheeler. Biology. Chapter eight.
Nutrition thus, as has been pointed out, makes it possible to classify most organisms as animals or plants.
Yet there are many unicellular forms in which both kinds of nutrition go on at the same time;
that is, the forms may possess a mouth for the ingestion of solid food and green coloring matter, chlorophyll,
for the manufacture of starchy food from gaseous matter.
Many of the lowest forms of life have long been puzzles
and the beginner in biological study is surprised to find them described in textbooks of both botany and zoology.
The fact is that they are on the border line, are neither plants nor animals but simply organisms.
Since they cannot be classified, it is necessary that they be listed both under botany and zoology, in order to make sure that they will not be omitted entirely.
Because of these uncertain forms of life,
Haeckel proposed once to include all one-celled animals and plants in a third kingdom to be called Protista (meaning the first of all life).
Parker's definition of animals and plants,
based on the foregoing considerations, is convenient for distinguishing between animals and plants in all cases except the doubtful unicellar forms.
He says: Animals are organisms of fixed and definite form, in which the cell-body is not covered with a cellulose wall.
They ingest solid proteinaceous food,
their nutritive processes result in oxidation, they have a definite organ of excretion and are capable of automatic movement
Plants are organisms of constantly varying form in which the cell body is surrounded by a cellulose wall;
they cannot ingest solid food, but are nourished by a watery solution of nutrient materials.
If chlorophyll is present, the carbon dioxide of the air serves as a source of carbon,
nitrogen is obtained from simple salts and the nutritive processes result in deoxidation;
if chlorophyll is absent, carbon is obtained from sugar or some similar compound,
nitrogen either from simple salts or from proteids, and the process of nutrition is one of oxidation.
There is no special excretory organ, and, except in the case of certain reproductive bodies, there is usually no locomotion.
The important point to recognize is that these boundaries are artificial and that there are no scientific frontiers in Nature.
As in the liquefaction of gases, there is a "critical point" at which the substance under experiment is neither gaseous nor liquid.
as in a mountainous country, it is impossible to say where mountain ends and valley begins; as in the development of an animal,
it is futile to argue about the exact period when, for instance, the egg becomes a tadpole or the tadpole a frog,
so in the case under discussion.
The distinction between the higher plants and animals is perfectly sharp and obvious,
but when the two groups are traced downward they are found gradually to merge,
as it were, into an assemblage of organisms which partake of the characters of both kingdoms and cannot without a certain violence
be either included in or excluded from either.
When any given "protist" has to be classified the case must be decided on its individual merits;
the organism must be compared in detail with all those which resemble it closely in structure, physiology and life history,
and then a balance must be struck and the doubtful form placed in the kingdom with which it has, on the whole, most points in common.
It will no doubt occur to the reader that, on the theory of evolution,
the fact of the animal and vegetable kingdoms being related to one another like two trees united at the roots may be accounted for by the hypothesis that
the earliest organisms were protists and that from them animals and plants were evolved along divergent lines of descent.
And in this connection the fact that some bacteria -- the simplest organisms known and devoid of chlorophyll
may flourish in solutions wholly devoid of organic matter is very significant.
The lower plants and animals referred to above are so far from everyday observation
and hence so unfamiliar that to most people the comparison made will mean little in terms of ordinary green flowering plants and common vertebrate animals.
In order to emphasize the fundamental similarity of organic function in higher and lower animals and plants, let us compare any higher plant
e.g., a bean plant with a higher animal, e.g., frog or even man.
In each the life is the sum total of a series of definite processes -- nutrition or food supply,
circulation, metabolism, excretion, oxygenation (part of respiration),
movement, irritability (nervous activity) and reproduction.
In turn these will be compared for the animal and the plant,
following in part the comparisons of certain animals and plants by Sedgwick and Wilson and others.
These comparisons will, however, be translated into terms applicable to any species of higher plants or animals.
In the nutrition of the animal the most essential and characteristic part of the food supply is derived from vegetable
or animal matter in the form of various organic compounds, of which the most important are proteids (protoplasm, albumen, etc.),
carbohydrates (starch, cellulose) and fats.
These materials are used by the animal in the manufacture of new protoplasm to take the place of that which has been used up.
It is, however, impossible for the animal to build these materials directly into the substance of its own body.
They must first undergo certain preparatory chemical changes known collectively as digestion
and only after the completion of this process can all the food be absorbed into the circulation.
For this purpose the food is taken not into the body proper, but into a kind of tubular chemical laboratory; called the alimentary canal,
through which it slowly passes, being subjected meanwhile to the action of certain chemical substances or reagents, known as digestive ferments.
These substances, which are dissolved in a watery liquid to form the digestive fluid, are secreted by the walls of the alimentary tube.
Through their action the solid portions are liquefied and the food is rendered capable of absorption into the body proper.
The food supply of the higher plant, like that of the animal, is the source of the required matter and energy,
but unlike that of the animal, it is not chiefly an income of foods, but only of the raw materials of food.
Matter enters the plant in the liquid or gaseous form by diffusion,
both from the soil through the roots (liquids) and from the atmosphere through the leaves (gases).
We have here the direct absorption into the body proper of food-stuffs precisely as the animal takes in water and oxygen.
Energy enters the plant, to a small extent,
as the potential energy of foodstuffs, but comes in principally as the kinetic energy of sunlight absorbed in the leaves.
Of the substances the solids (salts, etc.) must be dissolved in water before they can be taken in.
Water and dissolved salts continually pass by diffusion from the soil into the roots, where together they constitute the sap.
The sap travels throughout the whole plant, the main though not the only cause of movement
being the constant transpiration (evaporation) of watery vapor from the leaves, especially through the stomata.
The gaseous matters (carbon dioxide, oxygen, nitrogen) enter the plant mainly by diffusion from the atmosphere,
are dissolved by the sap in the leaves and elsewhere and thus may pass to every portion of the plant.
The green plant owes its power of absorbing the energy of sunlight
to the chlorophyll bodies or chromatophores, for plants which, like fungi, etc., are devoid of chlorophyll, are unable thus to acquire energy.
Entering the chlorophyll bodies, the kinetic energy of sunlight is applied to the decomposition of carbon dioxide and water.
After passing through manifold but imperfectly known processes, the elements of these substances finally reappear as starch,
often in the form of granules embedded in the chlorophyll bodies and free oxygen, most of which is returned to the atmosphere.
Thus the leaf of a green plant in the light is continually absorbing carbon dioxide and giving forth free oxygen.
Carbon dioxide and water contain no potential energy, since the affinities of their constituent elements are completely satisfied.
Starch, however, contains potential energy, since the molecule is relatively unstable
i.e., capable of decomposition into simpler, stabler molecules in which stronger affinities are satisfied.
And this is due to the fact that in the manufacture of starch in the chlorophyll bodies
the kinetic energy of sunlight was expended in lifting the atoms into position of vantage, thus endowing them with energy of position.
In this way some of the radiant and kinetic energy of the sun comes to be stored up as potential energy in the starch.
In short, the green plant is able by cooperation with sunlight to use simple raw materials (carbon dioxide, water, oxygen, etc.)
poor in energy or devoid of it, and out of them to manufacture food -- i.e. complex compounds rich in available potential energy.
This power is possessed by green plants alone; all other organisms being dependent for energy upon the potential energy of ready-made food.
This must, in the first instance, be provided for them by green plants, and hence without chlorophyll-bearing plants,
animals (and colorless plants as well) apparently could not long exist.
The plant absorbs also a small amount of kinetic energy, independently of the sunlight, in the form of heat.
This, however, is probably not a source of vital energy, but only contributes to the maintenance of the body temperature.
Food (starch) thus produced in the green leaves of higher plants and the inorganic foods
water, nitrites or nitrates and various mineral substances in solution in water
furnish the materials and energy required for the life and growth of the plant.
The circulatory system distributes these foods. In animals foods prepared for absorption in the stomach and intestine (by digestion)
are absorbed by the circulating liquids (blood and lymph) and transported to all cells of the animal body.
In the plant the inorganic matter in water from the soil are absorbed by the roots and carried up definite tubes in the woody part of the stem.
The causes of this ascent are not clear,
but root pressure due to osmosis, capillary action and evaporation from the leaves are factors.
Just as the solid food of animals must be digested in preparation for absorption,
so starch manufactured in the leaves must be digested (dissolved) before it can be transported.
This is done by diastase, an enzyme of plant cells.
The change is from starch to a sugar capable of diffusion.
Dissolved in water, the sugar is transported down delicate tubes, chiefly in the growing bark region of the stem.
It is clear that there are upward and downward currents of water containing food (comparable to blood of an animal),
but no system of complete circulation as in the blood vessels of a higher animal.
However, the result in distributed food is the same in the plant and in the animal.
In the cells the foods undergo metabolic changes.
In an animal the foods in the circulating liquids, blood and lymph, are selected and absorbed by the cells.
Only proteid foods form new protoplasm
and even of proteids only a limited amount, seventy-five to one hundred grams a day for a man, is built into new protoplasm.
The excess undergoes oxidation and forms nitrogen excretions.
The foods containing only the elements carbon, hydrogen and oxygen (fats and carbohydrates)
are directly oxidized to excretions and, lacking nitrogen, cannot serve for making new animal protoplasm.
Fat and carbohydrate foods, then, never become living matter.
They may be stored, especially as fat, until needed for oxidation to supply energy.
The building up of the protoplasm from proteids is anabolism, constructive metabolism.
The destruction of protoplasm, excess proteids or the fat and carbohydrate foods is catabolism, destructive metabolism.
Catabolism is probably due to enzyme action, but the final result is chiefly carbon dioxide and water,
which could be derived by the ordinary chemical evolution of protoplasm, proteid, sugar, starch or fats.
In the plant, starch, as has been seen, is first formed in the chlorophyll-bodies.
But the formation of starch, all important as it is, is after all only the manufacture of food
as a preliminary to the real processes of nutrition.
These processes must take place everywhere in ordinary protoplasm,
for it is here that oxidation occurs and the need for a renewal of matter and energy consequently arises.
Sooner or later the starch grains are changed into a kind of sugar (glucose), which, unlike starch, dissolves in the sap
and may thus be easily transported to all parts of the plant.
Wherever there is need for new protoplasm, whether to repair previous waste or to supply materials for growth,
after absorption into the cells the elements of the starch (or glucose) are, by the living protoplasm, in some unknown way
combined with nitrogen and sulphur (probably also with salts, water, etc.) to form proteid matter.
The particles of this newly formed compound are incorporated into the protoplasm.
If a larger quantity of starch is formed in the chlorophyll bodies than is immediately needed by the protoplasm for purposes of repair or growth,
it may be reconverted into starch after journeying as glucose through the plant
and be laid down as "reserve starch" in the cells of root or stem or elsewhere.
Apparently when this reserve supply is finally needed at any point in the plant, it is again changed to glucose and transported thither.
It is probable that new leaves and new tissues generally are always formed in part from this reserve starch.
In the plant as in the animal metabolism must consist of anabolic and catabolic processes.
The construction in the cells of new proteid from the absorbed carbohydrate and the materials from the soil is true anabolism.
It is also clear that catabolism or oxidation for the liberation of energy occurs as in animals, but this process is slower.
Probably foods containing carbon, hydrogen and oxygen are the sources of energy in the higher plants as in animals.
In both plants and animals simple waste substances result from the catabolic processes in the cells.
In the animal carbon dioxide, water and nitrogen compounds are the chief excretions.
They are absorbed by the circulating liquids and carried to the eliminating organs, lungs and kidneys chiefly, for elimination.
In the higher plants the excretions are carbon dioxide, which escapes through the epidermis of root, stem and leaf and through the stomata;
water which is lost by evaporation, especially from the leaf surface through the stomata;
excretions which are lost by osmosis through the roots and the accumulated but useless mineral substances which are eliminated by leaf fall.
In both animals and plants oxygen is essential to the catabolic part of metabolism.
Hence oxygen must be supplied to the cells.
Oxygenation is the term used to denote the oxygen-supplying part of respiration;
the other part of respiration, elimination of carbon dioxide, has been treated under excretions.
In the animal oxygen is absorbed by the blood, in excess by the hemoglobin of the red cells of the blood
and later is absorbed from the blood and lymph by all the living cells.
In the plant also oxygen is absorbed through the epidermis and stomata from the air.
This process is, however, obscured during the day because of the oxygen freed in the manufacture of starch which goes on at that time.
Probably this freed oxygen is used for the purpose of oxygenation, but more is freed in the photosynthetic process than is needed for oxygenation
and hence the excess oxygen is eliminated while starch manufacture is in process.
In comparing a higher animal and a green plant confusion must be avoided regarding the part played by oxygen and carbon dioxide in true respiration
with the part played by the same substances in starch formation (photosynthesis).
In non-green plants like the Indian pipe and mushrooms the breathing of oxygen and the excretion of carbon dioxide are as in the animal.
This is true also of green plants in darkness and even in the light of all parts of green plants except the chlorophyll-bodies.
These constitute a sort of extra mechanism, enabling green plants to make their own carbohydrate food.
Imagine a higher animal with an attachment for turning the carbon dioxide and water excreted
back to starch usable as food and the comparison of the green plant and the animal would be complete.
The Science: History of the Universe, Volume five. Edited by Francis Rolt-Wheeler.
Biology. Chapter ten. Morphology and Embryology, Part One.
The facts of biology which admit of adequate explanation only in connection with the theory of descent
are grouped by Romanes and other writers on organic evolution under the heads of morphology, embryology, classification,
In all these lines the facts are drawn together by a strong thread of unity.
There are numberless similarities and correlations and surprising uniformities.
The great variety of life as exhibited in the countless species of plants and animals has been referred to, and yet, great as this variety is,
there are, after all, only a few types of structure among all animals and plants, some three or four or eight or ten general modes of development,
and all the rest are modifications from these few types.
It is, moreover, true that all living forms are but series of modifications and extensions of one single plan of structure.
All have the same ultimate substance
the mysterious semi-fluid network of protoplasm, which is, so far as is known, the physical basis of all life;
and the equally mysterious nuclear substance or chromatin
which in some fashion presides over all the movements of the protoplasm and is the physical basis of the phenomena of heredity.
The same laws of heredity, variability and of response to outside stimulus hold in all parts of the organic world.
All organisms have the same need of reproduction.
All are forced to make concession after concession to their surroundings, and in these concessions all progress in life consists.
And at last each organism or each alliance of organisms must come to the greatest concession of all, which is called death.
The unity in life, then, is not less a fact than is life's great diversity.
Whatever emphasis is laid upon the diversity of life, the essential unity of all organisms must not be forgotten.
An examination of the facts in each of the lines of evidence makes it clear
that the only reasonable explanation for the existence of a fundamental unity in organic life
is the theory of descent -- i.e., that similarities are due to blood relationship and that differences come from adaptive modifications.
The facts adduced from morphology, being the result of researches into the structure of adult animals and plants,
lead to a preview of certain principles of adaptation, necessary for their interpretation.
First, it must be noted that some structures are not non-adaptive, that is, do not change to fit changed habits or conditions of life.
Such structures or organs are most often found internally.
For illustration: a change in the locomotive habit of a bird from that of flying to that of an ostrich
is associated with an adaptive modification of locomotor structures, legs and wings,
but not in any striking way is there change in the internal organs.
Internal organs may persist unchanged and hence they offer good guides to classification.
On the other hand, external structures are likely to undergo adaptation when habits or conditions of life change.
Hence, as Jordan has said, "the inside of an animal tells the real history of its ancestry; the outside tells us only where its ancestors have been."
In the second place, it must be noted that adaptations to similar conditions may result in superficial resemblances.
For example, there is a superficial resemblance between the wing of an insect and the wing of a bird
both adaptations to an aerial environment;
between the heart of an insect and the heart of a vertebrate animal
both adaptations for pumping blood;
between the fin of a fish and the paddle of a whale
both adaptive swimming organs, yet the resemblance in these cases does not go deeper than the surface -- it is one of function only.
All such cases of resemblance in function but not in detailed plan of structure are called "analogies,"
and mean nothing more than similarity of environment.
Turning to more fundamental resemblances, such as the wing of a bat and the wing of a bird,
careful study shows detailed internal as well as external similarities of structure. Such cases are "homologies".
On the one hand, then, are found structures which are perfectly analogous and yet in no way homologous:
totally different structures are modified to perform the same functions.
On the other hand are found structures which are perfectly homologous and yet in no way analogous:
the structural elements remain, but are profoundly modified to perform totally different functions.
Homology thus means identity of structure which is the result of identity of parentage. It is the stamp of heredity.
These principles of homology are essential to a correct interpretation of the facts of morphology.
The most striking fact of similar structure among plants and among animals is the existence of a common general plan in any group.
Since backboned animals are best known to most readers, they may be taken as an illustration.
All vertebrate animals, and none other, says Le Conte, "have an internal jointed skeleton worked by muscles on the outside.
The relation of skeleton and muscle in arthropods is exactly the reverse.
In all vertebrates, and in none other, the axis of this skeleton is a jointed backbone (vertebral column)
enclosing and protecting the nervous centers (cerebrospinal axis).
These, therefore, may well be called backboned animals.
All vertebrates, and none other, have a number of their anterior vertebral joints enlarged and consolidated into a box to form the skull,
in order to enclose and protect a similar enlargement of the nervous center,
viz., the brain; and also usually, but not always, a number of posterior joints,
enlarged and consolidated to form the pelvis, to serve as a firm support to the hind-limbs.
All vertebrates, and none other, have two cavities,
enclosed and protected by the skeleton, viz., the neural cavity above, and the visceral or body cavity below, the vertebral column.
All vertebrates, with few exceptions, and no other animals, have two and only two pair of limbs.
The exceptions are of two kinds, viz.: (a) some lowest fishes, amphioxus and lampreys,
which probably represent the vertebrate condition before limbs were acquired;
and (b) degenerate forms like snakes and some lizards, which have lost their limbs by disuse.
So much concerns the general plan of skeletal structures and is strongly suggestive of -- in fact it is inexplicable without -- common origin.
But much more remains which is not only suggestive, but demonstrative of such origin.
By extensive comparison in the taxonomic and ontogenic series, the whole vertebrate structure in all its details in different animals
may be shown to be modifications one of another.
Sometimes a piece is enlarged, sometimes diminished, or even becomes obsolete; sometimes several pieces are consolidated into one;
but, in spite of all these obscurations, corresponding parts usually may be made out.
These remarkable similarities in the common general plan alone are convincing evidences of descent,
but attention may be called to a like similarity extending to the details of structure.
For example: the wings of a bat (a mammal), a bird and a fossil flying reptile all show the same bones adaptively modified;
a series of either fore or hind limbs of a mammal with one toe (horse),
two toes (sheep), four toes (hog) and five toes (dog)
exhibit a remarkable series of homologies pointing to a five-toed ancestor,
and any other series of organs of vertebrates would give the same evidence of fundamental resemblances (homologies).
For such a series of facts the reader must be referred to special books like Wiedersheim's "Comparative Anatomy of the Vertebrates,"
Romanes's "Darwin and After Darwin", and Le Conte's "Evolution."
The existence of great similarities in vertebrate structure is not always fully recognized.
To the superficial observer the bodies of animals of different classes seem to differ fundamentally in plan,
to be entirely different machines, made each for its own purposes, at once, out of hand.
Extensive comparison, on the contrary, shows them to be the same, although the essential identity is obscured by adaptive modifications.
The simplest, in fact the only scientific, explanation of the phenomena of vertebrate structure is the idea of a primal vertebrate,
modified more and more through successive generations by the necessities of different modes of life.
See, then, the difference between man's mode of working and Nature's.
A man having made a steam-engine, and desiring to use it for a different purpose from that for which it was first designed and used,
will nearly always be compelled to add new parts not contemplated in the original machine.
Nature rarely makes new parts -- never, if she can avoid it -- but, on the contrary, adapts an old part to the new function.
It is as if Nature were not free to use any and every device to accomplish her end, but were conditioned by her own plans of structure;
as, indeed, she must be according to the derivation theory.
Thus, in the fin of a fish, the fore-paw of a reptile or a mammal, the wing of a bird, and the arm and hand of a man
is found the same part, variously modified for many purposes.
Another striking class of the facts of morphology which admit of scientific explanation only along the line of homology
are the thousands of cases of rudimentary or vestigial structures to be found.
Throughout both the animal and vegetable kingdoms dwarfed and useless representatives of organs are constantly met with,
which in other and allied kinds of animals and plants are of large size and functional utility.
Thus, for instance, the unborn whale has rudimentary teeth,
which are never destined to cut the gums; and throughout its life this animal retains, in a similarly rudimentary condition,
a number of organs which never could have been of use to any kind of creature save a terrestrial quadruped.
Other well-known examples among vertebrates are: Vestiges of hind limbs in certain snakes, reduced wings in the Apteryx and ostriches,
rudiments of eyes in cave fishes, hind limbs beneath the skin of whales, the vermiform appendix in man,
as well as useless muscles to move the ears and the skin, and also a very much reduced hairy covering over the surface of the body.
Wiedersheim has recorded more than one hundred and eighty such structural reminiscences in man.
Now, rudimentary organs of this kind are of such frequent occurrence, that almost every species of organism presents one or more of them
usually, indeed, a considerable number.
How, then, are they to be accounted for?
Of course the theory of descent with adaptive modification has a simple answer to supply
Namely that when from changed conditions of life, an organ which was previously useful becomes useless,
it will be suffered to dwindle away in successive generations, under the influence of certain natural causes.
On the other hand, the theory of special creation can only maintain that these rudiments are formed for the sake of adhering to an ideal type.
Now, here again the former theory appears to be triumphant over the latter, says Romanes,
surely if such a method were adopted in so many cases, we should expect that in consistency it would be adopted in all cases.
This reasonable expectation, however, is far from being realized.
In numberless cases, such as that of the fore-limbs of serpents, no vestige of a rudiment is present.
But the vacillating policy in the matter of rudiments does not end here; for it is shown in a still more aggravated form
where within the limits of the same natural group of organisms a rudiment is sometimes present and sometimes absent.
For instance, although in nearly all the numerous species of snakes there are no vestiges of limbs,
in the Python we find very tiny rudiments of the hindlimbs. Now,
is it a worthy conception of Deity that,
while neglecting to maintain his unity of ideal in the case of nearly all the numerous species of snakes, he should have added a tiny rudiment in the case of the Python
and even in that case should have maintained his ideal very inefficiently, inasmuch as only two limbs, instead of four, are represented?
Convincing as are the evidences of descent recorded in the structure of plants and animals,
these evidences have been in the past thirty years somewhat overshadowed by the far more surprising evidences
of descent discovered in the development of plant and animal embryos.
A dozen volumes would be necessary
to present the mass of embryological evidence, but a few salient facts will illustrate the kind of evidence to be deduced from embryology.
Most remarkable of all the principles which have been discovered by embryologists is the "Recapitulation Doctrine"
which, briefly stated, is that individual development (ontogeny) recapitulates ancestral history (phylogeny).
Illustrations quoted from the works of Romanes and Le Conte will make this principle clear.
It is an observable fact, says Romanes,
that there is often a close correspondence between developmental changes as revealed by any chronological series of fossils which may happen to have been preserved,
and developmental changes which may be observed during the life history of now existing individuals belonging to the same group of animals.
is closely reproduced in the life-history of existing deer. Or, in other words,
the antlers of an existing deer furnish in their development a kind of "resume," or recapitulation, of the successive phases
whereby the primitive horn was gradually superseded by horns presenting a greater and greater number of prongs in successive species of extinct deer.
Now, it must be obvious
that such a recapitulation in the life history of an existing animal of developmental changes successively distinctive of sundry allied,
though now extinct species, speaks strongly in favor of evolution.
For as it is of the essence of this theory that new forms arise from older forms by way of hereditary descent,
we should antecedently expect, if the theory is true,
that the phases of development presented by the individual organism would follow, in their main outlines, those phases of development
through which their long line of ancestors had passed.
The only alternative view is that as species of deer,
for instance, were separately created, additional prongs were successively added to their antlers; and yet that,
in order to be so added to successive species, every individual deer belonging to later species was required to repeat in his own lifetime
the process of successive additions which had previously taken place in a remote series of extinct species.
Now I do not deny that this view is a possible view; but I do deny that it is a probable one.
According to the evolutionary interpretation of such facts, we can see a very good reason why the life-history of the individual
is thus a condensed resume of the life history of its ancestral species.
But according to the opposite view no reason can be assigned why such should be the case.
It is well known, likewise comments Le Conte,
that the embryo or larva of a frog or toad, when first hatched, is a legless, tail-swimming, water-breathing, gill-breathing animal.
It is essentially a fish, and would be so classed if it remained in this condition.
The fish retains permanently this form, but the frog passes on.
Next, it forms first one pair and then another pair of legs; and meanwhile it begins to breathe also by lungs.
At this stage it breathes equally by lungs and by gills -- i.e., both air and water.
Now, the lower forms of amphibians, such as siredon, menobranchus, siren, etc.,
retain permanently this form, and are therefore called "perennibranchs," but the frog still passes on.
Then the gills gradually dry up, as the lungs develop, and they now breathe wholly by lungs, but still retain the tail.
Now this is the permanent, mature condition of many amphibians,
such as the triton, the salamander, etc., which are therefore called "caducibranchs," but the frog still passes on.
Finally, it loses the tail, or rather its tail is absorbed and its material used in further development, and it becomes a perfect frog,
the highest order (anoura) of this class. Thus, then, in ontogeny the fish goes no further than the fish stages.
The perennibranch passes through the fish stage to the perennibranch amphibian.
The caducibranch takes first the fish form, then the perennibranch form, and finally the caducibranch form, but goes no further.
Last, the anoura takes first the fish-form, then that of the perennibranch, then that of the caducibranch, and finally becomes anoura.
Now, this is undoubtedly the order of succession of forms in geological times -- i.e., in the phylogenic series.
Fishes first appeared in the Devonian and Upper Silurian in very reptilian or rather amphibian forms.
Then in the Carboniferous, fishes still continuing, there appeared the lowest -- i.e., most fish-like forms of amphibians.
These were undoubtedly perennibranchs. In the Permian and Triassic higher forms appeared, which were certainly caducibranch.
Finally, only in the Tertiary, so far as we yet know, do the highest form (anoura) appear.
The general similarity of the three series is complete.
The Seven Wonders of the Ancient World. By Edgar J. Banks. Chapter two. The Walls of Babylon.
In the old city of Damascus you climb to the hump of a tall fleet dromedary.
With guides and guards about you, you ride through the covered bazaars crowded with dark-faced Arabs in strange costumes,
and along the narrow winding lane which was once called the "Street Called Straight."
Leaving the city by the eastern gate, and passing a small village or two,
you ascend the hill to the plateau, and before you, as far as the eye can reach, stretches the great Arabian Desert.
With mingling fear and wonder at the mystery always lying beyond the desert horizon,
you tap gently with your heel upon the shoulder of the dromedary to urge her on.
At first, paying little heed to you, she hesitates and glances anxiously about the desert as if in search of an enemy.
Now and then she reaches down to graze the thorny argool along the way.
As the taps upon her shoulder are repeated, she stretches out her long neck, and with long strides makes for the eastern horizon;
she realizes that she is bound on the long journey across the desert. Hour after hour she bears you over the hard monotonous plain.
The Damascus mosques and their minarets sink beneath the western sky.
The desert about you shows no signs of life;
only a tall column of whirling sand, rearing its head until it is lost in the blue above, moves majestically along.
In the distance your eyes detect a beautiful lake with shores fringed with trees,
but soon the phantom lake vanishes, while others, still farther beyond, appear and vanish in rapid succession.
Like a great ball of fire the sun sinks in the west.
The stars come out one by one and shine brighter than elsewhere as if to light you on your way.
Late at night the weary dromedary kneels, and on the ground, close beside her, you lie down to sleep.
Again, long before the stars have been scattered by the morning sun, you are on your way.
Day after day you travel on, scorched by the heat of noon-day, shivering in the chill winds of the night.
Two weeks pass, and at last you stand on the eastern edge of the plateau
gazing down upon the great Euphrates winding along the valley beneath.
You have crossed the Arabian Desert, the first stage of the long journey to the walls of Babylon.
Here in the valley the water is sweet and the food abundant.
For ten days you follow down the river, through little villages and black tent encampments, among scenes of strange Arab life which never lose their charm.
Everywhere the valley is dotted with the mounds of buried cities carefully guarding the secrets of the centuries of long ago.
At last you see before you a mound rising like a mountain from the level plain.
Your journey is at an end. Before you is Babylon, the "Gate of God," as the old name means.
About you is all that remains of the second of the Seven Wonders of the World.
Babylon, even in the days of Nebuchadnezzar, was an old, old city.
There is a Hebrew tradition that it was the oldest of all cities, but now we know that great empires flourished and passed away before Babylon was built.
Old King Sargon I., who may have lived as early as three thousand eight hundred B.C.,
seems to have been the first to mention Babylon, and one of his inscriptions seems to say that he built the city and gave it its name.
But in those very early days Babylon was little more than a shrine, surrounded with mud huts and date palms.
It was about twenty-two fifty B.C., when the great Hammurabi made it his capital, that it became the chief city of Babylonia.
Its history for the next fifteen hundred years or more is obscure.
We know the names of its kings, and the records speak of long wars with the Assyrians.
In the year six eighty-nine B.C., Sinacherib, King of Nineveh, captured Babylon,
tore down its palaces and temples and walls, and scraped even the foundations of the city into the river.
The place where the old city had stood for three thousand years again became a desert.
Esarhaddon, the son of Sinacherib, was the next King of Nineveh.
He rebuilt Babylon that in accordance with the ancient custom he might be crowned in the sacred city.
When Esarhaddon died, one of his sons, Samas-sum-yukin, was made King of Babylon.
Another son, Assurbanipal, or the great Sardanapalus of the Greeks, became the King of Nineveh.
War broke out between the two brothers, and again Babylon was captured.
In six twenty-six Assurbanipal died,
and in that same year Nabopolassar, the father of the great Nebuchadnezzar, became the King of Babylon.
The building of the Babylon so famous in history began with Nabopolassar.
He enlarged the old city, erected temples, and began the construction of its walls.
In six oh six, Nineveh, the old enemy of Babylon, fell, never to rise again.
The next year, in six oh five, Nabopolassar died, and Nebuchadnezzar succeeded him to the throne.
He continued the building operations of his father, until Babylon became the greatest city of its age,
and surrounded it with walls the like of which no other city has ever seen.
Nebuchadnezzar, or Nebuchadrezzar, as his name should be spelled, was the greatest character in Babylonian history,
but about his name so many legends have grown that it is sometimes difficult to learn the facts of his life.
Early he married Amuhia, a daughter of the Medean king.
His military career began while he was still the crown prince, and his father was on the throne.
at the head of the Babylonian army, he defeated the Egyptians in the famous battle of Carchemish, the old Hittite capital,
and drove them from Asia.
Then Syria and Palestine were added to his future empire.
In five ninety-seven, when he sent his army to Jerusalem, he won the hatred of the Jews by taking Jehoiakin, the King, captive.
Eleven years later, in five eighty-six, he destroyed the sacred Hebrew city,
transported the Jews to Babylon, and brought the Hebrew kingdom to an end.
Centuries afterward, even to this day, Jewish mothers teach their children to hate his name.
They tell how he forced the exiles to carry heavy bags of sand across the desert to increase their burdens;
how he cast Hebrew lads into a fiery furnace and into the lions' den,
and how, in punishment for all his wickedness, he became a calf, and for seven years grazed the grass in the fields about the city.
Late in his life, in five sixty-seven, he invaded Egypt.
During all his reign there was little peace in his great mixed turbulent empire.
The walls of the palaces of many of the Assyrian kings were lined with great stone slabs engraved with reliefs and sometimes with the portrait of a king.
But in Babylonia stone was difficult to obtain, and sculptures were very rare.
Therefore it was useless to hope that Nebuchadnezzar's portrait would be found on his palace walls.
However, several decades ago, an Oriental appeared at the Berlin Museum,
offering for sale a small cameo engraved with a helmeted head of a Greek type.
About the head was an inscription in Greek characters saying that the face was that of Nebuchadnezzar.
The museum authorities believed that the cameo was one of the many spurious objects which the Eastern forgers were constantly sending to Europe,
yet they took an impression of it, and returned it to its owner.
Years later, when the archaeologists could readily distinguish the false from the true,
it was recognized that the cameo was genuine, and that it bore the likeness of the great King.
Unfortunately, the little stone seal, perhaps the only one to preserve for us his features, appears to have been lost for ever.
Its impression shows the face of a beardless young man, intelligent and refined.
The eyes are suggestive of the Semitic; the nose is of the Greek type;
the lips are thin, the chin prominent; the neck is that of a strong vigorous man.
Such was the appearance of the builder of the walls of Babylon.
Religion and cruelty frequently go hand in hand, and Nebuchadnezzar was exceedingly religious.
Though a great warrior, it was not for his military deeds that he was best known.
He was fond of restoring the ruined temples of the old Babylonian cities,
and most of the records which have come from his time speak chiefly of his deeds of piety.
Read the introduction to any of his inscriptions, of which the following is one, and you will call him vain and proud,
but his scribe wrote it in the manner customary for the scribes of those days to write of their royal masters.
Nebuchadnezzar, King of Babylon, the exalted prince, the favorite of Marduk, the lofty patesi,
the beloved of Nabu, the arbiter, the possessor of wisdom, who seeks out the path of their divinity,
who reverences their lordship; the untiring governor, who ponders daily concerning the maintenance of Esagil and Ezida,
and is continually anxious for the shrines of Babylon and Borsippa;
the wise, the pious, the maintainer of Esagil and Ezida,
the first-born son of Nabopolassar, King of Babylon, am I.
However cruel and religiously intolerant Nebuchadnezzar may have been, he was undoubtedly the greatest builder the world has ever seen.
There is scarcely one of the thousands of ruin mounds in Babylonia which does not contain bricks bearing his name.
There is scarcely a royal record from his reign which is not chiefly occupied with descriptions of his building operations.
He rebuilt scores of the ancient temples, surrounded many cities with walls,
lined the shores of the rivers with embankments, and spanned the rivers with bridges.
Tradition says that to please his foreign wife from the mountainous country he built the famous hanging gardens, but that may be only a tradition.
His palace in Babylon was one of the world's largest buildings, but the walls with which he protected his palace and city were the wonder of the whole world.
The ancients never tired of describing them.
Fortunately in several of his long inscriptions, recently discovered in the Babylonian mounds, Nebuchadnezzar speaks of the building of the walls.
In one of them he says:
I completed Imgur-Bel and Nimitti-Bel, the great walls of Babylon, the mighty city, the city of his exalted power.
At the entrance of the great gates I erected strong bulls of bronze, and terrible serpents standing upright.
My father did that which no previous king had done.
With mortar and bricks he built two moat-walls about the city,
and I, with mortar and bricks, built a third great moat-wall, and joined it and united it closely with the moat-walls of my father.
I laid its foundation deep to the water level;
I raised its summit mountain high. I constructed a moat-wall of burned bricks about the west wall of Babylon.
My father built the moat-wall of the Arachtu canal securely with mortar and bricks.
He built well the quays along the opposite shore of the Euphrates, but he did not finish all his work,
but I, his first-born, the beloved of his heart,
built the moat-walls of Arachtu with mortar and bricks, and, joining them together with those of my father, made them very solid.
A thing which no king before had ever done:
To the west of Babylon, at a greater distance from the outer wall, I constructed an enclosing wall four thousand cubits in length about the city.
I dug its moat to the water level.
I walled up its side with mortar and burned bricks, and I united it securely with the moat-walls of my father.
Along its edge I built a great wall of mortar and burned bricks mountain high.
Berossus, a priest of the temple of Bel at Babylon, writing about two fifty B.C.,
was living in the city while the walls were still standing, though in a ruinous condition.
His brief description of them should not be omitted. He says that Nebuchadnezzar
built three walls round about the inner city, and three others about that which was the outer; and this he did with burnt brick.
And after he had walled the city, and adorned its gates, he built another palace before his father's palace; but so that they joined to it:
to describe whose vast height and immense riches it would perhaps be too much for me to attempt.
Yet as large and lofty as they were, they were completed in fifteen days.
He also erected elevated places for walking, of stone; and made it resemble mountains: and built it so that it might be planted with all sorts of trees.
He also erected what is called a pensile paradise:
Of all the ancient descriptions of the famous walls and the city they protected, that of Herodotus is the fullest.
Perhaps Herodotus had never been in Babylon;
perhaps the tales that travelers told him were exaggerated as travelers' tales are likely to be,
yet he at least tried to be accurate. He says:
The city stands on a broad plain, and is an exact square, a hundred and twenty furlongs in length each way,
so that the entire circuit is four hundred and eighty furlongs.
While such is its size, in magnificence there is no other city that approaches to it.
It is surrounded, in the first place, by a broad and deep moat, full of water, behind which rises a wall
fifty royal cubits in width, and two hundred in height.
And here I may not omit to tell the use to which the mould dug out of the great moat was turned, nor the manner wherein the wall was wrought.
As fast as they dug the moat, the soil which they got from the cutting was made into bricks,
and when a sufficient number were completed they baked the bricks in kilns.
Then they set to building, and began by bricking the borders of the moat, after which they proceeded to construct the wall itself,
using throughout for their cement hot bitumen, and interposing a layer of wattled reeds at every thirtieth course of the bricks.
On the top, along the edges of the wall, they constructed buildings of a single chamber facing one another,
leaving between them room for a four-horse chariot to turn.
In the circuit of the wall are a hundred gates, all of brass, with brazen lintels and sideposts.
The bitumen used in the work was brought to Babylon from Is, a small stream which flows into the Euphrates
at the point where the city of the same name stands, eight days' journey from Babylon.
Lumps of bitumen are found in great abundance in this river.
The city is divided into two portions by the river which runs through the midst of it.
This river is the Euphrates, a broad, deep, swift stream, which rises in Armenia, and empties itself into the Erythraean Sea.
The city wall is brought down on both sides to the edge of the stream,
thence from the corners of the wall there is carried along each bank of the river a fence of burned bricks.
The houses are mostly three and four stories high;
the streets all run in straight lines, not only those parallel to the river, but also the cross streets which lead down to the waterside.
At the river end of these cross streets are low gates in the fence that skirts the stream,
which are, like the great gates in the outer wall, of brass, and open on the water.
The outer wall is the main defense of the city.
There is, however, a second inner wall, of less thickness than the first, but very little inferior to it in strength.
The center of each division of the town is occupied by a fortress.
In the one stood the palace of the kings, surrounded by a wall of great strength and size;
in the other was the sacred precinct of Jupiter Belus,
a square enclosure two furlongs each way, with gates of solid brass; which was also remaining in my time.
In the middle of the precinct there was a tower of solid masonry, a furlong in length and breadth,
upon which was raised a second tower, and on that a third, and so on up to eight.
The ascent to the top is on the outside, by a path which winds round all the towers.
When one is about halfway up, one finds a resting place and seats, where persons are wont to sit sometimes on their way to the summit.
Other ancient descriptions of the walls have been left us by Ctesias of the fifth century B.C., and by Strabo of the beginning of the Christian era,
but they add little to our knowledge.
Should we compare these ancient descriptions of the walls, we should find them hopelessly conflicting.
However, they teach us that in those early days when most cities were surrounded by enormous walls,
the walls of Babylon were so long and wide and high that all who saw them were amazed.
It is only from their ruins that we may hope to obtain accurate information of the strongest fortifications in the ancient world.
In the year five sixty-two, after a long reign of forty-three years, Nebuchadnezzar died.
He was followed by three kings whose reigns were short,
and in five fifty-five Nabonidus, the father of the Biblical Belshazzar, came to the throne.
Cyrus, the King of Persia, was rising to power, and after he had defeated the Medes
he extended his empire to the Mediterranean and even to Egypt.
Perhaps Babylon was so strongly fortified that at first he made no attempt to add it to his empire,
but when Nabonidus joined with the King of Egypt and with the wealthy Croesus of Lydia in an alliance against him,
Cyrus decided that Babylon must be taken.
In five thirty-eight the city fell, and for a time it became the home of the Persian King.
The fall of Babylon with its lofty walls was a most important event in the history of the ancient world.
A great empire which had existed for more than three thousand years was brought to an end.
The old enemies of Babylon rejoiced.
When the news came to the Hebrews, who were held there in exile, they excitedly rushed about the streets, crying: "Babylon is fallen,"
and to them came hope of returning to Jerusalem.
But how did the "mighty city" fall? How could Cyrus take Babylon whose walls were strong enough to resist any army?
It is a long story. Poets have sung it. Historians have written it. Prophets have preached it. Legends have gathered about it.
Every child knows the story of "the writing of the hand on the wall." It was the night that Babylon fell.
Belshazzar, the King, he was really the King's son, gave a feast to a thousand of his nobles.
In the great banquet hall of the palace, when the guests were drinking from the golden cups, and the revelry was at its highest,
there suddenly appeared upon the wall an armless hand.
High up, where all might see it, the armless hand wrote the King's fate.
Thou art weighed in the balances and art found wanting.
In that night, so the story ends, "Belshazzar, the Chaldean King, was slain."
Less picturesque than this Hebrew legend is the royal record of Babylon, which fortunately was inscribed upon a clay cylinder from the ruins of the city.
It refers to the death of the King's son, possibly to Belshazzar of the Bible story.
In the month Tammuz, when Cyrus fought the troops of Akkad (Babylonia) at Opis on the river Salsallat,
he subdued the people, and wherever they collected, he slew them.
On the fourteenth day Sippar was taken without a battle.
On the sixteenth day the troops of Cyrus entered Babylon without a battle.
Nabonidus was taken prisoner in Babylon. On the third of Marchesvan Cyrus entered Babylon and proclaimed peace to all the city.
He appointed Gobrias governor of Babylon.
On the night of the eleventh day Gobrias killed the son of the King.
Nor does the royal record of Babylon contain the only contemporary account of the fall of the city,
for upon a barrel-shaped cylinder of clay bearing a long inscription we have Cyrus's account of his capture of Babylon. Extracts from it are as follows:
Marduk, the great lord, looking with joy on his pious works and upright heart,
commanded him (Cyrus) to go forth to his city Babylon, and he went by his side as a friend and companion.
His many troops, whose number, like the waters of the river, could not be counted, marched in full armor at his side,
Without a skirmish or a battle, he permitted them to enter Babylon, and, sparing the city, he delivered the King Nabonidus to him.
All the people of Babylon prostrated themselves before him, and, kissing his feet, rejoiced in his sovereignty, while happiness shone on their faces.
The inscription continues: I am Cyrus, king of the world.
When I made my gracious entry into Babylon, with exceeding joy I took up my abode in the royal palace.
My many troops marched peacefully into Babylon.
I gave heed to the needs of Babylon and its cities, and the servitude of the Babylonians, whatever was oppressive, I removed from them.
I quieted their sighings and soothed their sorrows.
A much longer account of the capture of Babylon by Cyrus appears in the writings of Herodotus.
Though Herodotus wrote nearly a hundred years after Babylon fell, his story seems to bear the stamp of truth.
He certainly mentions details which neither Nabonidus nor Cyrus would care to have appear in their royal records. His story is as follows:
Cyrus, with the first approach of the ensuing spring, marched forward against Babylon.
The Babylonians, encamped without their walls, awaited his coming.
A battle was fought at a short distance from the city, in which the Babylonians were defeated by the Persian King,
whereupon they withdrew within their defenses.
Here they shut themselves up and made light of his siege, having laid in a store of provision for many years in preparation against this attack;
for when they saw Cyrus conquering nation after nation, they were convinced that he would never stop, and their turn would come at last.
Cyrus was now reduced to great perplexity, as time went on and he made no progress against the place.
In this distress either someone made this suggestion to him, or he bethought himself of a plan which he proceeded to put in execution.
He placed a portion of his army at the point where the river enters the city, and another body at the back of the place where it issues forth,
with orders to march into the town by the bed of the stream, as soon as the water became shallow enough:
he then himself drew off with the unwarlike portion of his host, and made for the place where Nitocris dug the basin for the river,
where he did exactly what she had done formerly: he turned the Euphrates by a canal into the basin, which was then a marsh,
on which the river sank to such an extent that the natural bed of the stream became fordable.
Hereupon the Persians who had been left for the purpose at Babylon by the river side
entered the stream, which had now sunk so as to reach about midway up a man's thigh, and thus got into the town.
Had the Babylonians been apprised of what Cyrus was about, or had they noticed their danger, they would never have allowed the Persians to enter the city,
but would have destroyed them utterly; for they would have made fast all the street gates which gave upon the river,
and mounting upon the walls along both sides of the stream, would so have caught the enemy as it were in a trap.
But, as it was, the Persians came upon them by surprise and so took the city.
Owing to the vast size of the place, the inhabitants of the central parts (as the residents of Babylon declare),
long after the outer portions of the town were taken, knew nothing of what had chanced, but as they were engaged in a festival,
continued dancing and reveling until they learned the capture but too certainly.
Such, then, were the circumstances of the first taking of Babylon.
When Cyrus took Babylon, little or no force was employed.
Only the King's son, Belshazzar, was killed.
The city was spared; the great walls were left standing; the daily sacrifices were continued in the temples, and Cyrus made his home in the royal palace.
The people, enjoying the greater freedom which Cyrus permitted them, were contented, and life in Babylon went on about as before.
In five twenty-nine Cyrus died.
During the reigns of the two following Persian kings Babylon was slowly regaining its independence,
and in five twenty-one Nebuchadnezzar the third, a native Babylonian, was placed on the throne.
Then the Babylonians secretly plotted to throw off the Persian yoke.
That same year, when Darius Hystaspes came to the Persian throne, the Babylonians openly rebelled.
The following story from Herodotus tells the results:
At last when the time came for rebelling openly they did as follows:
having first set apart their mothers, each man chose besides out of his whole household one woman whomsoever he pleased;
these alone were allowed to live, while all the rest were brought to one place and strangled.
The women chosen were kept to make bread for the men; while the others were strangled that they might not consume the stores.
When tidings reached Darius of what had happened,
he drew together all his power and began the war by marching straight upon Babylon and laying siege to the place.
The Babylonians, however, cared not a whit for his siege.
Mounting upon the battlements that crowned their walls, they insulted and jeered at Darius and his mighty host.
One even shouted to them and said, "Why sit ye there, Persians? Why do ye not go back to your homes? Till mules foal ye will not take our city!"
This was said by a Babylonian who thought that a mule would never foal.
Now when a year and seven months had passed, Darius and his army were quite wearied out, finding that they could not anyhow take the city.
All stratagems and all arts had been used, and yet the King could not prevail
not even when he tried the means by which Cyrus had made himself master of the place.
The Babylonians were ever upon the watch, and he found no way of conquering them.
At last, in the twentieth month,
a marvelous thing happened to Zopyrus, son of the Megabyzus who was among the seven men that overthrew the Magus.
One of his sumpter-mules gave birth to a foal.
Zopyrus, when they told him, not thinking that it could be true, went and saw the colt with his own eyes;
after which he commanded his servants to tell no one what had come to pass, while he himself pondered the matter.
Calling to mind then the words of the Babylonian at the beginning of the siege:
Till mules foal ye shall not take our city, he thought, as he reflected on this speech, that Babylon might now be taken,
for it seemed to him that there was a divine providence in the man having used the phrase, and then his mule having foaled.
As soon therefore as he felt within himself that Babylon was fated to be taken, he went to Darius and asked him if he set a very high value on its conquest.
When he found that Darius did indeed value it highly, he considered further with himself how he might make the deed his own, and be the man to take Babylon.
Noble exploits in Persia are ever highly honored and bring their authors to greatness.
He therefore reviewed all ways of bringing the city under,
but found none by which he could hope to prevail, unless he maimed himself and then went over to the enemy.
To do this seeming to him a light matter, he mutilated himself in a way that was utterly without remedy.
For he cut off his own nose and ears, and then, clipping his hair close and flogging himself with a scourge,
he came in this plight before Darius.
Wrath stirred within the King at the sight of a man of his lofty rank in such a condition;
leaping down from his throne he exclaimed aloud and asked Zopyrus who it was that had disfigured him, and what he had done to be so treated.
Zopyrus answered, "There is not a man in the world, but thou, O King, that could reduce me to such a plight
no stranger's hands have wrought this work on me, but my own only.
I maimed myself because I could not endure that the Assyrians should laugh at the Persians. "Wretched man," said Darius,
thou coverest the foulest deeds with the fairest possible name, when thou sayest thy maiming is to help our siege forward.
How will thy disfigurement, thou simpleton, induce the enemy to yield one day sooner?
Surely thou hadst gone out of thy mind when thou didst so misuse thyself.
Had I told thee, rejoined the other, "what I was bent on doing, thou wouldst not have suffered it;
as it is, I kept my own counsel, and so accomplished my plans.
Now, therefore, if there be no failure on thy part, we shall take Babylon.
I will desert to the enemy as I am, and when I get into their city I will tell them that it is by thee that I have been thus treated.
I think they will believe my words and entrust me with a command of troops. Thou, on thy part, must wait
till the tenth day after I am entered within the town, and then place near to the gates of Semiramis a detachment of thy army,
troops for whose loss thou wilt care little, a thousand men.
Wait, after that, seven days, and post me another detachment, two thousand strong, at the Nineveh gates;
then let twenty days pass, and at the end of that time station near the Chaldasan gates a body of four thousand.
Let neither these nor the former troops be armed with any weapons but their swords those thou mayest leave them.
After the twenty days are over, bid thy whole army attack the city on every side, and put me two bodies of Persians,
one at the Belian, the other at the Cissian gates; for I expect that, on account of my successes,
the Babylonians will entrust everything, even the keys of their gates, to me. Then it will be for me and my Persians to do the rest.
Having left these instructions, Zopyrus fled towards the gates of the town, often looking back, to give himself the air of a deserter.
The men upon the towers, whose business it was to keep a lookout,
observing him, hastened down, and setting one of the gates slightly ajar, questioned him who he was, and on what errand he had come.
He replied that he was Zopyrus, and deserted to them from the Persians.
Then the doorkeepers, when they heard this, carried him at once before the Magistrates.
Introduced into their assembly, he began to bewail his misfortunes, telling them that
Darius had maltreated him in the way they could see, only because he had given advice that the siege should be raised, since there seemed no hope of taking the city.
And now, he went on to say, "my coming to you, Babylonians,
will prove the greatest gain that you could possibly receive, while to Darius and the Persians it will be the severest loss.
Verily he by whom I have been so mutilated shall not escape unpunished. And truly all the paths of his counsels are known to me.
The Babylonians, seeing a Persian of such exalted rank in so grievous a plight, his nose and ears cut off,
his body red with marks of scourging and with blood, had no suspicion but that he spoke the truth, and was really come to be their friend and helper.
They were ready, therefore, to grant him anything he asked;
and on his suing for a command, they entrusted to him a body of troops with the help of which he proceeded to do as he had arranged with Darius.
On the tenth day after his flight he led out his detachment, and surrounding the thousand men,
whom Darius according to agreement had sent first, he fell upon them and slew them all.
Then the Babylonians, seeing that his deeds were as brave as his words, were beyond measure pleased, and set no bounds to their trust.
and when the next period agreed on had elapsed, again with a band of picked men he sallied forth, and slaughtered the two thousand.
After this second exploit, his praise was in all mouths.
Once more, however, he waited till the interval appointed had gone by, and then leading the troops to the place where the four thousand were,
he put them also to the sword.
This last victory gave him the finishing stroke to his power and made him all in all with the Babylonians:
accordingly they committed to him the command of their whole army, and put the keys of their city into his hands.
Darius now, still keeping to the plan agreed upon,
attacked the walls on every side, whereupon Zopyrus played out the remainder of his stratagem.
While the Babylonians, crowding to the walls, did their best to resist the Persian assault,
he threw open the Cissian and Belian gates, and admitted the enemy.
Such of the Babylonians as witnessed the treachery took refuge in the temple of Jupiter Belus;
the rest who did not see it kept at their posts, till at last they too learned that they were betrayed.
Thus was Babylon taken for the second time.
Darius having become master of the place, destroyed the wall, and tore down all the gates;
for Cyrus had done neither the one nor the other when he took Babylon.
He then chose out near three thousand of the leading citizens and caused them to be crucified, while he allowed the remainder still to inhabit the city.
Further, wishing to prevent the race of the Babylonians from becoming extinct,
he provided wives for them in the room of those whom (as I explained before) they strangled to save their stores.
These he levied from the nations bordering on Babylonia,
who were each required to send so large a number to Babylon, that in all there were collected no fewer than fifty thousand.
It is from these women that the Babylonians of our times are sprung.
As for Zopyrus he was considered by Darius to have surpassed, in the greatness of his achievements, all other Persians,
whether of former or of later times, except only Cyrus with whom no person ever yet thought himself worthy to compare.
Darius, as the story goes, would often say that "he had rather Zopyrus were unmaimed, than be master of twenty more Babylons."
And he honored Zopyrus greatly; year by year he presented him with all the gifts which are held in most esteem among the Persians;
he gave him likewise the government of Babylon for his life, free from tribute, and he also granted him many other favors.
How much truth there may be in this interesting tale of Herodotus, we may never know,
yet we may be sure that Babylon was taken by Darius only by use of stratagem. Its walls were impregnable.
Cyrus had permitted them to stand, and as long as he made Babylon his home, the city was as strongly protected as ever.
Darius, who besieged the rebellious city twice, weakened it by destroying some of its walls.
During the reign of Xerxes again the city rebelled, and in four eighty-four B.C. he captured it, and completely demolished its defenses.
Yet Babylon continued to live,
for history mentions the names of two of its later rulers. The palace of Nebuchadnezzar was occupied by Alexander the Great,
and there on June thirteen, three twenty-three B.C., he met his death.
The city then fell to Seleucus,
one of Alexander's generals, who for a time made it his home, but he was a Greek and cared little for things Babylonian.
Therefore, to destroy the power of the old capital, he planned to build Seleucia on the Tigris about fifty miles to the east.
The priests of the temple of Bel, so a story tells us,
learned of his purpose, and when they were consulted as to the most favorable time for beginning the work upon the new city,
they intentionally mentioned a most unfavorable hour.
The priests' deception was unavailing, and in two seventy-five B.C., the inhabitants of Babylon were transported to Seleucia.
Then the world metropolis, stripped of most of its population, became a mere village.
The poor of the surrounding country occupied its dismantled palaces.
The Hebrew exiles, whose ancestors Nebuchadnezzar had brought from Jerusalem,
settled there, and finally the place was abandoned to the Arabs of the desert.
Slowly the few remaining walls fell, and were buried in their own ruins.
As the centuries passed the mounds into which the city had turned grew higher and higher with the ruins of the huts later built upon them,
until at last the foundations of the temples and palaces were buried fully a hundred feet beneath the surface.
Even the shepherds ceased to graze their sheep there, and the wandering Arabs,
fearing the wild beasts and evil spirits which lurk among all old ruins, refused to pitch their tents there.
The prophecy of the Hebrew Isaiah was fulfilled:
Wild beasts of the desert shall lie there;
and their houses shall be full of doleful creatures, and owls shall dwell there, and satyrs shall dance there,
and the wild beasts of the islands shall cry in their desolate houses, and dragons in their pleasant palaces.
So Babylon was buried and forgotten.
It had become, as Dio Cassius said, "Mounds and legends and ruins."
But the walls of the old city had not yet served their full purpose.
The Sassanian kings of Persia were fond of hunting, and Babylon, then overgrown with trees, was their game preserve.
The old walls were restored to a height sufficient to prevent the escape of the animals, and among the ruins the kings enjoyed their favorite sport.
I was informed by a certain Elamite brother, who came from those regions, and now leads the life of a monk at Jerusalem,
that there is a royal hunting ground at Babylon, and that wild game of every kind is contained within the circuit of its walls.
The statement of St. Jerome is confirmed by the following passage from Zosimus, a Greek writer of the fifth century A.D.:
As the Emperor Julian was marching forward through Babylonia,
he passed other unimportant fortresses, and came at last to a walled enclosure, which the natives pointed out as a royal hunting ground.
It was a low rampart, enclosing a wide space planted with trees of every sort, in which all kinds of beasts were shut up;
they were supplied with food by keepers, and gave the king the opportunity of hunting whenever he felt inclined.
When Julian saw this, he caused a large part of the wall to be overthrown, and as the beasts escaped they were shot down by his soldiers.
The walls of Babylon were destined to serve still another purpose.
The spread of Mohammedanism caused new cities to be built, and Babylon was the quarry for their building material.
The walls of Babylon were transformed into the sacred cities of Kerbela and Nejef.
In the eleventh century, on the site of the southern part of Babylon, the city of Hillah was built.
Hillah might be called a child of Babylon, for it is almost entirely constructed with Nebuchadnezzar's bricks.
The walls of the houses are built of them.
The courtyards and streets are paved with them, and as you walk about the city the name of Nebuchadnezzar everywhere meets your eye.
Many of the ten thousand people living in Hillah still gain their livelihood by digging the bricks from the ruins to sell to the modern builders.
The great irrigating dams across the Euphrates are constructed entirely of them.
The people of Hillah, too, are a survival of Babylonian times.
Some are Arabs of the same tribes which used to roam the desert in Nebuchadnezzar's days. Some are the children of the Hebrew exiles of old.
Some, calling themselves Christians, are the descendants of Babylonians, perhaps of Nebuchadnezzar himself.
There among the ruins they still live in the same kind of houses,
dressing the same, eating the same food as did their ancestors when Nebuchadnezzar built the walls of Babylon.
Among the first of the modern travelers to describe the ruins of Babylon was Anthony Shirley, an Englishman who visited Mesopotamia in fifteen ninety-nine.
In his quaint way he says:
All the ground on which Babylon was spread is left now desolate; nothing standing in that Peninsula between the Euphrates and the Tigris,
but only part, and that a small part, of the great tower, which God hath suffered to stand
(if man may speak so confidently of His great impenetrable counsels), for an eternal Testimony of His great work in the confusion of Man's pride,
and that Arke of Nebuchadnezzar for as perpetual a memory of his great idolatry and condigne punishment.
About that same time Pietro della Valle, an Italian, visited Babylon,
and digging from the wall an inscribed square brick bearing the name of Nebuchadnezzar, he took it to Rome where it may still be seen.
That was the first object taken from Babylon to Europe;
it was the beginning of the great collections of Babylonian antiquities in the museums of the Western world.
Among the later visitors to Babylon was the great Niebuhr.
In eighteen twelve, James Claudius Rich, the British Resident at Baghdad, made the first complete examination of the ruins.
Porter, Layard, and Rawlinson followed him, but the real scientific exploration of Babylon and its walls
was begun by the Deutsche Orientgesellschaft, in eighteen eighty-nine, and continued till the summer of nineteen fifteen.
For fifteen years Dr. Koldewey and his assistants, with a force of two hundred native workmen, have labored there winter and summer.
The enormous amount of debris which buried the palaces and temples and walls of Nebuchadnezzar's city, in places to the depth of a hundred feet,
has been removed, and the surrounding city walls have been traced.
The excavations have shown that Babylon, as the ancients told us, was nearly square.
The Euphrates flowed through it, but the greater part of the city was on the eastern shore.
The city walls, of which the ancients were so proud, appear here and there like low ridges far out on the plain;
other parts of them have disappeared entirely.
In the northern part of the enclosure to the east of the river,
the large high mound, which resembles a mountain from a distance, still bears the ancient name Babel.
Arabs, searching for bricks, have burrowed their way down deep into it, revealing massive walls and arches.
The Germans maintain that it is the ruin of the Tower of Babel.
Here, it has been suggested, were the famous hanging gardens which some ancient authors included among the Seven Wonders of the World.
However, it is possible that the hanging gardens existed only in the imagination of the Greek writers,
for none of the many building inscriptions from Nebuchadnezzar mentions them.
Possibly along the terraces of the walls, or upon the stages of some lofty temple tower,
trees and overhanging vines were planted, and thus the travelers' tales arose.
At a distance of about two miles to the south of Babel is the larger and lower mound called the Kasr, or the Fortress,
because great masses of masonry used to project from its surface.
Deep down in the mound the Germans discovered the palace of Nebuchadnezzar with its hundreds of small chambers and its huge surrounding walls.
The mound still farther south is called Amran, because upon its summit stands the tomb of a Mohammedan saint of that name.
There lie the ruins of the famous temple of Esagil, sacred to Marduk.
Upon the little mound Jumjuma farther on, an Arab village has long stood.
All of the ancient writers agree in saying that Babylon was surrounded with both inner and outer walls, and the ruins confirm their statements.
Parts of the walls of Nineveh are still standing to the height of one hundred and twenty-five feet,
but the walls of Babylon have so long been used to supply bricks to the builders of the neighboring cities that only their bases remain.
In places even the bases have disappeared, and their moats have long been filled with the drifting sand.
The outer wall bore the name of Nimitti-Bel. Its direction was northeast and southwest, forming a triangle with the river.
The northeastern section may now be traced for a distance of less than three miles, and the southwestern "for more than a mile,
but both sections originally reached the river.
It seems that the circuit of the outer wall was about eleven miles.
The small portions of it which have been excavated suffice to show its construction.
The moat, ten feet deep, and of a width no longer known, ran close to its base. The wall was double.
Its outer part was about twenty-four feet in thickness, and its foundations, as Nebuchadnezzar said, were carried down to the water level.
Its bricks, measuring about thirteen inches square and three inches in thickness, were burned and stamped with the usual short inscription:
Nebuchadnezzar, King of Babylon, the restorer of the temples Esagil and Ezida,
the first-born son of Nabopolassar, King of Babylon.
They were laid in bitumen.
The inner part of the wall was constructed of unburned bricks, and at a distance of about thirty-six feet from the outer part.
The intervening space, which was filled with dirt probably to the upper inner edge of the outer part,
served as an elevated road where several chariots might have been driven abreast.
This inner part was about twenty-four feet wide, and at intervals of about one hundred and forty feet it was surmounted with towers.
The entire width of the outer defense, not including the moat, was therefore about eighty-two feet;
its height was probably more than double its width, but that may never be determined.
The inner wall of Babylon was called Imgur-Bel, and like the outer wall, it was double.
Time has dealt even less kindly with it, for it may be traced only for the distance of about a mile along its eastern side.
Nebuchadnezzar says that he built it of burned bricks, but only sun-dried bricks laid in mud now appear.
Its outer part, about twelve feet in width, was protected with towers at intervals of sixty-five feet.
A space of about twenty-three feet separated it from its inner part, which was about twenty feet in width.
It too was surmounted with towers.
No traces of its moat have appeared.
The entire width of this inner defense was about fifty-five feet; its height is uncertain.
To protect the sun-dried bricks of the inner wall from the winter rains
there were drains of large burned bricks, some of which bore the following long inscription:
the exalted prince, the protector of Esagil and Ezida, son of Nabopolassar, King of Babylon, am I.
Nabopolassar, the father, my begetter, built Imgur-Bel, the great wall of Babylon,
but I, the devout petitioner, the worshipper of the gods, built the moat, and made its wall of burned brick and bitumen mountain high.
O Marduk, great god, look joyfully upon the precious work of my hands. Be thou my protector.
Grant me as a gift a life of distant days.
The outer and inner defenses of Babylon were so strong and so high that no enemy could hope to take them,
yet the palace of Nebuchadnezzar was protected by a third defense far stronger.
Fortunately its walls have suffered less from the hands of the brick hunters, and the German excavators have been able to reconstruct their plan.
They may best be described by means of the accompanying diagram representing a cross section.
Had the enemy of Babylon succeeded in breaking through the outer and inner defenses of the city the royal palace would have still been far from his reach.
He would have had to cross a deep moat, to scale a wall of burned bricks about twenty feet in thickness and perhaps three times as high,
then a second wall still higher, a third and fourth and a fifth, each stronger and higher than the others,
and surmounted with towers, and then finally a sixth wall
whose summit reached into the sky as far, perhaps, as the tallest of the modern buildings.
Between the several sections were wide spaces where foot soldiers and charioteers might fight.
It must have been an imposing sight to one standing without to have seen the walls, one after another,
rising higher and higher, like a great terraced, turreted mountain.
We do not know their height, for the statements of the ancient writers disagree.
Herodotus says that it was three hundred and thirty-five feet;
Ctesias mentions three hundred feet; probably they were not far from the truth.
The ruins reach the height of about forty feet.
Nor were the walls about the palace a great mass of dull brick masonry.
The Ishtar gateway leading to the palace was encased with beautiful blue glazed bricks,
and decorated here and there with large reliefs representing bulls and lions and dragons,
designed in colors of white and blue and yellow and black.
It seems that the bricks of the reliefs were molded and glazed separately and so accurately that when built into the wall they fitted perfectly.
A modern artist would have difficulty in doing such accurate work.
Some of these decorations, the most valuable objects found in the ruins of the great city, still remain in their places on the walls;
others have been taken to the Berlin Museum.
Nebuchadnezzar speaks of great bronze gates and of images of bronze, but none have been discovered.
Probably their metal was far too valuable for the enemy to leave behind.
Should you walk along the shore of the Euphrates at Babylon, you would still see the embankments which Nebuchadnezzar constructed of bricks bearing his name,
but the river walls have disappeared, and the buttresses of the bridges have been torn or washed away.
Should you cross the river to search for the western inner wall, you would find but a small fragment of it.
The great outer wall seems to have disappeared completely beneath the desert surface.
Such were the walls of Babylon,
the strongest, the thickest, the loftiest, the most intricate, perhaps the most beautiful that ever protected a city,
walls which no ancient army was ever able to take by storm.
It is not strange, then, that they were included among the Seven Wonders of the World,
or that the Babylonian soldier stood confidently upon their summit, and jeering at the Persian army encamped below, shouted:
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter two. The Assassination: Part one.
This chapter describes President Kennedy's trip to Dallas, from its origin through its tragic conclusion.
The narrative of these events is based largely on the recollections of the participants,
although in many instances documentary or other evidence has also been used by the Commission.
Beginning with the advance plans and Secret Service preparations for the trip,
this chapter reviews the motorcade through Dallas, the fleeting moments of the assassination,
the activities at Parkland Memorial Hospital, and the return of the Presidential party to Washington.
An evaluation of the procedures employed to safeguard the President, with recommendations for improving these procedures, appears in Chapter eight of the report.
President Kennedy's visit to Texas in November nineteen sixty-three had been under consideration for almost a year before it occurred.
He had made only a few brief visits to the State since the nineteen sixty Presidential campaign and in nineteen sixty-two he began to consider a formal visit.
During nineteen sixty-three, the reasons for making the trip became more persuasive.
As a political leader, the President wished to resolve the factional controversy within the Democratic Party in Texas before the election of nineteen sixty-four.
The party itself saw an opportunity to raise funds by having the President speak at a political dinner eventually planned for Austin.
As Chief of State, the President always welcomed the opportunity to learn, firsthand, about the problems which concerned the American people.
Moreover, he looked forward to the public appearances which he personally enjoyed. The basic decision on the November trip to Texas was made at a meeting of President Kennedy,
Vice President Johnson, and Governor Connally on June fifth, nineteen sixty-three, at the Cortez Hotel in El Paso, Texas.
The President had spoken earlier that day at the Air Force Academy in Colorado Springs, Colorado.
and had stopped in El Paso to discuss the proposed visit and other matters with the Vice President and the Governor.
The three agreed that the President would come to Texas in late November nineteen sixty-three.
The original plan called for the President to spend only one day in the State, making whirlwind visits to Dallas, Fort Worth, San Antonio, and Houston.
In September, the White House decided to permit further visits by the President and extended the trip to run from the afternoon of November twenty-one
through the evening of Friday, November twenty-two.
When Governor Connally called at the White House on October four to discuss the details of the visit,
it was agreed that the planning of events in Texas would be left largely to the Governor.
At the White House, Kenneth O'Donnell, special assistant to the President, acted as coordinator for the trip.
Everyone agreed that, if there was sufficient time, a motorcade through downtown Dallas would be the best way for the people to see their President.
When the trip was planned for only one day, Governor Connally had opposed the motorcade because there was not enough time. The Governor stated, however, that, quote,
once we got San Antonio moved from Friday to Thursday afternoon, where that was his initial stop in Texas,
then we had the time, and I withdrew my objections to a motorcade. End quote.
According to O'Donnell, quote, we had a motorcade wherever we went, end quote.
particularly in large cities where the purpose was to let the President be seen by as many people as possible.
In his experience, quote, it would be automatic, end quote, for the Secret Service to arrange a route which would, within the time allotted,
bring the President, quote, through an area which exposes him to the greatest number of people, end quote.
Advance Preparations for the Dallas Trip
Advance preparations for President Kennedy's visit to Dallas were primarily the responsibility of two Secret Service agents:
Special Agent Winston G. Lawson, a member of the White House detail who acted as the advance agent, and Forrest V. Sorrels,
special agent in charge of the Dallas office. Both agents were advised of the trip on November four.
Lawson received a tentative schedule of the Texas trip on November eight from Roy H. Kellerman, assistant special agent in charge of the White House detail,
who was the Secret Service official responsible for the entire Texas journey.
As advance agent working closely with Sorrels, Lawson had responsibility for arranging the timetable for the President's visit to Dallas
and coordinating local activities with the White House staff, the organizations directly concerned with the visit, and local law enforcement officials.
Lawson's most important responsibilities were to take preventive action against anyone in Dallas considered a threat to the President,
to select the luncheon site and motorcade route, and to plan security measures for the luncheon and the motorcade.
Preventive Intelligence Activities. The Protective Research Section (PRS) of the Secret Service
maintains records of people who have threatened the President or so conducted themselves as to be deemed a potential danger to him.
On November eight, nineteen sixty-three,
after undertaking the responsibility for advance preparations for the visit to Dallas, Agent Lawson went to the PRS offices in Washington.
A check of the geographic indexes there revealed no listing for any individual deemed to be a potential danger to the President
in the territory of the Secret Service regional office which includes Dallas and Fort Worth.
To supplement the PRS files, the Secret Service depends largely on local police departments and local offices of other Federal agencies
which advise it of potential threats immediately before the visit of the President to their community.
Upon his arrival in Dallas on November twelve
Lawson conferred with the local police and the local office of the Federal Bureau of Investigation about potential dangers to the President.
Although there was no mention in PRS files of the demonstration in Dallas against Ambassador Adlai Stevenson on October twenty-fourth,
nineteen sixty-three, Lawson inquired about the incident and obtained through the local police photographs of some of the persons involved.
On November twenty-two a Secret Service agent stood at the entrance to the Trade Mart, where the President was scheduled to speak, with copies of these photographs.
Dallas detectives in the lobby of the Trade Mart and in the luncheon area also had copies of these photographs.
A number of people who resembled some of those in the photographs were placed under surveillance at the Trade Mart.
The FBI office in Dallas gave the local Secret Service representatives the name of a possibly dangerous individual in the Dallas area who was investigated.
It also advised the Secret Service of the circulation on November twenty-one of a handbill sharply critical of President Kennedy,
discussed in chapter six of this report.
Shortly before, the Dallas police had reported to the Secret Service that the handbill had appeared on the streets of Dallas.
Neither the Dallas police nor the FBI had yet learned the source of the handbill.
No one else was identified to the Secret Service through local inquiry as potentially dangerous,
nor did PRS develop any additional information between November twelve, when Lawson left Washington, and November twenty-two.
The adequacy of the intelligence system maintained by the Secret Service at the time of the assassination,
including a detailed description of the available data on Lee Harvey Oswald and the reasons why his name had not been furnished to the Secret Service,
is discussed in chapter eight.
An important purpose of the President's visit to Dallas was to speak at a luncheon given by business and civic leaders.
The White House staff informed the Secret Service
that the President would arrive and depart from Dallas' Love Field; that a motorcade through the downtown area of Dallas to the luncheon site should be arranged;
and that following the luncheon the President would return to the airport by the most direct route.
Accordingly, it was important to determine the luncheon site as quickly as possible, so that security could be established at the site and the motorcade route selected.
On November four, Gerald A. Behn, agent in charge of the White House detail, asked Sorrels to examine three potential sites for the luncheon.
One building, Market Hall, was unavailable for November twenty-two.
The second, the Women's Building at the State Fair Grounds,
was a one-story building with few entrances and easy to make secure, but it lacked necessary food-handling facilities
and had certain unattractive features, including a low ceiling with exposed conduits and beams.
The third possibility, the Trade Mart, a handsome new building with all the necessary facilities, presented security problems. It had numerous entrances,
several tiers of balconies surrounding the central court where the luncheon would be held, and several catwalks crossing the court at each level.
On November four, Sorrels told Behn he believed security difficulties at the Trade Mart could be overcome by special precautions.
Lawson also evaluated the security hazards at the Trade Mart on November thirteen.
Kenneth O'Donnell made the final decision to hold the luncheon at the Trade Mart; Behn so notified Lawson on November fourteen.
Once the Trade Mart had been selected, Sorrels and Lawson worked out detailed arrangements for security at the building.
In addition to the preventive measures already mentioned, they provided for controlling access to the building, closing off and policing areas around it,
securing the roof and insuring the presence of numerous police officers inside and around the building.
Ultimately more than two hundred law enforcement officers, mainly Dallas police but including eight Secret Service agents,
were deployed in and around the Trade Mart.
On November eight, when Lawson was briefed on the itinerary for the trip to Dallas,
he was told that forty-five minutes had been allotted for a motorcade procession from Love Field to the luncheon site.
Lawson was not specifically instructed to select the parade route, but he understood that this was one of his functions.
Even before the Trade Mart had been definitely selected, Lawson and Sorrels began to consider the best motorcade route from Love Field to the Trade Mart.
On November fourteen, Lawson and Sorrels attended a meeting at Love Field
and on their return to Dallas drove over the route which Sorrels believed best suited for the proposed motorcade.
This route, eventually selected for the motorcade from the airport to the Trade Mart, measured ten miles and could be driven easily within the allotted forty-five minutes.
From Love Field the route passed through a portion of suburban Dallas,
through the downtown area along Main Street and then to the Trade Mart via Stemmons Freeway.
For the President's return to Love Field following the luncheon, the agents selected the most direct route, which was approximately four miles.
After the selection of the Trade Mart as the luncheon site,
Lawson and Sorrels met with Dallas Chief of Police Jesse E. Curry, Assistant Chief Charles Batchelor,
Deputy Chief N. T. Fisher, and several other command officers to discuss details of the motorcade and possible routes.
The route was further reviewed by Lawson and Sorrels with Assistant Chief Batchelor and members of the local host committee on November fifteen.
The police officials agreed that the route recommended by Sorrels was the proper one and did not express a belief that any other route might be better.
Sorrels and Lawson drove over the selected route with Batchelor and other police officers, verifying that it could be traversed within forty-five minutes.
Representatives of the local host committee and the White House staff were advised by the Secret Service of the actual route on the afternoon of November eighteen.
The route impressed the agents as a natural and desirable one.
Sorrels, who had participated in Presidential protection assignments in Dallas since a visit by President Franklin D. Roosevelt
in nineteen thirty-six, as testified that the traditional parade route in Dallas was along Main Street, since the tall buildings along the street
gave more people an opportunity to participate.
The route chosen from the airport to Main Street was the normal one, except where Harwood Street was selected as the means of access to Main Street
in preference to a short stretch of the Central Expressway, which presented a minor safety hazard
and could not accommodate spectators as conveniently as Harwood Street.
According to Lawson, the chosen route seemed to be the best.
It afforded us wide streets most of the way, because of the buses that were in the motorcade.
It afforded us a chance to have alternative routes if something happened on the motorcade route. It was the type of suburban area a good part of the way
where the crowds would be able to be controlled for a great distance, and we figured that the largest crowds would be downtown, which they were,
and that the wide streets that we would use downtown would be of sufficient width to keep the public out of our way.
Elm Street, parallel to Main Street and one block north,
was not used for the main portion of the downtown part of the motorcade because Main Street offered better vantage points for spectators.
To reach the Trade Mart from Main Street the agents decided to use the Stemmons Freeway (Route Number seventy-seven), the most direct route.
The only practical way for westbound traffic on Main Street
to reach the northbound lanes of the Stemmons Freeway is via Elm Street, which Route Number seventy-seven traffic is instructed to follow in this part of the city.
Elm Street was to be reached from Main by turning right at Houston,
going one block north and then turning left onto Elm.
On this last portion of the journey, only five minutes from the Trade Mart,
the President's motorcade would pass the Texas School Book Depository Building on the northwest corner of Houston and Elm Streets.
The building overlooks Dealey Plaza, an attractively landscaped triangle of three acres.
From Houston Street, which forms the base of the triangle, three streets -- Commerce, Main, and Elm --
trisect the plaza, converging at the apex of the triangle to form a triple underpass beneath a multiple railroad bridge
almost five hundred feet from Houston Street.
Elm Street, the northernmost of the three, after intersecting Houston curves in a southwesterly arc
through the underpass and leads into an access road,
which branches off to the right and is used by traffic going to the Stemmons Freeway and the Dallas-Fort Worth Turnpike.
The Elm Street approach to the Stemmons Freeway is necessary
in order to avoid the traffic hazards which would otherwise exist if right turns were permitted from both Main and Elm into the freeway.
To create this traffic pattern, a concrete barrier between Main and Elm Streets presents an obstacle to a right turn
from Main across Elm to the access road to Stemmons Freeway and the Dallas-Fort Worth Turnpike.
This concrete barrier extends far enough beyond the access road to make it impracticable for vehicles to turn right from Main directly to the access road.
A sign located on this barrier instructs Main Street traffic not to make any turns.
In conformity with these arrangements, traffic proceeding west on Main is directed to turn right at Houston
in order to reach the Dallas-Fort Worth Turnpike, which has the same access road from Elm Street as does the Stemmons Freeway.
The planning for the motorcade also included advance preparations for security arrangements along the route.
Sorrels and Lawson reviewed the route in cooperation with Assistant Chief Bachelor and other Dallas police officials who took notes on the requirements
for controlling the crowds and traffic, watching the overpasses, and providing motorcycle escort.
To control traffic, arrangements were made for the deployment of foot patrolmen and motorcycle police at various positions along the route.
Police were assigned to each overpass on the route and instructed to keep them clear of unauthorized persons.
No arrangements were made for police or building custodians
to inspect buildings along the motorcade route since the Secret Service did not normally request or make such a check.
Under standard procedures, the responsibility for watching the windows of buildings was shared by local police stationed along the route
and Secret Service agents riding in the motorcade.
As the date for the President's visit approached,
the two Dallas newspapers carried several reports of his motorcade route.
The selection of the Trade Mart as the possible site for the luncheon first appeared in the Dallas Times-Herald on November fifteen, nineteen sixty-three.
The following day, the newspaper reported that the Presidential party
quote, apparently will loop through the downtown area, probably on Main Street, en route from Dallas Love Field, end quote.
on its way to the Trade Mart. On November nineteen, the Times-Herald afternoon paper detailed the precise route:
From the airport, the President's party will proceed to Mockingbird Lane to Lemmon and then to Turtle Creek, turning south to Cedar Springs.
The motorcade will then pass through downtown on Harwood
and then west on Main, turning back to Elm at Houston and then out Stemmons Freeway to the Trade Mart.
Also on November nineteen, the Morning News reported that the President's motorcade would travel from Love Field along specified streets, then
Harwood to Main, Main to Houston, Houston to Elm, Elm under the Triple Underpass to Stemmons Freeway, and on to the Trade Mart.
On November twenty a front page story reported that the streets on which the Presidential motorcade would travel included "Main and Stemmons Freeway."
On the morning of the President's arrival,
the Morning News noted that the motorcade would travel through downtown Dallas onto the Stemmons Freeway, and reported that, quote, the motorcade will move slowly
so that crowds can get a good view of President Kennedy and his wife.
The President's intention to pay a visit to Texas in the fall of nineteen sixty-three aroused interest throughout the State.
The two Dallas newspapers provided their readers with a steady stream of information and speculation about the trip,
beginning on September thirteen, when the Times-Herald announced in a front page article that President Kennedy was planning a brief one-day tour of four Texas cities
Dallas, Fort Worth, San Antonio, and Houston
Both Dallas papers cited White House sources on September twenty-six as confirming the President's intention to visit Texas on November twenty-one and twenty-two,
with Dallas scheduled as one of the stops.
Articles, editorials, and letters to the editor in the Dallas Morning News and the Dallas Times-Herald after September thirteen
reflected the feeling in the community toward the forthcoming Presidential visit.
Although there were critical editorials and letters to the editors, the news stories reflected the desire of Dallas officials to welcome the President with dignity and courtesy.
An editorial in the Times-Herald of September seventeen
called on the people of Dallas to be "congenial hosts" even though "Dallas didn't vote for Mr. Kennedy in nineteen sixty,
may not endorse him in 'sixty-four.
On October three the Dallas Morning News quoted U.S. Representative Joe Pool's hope
that President Kennedy would receive a "good welcome" and would not face demonstrations like those encountered
by Vice President Johnson during the nineteen sixty campaign.
Increased concern about the President's visit was aroused by the incident involving the U.S. Ambassador to the United Nations, Adlai E. Stevenson.
On the evening of October twenty-four, nineteen sixty-three, after addressing a meeting in Dallas,
Stevenson was jeered, jostled, and spat upon by hostile demonstrators outside the Dallas Memorial Auditorium Theater.
The local, national, and international reaction to this incident evoked from Dallas officials and newspapers strong condemnations of the demonstrators.
Mayor Earle Cabell called on the city to redeem itself during President Kennedy's visit.
He asserted that Dallas had shed its reputation of the twenties as the, quote, Southwest hate capital of Dixie, end quote
On October twenty-six the press reported Chief of Police Curry's plans
to call in one hundred extra off-duty officers to help protect President Kennedy.
Any thought that the President might cancel his visit to Dallas was ended
when Governor Connally confirmed on November eight that the President would come to Texas on November twenty-one and twenty-two,
and that he would visit San Antonio, Houston, Fort Worth, Dallas, and Austin.
During November the Dallas papers reported frequently on the plans for protecting the President, stressing the thoroughness of the preparations.
They conveyed the pleas of Dallas leaders that citizens not demonstrate or create disturbances during the President's visit.
On November eighteen the Dallas City Council adopted a new city ordinance prohibiting interference with attendance at lawful assemblies.
Two days before the President's arrival Chief Curry warned that the Dallas police would not permit improper conduct during the President's visit.
the president of the Dallas Chamber of Commerce referred to the city's reputation for being the friendliest town in America and asserted that citizens would, quote,
greet the President of the United States with the warmth and pride that keep the Dallas spirit famous the world over, end quote,
Two days later, a local Republican leader called for a "civilized nonpartisan" welcome
for President Kennedy, stating that "in many respects Dallas County has isolated itself from the main stream of life in the world in this decade.
Another reaction to the impending visit -- hostile to the President -- came to a head shortly before his arrival.
On November twenty-one there appeared on the streets of Dallas the anonymous handbill mentioned above.
It was fashioned after the "wanted" circulars issued by law enforcement agencies.
Beneath two photographs of President Kennedy, one full- face and one profile, appeared the caption, quote, Wanted for Treason,
end quote, followed by a scurrilous bill of particulars that constituted a vilification of the President.
And on the morning of the President's arrival, there appeared in the Morning News a full, black-bordered advertisement headed:
Welcome Mr. Kennedy to Dallas, sponsored by the American Fact-finding Committee, which the sponsor later testified was an ad hoc committee
quote, formed strictly for the purpose of having a name to put in the paper, end quote,
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter two. The Assassination: Part two.
Visits to Other Texas Cities
The trip to Texas began with the departure of President and Mrs. Kennedy from the White House
by helicopter at ten:forty-five A.M., Eastern Standard Time, on November twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three, for Andrews Air Force Base.
They took off in the Presidential plane, Air Force One, at eleven a.m., arriving at San Antonio at one:thirty p.m., Eastern Standard Time.
They were greeted by Vice President Johnson and Governor Connally, who joined the Presidential party in a motorcade through San Antonio.
During the afternoon, President Kennedy dedicated the U.S. Air Force School of Aerospace Medicine at Brooks Air Force Base.
Late in the afternoon he flew to Houston where he rode through the city in a motorcade,
spoke at the Rice University Stadium, and attended a dinner in honor of U.S. Representative Albert Thomas.
At Rice Stadium a very large, enthusiastic crowd greeted the President.
In Houston, as elsewhere during the trip, the crowds showed much interest in Mrs. Kennedy.
David F. Powers of the President's staff later stated that when the President asked for his assessment of the day's activities, Powers replied
quote, that the crowd was about the same as the one which came to see him before but there were one hundred thousand extra people on hand who came to see Mrs. Kennedy.
Late in the evening, the Presidential party flew to Fort Worth where they spent the night at the Texas Hotel.
On the morning of November twenty-two, President Kennedy attended a breakfast at the hotel and afterward addressed a crowd at an open parking lot.
The President liked outdoor appearances because more people could see and hear him.
Before leaving the hotel, the President, Mrs. Kennedy, and Kenneth O'Donnell talked about the risks inherent in Presidential public appearances.
According to O'Donnell, the President commented that, quote,
if anybody really wanted to shoot the President of the United States, it was not a very difficult job
all one had to do was get a high building someday with a telescopic rifle, and there was nothing anybody could do to defend against such an attempt.
Upon concluding the conversation, the President prepared to depart for Dallas.
In Dallas the rain had stopped, and by midmorning a gloomy overcast sky had given way to the bright sunshine that greeted the Presidential party
when Air Force One touched down at Love Field at eleven:forty a.m., Eastern Standard Time.
Governor and Mrs. Connally and Senator Ralph W. Yarborough had come with the President from Fort Worth.
Vice President Johnson's airplane, Air Force Two, had arrived at Love Field at approximately eleven:thirty-five a.m.,
and the Vice President and Mrs. Johnson were in the receiving line to greet President and Mrs. Kennedy.
After a welcome from the Dallas reception committee,
President and Mrs. Kennedy walked along a chain-link fence at the reception area greeting a large crowd of spectators that had gathered behind it.
Secret Service agents formed a cordon to keep the press and photographers from impeding their passage and scanned the crowd for threatening movements.
Dallas police stood at intervals along the fence and Dallas plain clothes men mixed in the crowd.
Vice President and Mrs. Johnson followed along the fence, guarded by four members of the Vice-Presidential detail.
Approximately ten minutes after the arrival at Love Field, the President and Mrs. Kennedy went to the Presidential automobile to begin the motorcade.
Secret Service arrangements for Presidential trips, which were followed in the Dallas motorcade,
are designed to provide protection while permitting large numbers of people to see the President.
Every effort is made to prevent unscheduled stops, although the President may, and in Dallas did, order stops in order to greet the public.
Men the motorcade slows or stops, agents take positions between the President and the crowd.
The order of vehicles in the Dallas motorcade was as follows:
Motorcycles. -- Dallas police motorcycles preceded the pilot car.
Manned by officers of the Dallas Police Department, this automobile preceded the main party by approximately quarter of a mile.
Its function was to alert police along the route that the motorcade was approaching and to check for signs of trouble.
Motorcycles. -- Next came four to six motorcycle policemen whose main purpose was to keep the crowd back.
The lead car. -- Described as a "rolling command car," this was an unmarked Dallas police car, driven by Chief of Police Curry
and occupied by Secret Service Agents Sorrels and Lawson and by Dallas County Sheriff J. E. Decker.
The occupants scanned the crowd and the buildings along the route.
Their main function was to spot trouble in advance and to direct any necessary steps to meet the trouble.
Following normal practice, the lead automobile stayed approximately four to five car lengths ahead of the President's limousine.
The President's automobile was specially designed nineteen sixty-one Lincoln convertible
with two collapsible jump seats between the front and rear seats.
It was outfitted with a clear plastic bubbletop which was neither bulletproof nor bullet resistant.
Because the skies had cleared in Dallas, Lawson directed that the top not be used for the day's activities.
He acted on instructions he had received earlier from Assistant Special Agent in Charge Roy H. Kellerman, who was in Fort Worth with the President.
Kellerman had discussed the matter with O'Donnell, whose instructions were, quote,
If the weather is clear and it is not raining, have that bubbletop off, end quote,
Elevated approximately fifteen inches above the back of the front seat
was a metallic frame with four handholds that riders in the car could grip while standing in the rear seat during parades.
At the rear on each side of the automobile were small running boards, each designed to hold a Secret Service agent,
with a metallic handle for the rider to grasp.
The President had frequently stated that he did not want agents to ride on these steps during a motorcade except when necessary.
He had repeated this wish only a few days before, during his visit to Tampa, Florida.
President Kennedy rode on the right-hand side of the rear seat with Mrs. Kennedy on his left.
Governor Connally occupied the right jump seat, Mrs. Connally the left.
Driving the Presidential limousine was Special Agent William R. Greer of the Secret Service;
on his right sat Kellerman.
Kellerman's responsibilities included maintaining radio communications with the lead and follow-up cars,
scanning the route, and getting out and standing near the President when the cars stopped.
Motorcycles. -- Four motorcycles, two on each side, flanked the rear of the Presidential car.
They provided some cover for the President, but their main purpose was to keep back the crowd.
On previous occasions, the President had requested that, to the extent possible, these flanking motorcycles keep back from the sides of his car.
This vehicle, a nineteen fifty-five Cadillac eight-passenger convertible especially outfitted for the Secret Service,
followed closely behind the President's automobile.
It carried eight Secret Service agents -- two in the front seat, two in the rear, and two on each of the right and left running boards.
Each agent carried a thirty-eight-caliber pistol, and a shotgun and automatic rifle were also available.
Presidential Assistants David F. Powers and Kenneth O'Donnell sat in the right and left jump seats, respectively.
The agents in this car, under established procedure, had instructions to watch the route for signs of trouble,
scanning not only the crowds but the windows and roofs of buildings, overpasses, and crossings.
They were instructed to watch particularly for thrown objects, sudden actions in the crowd, and any movements toward the Presidential car.
The agents on the front of the running boards had directions to move immediately to positions just to the rear of the President and Mrs. Kennedy when the President's car slowed
to a walking pace or stopped,
or when the press of the crowd made it impossible for the escort motorcycles to stay in position on the car's rear flanks.
The two agents on the rear of the running boards were to advance toward the front of the President's car whenever it stopped or slowed down sufficiently for them to do so.
The Vice-Presidential automobile, a four-door Lincoln convertible obtained locally for use in the motorcade,
proceeded approximately two to three car lengths behind the President's follow-up car.
This distance was maintained so that spectators would normally turn their gaze from the President's automobile by the time the Vice President came into view.
Vice President Johnson sat on the right-hand side of the rear seat, Mrs. Johnson in the center, and Senator Yarborough on the left.
Rufus W. Youngblood, special agent in charge of the Vice President's detail,
occupied the right-hand side of the front seat, and Hurchel Jacks of the Texas State Highway patrol was the driver.
Driven by an officer of the Dallas Police Department,
this vehicle was occupied by three Secret Service agents and Clifton C. Garter, assistant to the Vice President.
These agents performed for the Vice President the same functions that the agents in the Presidential follow-up car performed for the President.
The remainder of the motorcade consisted of five cars for other dignitaries, including the mayor of Dallas and Texas Congressmen,
telephone and Western Union vehicles, a White House communications car,
three cars for press photographers, an official party bus for White House staff members and others, and two press buses.
Admiral George G. Burkley, physician to the President,
was in a car following those, quote, containing the local and national representatives, end quote,
A Dallas police car and several motorcycles at the rear kept the motorcade together and prevented unauthorized vehicles from joining the motorcade.
A base station at a fixed location in Dallas operated a radio network which linked together the lead car,
Presidential car, Presidential follow-up car,
White House communications car, Trade Mart, Love Field, and the Presidential and Vice-Presidential airplanes.
and Vice-Presidential follow-up car used portable sets with a separate frequency for their own car-to-car communication.
The motorcade left Love Field shortly after eleven:fifty a.m. and drove at speeds up to twenty-five to thirty miles an hour
through thinly populated areas on the outskirts of Dallas.
At the President's direction, his automobile stopped twice, the first time to permit him to respond to a sign asking him to shake hands.
During this brief stop, agents in the front positions on the running boards of the Presidential follow-up car came forward and stood beside the President's car,
looking out toward the crowd, and Special Agent Kellerman assumed his position next to the car.
On the other occasion, the President halted the motorcade to speak to a Catholic nun and a group of small children.
In the downtown area, large crowds of spectators gave the President a tremendous reception.
The crowds were so dense that Special Agent Clinton J. Hill
had to leave the left front running board of the President's follow-up car four times to ride on the rear of the President's limousine.
Several times Special Agent John D. Ready came forward from the right front running board of the Presidential follow-up car
to the right side of the President's car.
Special Agent Glen A. Bennett once left his place inside the follow-up car to help keep the crowd away from the President's car.
When a teenage boy ran toward the rear of the President's car, Ready left the running board to chase the boy back into the crowd.
On several occasions when the Vice President's car was slowed down by the throng, Special Agent Youngblood stepped out to hold the crowd back.
According to plan, the President's motorcade proceeded west through downtown Dallas on Main Street
to the intersection of Houston Street, which marks the beginning of Dealey Plaza.
From Main Street the motorcade turned right and went north on Houston Street, passing tall buildings on the right,
and headed toward the Texas School Book Depository Building.
The spectators were still thickly congregated in front of the buildings which lined the east side of Houston Street, but the crowd thinned abruptly along Elm Street,
which curves in a southwesterly direction as it proceeds downgrade toward the Triple Underpass and the Stemmons Freeway.
As the motorcade approached the intersection of Houston and Elm Streets, there was general gratification in the Presidential party about the enthusiastic reception.
Evaluating the political overtones, Kenneth O'Donnell was especially pleased
because it convinced him that the average Dallas resident was like other American citizens in respecting and admiring the President.
Mrs. Connally, elated by the reception, turned to President Kennedy and said, quote, Mr. President, you can't say Dallas doesn't love you.
end quote, the President replied, "That is very obvious."
At twelve:thirty p.m., Eastern Standard Time, as the President's open limousine proceeded at approximately eleven miles per hour along Elm Street
toward the Triple Underpass, shots fired from a rifle mortally wounded President Kennedy and seriously injured Governor Connally.
One bullet passed through the President's neck;
a subsequent bullet, which was lethal, shattered the right side of his skull.
Governor Connally sustained bullet wounds in his back, the right side of his chest, right wrist, and left thigh.
The exact time of the assassination was fixed by the testimony of four witnesses.
Special Agent Rufus W. Youngblood observed that the large electric sign clock atop the Texas School Book Depository Building
showed the numerals twelve:thirty as the Vice-Presidential automobile proceeded north on Houston Street, a few seconds before the shots were fired.
Just prior to the shooting, David F. Powers, riding in the Secret Service follow-up car, remarked to Kenneth O'Donnell
that it was twelve:thirty p.m., the time they were due at the Trade Mart.
Seconds after the shooting, Roy Kellerman, riding in the front seat of the Presidential limousine,
looked at his watch and said "twelve:thirty" to the driver, Special Agent Greer.
The Dallas police radio log reflects that Chief of Police Curry reported the shooting of the President
and issued his initial orders at twelve:thirty p.m.
William Greer, operator of the Presidential limousine, estimated the car's speed at the time of the first shot as twelve to fifteen miles per hour.
Other witnesses in the motorcade estimated the speed of the President's limousine from seven to twenty-two miles per hour.
A more precise determination has been made from motion pictures taken on the scene by an amateur photographer, Abraham Zapruder.
Based on these films, the speed of the President's automobile is computed at an average speed of eleven point two miles per hour.
The car maintained this average speed over a distance of approximately one hundred eighty-six feet immediately preceding the shot which struck the President in the head.
While the car traveled this distance, the Zapruder camera ran one hundred fifty-two frames.
Since the camera operates at a speed of eighteen point three frames per second,
it was calculated that the car required eight point three seconds to cover the one hundred thirty-six feet.
This represents a speed of eleven point two miles per hour.
Mrs. John F. Kennedy, on the left of the rear seat of the limousine, looked toward her left and waved to the crowds along the route.
Soon after the motorcade turned onto Elm Street, she heard a sound similar to a motorcycle noise and a cry from Governor Connally,
which caused her to look to her right.
On turning she saw a quizzical look on her husband's face as he raised his left hand to his throat.
Mrs. Kennedy then heard a second shot and saw the President's skull torn open under the impact of the bullet.
As she cradled her mortally wounded husband, Mrs. Kennedy cried, quote,
Oh, my God, they have shot my husband. I love you, Jack.
Governor Connally testified that he recognized the first noise as a rifle shot
and the thought immediately crossed his mind that it was an assassination attempt.
From his position in the right jump seat immediately in front of the President,
he instinctively turned to his right because the shot appeared to come from over his right shoulder.
Unable to see the President as he turned to the right,
the Governor started to look back over his left shoulder, but he never completed the turn because he felt something strike him in the back.
In his testimony before the Commission, Governor Connally was certain that he was hit by the second shot, which he stated he did not hear.
Mrs. Connally, too, heard a frightening noise from her right.
Looking over her right shoulder, she saw that the President had both hands at his neck but she observed no blood and heard nothing.
She watched as he slumped down with an empty expression on his face.
Roy Kellerman, in the right front seat of the limousine, heard a report like a firecracker pop.
Turning to his right in the direction of the noise, Kellerman heard the President say
My God, I am hit, and saw both of the President's hands move up toward his neck.
As he told the driver, quote, Let's get out of here; we are hit, end quote,
Kellerman grabbed his microphone and radioed ahead to the lead car,
quote, we are hit. Get us to the hospital immediately, end quote.
The driver, William Greer, heard a noise which he took to be a backfire from one of the motorcycles flanking the Presidential car.
When he heard the same noise again, Greer glanced over his shoulder and saw Governor Connally fall.
At the sound of the second shot
he realized that something was wrong, and he pressed down on the accelerator as Kellerman said, quote, Get out of here fast, end quote.
As he issued his instructions to Greer and to the lead car, Kellerman heard a flurry of shots within five seconds of the first noise.
According to Kellerman, Mrs. Kennedy then cried out, quote,
What are they doing to you! end quote. Looking back from the front seat,
Kellerman saw Governor Connally in his wife's lap and Special Agent Clinton J. Hill lying across the trunk of the car.
Mrs. Connally heard a second shot fired and pulled her husband down into her lap.
Observing his blood-covered chest as he was pulled into his wife's lap, Governor Connally believed himself mortally wounded.
He cried out, quote, Oh, no, no, no. My God, they are going to kill us all, end quote,
At first Mrs. Connally thought that her husband had been killed,
but then she noticed an almost imperceptible movement and knew that he was still alive. She said, quote, It's all right. Be still, end quote,
The Governor was lying with his head on his wife's lap when he heard a shot hit the President.
At that point, both Governor and Mrs. Connally observed brain tissue splattered over the interior of the car.
According to Governor and Mrs. Connally, it was after this shot that Kellerman issued his emergency instructions and the car accelerated.
Reaction by Secret Service Agents
From the left front running board of the President's follow-up car,
Special Agent Hill was scanning the few people standing on the south side of Elm Street after the motorcade had turned off Houston Street.
He estimated that the motorcade had slowed down to approximately nine or ten miles per hour
on the turn at the intersection of Houston and Elm Streets and then proceeded at a rate of twelve to fifteen miles per hour
with the follow-up car trailing the President's automobile by approximately five feet.
Hill heard a noise, which seemed to be a firecracker, coming from his right rear.
He immediately looked to his right, quote, and, in so doing, my eyes had to cross the Presidential limousine
and I saw President Kennedy grab at himself and lurch forward and to the left, end quote.
Hill jumped from the follow-up car and ran to the President's automobile.
At about the time he reached the President's automobile,
Hill heard a second shot, proximately five seconds after the first, which removed a portion of the President's head.
At the instant that Hill stepped onto the left rear step of the President's automobile and grasped the handhold,
the car lurched forward, causing him to lose his footing. He ran three or four steps, regained his position and mounted the car.
Between the time he originally seized the handhold and the time he mounted the car, Hill recalled:
quote, Mrs. Kennedy had jumped up from the seat and was, it appeared to me, reaching for something coming off the fight rear bumper of the car,
the right rear tail, when she noticed that I was trying to climb on the car.
She turned toward me and I grabbed her and put her back in the back seat, crawled up on top of the back seat and lay there.
David Powers, who witnessed the scene from the President's follow-up car,
stated that Mrs. Kennedy would probably have fallen off the rear end of the car and been killed if Hill had not pushed her back into the Presidential automobile.
Mrs. Kennedy had no recollection of climbing onto the back of the car.
Special Agent Ready, on the right front running board of the Presidential follow-up car,
heard noises that sounded like firecrackers and ran toward the President's limousine.
But he was immediately called back by Special Agent Emory P. Roberts, in charge of the follow-up car,
who did not believe that he could reach, the President's car at the speed it was then traveling.
Special Agent George W. Hickey, Jr., in the rear seat of the Presidential follow-up car,
picked up and cocked an automatic rifle as he heard the last shot.
At this point the cars were speeding through the underpass and had left the scene of the shooting,
but Hickey kept the automatic weapon ready as the car raced to the hospital.
Most of the other Secret Service agents in the motorcade had drawn their sidearms.
Roberts noticed that the Vice President's car was approximately one-half block
behind the Presidential follow-up car at the time of the shooting and signaled for it to move in closer.
Directing the security detail for the Vice President from the right front seat of the Vice-Presidential car, Special Agent Youngblood recalled, quote,
As we were beginning to go down this incline, all of a sudden there was an explosive noise.
I quickly observed unnatural movement of crowds, like ducking or scattering, and quick movements in the Presidential follow-up car.
So I turned around and hit the Vice President on the shoulder and hollered, get down,
and then looked around again and saw more of this movement, and so I proceeded to go to the back seat and get on top of him.
Youngblood was not positive that he was in the rear seat before the second shot, but thought it probable because of President Johnson's statement
to that effect immediately after the assassination.
President Johnson emphasized Youngblood's instantaneous reaction after the first shot:
I was startled by the sharp report or explosion,
but I had no time to speculate as to its origin because Agent Youngblood turned in a flash, immediately after the first explosion,
hitting me on the shoulder, and shouted to all of us in the back seat to get down.
I was pushed down by Agent Youngblood.
Almost in the same moment in which he hit or pushed me, he vaulted over the back seat and sat on me.
I was bent over under the weight of Agent Youngblood's body, toward Mrs. Johnson and Senator Yarborough, end quote,
Clifton C. Carter, riding in the Vice President's follow-up car a short distance behind,
reported that Youngblood was in the rear seat using his body to shield the Vice President before the second and third shots were fired.
Other Secret Service agents assigned to the motorcade remained at their posts during the race to the hospital.
None stayed at the scene of the shooting, and none entered the Texas School Book Depository Building at or immediately after the shooting.
Secret Service procedure requires that each agent stay with the person being protected
and not be diverted unless it is necessary to accomplish the protective assignment.
Forrest V. Sorrels, special agent in charge of the Dallas office, was the first Secret Service agent to return to the scene of the assassination,
approximately twenty or twenty-five minutes after the shots were fired.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter two. The Assassination: Part three.
Parkland Memorial Hospital. The Race to the Hospital
In the final instant of the assassination, the Presidential motorcade began a race to Parkland Memorial Hospital,
approximately four miles from the Texas School Book Depository Building.
On receipt of the radio message from Kellerman to the lead car that the President had been hit,
Chief of Police Curry and police motorcyclists at the head of the motorcade led the way to the hospital.
Meanwhile, Chief Curry ordered the police base station to notify Parkland Hospital that the wounded President was en route.
The radio log of the Dallas Police Department shows that at twelve:thirty p.m. on November twenty-two
Chief Curry radioed, quote, Go to the hospital -- Parkland Hospital. Have them stand by, end quote,
A moment later Curry added, quote, Looks like the President has been hit. Have Parkland stand by, end quote,
The base station replied, quote, They have been notified, end quote,
Traveling at speeds estimated at times to be up to seventy or eighty miles per hour down the Stemmons Freeway and Harry Hines Boulevard
the Presidential limousine arrived at the emergency entrance of the Parkland Hospital at about twelve:thirty-five p.m.
Arriving almost simultaneously were the President's follow-up car, the Vice President's automobile, and the Vice President's follow-up car.
Admiral Burkley, the President's physician, arrived at the hospital, quote, between three and five minutes following the arrival of the President, end quote.
since the riders in his car, quote, were not exactly aware what had happened, end quote, and the car went on to the Trade Mart first.
When Parkland Hospital received the notification, the staff in the emergency area was alerted and trauma rooms one and two were prepared.
These rooms were for the emergency treatment of acutely ill or injured patients. Although the first message mentioned an injury only to President Kennedy,
As the President's limousine sped toward the hospital, twelve doctors to the emergency area: surgeons, Drs. Malcolm O. Perry,
Charles R. Baxter, Robert N. McClelland, Ronald C. Jones; the chief neurologist, Dr. William Kemp Clark;
four anesthesiologists, Drs. Marion T. Jenkins, Adolph H. Giesecke, Jr., Jackie H. Hunt,
urological surgeon, Dr Paul C. Peters; an oral surgeon, Dr. Don T. Curtis; and a heart specialist,
Upon arriving at Parkland Hospital,
Lawson jumped from the lead car and rushed into the emergency entrance, where he was met by hospital staff members wheeling stretchers out to the automobile.
Special Agent Hill removed his suit jacket and covered the President's head and upper chest to prevent the taking of photographs.
Governor Connally, who had lost consciousness on the ride to the hospital, regained consciousness when the limousine stopped abruptly at the emergency entrance.
Despite his serious wounds, Governor Connally tried to get out of the way so that medical help could reach the President.
Although he was reclining in his wife's arms, he lurched forward in an effort to stand upright and get out of the car, but he collapsed again.
Then he experienced his first sensation of pain, which became excruciating.
The Governor was lifted onto a stretcher and taken into trauma room two.
For a moment, Mrs. Kennedy refused to release the President, whom she held in her lap,
but then Kellerman, Greer, and Lawson lifted the President onto a stretcher and pushed it into trauma room one.
The first physician to see the President at Parkland Hospital was Dr. Charles J. Carrico, a resident in general surgery.
Dr. Carrico was in the emergency area, examining another patient, when he was notified that President Kennedy was en route to the hospital.
Approximately two minutes later, Dr. Carrico saw the President on his back, being wheeled into the emergency area.
He noted that the President was blue-white or ashen in color; had slow, spasmodic, agonal respiration without any coordination;
made no voluntary movements; had his eyes open with the pupils dilated without any reaction to light,
evidenced no palpable pulse; and had a few chest sounds which were thought to be heartbeats.
On the basis of these findings, Dr. Carrico concluded that President Kennedy was still alive.
Dr. Carrico noted two wounds: a small bullet wound in the front lower neck,
and an extensive wound in the President's head where a sizable portion of the skull was missing.
He observed shredded brain tissue and, quote, considerable slow oozing, end quote, from the latter wound,
followed by, quote, more profuse bleeding, end quote, after some circulation was established.
Dr. Carrico felt the President's back and determined that there was no large wound there which would be an immediate threat to life.
Observing the serious problems presented by the head wound and inadequate respiration, Dr. Carrico directed his attention to improving the President's breathing.
He noted contusions, hematoma to the right of the larynx, which was deviated slightly to the left,
and also ragged tissue which indicated a tracheal injury.
Dr. Carrico inserted a cuffed endotracheal tube past the injury, inflated the cuff, and connected it to a Bennett machine to assist in respiration.
At that point, direction of the President's treatment was undertaken by Dr. Malcolm O. Perry, who arrived at trauma room one a few moments after the President.
Dr. Perry noted the President's back brace as he felt for a femoral pulse, which he did not find.
Observing that an effective airway had to be established if treatment was to be effective, Dr. Perry performed a tracheotomy, which required three to five minutes.
While Dr. Perry was performing the tracheotomy, Drs. Carrico and Ronald Jones made cutdowns on the President's right leg and left arm, respectively,
to infuse blood and fluids into the circulatory system.
Dr. Carrico treated the President's known ad-renal insufficiency by administering hydrocortisone.
Dr. Robert N. McClelland entered at that point and assisted Dr. Perry with the tracheotomy.
Dr. Fouad Bashour, chief of cardiology, Dr. M. T. Jenkins, chief of anesthesiology, and Dr. A. H. Giesecke, Jr.,
then joined in the effort to revive the President.
When Dr. Perry noted free air and blood in the President's chest cavity, he asked that chest tubes be inserted to allow for drainage of blood and air.
Drs. Paul C. Peters and Charles R. Baxter initiated these procedures.
As a result of the infusion of liquids through the cutdowns, the cardiac massage, and the airway,
the doctors were able to maintain peripheral circulation as monitored at the neck (carotid) artery and at the wrist (radial) pulse.
A femoral pulse was also detected in the President's leg.
While these medical efforts were in progress,
Dr. Clark noted some electrical activity on the cardiotachyscope attached to monitor the President's heart responses.
Dr. Clark, who most closely observed the head wound,
described a large, gaping wound in the right rear part of the head, with substantial damage and exposure of brain tissue, and a considerable loss of blood.
Dr. Clark did not see any other hole or wound on the President's head.
According to Dr. Clark, the small bullet hole on the right rear of the President's head discovered during the subsequent autopsy
quote, could have easily been hidden in the blood and hair, end quote,
In the absence of any neurological, muscular, or heart response, the doctors concluded that efforts to revive the President were hopeless.
This was verified by Admiral Burkley, the President's physician, who arrived at the hospital after emergency treatment was underway and concluded that, quote,
my direct services to him at that moment would have interfered with the action of the team which was in progress, end quote,
At approximately one p.m., after last rites were administered to the President by Father Oscar L. Huber, Dr. Clark pronounced the President dead.
He made the official determination because the ultimate cause of death, the severe head injury, was within his sphere of specialization.
The time was fixed at one p.m., as an approximation, since it was impossible to determine the precise moment when life left the President.
President Kennedy could have survived the neck injury, but the head wound was fatal.
From a medical viewpoint, President Kennedy was alive when he arrived at Parkland Hospital;
the doctors observed that he had a heartbeat and was making some respiratory efforts.
But his condition was hopeless, and the extraordinary efforts of the doctors to save him could not help but to have been unavailing.
Since the Dallas doctors directed all their efforts to controlling the massive bleeding caused by the head wound, and to reconstructing an airway to his lungs,
the President remained on his back throughout his medical treatment at Parkland.
When asked why he did not turn the President over, Dr. Carrico testified as follows:
This man was in obvious extreme distress and any more thorough inspection would have involved several minutes -- well, several
considerable time which at this juncture was not available.
A thorough inspection would have involved washing and cleansing the back, and this is not practical in treating an acutely injured patient.
You have to determine which things, which are immediately life threatening and cope with them, before attempting to evaluate the full extent of the injuries.
Did you ever have occasion to look at the President's back?
Answer: No, sir. Before -- well, in trying to treat an acutely injured patient, you have to establish an airway, adequate ventilation
and you have to establish adequate circulation.
Before this was accomplished the President's cardiac activity had ceased and closed cardiac massage was instituted, which made it impossible to inspect his back.
Question: Was any effort made to inspect the President's back after he had expired? Answer: No, sir.
Question: And why was no effort made at that time to inspect his back? Answer:
I suppose nobody really had the heart to do it.
Moreover, the Parkland doctors took no further action after the President had expired because they concluded that it was beyond the scope of their permissible duties.
While one medical team tried to revive President Kennedy, a second performed a series of operations on the bullet wounds sustained by Governor Connally.
Governor Connally was originally seen by Dr. Carrico and Dr. Richard Dulany.
While Dr. Carrico went on to attend the President, Dr. Dulany stayed with the Governor and was soon joined by several other doctors.
At approximately twelve:forty-five p.m., Dr. Robert Shaw,
chief of thoracic surgery, arrived at trauma room two, to take charge of the care of Governor Connally,
whose major wound fell within Dr. Shaw's area of specialization.
Governor Connally had a large sucking wound in the front of the right chest which caused extreme pain and difficulty in breathing.
Rubber tubes were inserted between the second and third ribs to reexpand the right lung, which had collapsed because of the opening in the chest wall.
At one:thirty-five p.m., after Governor Connally had been moved to the operating room, Dr. Shaw started the first operation
by cutting away the edges of the wound on the front of the Governor's chest and suturing the damaged lung and lacerated muscles.
The elliptical wound in the Governor's back, located slightly to the left of the Governor's right armpit approximately five-eighths inch (a centimeter and a half)
in its greatest diameter, was treated by cutting away the damaged skin and suturing the back muscle and skin.
This operation was concluded at three:twenty p.m.
Two additional operations were performed on Governor Connally for wounds which he had not realized he had sustained until he regained consciousness the following day.
From approximately four p.m. to four:fifty p.m. on November twenty-two,
Dr. Charles F. Gregory, chief of orthopedic surgery, operated on the wounds of Governor Connally's right wrist,
assisted by Drs. William Osborne and John Parker.
The wound on the back of the wrist was left partially open for draining, and the wound on the palm side was enlarged, cleansed, and closed.
The fracture was set, and a cast was applied with some traction utilized.
While the second operation was in progress,
Dr. George T. Shires, assisted by Drs. Robert McClelland, Charles Baxter, and Ralph Don Patman,
treated the gunshot wound in the left thigh.
This punctuate missile wound, about two-fifths inch in diameter (one centimeter) and located approximately five inches above the left knee,
was cleansed and closed with sutures; but a small metallic fragment remained in the Governor's leg.
Vice President Johnson at Parkland
As President Kennedy and Governor Connally were being removed from the limousine onto stretchers,
a protective circle of Secret Service agents surrounded Vice President and Mrs. Johnson
and escorted them into Parkland Hospital through the emergency entrance.
The agents moved a nurse and patient out of a nearby room, lowered the shades, and took emergency security measures to protect the Vice President.
Two men from the President's follow-up car were detailed to help protect the Vice President.
An agent was stationed at the entrance to stop anyone who was not a member of the Presidential party.
U.S. Representatives Henry B. Gonzalez,
Jack Brooks, Homer Thornberry, and Albert Thomas joined Clifton C. Carter and the group of special agents protecting the Vice President.
On one occasion Mrs. Johnson, accompanied by two Secret Service agents, left the room to see Mrs. Kennedy and Mrs. Connally.
Concern that the Vice President might also be a target for assassination prompted the Secret Service agents to urge him to leave the hospital and return to Washington immediately.
The Vice President decided to wait until he received definitive word of the President's condition.
At approximately one:twenty p.m., Vice President Johnson was notified by O'Donnell that President Kennedy was dead.
Special Agent Youngblood learned from Mrs. Johnson the location of her two daughters
and made arrangements through Secret Service headquarters in Washington to provide them with protection immediately.
When consulted by the Vice President, O'Donnell advised him to go to the airfield immediately and return to Washington.
It was decided that the Vice President should return on the Presidential plane rather than on the Vice-Presidential plane because it had better communication equipment.
The Vice President conferred with White House Assistant Press Secretary Malcolm Kilduff
and decided that there would be no release of the news of the President's death until the Vice President had left the hospital.
When told that Mrs. Kennedy refused to leave without the President's body, the Vice President said that he would not leave Dallas without her.
On the recommendation of the Secret Service agents, Vice President Johnson decided to board the Presidential airplane, Air Force One,
and wait for Mrs. Kennedy and the President's body.
Secret Service Emergency Security Arrangements
Immediately after President Kennedy's stretcher was wheeled into trauma room one, Secret Service agents took positions at the door of the small emergency room.
A nurse was asked to identify hospital personnel and to tell everyone, except necessary medical staff members, to leave the emergency room.
Other Secret Service agents posted themselves in the corridors and other areas near the emergency room.
Special Agent Lawson made certain that the Dallas police kept the public and press away from the immediate area of the hospital.
Agents Kellerman and Hill telephoned the head of the White House detail, Gerald A. Behn, to advise him of the assassination.
The telephone line to Washington was kept open throughout the remainder of the stay at the hospital.
Secret Service agents stationed at later stops on the President's itinerary of November twenty-two were redeployed.
Men at the Trade Mart were driven to Parkland Hospital in Dallas police cars.
The Secret Service group awaiting the President in Austin were instructed to return to Washington.
Meanwhile, the Secret Service agents in charge of security at Love Field started to make arrangements for departure.
As soon as one of the agents learned of the shooting, he asked the officer in charge of the police detail at the airport
to institute strict security measures for the Presidential aircraft, the airport terminal, and the surrounding area.
The police were cautioned to prevent picture taking.
Secret Service agents working with police cleared the areas adjacent to the aircraft, including warehouses,
other terminal buildings and the neighboring parking lots, of all people.
The agents decided not to shift the Presidential aircraft to the far side of the airport because the original landing area was secure
and a move would require new measures.
When security arrangements at the airport were complete, the Secret Service made the necessary arrangements for the Vice President to leave the hospital.
Unmarked police cars took the Vice President and Mrs. Johnson from Parkland Hospital to Love Field.
Chief Curry drove one automobile occupied by Vice President Johnson, U.S. Representatives Thomas and Thornberry, and Special Agent Youngblood.
In another car Mrs. Johnson was driven to the airport accompanied by Secret Service agents and Representative Brooks.
Motorcade policemen who escorted the automobiles were requested by the Vice President and Agent Youngblood not to use sirens.
During the drive Vice President Johnson, at Youngblood's instruction, kept below window level.
Removal of the President's Body
While the team of doctors at Parkland Hospital tried desperately to save the life of President Kennedy,
Mrs. Kennedy alternated between watching them and waiting outside.
After the President was pronounced dead,
O'Donnell tried to persuade Mrs. Kennedy to leave the area, but she refused.
A casket was obtained and the President's body was prepared for removal.
Before the body could be taken from the hospital,
two Dallas officials informed members of the President's start that the body could not be removed from the city until an autopsy was performed.
Despite the protests of these officials, the casket was wheeled out of the hospital, placed in an ambulance, and transported to the airport shortly after two p.m.
At approximately two:fifteen p.m. the casket was loaded, with some difficulty because of the narrow airplane door,
onto the rear of the Presidential plane where seats had been removed to make room.
Concerned that the local officials might try to prevent the plane's departure, O'Donnell asked that the pilot take off immediately.
He was informed that takeoff would be delayed until Vice President Johnson was sworn in.
Swearing in of the New President
From the Presidential airplane, the Vice President telephoned Attorney General Robert F. Kennedy,
who advised that Mr. Johnson take the Presidential oath of office before the plane left Dallas.
Federal Judge Sarah T. Hughes hastened to the plane to administer the oath.
Members of the Presidential and Vice-Presidential parties filled the central compartment of the plane to witness the swearing in.
At two:thirty-eight p.m., Eastern Standard Time, Lyndon Baines Johnson took the oath of office as the thirty-sixth President of the United States.
Mrs. Kennedy and Mrs. Johnson stood at the side of the new President as he took the oath of office.
Nine minutes later, the Presidential airplane departed for Washington, D.C.
On the return flight, Mrs. Kennedy sat with David Powers, Kenneth O'Donnell, and Lawrence O'Brien.
At five:fifty-eight p.m. Eastern Standard Time,
Air Force One landed at Andrews Air Force Base, where President Kennedy had begun his last trip only thirty-one hours before.
Detailed security arrangements had been made by radio from the President's plane on the return flight.
The public had been excluded from the base, and only Government officials and the press were permitted near the landing area.
Upon arrival, President Johnson made a brief statement over television and radio.
President and Mrs. Johnson were flown by helicopter to the White House, from where Mrs. Johnson was driven to her residence under Secret Service escort.
The President then walked to the Executive Office Building, where he worked until nine p.m.
Given a choice between the National Naval Medical Center at Bethesda, Maryland, and the Army's Walter Reed Hospital,
Mrs. Kennedy chose the hospital in Bethesda for the autopsy because the President had served in the Navy.
Mrs. Kennedy and the Attorney General,
with three Secret Service agents, accompanied President Kennedy's body on the forty-five-minute automobile trip from Andrews Air Force Base to the hospital.
On the seventeenth floor of the Hospital, Mrs. Kennedy and the Attorney General joined other members of the Kennedy family to await the conclusion of the autopsy.
Mrs. Kennedy was guarded by Secret Service agents in quarters assigned to her in the naval hospital.
The Secret Service established a communication system with the White House and screened all telephone calls and visitors.
The hospital received the President's body for autopsy at approximately seven:thirty-five p.m.
X-rays and photographs were taken preliminarily and the pathological examination began at about eight p.m.
The autopsy report noted that President Kennedy was forty-six years of age, seventy-two and one half inches tall,
weighed one hundred seventy pounds, had blue eyes and reddish-brown hair.
The body was muscular and well developed with no gross skeletal abnormalities except for those caused by the gunshot wounds.
Under "Pathological Diagnosis" the cause of death was set forth as "Gunshot wound, head."
The autopsy examination revealed two wounds in the President's head.
One wound, approximately one-fourth of an inch by five-eighths of an inch (six by fifteen millimeters),
was located about an inch (two point five centimeters) to the right and slightly above the large bony protrusion
(external occipital protuberance) which juts out at the center of the lower part of the back of the skull.
The second head wound measured approximately five inches (thirteen centimeters) in its greatest diameter,
but it was difficult to measure accurately because multiple crisscross fractures radiated from the large defect.
During the autopsy examination, Federal agents brought the surgeons three pieces of bone recovered from Elm Street and the Presidential automobile.
When put together, these fragments accounted for approximately three-quarters of the missing portion of the skull.
The surgeons observed, through X-ray analysis, thirty or forty tiny dustlike fragments of metal
running in a line from the wound in the rear of the President's head toward the front part of the skull,
with a sizable metal fragment lying just above the right eye.
From this head wound two small irregularly shaped fragments of metal were recovered and turned over to the FBI.
The autopsy also disclosed a wound near the base of the back of President Kennedy's neck slightly to the right of his spine.
The doctors traced the course of the bullet through the body and, as information was received from Parkland Hospital,
concluded that the bullet had emerged from the front portion of the President's neck that had been cut away by the tracheotomy at Parkland.
The nature and characteristics of this neck wound are discussed fully in the next chapter.
After the autopsy was concluded at approximately eleven p.m., the President's body was prepared for burial.
This was finished at approximately four a.m.
Shortly thereafter, the President's wife, family and aides left Bethesda Naval Hospital.
The President's body was taken to the East Room of the White House where it was placed under ceremonial military guard.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter four. The Assassin: Part one.
The preceding chapter has established that the bullets which killed President Kennedy and wounded Governor Connally
were fired from the southeast corner window of the sixth floor of the Texas School Book Depository Building
and that the weapon which fired these bullets was a Mannlicher-Carcano
six point five-millimeter Italian rifle bearing the serial number C two seven six six.
In this chapter the Commission evaluates the evidence upon which it has based its conclusion concerning the identity of the assassin.
This evidence includes (one) the ownership and possession of the weapon used to commit the assassination,
(two) the means by which the weapon was brought into the Depository Building,
(three) the identity of the person present at the window from which the shots were fired,
(four) the killing of Dallas Patrolman J. D. Tippit within forty-five minutes after the assassination, (five)
the resistance to arrest and the attempted shooting of another police officer by the man (Lee Harvey Oswald) subsequently accused of assassinating President Kennedy
(six) the lies told to the police by Oswald, (seven)
the evidence linking Oswald to the attempted killing of Maj. Gen. Edwin A. Walker (Resigned, U.S. Army) on April ten, nineteen sixty-three,
and (eight) Oswald's capability with a rifle.
Ownership And Possession Of Assassination Weapon
Purchase of Rifle by Oswald
Shortly after the Mannlicher-Carcano rifle was found on the sixth floor of the Texas School Book Depository Building, agents of the FBI
learned from retail outlets in Dallas that Crescent Firearms, Inc., of New York City,
was a distributor of surplus Italian six point five-millimeter military rifles. During the evening of November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three,
a review of the records of Crescent Firearms revealed that the firm had shipped an Italian carbine, serial number C two seven six six,
to Klein's Sporting Goods Co., of Chicago, Illinois.
After searching their records from ten p.m. to four a.m.
the officers of Klein's discovered that a rifle bearing serial number C two seven six six had been shipped to one A. Hidell,
Post Office Box two nine one five, Dallas, Texas, on March twenty, nineteen sixty-three.
According to its microfilm records, Klein's received an order for a rifle on March thirteen, nineteen sixty-three,
on a coupon clipped from the February nineteen sixty-three issue of the American Rifleman magazine.
The order coupon was signed, in handprinting, "A. Hidell, P.O. Box two nine one five, Dallas, Texas."
It was sent in an envelope bearing the same name and return address in handwriting.
Document examiners for the Treasury Department and the FBI testified unequivocally
that the bold printing on the face of the mail-order coupon was in the handprinting of Lee Harvey Oswald and that the writing on the envelope was also his.
Oswald's writing on these and other documents was identified by comparing the writing and printing on the documents in question
with that appearing on documents known to have been written by Oswald, such as his letters, passport application, and endorsements of checks.
In addition to the order coupon the envelope contained a. U.S. postal money order for twenty-one dollars, forty-five cents,
purchased as Number two two zero two one three zero four six two in Dallas, Texas, on March twelve, nineteen sixty-three.
The canceled money order was obtained from the Post Office Department.
Opposite the printed words "Pay To" were written the words "Kleins Sporting Goods,"
and opposite the printed word "From"
were written the words "A. Hidell, P.O. Box two nine one five Dallas, Texas."
These words were also in the handwriting of Lee Harvey Oswald.
From Klein's records it was possible to trace the processing of the order after its receipt.
A bank deposit made on March thirteen, nineteen sixty-three, included an item of twenty-one dollars, forty-five cents. Klein's shipping order form
shows an imprint made by the cash register which recorded the receipt of twenty-one dollars, forty-five cents on March thirteen, nineteen sixty-three.
This price included nineteen dollars, ninety-five cents for the rifle and the scope, and one dollar, fifty cents for postage and handling.
The rifle without the scope cost only twelve dollars, seventy-eight cents.
According to the vice president of Klein's, William Waldman,
the scope was mounted on the rifle by a gunsmith employed by Klein's, and the rifle was shipped fully assembled in accordance with customary company procedures.
The specific rifle shipped against the order had been received by Klein's from Crescent on February twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three.
It bore the manufacturer's serial number C two seven six six.
On that date, Klein's placed an internal control number V C eight three six on this rifle.
According to Klein's shipping order form, one Italian carbine six point five x four x scope,
control number V C eight three six, serial number C two seven six six, was shipped parcel post to
A. Hidell, P.O. Box two nine one five, Dallas, Texas, on March twenty, nineteen sixty-three.
Information received from the Italian Armed Forces Intelligence Service has established that this particular rifle was the only rifle of its type
bearing serial number C two seven six six.
The post office box to which the rifle was shipped was rented to "Lee H. Oswald" from October nine, nineteen sixty-two,
to May fourteen, nineteen sixty-three.
Experts on handwriting identification from the Treasury Department and the FBI
testified that the signature and other writing on the application for that box were in the handwriting of Lee Harvey Oswald
as was a change-of-address card dated May twelve, nineteen sixty-three,
by which Oswald requested that mail addressed to that box be forwarded to him in New Orleans, where he had moved on April twenty-four.
Since the rifle was shipped from Chicago on March twenty, nineteen sixty-three, it was received in Dallas during the period when Oswald rented and used the box.
It is not known whether the application for post office box two nine one five listed "A. Hidell" as a person entitled to receive mail at this box.
In accordance with postal regulations, the portion of the application which lists names of persons, other than the applicant, entitled to receive mail
was thrown away after the box was closed in May nineteen sixty-three.
Postal Inspector Harry D. Holmes of the Dallas Post Office testified, however, that when a package is received for a certain box,
a notice is placed in that box regardless of whether the name on the package is listed on the application as a person entitled to receive mail through that box.
The person having access to the box then takes the notice to the window and is given the package.
Ordinarily, Inspector Holmes testified, identification is not requested because it is assumed that the person with the notice is entitled to the package.
Oswald's use of the name "Hidell" to purchase the assassination weapon was one of several instances in which he used this name as an alias.
When arrested on the day of the assassination, he had in his possession a Smith and Wesson thirty-eight caliber revolver
purchased by mail-order coupon from Seaport-Traders, Inc., a mail-order division of George Rose and Co., Los Angeles.
The mail-order coupon listed the purchaser as "A. J. Hidell Age twenty-eight"
with the address of post office box two nine one five in Dallas.
Handwriting experts from the FBI and the Treasury Department testified that the writing on the mail-order form was that of Lee Harvey Oswald.
Among other identification cards in Oswald's wallet at the time of his arrest were a Selective Service notice of classification,
a Selective Service registration certificate, and a certificate of service in the U.S. Marine Corps, all three cards being in his own name.
Also in his wallet at that time
were a Selective Service notice of classification and a Marine certificate of service in the name of Alek James Hidell.
On the Hidell Selective Service card there appeared a signature, "Alek J. Hidell,"
and the photograph of Lee Harvey Oswald.
Experts on questioned documents from the Treasury Department and the FBI testified that the Hidell cards were counterfeit photographic reproductions
made by photographing the Oswald cards, retouching the resulting negatives, and producing prints from the retouched negatives.
The Hidell signature on the notice of classification was in the handwriting of Oswald.
In Oswald's personal effects found in his room at ten twenty-six North Beckley Avenue in Dallas
was a purported international certificate of vaccination signed by "Dr. A. J. Hideel,
Post Office Box three zero zero one six, New Orleans
It certified that Lee Harvey Oswald had been vaccinated for smallpox on June eight, nineteen sixty-three.
This, too, was a forgery. The signature of "A. J. Hideel" was in the handwriting of Lee Harvey Oswald.
There is no "Dr. Hideel" licensed to practice medicine in Louisiana.
There is no post office box three zero zero one six in the New Orleans Post Office
but Oswald had rented post office box three zero zero six one in New Orleans on June three, nineteen sixty-three,
listing Marina Oswald and A. J. Hidell
as additional persons entitled to receive mail in the box. The New Orleans postal authorities had not discarded the portion of the application
listing the names of those, other than the owner of the box, entitled to receive mail through the box.
Expert testimony confirmed that the writing on this application was that of Lee Harvey Oswald.
Hidell's name on the post office box application was part of Oswald's use of a nonexistent Hidell
to serve as president of the so-called New Orleans Chapter of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
testified that she first learned of Oswald's use of the fictitious name "Hidell" in connection with his pro-Castro activities in New Orleans.
According to her testimony, he compelled her to write the name "Hidell" on membership cards in the space designated for the signature of the "Chapter President."
The name "Hidell" was stamped on some of the "Chapter's" printed literature and on the membership application blanks.
quote, I knew there was no such organization. And I know Hidell is merely an altered Fidel, and I laughed at such foolishness.
end quote. Hidell was a fictitious president of an organization of which Oswald was the only member.
When seeking employment in New Orleans,
Oswald listed a "Sgt. Robert Hidell" as a reference on one job application and "George Hidell" as a reference on another.
Both names were found to be fictitious.
Moreover, the use of "Alek" as a first name for Hidell is a further link to Oswald because "Alek" was Oswald's nickname in Russia.
Letters received by Marina Oswald from her husband signed "Alek" were given to the Commission.
Oswald's Palmprint on Rifle Barrel
Based on the above evidence, the Commission concluded that Oswald purchased the rifle found on the sixth floor of the Depository Building.
Additional evidence of ownership was provided in the form of palmprint identification which indicated that Oswald had possession of the rifle he had purchased.
A few minutes after the rifle was discovered on the sixth floor of the Depository Building
it was examined by Lt. J. C. Day of the identification bureau of the Dallas police.
He lifted the rifle by the wooden stock after his examination convinced him that the wood was too rough to take fingerprints.
Capt. J. W. Fritz then ejected a cartridge by operating the bolt,
but only after Day viewed the knob on the bolt through a magnifying glass and found no prints.
Day continued to examine the rifle with the magnifying glass, looking for possible fingerprints.
He applied fingerprint powder to the side of the metal housing near the trigger, and noticed traces of two prints.
At eleven:forty-five p.m. on November twenty-two,
the rifle was released to the FBI and forwarded to Washington where it was examined on the morning of November twenty-three
by Sebastian F. Latona, supervisor of the Latent Fingerprint Section of the FBI's Identification Division.
In his testimony before the Commission, Latona stated that when he received the rifle, the area where prints were visible was protected by cellophane.
He examined these prints, as well as photographs of them which the Dallas police had made, and concluded that:
the formations, the ridge formations and characteristics, were insufficient for purposes of either effecting identification
or a determination that the print was not identical with the prints of people.
Accordingly, my opinion simply was that the latent prints which were there were of no value, end quote.
Latona then processed the complete weapon but developed no identifiable prints.
He stated that the poor quality of the wood and the metal would cause the rifle to absorb moisture from the skin, thereby making a clear print unlikely.
On November twenty-two, however, before surrendering possession of the rifle to the FBI Laboratory,
Lieutenant Day of the Dallas Police Department had "lifted" a palmprint from the underside of the gun barrel
quote, near the firing end of the barrel about three inches under the woodstock when I took the woodstock loose, end quote,
Lifting a print involves the use of adhesive material to remove the fingerprint powder which adheres to the original print.
In this way the powdered impression is actually removed from the object.
The lifting had been so complete in this case that there was no trace of the print on the rifle itself when it was examined by Latona.
Nor was there any indication that the lift had been performed.
Day, on the other hand, believed that sufficient traces of the print had been left on the rifle barrel,
because he did not release the lifted print until November twenty-six, when he received instructions to send "everything that we had" to the FBI.
The print arrived in the FBI Laboratory in Washington on November twenty-nine, mounted on a card on which Lieutenant Day had written the words
quote, off underside gun barrel near end of grip C two seven six six, end quote,
The print's positive identity as having been lifted from the rifle
was confirmed by FBI Laboratory tests which established that the adhesive material bearing the print
also bore impressions of the same irregularities that appeared on the barrel of the rifle.
Latona testified that this palmprint was the right palmprint of Lee Harvey Oswald.
At the request of the Commission, Arthur Mandella,
fingerprint expert with the New York City Police Department, conducted an independent examination and also determined that this was the right palmprint of Oswald.
Latona's findings were also confirmed by Ronald G. Wittmus, another FBI fingerprint expert.
In the opinion of these experts, it was not possible to estimate the time which elapsed between the placing of the print on the rifle and the date of the lift.
Experts testifying before the Commission agreed that palmprints are as unique as fingerprints for purposes of establishing identification.
Oswald's palmprint on the underside of the barrel demonstrates that he handled the rifle when it was disassembled.
A palmprint could not be placed on this portion of the rifle, when assembled, because the wooden foregrip covers the barrel at this point.
The print is additional proof that the rifle was in Oswald's possession.
In a crevice between the butt plate of the rifle and the wooden stock
was a tuft of several cotton fibers of dark blue, gray-black, and orange-yellow shades.
On November twenty-three, nineteen sixty-three,
these fibers were examined by Paul M. Stombaugh, a special agent assigned to the Hair and Fiber Unit of the FBI Laboratory.
He compared them with the fibers found in the shirt which Oswald was wearing when arrested in the Texas Theatre.
This shirt was also composed of dark blue, gray- black and orange-yellow cotton fibers.
Stombaugh testified that the colors, shades, and twist of the fibers found in the tuft on the rifle matched those in Oswald's shirt.
Stombaugh explained in his testimony that in fiber analysis, as distinct from fingerprint or firearms identification,
it is not possible to state with scientific certainty that a particular small group of fibers come from a certain piece of clothing
to the exclusion of all others because there are not enough microscopic characteristics present in fibers.
Judgments as to probability will depend on the number and types of matches.
He concluded, quote, There is no doubt in my mind that these fibers could have come from this shirt.
There is no way, however, to eliminate the possibility of the fibers having come from another identical shirt, end quote,
Having considered the probabilities as explained in Stombaugh's testimony,
the Commission has concluded that the fibers in the tuft on the rifle most probably came from the shirt worn by Oswald when he was arrested,
and that this was the same shirt which Oswald wore on the morning of the assassination.
Marina Oswald testified that she thought her husband wore this shirt to work on that day.
The testimony of those who saw him after the assassination was inconclusive about the color of Oswald's shirt,
but Mary Bledsoe, a former landlady of Oswald, saw him on a bus approximately ten minutes after the assassination
and identified the shirt as being the one worn by Oswald primarily because of a distinctive hole in the shirt's right elbow.
Moreover, the bus transfer which he obtained as he left the bus was still in the pocket when he was arrested.
Although Oswald returned to his roominghouse after the assassination and when questioned by the police, claimed to have changed his shirt,
the evidence indicates that he continued wearing the same shirt which he was wearing all morning and which he was still wearing when arrested.
In light of these findings the Commission evaluated the additional testimony of Stombaugh
that the fibers were caught in the crevice of the rifle's butt plate, quote, in the recent past, end quote,
Although Stombaugh was unable to estimate the period of time the fibers were on the rifle he said that the fibers, quote,
were clean, they had good color to them, there was no grease on them and they were not fragmented. They looked as if they had just been picked up, end quote.
The relative freshness of the fibers is strong evidence that they were caught on the rifle on the morning of the assassination or during the preceding evening.
For ten days prior to the eve of the assassination Oswald had not been present at Ruth Paine's house in Irving, Texas, where the rifle was kept.
Moreover, the Commission found no reliable evidence that Oswald used the rifle at any time between September twenty-three,
when it was transported from New Orleans, and November twenty-two, the day of the assassination.
The fact that on the morning of the assassination Oswald was wearing the shirt from which these relatively fresh fibers most probably originated,
provides some evidence that they were placed on the rifle that day
since there was limited, if any, opportunity for Oswald to handle the weapon during the two months prior to November twenty-two.
On the other hand Stombaugh pointed out that fibers might retain their freshness if the rifle had been
quote, put aside, end quote, after catching the fibers.
The rifle used in the assassination probably had been wrapped in a blanket for about eight weeks prior to November twenty-two.
Because the relative freshness of these fibers might be explained by the continuous storage of the rifle in the blanket,
the Commission was unable to reach any firm conclusion as to when the fibers were caught in the rifle.
The Commission was able to conclude, however, that the fibers most probably came from Oswald's shirt.
This adds to the conviction of the Commission that Oswald owned and handled the weapon used in the assassination.
Photograph of Oswald With Rifle
During the period from March two, nineteen sixty-three, to April twenty-four, nineteen sixty-three,
the Oswalds lived on Neely Street in Dallas in a rented house which had a small back yard.
One Sunday, while his wife was hanging diapers, Oswald asked her to take a picture of him holding a rifle, a pistol
and issues of two newspapers later identified as the Worker and the Militant.
Two pictures were taken. The Commission has concluded that the rifle shown in these pictures is the same rifle which was found on the sixth floor of the Depository Building
on November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three. One of these pictures, Exhibit Number one thirty-three A, shows most of the rifle's configuration.
Special Agent Lyndal L. Shaneyfelt, a photography expert with the FBI,
photographed the rifle used in the assassination, attempting to duplicate the position of the rifle and the lighting in Exhibit Number one thirty-three A.
After comparing the rifle in the simulated photograph with the rifle in Exhibit Number one thirty-three A, Shaneyfelt testified, quote,
I found it to be the same general configuration. All appearances were the same, end quote,
He found, quote, one notch in the stock at this point that appears very faintly in the photograph, end quote.
He stated, however, that while he, quote, found no differences, end quote, between the rifles in the two photographs, he could not make a, quote, positive identification
to the exclusion of all other rifles of the same general configuration, end quote.
The authenticity of these pictures has been established by expert testimony which links the second picture,
Commission Exhibit Number one thirty-three B, to Oswald's Imperial Reflex camera, with which Marina Oswald testified she took the pictures.
The negative of that picture, Commission Exhibit Number one thirty-three B, was found among Oswald's possessions.
Using a recognized technique of determining whether a picture was taken with a particular camera,
Shaneyfelt compared this negative with a negative which he made by taking a new picture with Oswald's camera.
He concluded that the negative of Exhibit Number one thirty-three B was exposed in Oswald's Imperial Reflex camera to the exclusion of all other cameras.
He could not test Exhibit Number one thirty-three A in the same way because the negative was never recovered.
Both pictures, however, have identical backgrounds and lighting and, judging from the shadows, were taken at the same angle.
They are photographs of the same scene.
Since Exhibit Number one thirty-three B was taken with Oswald's camera,
it is reasonably certain that Exhibit Number one thirty-three A was taken by the same camera at the same time, as Marina Oswald testified.
Moreover, Shaneyfelt testified that in his opinion the photographs were not composites of two different photographs
and that Oswald's face had not been superimposed on another body.
One of the photographs taken by Marina Oswald was widely published in newspapers and magazines,
and in many instances the details of these pictures differed from the original, and even from each other, particularly as to the configuration of the rifle.
The Commission sought to determine whether these photographs were touched prior to publication.
Shaneyfelt testified that the published photographs appeared to be based on a copy of the original which the publications had each retouched differently.
Several of the publications furnished the Commission with the prints they had used, or described by correspondence the retouching they had done.
This information enabled the Commission to conclude
that the published pictures were the same as the original except for retouching done by these publications, apparently for the purpose of clarifying the lines of the rifle
and other details in the picture.
The dates surrounding the taking of this picture and the purchase of the rifle
reinforce the belief that the rifle in the photograph is the rifle which Oswald bought from Klein's.
The rifle was shipped from Klein's in Chicago on March twenty, nineteen sixty-three, at a time when the Oswalds were living on Neely Street.
From an examination of one of the photographs, the Commission determined the dates of the issues of the Militant and the Worker which Oswald was holding in his hand.
By checking the actual mailing dates of these issues and the time it usually takes to effect delivery to Dallas,
it was established that the photographs must have been taken sometime after March twenty-seven.
Marina Oswald testified that the photographs were taken on a Sunday about two weeks before the attempted shooting of Maj. Gen. Edwin A. Walker
on April ten, nineteen sixty-three.
By Sunday, March thirty-one, nineteen sixty-three,
ten days prior to the Walker attempt, Oswald had undoubtedly received the rifle shipped from Chicago on March twenty,
the revolver shipped from Los Angeles on the same date, and the two newspapers which he was holding in the picture.
Marina Oswald testified that the rifle found on the sixth floor of the Depository Building was the "fateful rifle of Lee Oswald."
Moreover, it was the only rifle owned by her husband following his return from the Soviet Union in June nineteen sixty-two.
It had been purchased in March nineteen sixty-three, and taken to New Orleans where Marina Oswald saw it in their rented apartment
during the summer of nineteen sixty-three.
It appears from his wife's testimony
that Oswald may have sat on the screened-in porch at night practicing with the rifle by looking through the telescopic sight and operating the bolt.
Oswald loaded their possessions into a station wagon owned by Ruth Paine, who had invited Marina Oswald and the baby to live at her home in Irving, Texas.
Marina Oswald has stated that the rifle was among these possessions, although Ruth Paine testified that she was not aware of it.
From September twenty-four, nineteen sixty-three, when Marina Oswald arrived in Irving from New Orleans, until the morning of the assassination,
the rifle was, according to the evidence, stored in a green and brown blanket in the Paines' garage among the Oswalds' other possessions.
About one week after the return from New Orleans,
Marina Oswald was looking in the garage for parts to the baby's crib and thought that the parts might be in the blanket.
When she started to open the blanket, she saw the stock of the rifle.
Ruth and Michael Paine both noticed the rolled-up blanket in the garage during the time that Marina Oswald was living in their home.
On several occasions, Michael Paine moved the blanket in the garage.
He thought it contained tent poles, or possibly other camping equipment such as a folding shovel.
When he appeared before the Commission, Michael Paine lifted the blanket
with the rifle wrapped inside and testified that it appeared to be the same approximate weight and shape as the package in his garage.
About three hours after the assassination, a detective and deputy sheriff saw the blanket-roll,
tied with a string, lying on the floor of the Paines' garage.
Each man testified that he thought he could detect the outline of a rifle in the blanket, even though the blanket was empty.
Paul M. Stombaugh, of the FBI Laboratory,
examined the blanket and discovered a bulge approximately ten inches long midway in the blanket.
This bulge was apparently caused by a hard protruding object which had stretched the blanket's fibers.
It could have been caused by the telescopic sight of the rifle which was approximately eleven inches long.
Having reviewed the evidence that (one) Lee Harvey Oswald purchased the rifle used in the assassination,
(two) Oswald's palmprint was on the rifle in a position which shows that he had handled it while it was disassembled,
(three) fibers found on the rifle most probably came from the shirt Oswald was wearing on the day of the assassination,
(four) a photograph taken in the yard of Oswald's apartment showed him holding this rifle, and (five)
the rifle was kept among Oswald's possessions from the time of its purchase until the day of the assassination,
the Commission concluded that the rifle used to assassinate President Kennedy and wound Governor Connally was owned and possessed by Lee Harvey Oswald.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter four. The Assassin: Part two.
The rifle in the building.
The Commission has evaluated the evidence tending to show how Lee Harvey Oswald's Mannlicher-Carcano rifle, serial number C two seven six six,
was brought into the Depository Building, where it was found on the sixth floor shortly after the assassination.
In this connection the Commission considered (one)
the circumstances surrounding Oswald's return to Irving, Texas, on Thursday, November twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three,
(two) the disappearance of the rifle from its normal place of storage, (three)
Oswald's arrival at the Depository Building on November twenty-two, carrying a long and bulky brown paper package,
the presence of a long handmade brown paper bag near the point from which the shots were fired, and (five) the palmprint,
fiber, and paper analyses linking Oswald and the assassination weapon to this bag.
During October and November of nineteen sixty-three,
Lee Harvey Oswald lived in a roominghouse in Dallas while his wife and children lived in Irving, at the home of Ruth Paine,
approximately fifteen miles from Oswald's place of work at the Texas School Book Depository.
Oswald traveled between Dallas and Irving on weekends in a car driven by a neighbor of the Paines, Buell Wesley Frazier,
who also worked at the Depository.
Oswald generally would go to Irving on Friday afternoon and return to Dallas Monday morning.
According to the testimony of Frazier, Marina Oswald, and Ruth Paine, it appears that Oswald never returned to Irving in midweek
prior to November twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three, except on Monday, October twenty-one, when he visited his wife in the hospital
after the birth of their second child.
During the morning of November twenty-one, Oswald asked Frazier whether he could ride home with him that afternoon.
Frazier, surprised, asked him why he was going to Irving on Thursday night rather than Friday.
Oswald replied, quote, I'm going home to get some curtain rods to put in an apartment, end quote.
The two men left work at four:forty p.m. and drove to Irving.
There was little conversation between them on the way home.
Mrs. Linnie Mae Randle, Frazier's sister, commented to her brother about Oswald's unusual midweek return to Irving.
Frazier told her that Oswald had come home to get curtain rods.
It would appear, however, that obtaining curtain rods was not the purpose of Oswald's trip to Irving on November twenty-one.
Mrs. A. C. Johnson, his landlady, testified that Oswald's room at ten twenty-six North Beckley Avenue
had curtains and curtain rods, and that Oswald had never discussed the subject with her.
In the Paines' garage, along with many other objects of a household character,
there were two flat lightweight curtain rods belonging to Ruth Paine but they were still there on Friday afternoon after Oswald's arrest.
Oswald never asked Mrs. Paine about the use of curtain rods,
and Marina Oswald testified that Oswald did not say anything about curtain rods on the day before the assassination.
No curtain rods were known to have been discovered in the Depository Building after the assassination.
In deciding whether Oswald carried a rifle to work in a long paper bag on November twenty-two,
the Commission gave weight to the fact that Oswald gave a false reason for returning home on November twenty-one,
and one which provided an excuse for the carrying of a bulky package the following morning.
Before dinner on November twenty-one, Oswald played on the lawn of the Paines' home with his daughter June.
After dinner Ruth Paine and Marina Oswald were busy cleaning house and preparing their children for bed.
Between the hours of eight and nine p.m. they were occupied with the children in the bedrooms located at the extreme east end of the house.
On the west end of the house is the attached garage, which can be reached from the kitchen or from the outside.
In the garage were the personal belongings of the Oswald family including, as the evidence has shown, the rifle wrapped in the old brown and green blanket.
At approximately nine p.m., after the children had been put to bed, Mrs. Paine, according to her testimony before the Commission, quote,
went out to the garage to paint some children's blocks, and worked in the garage for half an hour or so.
I noticed when I went out that the light was on, end quote,
Mrs. Paine was certain that she had not left the light on in the garage after dinner.
According to Mrs. Paine, Oswald had gone to bed by nine p.m.;
Marina Oswald testified that it was between nine and ten p.m.
Neither Marina Oswald nor Ruth Paine saw Oswald in the garage.
The period between eight and nine p.m., however, provided ample opportunity for Oswald to prepare the rifle for his departure the next morning.
Only if disassembled could the rifle fit into the paper bag found near the window from which the shots were fired.
A firearms expert with the FBI assembled the rifle in six minutes using a ten-cent coin as a tool,
and he could disassemble it more rapidly.
While the rifle may have already been disassembled when Oswald arrived home on Thursday, he had ample time that evening to disassemble the rifle
and insert it into the paper bag.
On the day of the assassination, Marina Oswald was watching television when she learned of the shooting.
A short time later Mrs. Paine told her that someone had shot the President, quote, from the building in which Lee is working, end quote.
Marina Oswald testified that at that time, quote, My heart dropped.
I then went to the garage to see whether the rifle was there and I saw that the blanket was still there and I said Thank God, end quote.
She did not unroll the blanket. She saw that it was in its usual position and it appeared to her to have something inside.
Soon afterward, at about three p.m., police officers arrived and searched the house.
Mrs. Paine pointed out that most of the Oswalds' possessions were in the garage.
With Ruth Paine acting as an interpreter, Detective Rose asked Marina whether her husband had a rifle.
Mrs. Paine, who had no knowledge of the rifle, first said "No," but when the question was translated, Marina Oswald replied "Yes."
She pointed to the blanket which was on the floor very close to where Ruth Paine was standing.
As she [Marina] told me about it I stepped onto the blanket roll
And she indicated to me that she had peered into this roll and saw a portion of what she took to be a gun she knew her husband to have, a rifle.
And I then translated this to the officers that she knew that her husband had a gun that he had stored in here.
I then stepped off of it and the officer picked it up in the middle and it bent so.
Mrs. Paine had the actual blanket before her as she testified and she indicated that the blanket hung limp in the officer's hand.
Marina Oswald testified that this was her first knowledge that the rifle was not in its accustomed place.
The Long and Bulky Package
On the morning of November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three,
Lee Harvey Oswald left the Paine house in Irving at approximately seven:fifteen a.m., while Marina Oswald was still in bed.
Neither she nor Mrs. Paine saw him leave the house. About half-a-block away from the Paine house was the residence of Mrs. Linnie Mae Randle,
sister of the man with whom Oswald drove to work -- Buell Wesley Frazier.
Mrs. Randle stated that on the morning of November twenty-two, while her brother was eating breakfast,
she looked out the breakfast-room window and saw Oswald cross the street and walk toward the driveway where her brother parked his car near the carport.
He carried a, quote, heavy brown bag, end quote.
Oswald gripped the bag in his right hand near the top, quote, It tapered like this as he hugged it in his hand.
It was more bulky toward the bottom, end quote, than toward the top.
She then opened the kitchen door and saw Oswald open the right rear door of her brother's car and place the package in the back of the car.
Mrs. Randle estimated that the package was approximately twenty-eight inches long and about eight inches wide.
She thought that its color was similar to that of the bag found on the sixth floor of the School Book Depository after the assassination.
Frazier met Oswald at the kitchen door and together they walked to the car.
After entering the car, Frazier glanced over his shoulder and noticed a brown paper package on the back seat.
He asked, quote, What's the package, Lee? End quote. Oswald replied, quote, curtain rods, end quote.
Frazier told the Commission, quote,
the main reason he was going over there that Thursday afternoon when he was to bring back some curtain rods, so I didn't think any more about it when he told me that, end quote,
Frazier estimated that the bag was two feet long, quote, give and take a few inches, end quote, and about five or six inches wide.
As they sat in the car, Frazier asked Oswald where his lunch was, and Oswald replied that he was going to buy his lunch that day.
Frazier testified that Oswald carried no lunch bag that day.
quote, when he rode with me, I say he always brought lunch except that one day on November twenty-two he didn't bring his lunch that day, end quote,
Frazier parked the car in the company parking lot about two blocks north of the Depository Building.
Oswald left the car first, picked up the brown paper bag, and proceeded toward the building ahead of Frazier.
Frazier walked behind and as they crossed the railroad tracks he watched the switching of the cars.
Frazier recalled that one end of the package was under Oswald's armpit and the lower part was held with his right hand
so that it was carried straight and parallel to his body.
When Oswald entered the rear door of the Depository Building, he was about fifty feet ahead of Frazier.
It was the first time that Oswald had not walked with Frazier from the parking lot to the building entrance.
When Frazier entered the building, he did not see Oswald.
believed that he saw Oswald coming to work, but he does not remember that Oswald had anything in his hands as he entered the door.
No other employee has been found who saw Oswald enter that morning.
In deciding whether Oswald carried the assassination weapon in the bag which Frazier and Mrs. Randle saw,
the Commission has carefully considered the testimony of these two witnesses with regard to the length of the bag.
Frazier and Mrs. Randle testified
that the bag which Oswald was carrying was approximately twenty-seven or twenty-eight inches long, whereas the wooden stock of the rifle, which is its largest component,
measured thirty-four point eight inches.
The bag found on the sixth floor was eighty-eight inches long.
When Frazier appeared before the Commission and was asked to demonstrate how Oswald carried the package, he said, quote, Like I said,
I remember that I didn't look at the package very much but when I did look at it he did have his hands on the package like that, end quote, and at this point
Frazier placed the upper part of the package under his armpit and attempted to cup his right hand beneath the bottom of the bag.
The disassembled rifle was too long to be carried in this manner.
Similarly, when the butt of the rifle was placed in Frazier's hand, it extended above his shoulder to ear level.
Moreover, in an interview on December one, nineteen sixty-three, with agents of the FBI, Frazier had marked the point on the back seat of his car
which he believed was where the bag reached when it was laid on the seat with one edge against the door.
The distance between the point on the seat and the door was twenty-seven inches.
Mrs. Randle said, when shown the paper bag,
that the bag she saw Oswald carrying, quote, wasn't that long, I mean it was folded down at the top as I told you. It definitely wasn't that long, end quote,
And she folded the bag to length of about twenty-eight and a half inches.
Frazier doubted whether the bag that Oswald carried was as wide as the bag found on the sixth floor, although Mrs. Randle testified
that the width was approximately the same.
The Commission has weighed the visual recollection of Frazier and Mrs. Randle against the evidence here presented
that the bag Oswald carried contained the assassination weapon and has concluded that Frazier and Randle are mistaken as to the length of the bag.
Mrs. Randle saw the bag fleetingly
and her first remembrance is that it was held in Oswald's right hand, quote, and it almost touched the ground as he carried it, end quote.
Frazier's view of the bag was from the rear. He continually advised that he was not paying close attention. For example, he said, quote,
I didn't pay too much attention the way he was walking because I was walking along there looking at the railroad cars and watching the men on the diesel switch them cars
and I didn't pay too much attention on how he carried the package at all, end quote.
Frazier could easily have been mistaken when he stated that Oswald held the bottom of the bag cupped in his hand with the upper end tucked into his armpit.
A handmade bag of wrapping paper and tape was found in the southeast corner of the sixth floor alongside the window from which the shots were fired.
It was not a standard type bag which could be obtained in a store and it was presumably made for a particular purpose.
It was the appropriate size to contain, in disassembled form,
Oswald's Mannlicher-Carcano rifle, serial Number C two seven six six, which was also found on the sixth floor.
Three cartons had been placed at the window apparently to act as a gun rest and a fourth carton was placed behind those at the window.
A person seated on the fourth carton could assemble the rifle without being seen from the rest of the sixth floor
because the cartons stacked around the southeast corner would shield him.
The presence of the bag in this corner is cogent evidence that it was used as the container for the rifle.
At the time the bag was found, Lieutenant Day of the Dallas police wrote on it, quote, Found next to the sixth floor window gun fired from.
May have been used to carry gun. Lt. J. C. Day, end quote.
Scientific Evidence Linking Rifle and Oswald to Paper Bag
Oswald's fingerprint and palmprint found on bag.
Using a standard chemical method involving silver nitrates
the FBI Laboratory developed a latent palmprint and latent fingerprint on the bag.
Sebastian F. Latona, supervisor of the FBI's Latent Fingerprint Section,
identified these prints as the left index fingerprint and right palmprint of Lee Harvey Oswald
The portion of the palm which was identified was the heel of the right palm, i.e., the area near the wrist, on the little finger side.
These prints were examined independently by Ronald G. Wittmus of the FBI,
and by Arthur Mandella, a fingerprint expert with the New York City Police Department.
Both concluded that the prints were the right palm and left index finger of Lee Oswald. No other identifiable prints were found on the bag.
Oswald's palmprint on the bottom of the paper bag indicated, of course, that he had handled the bag.
Furthermore, it was consistent with the bag having contained a heavy or bulky object when he handled it since a light object is usually held by the fingers.
The palmprint was found on the closed end of the bag.
It was from Oswald's right hand, in which he carried the long package as he walked from Frazier's car to the building.
Materials used to make bag.
On the day of the assassination, the Dallas police obtained a sample of wrapping paper and tape
from the shipping room of the Depository and forwarded it to the FBI Laboratory in Washington.
James C. Cadigan, a questioned-documents expert with the Bureau, compared the samples with the paper and tape in the actual bag.
In all of the observations and physical tests that I made I found the bag and the paper sample were the same, end quote.
Among other tests, the paper and tape were submitted to fiber analysis and spectrographic examination.
In addition the tape was compared to determine whether the sample tape and the tape on the bag had been taken from the tape dispensing machine at the Depository.
When asked to explain the similarity of characteristics, Cadigan stated, quote, well briefly
it would be the thickness of both the paper and the tape, the color under various lighting conditions of both the paper and the tape,
the width of the tape, the knurled markings on the surface of the fiber, the texture of the fiber, the letting pattern
I found that the paper sack found on the sixth floor and the sample
had the same observable characteristics both under the microscope and all the visual tests that I could conduct.
The papers I also found were similar in fiber composition, therefore, in addition to the visual characteristics,
microscopic and UV (ultra violet) characteristics, end quote.
Mr. Cadigan concluded that the paper and tape from the bag were identical in all respects to the sample paper and tape
taken from the Texas School Book Depository shipping room on November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three.
On December one, nineteen sixty-three, a replica bag was made from materials found on that date in the shipping room.
This was done as an investigatory aid
since the original bag had been discolored during various laboratory examinations and could not be used for valid identification by witnesses.
Cadigan found that the paper used to make this replica sack had different characteristics from the paper in the original bag.
The science of paper analysis enabled him to distinguish between different rolls of paper even though they were produced by the same manufacturer.
Since the Depository normally used approximately one roll of paper every three working days,
it was not surprising that the replica sack made on December one, nineteen sixty-three,
had different characteristics from both the actual bag and the sample taken on November twenty-two.
On the other hand, since two rolls could be made from the same batch of paper,
one cannot estimate when, prior to November twenty-two, Oswald made the paper bag.
However, the complete identity of characteristics between the paper and tape in the bag found on the sixth floor
and the paper and tape found in the shipping room of the Depository on November twenty-two
enabled the Commission to conclude that the bag was made from these materials.
The Depository shipping department was on the first floor to which Oswald had access in the normal performance of his duties filling orders.
Fibers in paper bag matched fibers in blanket
When Paul M. Stombaugh of the FBI Laboratory examined the paper bag,
he found, on the inside, a single brown delustered viscose fiber and several light green cotton fibers.
The blanket in which the rifle was stored was composed of brown and green cotton, viscose and woolen fibers.
The single brown viscose fiber found in the bag matched some of the brown viscose fibers from the blanket in all observable characteristics.
The green cotton fibers found in the paper bag matched some of the green cotton fibers in the blanket
quote, in all observable microscopic characteristics, end quote.
Despite these matches, however, Stombaugh was unable to render on opinion that the fibers which he found in the bag had probably come from the blanket,
because other types of fibers present in the blanket were not found in the bag.
All I would say here is that it is possible that these fibers could have come from this blanket.
because this blanket is composed of brown and green woolen fibers, brown and green delustered viscose fibers, and brown and green cotton fibers.
We found no brown cotton fibers, no green viscose fibers, and no woolen fibers.
So if I found all of these then I would have been able to say these fibers probably had come from this blanket. But since I found so few,
then I would say the possibility exists, these fibers could have come from this blanket, end quote.
Stombaugh confirmed that the rifle could have picked up fibers from the blanket and transferred them to the paper bag.
In light of the other evidence linking Lee Harvey Oswald, the blanket, and the rifle to the paper bag found on the sixth floor,
the Commission considered Stombaugh's testimony of probative value in deciding whether Oswald carried the rifle into the building in the paper bag.
The preponderance of the evidence supports the conclusion that Lee Harvey Oswald (one)
told the curtain rod story to Frazier to explain both the return to Irving on a Thursday
and the obvious bulk of the package which he intended to bring to work the next day;
(two) took paper and tape from the wrapping bench of the Depository and fashioned a bag large enough to carry the disassembled rifle;
(three) removed the rifle from the blanket in the Paines' garage on Thursday evening;
(four) carried the rifle into the Depository Building, concealed in the bag;
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter four. The Assassin: Part three.
Lee Harvey Oswald was hired on October fifteen, nineteen sixty-three, by the Texas School Book Depository as an "order filler."
He worked principally on the first and sixth floors of the building, gathering books listed on orders and delivering them to the shipping room on the first floor.
He had ready access to the sixth floor, from the southeast corner window of which the shots were fired.
The Commission evaluated the physical evidence found near the window after the assassination and the testimony of eyewitnesses
in deciding whether Lee Harvey Oswald was present at this window at the time of the assassination.
Palmprints and Fingerprints on Cartons and Paper Bag
Below the southeast corner window on the sixth floor was a large carton of books
measuring approximately eighteen by twelve by fourteen inches which had been moved from a stack along the south wall.
Atop this carton was a small carton marked "Rolling Readers," measuring approximately thirteen by nine by eight inches.
In front of this small carton and resting partially on the windowsill was another small "Rolling Readers" carton.
These two small cartons had been moved from a stack about three aisles away.
The boxes in the window appeared to have been arranged as a convenient gun rest.
Behind these boxes was another carton placed on the floor on which a man sitting
could look southwesterly down Elm Street over the top of the "Rolling Readers" cartons.
Next to these cartons was the handmade paper bag, previously discussed,
on which appeared the print of the left index finger and right palm of Lee Harvey Oswald.
The cartons were forwarded to the FBI in Washington.
Sebastian F. Latona, supervisor of the Latent Fingerprint Section,
testified that twenty identifiable fingerprints and eight palmprints were developed on these cartons.
The carton on the windowsill and the large carton below the window contained no prints which could be identified as being those of Lee Harvey Oswald.
The other "Rolling Readers" carton, however, contained a palmprint and a fingerprint which were identified by Latona
as being the left palmprint and right index fingerprint of Lee Harvey Oswald.
The Commission has considered the possibility that the cartons might have been moved in connection with the work that was being performed on the sixth floor on November twenty-two.
Depository employees were laying a new floor at the west end and transferring books from the west to the east end of the building.
The "Rolling Readers" cartons, however, had not been moved by the floor layers and had apparently been taken to the window from their regular position for some particular purpose.
The "Rolling Readers" boxes contained, instead of books, light blocks used as reading aids.
They could be easily adjusted and were still solid enough to serve as a gun rest.
The box on the floor, behind the three near the window,
had been one of these moved by the floor layers from the west wall to near the east side of the building in preparation for the laying of the floor.
During the afternoon of November twenty-two,
Lieutenant Day of the Dallas police dusted this carton with powder and developed a palmprint on the top edge of the carton on the side nearest the window.
The position of this palmprint on the carton was parallel with the long axis of the box, and at right angles with the short axis;
the bottom of the palm rested on the box.
Someone sitting on the box facing the window would have his palm in this position if he placed his hand alongside his right hip.
This print which had been cut out of the box was also forwarded to the FBI and Latona identified it as Oswald's right palmprint.
not too long, end quote, a time had elapsed between the time that the print was placed on the carton and the time that it had been developed by the Dallas police.
Although Bureau experiments had shown that twenty-four hours was a likely maximum time, Latona stated
that he could only testify with certainty that the print was less than three days old.
The print, therefore, could have been placed on the carton at any time within this period.
The freshness of this print could be estimated only because the Dallas police developed it through the use of powder.
Since cartons absorb perspiration, powder can successfully develop a print on such material only within a limited time.
When the FBI in Washington received the cartons, the remaining prints, including Oswald's on the Rolling Readers carton,
were developed by chemical processes.
The freshness of prints developed in this manner cannot be estimated,
so no conclusions can be drawn as to whether these remaining prints preceded or followed the print developed in Dallas by powder.
Most of the prints were found to have been placed on the cartons by an FBI clerk
and a Dallas police officer after the cartons had been processed with powder by the Dallas Police.
In his independent investigation, Arthur Mandella of the New York City Police Department
reached the same conclusion as Latona that the prints found on the cartons were those of Lee Harvey Oswald.
In addition, Mandella was of the opinion that the print taken from the carton on the floor
was probably made within a day or a day and a half of the examination on November twenty-two.
Another expert with the FBI, Ronald G. Wittmus, conducted a separate examination and also agreed with Latona that the prints were Oswald's.
In evaluating the significance of these fingerprint and palmprint identifications,
the Commission considered the possibility that Oswald handled these cartons as part of his normal duties.
Since other identifiable prints were developed on the cartons, the Commission requested that they be compared with the prints of the twelve warehouse employees
who, like Oswald, might have handled the cartons. They were also compared with the prints of those law enforcement officials who might have handled the cartons.
The results of this investigation are fully discussed in chapter six, page two forty-nine.
Although a person could handle a carton and not leave identifiable prints,
none of these employees except Oswald left identifiable prints on the cartons.
This finding, in addition to the freshness of one of the prints and the presence of Oswald's prints on two of the four cartons and the paper bag
led the Commission to attach some probative value to the fingerprint and palmprint identifications in reaching the conclusion
that Oswald was at the window from which the shots were fired, although the prints do not establish the exact time he was there.
Oswald's Presence on Sixth Floor Approximately thirty-five Minutes Before the Assassination
Additional testimony linking Oswald with the point from which the shots were fired
was provided by the testimony of Charles Givens, who was the last known employee to see Oswald inside the building prior to the assassination.
During the morning of November twenty-two, Givens was working with the floor-laying crew in the southwest section of the sixth floor.
At about eleven:forty-five a.m. the floor-laying crew used both elevators to come down from the sixth floor.
The employees raced the elevators to the first floor. Givens saw Oswald standing at the gate on the fifth floor as the elevator went by.
Givens testified that after reaching the first floor, quote,
I discovered I left my cigarettes in my jacket pocket upstairs, and I took the elevator back upstairs to get my jacket with my cigarettes in it, end quote.
He saw Oswald, a clipboard in hand, walking from the southeast corner of the sixth floor toward the elevator.
Givens said to Oswald, quote, Boy are you going downstairs? It's near lunch time, end quote.
Oswald said, quote, No, sir. When you get downstairs, close the gate to the elevator, end quote.
Oswald was referring to the west elevator which operates by pushbutton and only with the gate closed. Givens said, "Okay,"
and rode down in the east elevator.
When he reached the first floor, the west elevator -- the one with the gate was not there.
Givens thought this was about eleven:fifty-five a.m.
None of the Depository employees is known to have seen Oswald again until after the shooting.
The significance of Givens' observation that Oswald was carrying his clipboard
became apparent on December two, nineteen sixty-three, when an employee, Frankie Kaiser,
found a clipboard hidden by book cartons in the northwest corner of the sixth floor at the west wall a few feet from where the rifle had been found.
This clipboard had been made by Kaiser and had his name on it.
Kaiser identified it as the clipboard which Oswald had appropriated from him when Oswald came to work at the Depository.
Three invoices on this clipboard, each dated November twenty-two, were for Scott-Foresman books, located on the first and sixth floors.
Oswald had not filled any of the three orders.
Howard L. Brennan was an eyewitness to the shooting. As indicated previously the Commission considered his testimony as probative
in reaching the conclusion that the shots came from the sixth floor, southeast corner window of the Depository Building.
Brennan also testified that Lee Harvey Oswald,
whom he viewed in a police lineup on the night of the assassination, was the man he saw fire the shots from the sixth-floor window of the Depository Building.
When the shots were fired, Brennan was in an excellent position to observe anyone in the window. He was sitting on a concrete wall
on the southwest corner of Elm and Houston Streets, looking north at the Depository Building which was directly in front of him.
The window was approximately one hundred twenty feet away.
In the six to eight minute period before the motorcade arrived, Brennan saw a man leave and return to the window, quote, a couple of times, end quote,
After hearing the first shot, which he thought was a motorcycle backfire, Brennan glanced up at the window. He testified that, quote,
this man I saw previously was aiming for his last shot. As it appeared to me he was standing up and resting against the left window sill, end quote.
Brennan saw the man fire the last shot and disappear from the window.
Within minutes of the assassination, Brennan described the man to the police.
This description most probably led to the radio alert sent to police cars at approximately twelve:forty-five p.m., which described the suspect as white,
slender, weighing about one sixty-five pounds, about five foot ten inches tall, and in his early thirties.
In his sworn statement to the police later that day,
Brennan described the man in similar terms, except that he gave the weight as between one hundred sixty-five and one hundred seventy-five pounds and the height was omitted.
In his testimony before the Commission, Brennan described the person he saw as, quote,
man in his early thirties, fair complexion, slender, but neat, neat slender, possible five foot ten
Oswald was five foot nine inches, slender and twenty-four years old.
When arrested, he gave his weight as one hundred forty pounds. On other occasions he gave weights of both one hundred forty and one hundred fifty pounds.
The New Orleans police records of his arrest in August of nineteen sixty-three show a weight of one hundred thirty-six pounds.
The autopsy report indicated an estimated weight of one hundred fifty pounds.
Brennan's description should also be compared with the eyewitness description broadcast over the Dallas police radio at one:twenty-two p.m.
of the man who shot Patrolman J. D. Tippit.
The suspect was described as, quote, a white male about thirty, five foot eight, black hair, slender, end quote.
At one:twenty-nine p.m. the police radio reported
that the description of the suspect in the Tippit shooting was similar to the description which had been given by Brennan in connection with the assassination.
Approximately seven or eight minutes later
the police radio reported that, quote, an eyeball witness, end quote, described the suspect in the Tippit shooting as, quote, a white male,
twenty-seven, five foot eleven, one hundred sixty-five pounds, black wavy hair, end quote,
As will be discussed fully below, the Commission has concluded that this suspect was Lee Harvey Oswald.
Although Brennan testified that the man in the window was standing when he fired the shots, most probably he was either sitting or kneeling.
The half-open window, the arrangement of the boxes, and the angle of the shots virtually preclude a standing position.
It is understandable, however, for Brennan to have believed that the man with the rifle was standing. A photograph of the building taken seconds after the assassination
shows three employees looking out of the fifth-floor window directly below the window from which the shots were fired.
Brennan testified that they were standing, which is their apparent position in the photograph.
But the testimony of these employees, together with photographs subsequently taken of them at the scene of the assassination,
establishes that they were either squatting or kneeling.
Since the window ledges in the Depository Building are lower than in most buildings,
a person squatting or kneeling exposes more of his body than would normally be the case.
From the street, this creates the impression that the person is standing.
Brennan could have seen enough of the body of a kneeling or squatting person to estimate his height.
Shortly after the assassination Brennan noticed
two of these employees leaving the building and immediately identified them as having been in the fifth-floor windows.
When the three employees appeared before the Commission, Brennan identified the two whom he saw leave the building.
The two men, Harold Norman and James Jarman, Jr., each confirmed that when they came out of the building,
they saw and heard Brennan describing what he had seen.
Jarman heard Brennan, quote, talking to this officer about that he had heard these shots and he had seen the barrel of the gun sticking out the window,
and he said that the shots came from inside the building, end quote.
During the evening of November twenty-two, Brennan identified Oswald as the person in the lineup who bore the closest resemblance to the man in the window
but he said he was unable to make a positive identification.
Brennan had seen Oswald's picture on television, and he told the Commission that whether this affected his identification, quote, is something I do not know.
In an interview with FBI agents on December seventeen, nineteen sixty-three,
Brennan stated that he was sure that the person firing the rifle was Oswald.
In another interview with FBI agents on January seven, nineteen sixty-four,
Brennan appeared to revert to his earlier inability to make a positive identification,
but, in his testimony before the Commission, Brennan stated that his remarks of January seven were intended by him merely as an accurate report
of what he said on November twenty-two.
Brennan told the Commission that he could have made a positive identification in the lineup on November twenty-two
but did not do so because he felt that the assassination was, quote, a Communist activity,
and I felt like there hadn't been more than one eyewitness, and if it got to be a known fact that I was an eyewitness, my family or I, either one, might not be safe.
When specifically asked before the Commission
whether or not he could positively identify the man he saw in the sixth-floor window as the same man he saw in the police station,
Brennan stated, quote, I could at that time -- I could, with all sincerity, identify him as being the same man, end quote.
Although the record indicates that Brennan was an accurate observer, he declined to make a positive identification of Oswald when he first saw him in the police lineup.
The Commission, therefore, does not base its conclusion concerning the identity of the assassin
on Brennan's subsequent certain identification of Lee Harvey Oswald as the man he saw fire the rifle.
Immediately after the assassination, however,
Brennan described to the police the man he saw in the window and then identified Oswald as the person who most nearly resembled the man he saw.
The Commission is satisfied that, at the least,
Brennan saw a man in the window who closely resembled Lee Harvey Oswald, and that Brennan believes the man he saw was in fact
Two other witnesses were able to offer partial descriptions of a man they saw in the southeast corner window
of the sixth floor approximately one minute before the assassination, although neither witness saw the shots being fired.
Ronald Fischer and Robert Edwards were standing on the curb at the southwest corner of Elm and Houston Streets,
the same corner where Brennan was sitting on a concrete wall.
Fischer testified that about ten or fifteen seconds before the motorcade turned onto Houston Street from Main Street,
Edwards said, quote, Look at that guy there in that window, end quote,
Fischer looked up and watched the man in the window for ten or fifteen seconds and then started watching the motorcade, which came into view on Houston Street.
He said that the man held his attention until the motorcade came because the man, quote,
appeared uncomfortable for one, and secondly, he wasn't watching. he didn't look like he was watching for the parade.
He looked like he was looking down toward the Trinity River and the Triple Underpass down at the end -- toward the end of Elm Street. And
all the time I watched him, he never moved his head, he never -- he never moved anything. Just was there transfixed.
Fischer placed the man in the easternmost window on the south side of the Depository Building on either the fifth or the sixth floor.
He said that he could see the man from the middle of his chest to the top of his head, and that as he was facing the window the man was in the lower right-hand portion of the window
and, quote, seemed to be sitting a little forward, end quote,
The man was dressed in a light-colored, open-neck shirt which could have been either a sports shirt or a T-shirt,
and he had brown hair, a slender face and neck with light complexion, and looked to be twenty-two or twenty-four years old.
The person in the window was a white man and, quote, looked to me like he was looking straight at the Triple Underpass, end quote, down Elm Street.
Boxes and cases were stacked behind him.
Approximately one week after the assassination, according to Fisher, policemen showed him a picture of Oswald.
In his testimony he said, quote, I told them that that could have been the man.
That that could have been the man that I saw in the window in the School Book Depository Building, but that I was not sure, end quote.
Fischer described the man's hair as some shade of brown, quote, it wasn't dark, and it wasn't light, end quote.
On November twenty-two, Fischer had apparently described the man as, quote, light-headed, end quote.
Fischer explained that he did not mean by the earlier statement that the man was blond, but rather that his hair was not black.
Robert Edwards said that, while looking at the south side of the Depository Building shortly before the motorcade,
he saw nothing of importance, quote, except maybe one individual who was up there in the corner room of the sixth floor which was crowded in among boxes, end quote.
He said that this was a white man about average in size, quote, possibly thin, end quote, and that he thought the man had light-brown hair.
Fischer and Edwards did not see the man clearly enough or long enough to identify him.
Their testimony is of probative value, however, because their limited description is consistent with that of the man who has been found by the Commission,
based on other evidence, to have fired the shots from the window.
Another person who saw the assassin as the shots were fired was Amos L. Euins, age fifteen,
who was one of the first witnesses to alert the police to the Depository as the source of the shots, as has been discussed in chapter three.
Euins, who was on the southwest corner of Elm and Houston Streets testified that he could not describe the man he saw in the window.
According to Euins, however, as the man lowered his head in order to aim the rifle down Elm Street, he appeared to have a white bald spot, on his head.
Shortly after the assassination, Euins signed an affidavit describing the man as "white,"
but a radio reporter testified that Euins described the man to him as, quote, colored, end quote.
Euins stated that he could not ascertain the man's race and that the statement in the affidavit was intended to refer only to the white spot on the man's head
and not to his race.
A Secret Service agent who spoke to Euins approximately twenty to thirty minutes after the assassination
confirmed that Euins could neither describe the man in the window nor indicate his race.
Accordingly, Euins' testimony is considered probative as to the source of the shots but is inconclusive as to the identity of the man in the window.
In evaluating the evidence that Oswald was at the southeast corner window of the sixth floor at the time of the shooting,
the Commission has considered the allegation that Oswald was photographed standing in front of the building when the shots were fired.
The picture which gave rise to these allegations was taken by Associated Press Photographer James W. Altgens,
who was standing on the south side of Elm Street between the Triple Underpass and the Depository Building.
As the motorcade started its descent down Elm Street., Altgens snapped a picture of the Presidential limousine with the entrance to the Depository Building in the background.
Just before snapping the picture Altgens heard a noise which sounded like the popping of a firecracker.
Investigation has established that Altgens' picture was taken approximately two seconds after the firing of the shot
which entered the back of the President's neck.
In the background of this picture were several employees watching the parade from the steps of the Depository Building.
One of these employees was alleged to resemble Lee Harvey Oswald.
The Commission has determined that the employee was in fact Billy Lovelady, who identified himself in the picture.
Standing alongside him were Buell Wesley Frazier and William Shelley, who also identified Lovelady.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter four. The Assassin: Part four. Oswald's Actions in Building After Assassination.
In considering whether Oswald was at the southeast corner window at the time the shots were fired,
the Commission has reviewed the testimony of witnesses who saw Oswald in the building within minutes after the assassination.
The Commission has found that Oswald's movements, as described by these witnesses,
are consistent with his having been at the window at twelve:thirty p.m.
The encounter in the lunchroom.
The first person to see Oswald after the assassination was Patrolman M. L. Baker of the Dallas Police Department.
Baker was riding a two-wheeled motorcycle behind the last press car of the motorcade.
As he turned the corner from Main onto Houston at a speed of about five to ten miles per hour,
a strong wind blowing from the north almost unseated him.
At about this time he heard the first shot.
Having recently heard the sounds of rifles while on a hunting trip, Baker recognized the shots as that of a high-powered rifle; Quote,
it sounded high and I immediately kind of looked up,
and I had a feeling that it came from the building, either right in front of me [the Depository Building] or of the one across to the right of it, end quote,
He saw pigeons flutter upward. He was not certain, quote, but I am pretty sure they came from the building right on the northwest corner, end quote.
He heard two more shots spaced, quote, pretty well even to me.
end quote, After the third shot, he, quote, revved that motorcycle up, end quote,
drove to the northwest corner of Elm and Houston, and parked approximately ten feet from the traffic signal.
As he was parking he noted that people were, quote, falling, and they were rolling around down there grabbing their children, end quote, and rushing about.
A woman screamed, quote, Oh, they have shot that man, they have shot that man, end quote.
Baker, quote, had it in mind that the shots came from the top of this building here, end quote, so he ran straight to the entrance of the Depository Building.
Baker testified that he entered the lobby of the building and, quote, spoke out and asked where the stairs or elevator was
and this man, Mr. Truly, spoke up and says, it seems to me like he says,
I am a building manager. Follow me, officer, and I will show you, end quote.
Baker and building superintendent Roy Truly went through a second set of doors and stopped at a swinging door where Baker bumped into Truly's back.
They went through the swinging door and continued at, quote, a good trot, end quote,
to the northwest corner of the floor where Truly hoped to find one of the two freight elevators.
Truly pushed the button for the west elevator which operates automatically if the gate is closed.
He shouted twice, quote, Turn loose the elevator, end quote,
When the elevator failed to come, Baker said, quote, let's take the stairs, end quote, and he followed Truly up the stairway, which is to the west of the elevator.
The stairway is located in the northwest corner of the Depository Building.
The stairs from one floor to the next are "L-shaped," with both legs of the "L" approximately the same length.
Because the stairway itself is enclosed, neither Baker nor Truly could see anything on the second-floor hallway until they reached the landing at the top of the stairs.
On the second-floor landing there is a small open area with a door at the east end.
This door leads into a small vestibule, and another door leads from the vestibule into the second-floor lunchroom.
The lunchroom door is usually open, but the first door is kept shut by a closing mechanism on the door.
This vestibule door is solid except for a small glass window in the upper part of the door.
As Baker reached the second floor, he was about twenty feet from the vestibule door. He intended to continue around to his left toward the stairway going up
but through the window in the door he caught a fleeting glimpse of a man walking in the vestibule toward the lunchroom.
Since the vestibule door is only a few feet from the lunchroom door, the man must have entered the vestibule only a second or two before Baker arrived at the top of the stairwell.
Yet he must have entered the vestibule door before Truly reached the top of the stairwell, since Truly did not see him.
If the man had passed from the vestibule into the lunchroom, Baker could not have seen him.
Baker said, quote, He [Truly] had already started around the bend to come to the next elevator going up,
I was coming out this one on the second floor, and I don't know, I was kind of sweeping this area as I come up, I was looking from right to left
and as I got to this door here I caught a glimpse of this man, just, you know, a sudden glimpse. And it looked to me like he was going away from me.
I can't say whether he had gone on through that door [the lunchroom door] or not.
All I did was catch a glance at him, and evidently he was -- this door might have been, you know, closing and almost shut at that time, end quote.
With his revolver drawn, Baker opened the vestibule door and ran into the vestibule.
He saw a man walking away from him in the lunchroom.
Baker stopped at the door of the lunchroom and commanded, quote, Come here, end quote.
The man turned and walked back toward Baker.
He had been proceeding toward the rear of the lunchroom.
Along a side wall of the lunchroom was a soft drink rending machine, but at that time the man had nothing in his hands.
Meanwhile, Truly had run up several steps toward the third floor.
Missing Baker, he came back to find the officer in the doorway to the lunchroom facing Lee Harvey Oswald.
Baker turned to Truly and said, quote, Do you know this man, does he work here? end quote.
Baker stated later that the man did not seem to be out of breath; he seemed calm. Quote, He never did say a word or nothing.
In fact, he didn't change his expression one bit, end quote.
Truly said of Oswald: quote, He didn't seem to be excited or overly afraid or anything. He might have been a bit startled, like I might have been if somebody confronted me.
But I cannot recall any change in expression of any kind on his face, end quote.
Truly thought that the officer's gun at that time appeared to be almost touching the middle portion of Oswald's body.
Truly also noted at this time that Oswald's hands were empty.
In an effort to determine whether Oswald could have descended to the lunchroom
from the sixth floor by the time Baker and Truly arrived, Commission counsel asked Baker and Truly to repeat their movements from the time of the shot
until Baker came upon Oswald in the lunchroom.
Baker placed himself on a motorcycle about two hundred feet from the corner of Elm and Houston Streets where he said he heard the shots.
Truly stood in front of the building.
At a given signal, they reenacted the event. Baker's movements were timed with a stopwatch.
On the first test, the elapsed time between the simulated first shot and Baker's arrival on the second-floor stair landing
was one minute and thirty seconds.
The second test run required one minute and fifteen seconds.
A test was also conducted to determine the time required to walk from the southeast corner of the sixth floor to the second-floor lunchroom by stairway.
Special Agent John Howlett of the Secret Service carried a rifle from the southeast corner of the sixth floor along the east aisle to the northeast corner.
He placed the rifle on the floor near the site where Oswald's rifle was actually found after the shooting.
Then Howlett walked down the stairway to the second-floor landing and entered the lunchroom.
The first test, run at normal walking pace, required one minute, eighteen seconds;
the second test, at a "fast walk" took one minute, fourteen seconds.
The second test followed immediately after the first.
The only interval was the time necessary to ride in the elevator from the second to the sixth floor and walk back to the southeast corner.
Howlett was not short winded at the end of either test run.
The minimum time required by Baker to park his motorcycle and reach the second-floor lunchroom was within three seconds of the time needed to walk
from the southeast corner of the sixth floor down the stairway to the lunchroom.
The time actually required for Baker and Truly to reach the second floor on November twenty-two was probably longer than in the test runs. For example,
Baker required fifteen seconds after the simulated shot to ride his motorcycle one hundred eighty to two hundred feet,
park it, and run forty-five feet to the building.
No allowance was made for the special conditions which existed on the day of the assassination
possible delayed reaction to the shot, jostling with the crowd of people on the steps and scanning the area along Elm Street and the parkway.
Baker said, quote, We simulated the shots and by the time we got there, we did everything that I did that day,
and this would be the minimum, because I am sure that I, you know, it took me a little longer, end quote,
On the basis of this time test, therefore,
the Commission concluded that Oswald could have fired the shots and still have been present in the second-floor lunchroom when seen by Baker and Truly.
That Oswald descended by stairway from the sixth floor to the second-floor lunchroom
is consistent with the movements of the two elevators, which would have provided the other possible means of descent.
When Truly, accompanied by Baker, ran to the rear of the first floor,
he was certain that both elevators, which occupy the same shaft, were on the fifth floor.
Baker, not realizing that there were two elevators, thought that only one elevator was in the shaft and that it was two or three floors above the second floor.
In the few seconds which elapsed while Baker and Truly ran from the first to the second floor,
neither of these slow elevators could have descended from the fifth to the second floor. Furthermore, no elevator was at the second floor when they arrived there.
Truly and Baker continued up the stairs after the encounter with Oswald in the lunchroom.
There was no elevator on the third or fourth floor.
The east elevator was on the fifth floor when they arrived; the west elevator was not.
They took the east elevator to the seventh floor and ran up a stairway to the roof where they searched for several minutes.
Jack Dougherty, an employee working on the fifth floor,
testified that he took the west elevator to the first floor after hearing a noise which sounded like a backfire.
Eddie Piper, the janitor, told Dougherty that the President had been shot,
but in his testimony Piper did not mention either seeing or talking with Dougherty during these moments of excitement.
Both Dougherty and Piper were confused witnesses. They had no exact memory of the events of that afternoon.
Truly was probably correct in stating that the west elevator was on the fifth floor when he looked up the elevator shaft from the first floor.
The west elevator was not on the fifth floor when Baker and Truly reached that floor,
probably because Jack Dougherty took it to the first floor while Baker and Truly were running up the stairs or in the lunchroom with Oswald.
Neither elevator could have been used by Oswald as a means of descent.
Oswald's use of the stairway is consistent with the testimony of other employees in the building.
Three employees -- James Jarman, Jr.,
Harold Norman, and Bonnie Ray Williams -- were watching the parade from the fifth floor, directly below the window from which the shots were fired.
They rushed to the west windows after the shots were fired and remained there
until after they saw Patrolman Baker's white helmet on the fifth floor moving toward the elevator.
While they were at the west windows their view of the stairwell was completely blocked by shelves and boxes.
This is the period during which Oswald would have descended the stairs. In all likelihood
Dougherty took the elevator down from the fifth floor after Jarman, Norman, and Williams ran to the west windows and were deciding what to do.
None of these three men saw Dougherty, probably because of the anxiety of the moment and because of the books which may have blocked the view.
Neither Jarman, Norman, Williams, or Dougherty saw Oswald.
Victoria Adams, who worked on the fourth floor of the Depository Building,
claimed that within about one minute following the shots she ran from a window on the south side of the fourth floor,
down the rear stairs to the first floor, where she encountered two Depository employees -- William Shelley and Billy Lovelady.
If her estimate of time is correct, she reached the bottom of the stairs before Truly and Baker started up,
and she must have run down the stairs ahead of Oswald and would probably have seen or heard him.
Actually she noticed no one on the back stairs. If she descended from the fourth to the first floor as fast as she claimed in her testimony,
she would have seen Baker or Truly on the first floor or on the stairs, unless they were already in the second-floor lunchroom talking to Oswald.
When she reached the first floor, she actually saw Shelley and Lovelady slightly east of the east elevator.
Shelley and Lovelady, however, have testified
that they were watching the parade from the top step of the building entrance when Gloria Calverly, who works in the Depository Building,
ran up and said that the President had been shot.
Lovelady and Shelley moved out into the street.
About this time Shelley saw Truly and Patrolman Baker go into the building
Shelley and Lovelady, at a fast walk or trot, turned west into the railroad yards and then to the west side of the Depository Building.
They reentered the building by the rear door several minutes after Baker and Truly rushed through the front entrance.
On entering, Lovelady saw a girl on the first floor who he believes was Victoria Adams.
If Miss Adams accurately recalled meeting Shelley and Lovelady when she reached the bottom of the stairs,
then her estimate of the time when she descended from the fourth floor is incorrect,
and she actually came down the stairs several minutes after Oswald and after Truly and Baker as well.
Within a minute after Baker and Truly left Oswald in the lunchroom, Mrs. R. A. Reid, clerical supervisor for the Texas School Book Depository,
saw him walk through the clerical office on the second floor toward the door leading to the front stairway.
Mrs. Reid had watched the parade from the sidewalk in front of the building with Truly and Mr. O. V. Campbell, vice president of the Depository.
She testified that she heard three shots which she thought came from the building.
She ran inside and up the front stairs into the large open office reserved for clerical employees.
As she approached her desk, she saw Oswald.
He was walking into the office from the back hallway,
carrying a full bottle of Coca-Cola in his hand, presumably purchased after the encounter with Baker and Truly.
As Oswald passed Mrs. Reid she said, quote, Oh, the President has been shot, but maybe they didn't hit him, end quote.
Oswald mumbled something and walked by. She paid no more attention to him.
The only exit from the office in the direction Oswald was moving was through the door to the front stairway.
Mrs. Reid testified that when she saw Oswald, he was wearing a T-shirt and no jacket.
When he left home that morning, Marina Oswald, who was still in bed, suggested that he wear a jacket.
A blue jacket, later identified by Marina Oswald as her husband's, was subsequently found in the building, apparently left behind by Oswald.
Mrs. Reid believes that she returned to her desk from the street about two minutes after the shooting.
Reconstructing her movements, Mrs. Reid ran the distance three times and was timed in two minutes by stopwatch.
The reconstruction was the minimum time. Accordingly, she probably met Oswald at about twelve:thirty-two,
approximately thirty to forty-five seconds after Oswald's lunchroom encounter with Baker and Truly.
After leaving Mrs. Reid in the front office, Oswald could have gone down the stairs and out the front door by twelve:thirty-three p.m.
three minutes after the shooting.
At that time the building had not yet been sealed off by the police.
While it was difficult to determine exactly when the police sealed off the building,
the earliest estimates would still have permitted Oswald to leave the building by twelve:thirty-three.
One of the police officers assigned to the corner of Elm and Houston Streets for the Presidential motorcade, W. E. Barnett,
testified that immediately after the shots he went to the rear of the building to check the fire escape.
He then returned to the corner of Elm and Houston where he met a sergeant who instructed him to find out the name of the building.
Barnett ran to the building, noted its name, and then returned to the corner.
There he was met by a construction worker -- in all likelihood Howard Brennan, who was wearing his work helmet.
This worker told Barnett that the shots had been fired from a window in the Depository Building,
where upon Barnett posted himself at the front door to make certain that no one left the building.
The sergeant did the same thing at the rear of the building.
Barnett estimated that approximately three minutes elapsed between the time he heard the last of the shots and the time he started guarding the front door.
According to Barnett, quote, there were people going in and out, end quote, during this period.
Sgt. D. V. Harkness of the Dallas police
said that to his knowledge the building was not sealed off at twelve:thirty-six p.m. when he called in on police radio
that a witness (Amos Euins) had seen shots fired from a window of the building.
At that time, Inspector Herbert V. Sawyer's car was parked in front of the building.
Harkness did not know whether or not two officers with Sawyer were guarding the doors.
At twelve:thirty-four p.m. Sawyer heard a call over the police radio that the shots had come from the Depository Building.
He then entered the building and took the front passenger elevator as far as it would go -- the fourth floor.
After inspecting this floor, Sawyer returned to the street about three minutes after he entered the building.
After he returned to the street he directed Sergeant Harkness to station two patrolmen at the front door and not let anyone in or out;
he also directed that the back door be sealed off.
This was no earlier than twelve:thirty-seven p.m. and may have been later.
Special Agent Forrest V. Sorrels of the Secret Service, who had been in the motorcade,
testified that after driving to Parkland Hospital, he returned to the Depository Building about twenty minutes after the shooting,
found no police officers at the rear door and was able to enter through this door without identifying himself.
Although Oswald probably left the building at about twelve:thirty-three p.m., his absence was not noticed until at least one-half hour later.
Truly, who had returned with Patrolman Baker from the roof, saw the police questioning the warehouse employees.
Approximately fifteen men worked in the warehouse and Truly noticed that Oswald was not among those being questioned.
Satisfying himself that Oswald was missing, Truly obtained Oswald's address, phone number, and description from his employment application card.
The address listed was for the Paine home in Irving.
Truly gave this information to Captain Fritz who was on the sixth floor at the time.
Truly estimated that he gave this information to Fritz about fifteen or twenty minutes after the shots,
but it was probably no earlier than one:twenty-two p.m., the time when the rifle was found.
Fritz believed that he learned of Oswald's absence after the rifle was found.
The fact that Truly found Fritz in the northwest corner of the floor, near the point where the rifle was found, supports Fritz' recollection.
Fingerprint and palmprint evidence establishes that Oswald handled two of the four cartons next to the window
and also handled a paper bag which was found near the cartons.
Oswald was seen in the vicinity of the southeast corner of the sixth floor approximately thirty-five minutes before the assassination
and no one could be found who saw Oswald anywhere else in the building until after the shooting.
An eyewitness to the shooting immediately provided a description of the man in the window which was similar to Oswald's actual appearance.
This witness identified Oswald in a lineup as the man most nearly resembling the man he saw and later identified Oswald as the man he observed.
Oswald's known actions in the building immediately after the assassination are consistent with his having been at the southeast corner window of the sixth floor
On the basis of these findings the Commission has concluded that Oswald, at the time of the assassination,
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter four. The Assassin: Part five.
The Killing of Patrolman J. D. Tippit
After leaving the Depository Building at approximately twelve:thirty-three p.m., Lee Harvey Oswald proceeded to his roominghouse by bus and taxi.
He arrived at approximately one p.m. and left a few minutes later.
At about one:sixteen p.m., a Dallas police officer, J. D. Tippit, was shot less than one mile from Oswald's roominghouse.
In deciding whether Oswald killed Patrolman Tippit the Commission considered the following:
(one) positive identification of the killer by two eyewitnesses who saw the shooting
and seven eyewitnesses who heard the shots and saw the gunman flee the scene with the revolver in his hand,
(two) testimony of firearms identification experts establishing the identity of the murder weapon,
(three) evidence establishing the ownership of the murder weapon,
(four) evidence establishing the ownership of a zipper jacket
found along the path of flight taken by the gunman from the scene of the shooting to the place of arrest.
Oswald's Movements After Leaving Depository Building
According to the reconstruction of time and events which the Commission found most credible,
Lee Harvey Oswald left the building approximately three minutes after the assassination.
He probably walked east on Elm Street for seven blocks to the corner of Elm and Murphy
where he boarded a bus which was heading back in the direction of the Depository Building, on its way to the Oak Cliff section of Dallas.
When Oswald was apprehended, a bus transfer marked for the Lakewood-Marsalis route was found in his shirt pocket.
The transfer was dated "Friday November twenty-two, 'sixty-three" and was punched in two places by the bus driver.
On the basis of this punchmark, which was distinctive to each Dallas driver,
the transfer was conclusively identified as having been issued by Cecil J. McWatters, a busdriver for the Dallas Transit Co.
On the basis of the date and time on the transfer, McWatters was able to testify that the transfer had been issued by him
on a trip which passed a check point at St. Paul and Elm Streets at twelve:thirty-six p.m., November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three.
McWatters was sure that he left the checkpoint on time
and he estimated that it took him three to four minutes to drive three blocks west from the checkpoint to Field Street,
which he reached at about twelve:forty p.m.
McWatters' recollection is that he issued this transfer to a man who entered his bus just beyond Field Street,
where a man beat on the front door of the bus, boarded it and paid his fare.
About two blocks later, a woman asked to get off to make a one o'clock train at Union Station
and requested a transfer which she might use if she got through the traffic.
So I gave her a transfer and opened the door and she was going out the gentleman I had picked up about two blocks [back]
asked for a transfer and got off at the same place in the middle of the block where the lady did.
It was the intersection near Lamar Street, it was near Poydras and Lamar Street.
The man was on the bus approximately four minutes.
At about six:thirty p.m. on the day of the assassination, McWatters viewed four men in a police lineup.
He picked Oswald from the lineup as the man who had boarded the bus at the, quote, lower end of town on Elm around Houston, end quote,
and who, during the ride south on Marsalis, had an argument with a woman passenger.
In his Commission testimony, McWatters said he had been in error and that a teenager named Milton Jones was the passenger he had in mind.
In a later interview, Jones confirmed that he had exchanged words with a woman passenger on the bus during the ride south on Marsalis.
McWatters also remembered that a man received a transfer at Lamar and Elm Streets and that a man in the lineup was about the size of this man.
However, McWatters' recollection alone was too vague to be a basis for placing Oswald on the bus.
Riding on the bus was an elderly woman, Mary Bledsoe, who confirmed the mute evidence of the transfer.
Oswald had rented a room from Mrs. Bledsoe about six weeks before, on October seven, but she had asked him to leave at the end of a week.
Mrs. Bledsoe told him, quote, I am not going to rent to you any more, end quote,
She testified, quote, I didn't like his attitude. There was just something about him I didn't like or want him. Just didn't want him around me, end quote,
On November twenty-two, Mrs. Bledsoe came downtown to watch the Presidential motorcade.
She boarded the Marsalis bus at St. Paul and Elm Streets to return home. She testified further, quote,
And, after we got past Akard, at Murphy -- I figured it out. Let's see. I don't know for sure.
Oswald got on. He looks like a maniac. His sleeve was out here. His shirt was undone.
Was a hole in it, hole, and he was dirty, and I didn't look at him. I didn't want to know I even seen him.
he looked so bad in his face, and his face was so distorted. Hole in his sleeve right here.
End quote. As Mrs. Bledsoe said these words, she pointed to her right elbow.
When Oswald was arrested in the Texas Theatre, he was wearing a brown sport shirt with a hole in the right sleeve at the elbow.
Mrs. Bledsoe identified the shirt as the one Oswald was wearing and she stated she was certain that it was Oswald who boarded the bus.
Mrs. Bledsoe recalled that Oswald sat halfway to the rear of the bus which moved slowly and intermittently as traffic became heavy.
She heard a passing motorist tell the driver that the President had been shot.
People on the bus began talking about it. As the bus neared Lamar Street, Oswald left the bus and disappeared into the crowd.
The Marsalis bus which Oswald boarded traveled a route west on Elm,
south on Houston, and southwest across the Houston viaduct to service the Oak Cliff area along Marsalis.
A Beckley bus which also served the Oak Cliff area,
followed the same route as the Marsalis bus through downtown Dallas, except that it continued west on Elm,
across Houston in front of the Depository Building, past the Triple Underpass into west Dallas, and south on Beckley.
Marsalis Street is seven blocks from Beckley.
Oswald lived at ten twenty-six North Beckley.
He could not reach his roominghouse on the Marsalis bus, but the Beckley bus stopped across the street.
According to McWatters, the Beckley bus was behind the Marsalis bus, but he did not actually see it.
Both buses stopped within one block of the Depository Building.
Instead of waiting there, Oswald apparently went as far away as he could and boarded the first Oak Cliff bus which came along
rather than wait for one which stopped across the street from his roominghouse.
In a reconstruction of this bus trip, agents of the Secret Service and the FBI walked the seven blocks from the front entrance of the Depository Building
to Murphy and Elm three times, averaging six point five minutes for the three trips.
A bus moving through heavy traffic on Elm from Murphy to Lamar was timed at four minutes.
If Oswald left the Depository Building at twelve:thirty-three p.m.,
walked seven blocks directly to Murphy and Elm, and boarded a bus almost immediately,
he would have boarded the bus at approximately twelve:forty p.m. and left it at approximately twelve:forty-four p.m.
Roger D. Craig, a deputy sheriff of Dallas County,
claimed that about fifteen minutes after the assassination he saw a man, whom he later identified as Oswald,
coming from the direction of the Depository Building and running down the hill north of Elm Street
toward a light-colored Rambler station wagon, which was moving slowly along Elm toward the underpass:
The station wagon stopped to pick up the man and then drove off.
Craig testified that later in the afternoon he saw Oswald in the police interrogation room
and told Captain Fritz that Oswald was the man he saw.
Craig also claimed that when Fritz pointed out to Oswald that Craig had identified him,
Oswald rose from his chair, looked directly at Fritz, and said, quote, Everybody will know who I am now, end quote,
The Commission could not accept important elements of Craig's testimony.
Captain Fritz stated that a deputy sheriff whom he could not identify did ask to see him that afternoon
and told him a similar story to Craig's.
Fritz did not bring him into his office to identify Oswald but turned him over to Lieutenant Baker for questioning.
If Craig saw Oswald that afternoon, he saw him through the glass windows of the office.
And neither Captain Fritz nor any other officer can remember that Oswald dramatically arose from his chair
and said, quote, Everybody will know who I am now, end quote.
If Oswald had made such a statement, Captain Fritz and others present would probably have remembered it.
Craig may have seen a person enter a white Rambler station wagon fifteen or twenty minutes after the shooting and travel west on Elm Street
but the Commission concluded that this man was not Lee Harvey Oswald,
because of the overwhelming evidence that Oswald was far away from the building by that time.
William Whaley, a taxicab driver, told his employer on Saturday morning, November twenty-three
that he recognized Oswald from a newspaper photograph as a man whom he had driven to the Oak Cliff area the day before.
Notified of Whaley's statement, the police brought him to the police station that afternoon.
He was taken to the lineup room where, according to Whaley, five young teenagers, all handcuffed together, were displayed with Oswald.
He testified that Oswald looked older than the other boys.
The police asked him whether he could pick out his passenger from the lineup.
You could have picked him out without identifying him by just listening to him.
because he was bawling out the policeman, telling them it wasn't right to put him in line with these teenagers and all of that
and they asked me which one and I told them. It was him all right, the same man. He showed no respect for the policemen,
he told them what he thought about them. They knew what they were doing and they were trying to railroad him and he wanted his lawyer.
Whaley believes that Oswald's conduct did not aid him in his identification, quote, because I knew he was the right one as soon as I saw him.
Whaley's memory of the lineup is inaccurate. There were four men altogether, not six men, in the lineup with Oswald.
Whaley said that Oswald was the man under Number two.
Actually Oswald was under Number three.
Only two of the men in the lineup with Oswald were teenagers: John T. Horn, aged eighteen, was Number one;
David Knapp, aged eighteen, was Number two;
Lee Oswald was Number three;
and Daniel Lujan, aged twenty-six, was Number four.
When he first testified before the Commission,
Whaley displayed a trip manifest which showed a twelve o'clock trip from Travis Hotel to the Continental bus station,
a twelve:fifteen p.m. pickup at Continental to Greyhound, unloaded at twelve:thirty p.m.,
and a pickup from Greyhound (bus station) at twelve:thirty p.m.,
unloaded at five hundred North Beckley at twelve:forty-five p.m.
Whaley testified that he did not keep an accurate time record of his trips but recorded them by the quarter hour,
and that sometimes he made his entry right after a trip while at other times he waited to record three or four trips.
As he unloaded his Continental bus station passenger in front of Greyhound, he started to get out to buy a package of cigarettes.
He saw a man walking south on Lamar from Commerce.
The man was dressed in faded blue color khaki work clothes, a brown shirt, and some kind of work jacket that almost matched his pants.
The man asked, quote, May I have the cab?, end quote, and got into the front seat.
Whaley described the ensuing events as follows, quote,
And about that time an old lady, I think she was an old lady, I don't remember nothing but her sticking her head down past him in the door and said,
Driver, will you call me a cab down here? She had seen him get this cab and she wanted one, too,
and he opened the door a little bit like he was going to get out and he said, "I will let you have this one," and she says, "No, the driver can call me one."
I asked him where he wanted to go. And he said, "five hundred North Beckley. Well, I started up,
I started to that address, and the police cars, the sirens was going, running crisscrossing everywhere, just a big uproar in that end of town and I said,
What the hell. I wonder what the hell is the uproar?
And he never said anything. So I figured he was one of these people that don't like to talk so I never said any more to him.
But when I got pretty close to five hundred block at Neches and North Beckley which is the five hundred block, he said, "This will do fine," and I pulled over to the curb right there.
He gave me a dollar bill, the trip was ninety-five cents.
He gave me a dollar bill and didn't say anything, just got out and closed the door and walked around the front of the cab over to the other side of the street
[east side of the street]. Of course, the traffic was moving through there and I put it in gear and moved on, that is the last I saw of him.
Whaley was somewhat imprecise as to where he unloaded his passenger.
He marked what, he thought was the intersection of Neches and Beckley on a map of Dallas with a large "X."
He said, quote, Yes, sir; that is right, because that is the five hundred block of North Beckley, end quote,
However, Neches and Beckley do not intersect.
Neches is within one-half block of the roominghouse at ten twenty-six North Beckley where Oswald was living.
The five hundred block of North Beckley is five blocks south of the roominghouse.
After a review of these inconsistencies in his testimony before the Commission, Whaley was interviewed again in Dallas.
The route of the taxicab was retraced under the direction of Whaley.
He directed the driver of the car to a point twenty feet north of the northwest corner of the intersection of Beckley and Neely
the point at which he said his passenger alighted.
This was the seven hundred block of North Beckley
The elapsed time of the reconstructed run from the Greyhound Bus Station to Neely and Beckley was five minutes and thirty seconds by stopwatch.
The walk from Beckley and Neely to ten twenty-six North Beckley was timed by Commission counsel at five minutes and forty-five seconds.
Whaley testified that Oswald was wearing either the gray zippered jacket or the heavy blue jacket.
He was in error, however.
Oswald could not possibly have been wearing the blue jacket during the trip with Whaley, since it was found in the "domino" room of the Depository late in November.
Moreover, Mrs. Bledsoe saw Oswald in the bus without a jacket and wearing a shirt with a hole at the elbow.
On the other hand, Whaley identified Commission Exhibit Number one fifty (the shirt taken from Oswald upon arrest) as the shirt his passenger was wearing.
He also stated he saw a silver identification bracelet on his passenger's left wrist.
Oswald was wearing such a bracelet when he was arrested.
On November twenty-two, Oswald told Captain Fritz that he rode a bus to a stop near his home and then walked to his roominghouse.
When queried the following morning concerning a bus transfer found in his possession at the time of his arrest, he admitted receiving it.
And when interrogated about a cab ride, Oswald also admitted that he left the slow-moving bus and took a cab to his roominghouse.
The Greyhound Bus Station at Lamar and Jackson Streets, where Oswald entered Whaley's cab,
is three to four short blocks south of Lamar and Elm. If Oswald left the bus at twelve:forty-four p.m.
and walked directly to the terminal, he would have entered the cab at twelve:forty-seven or twelve:forty-eight p.m.
If the cab ride was approximately six minutes, as was the reconstructed ride,
he would have reached his destination at approximately twelve:fifty-four p.m.
If he was discharged at Neely and Beckley and walked directly to his roominghouse,
he would have arrived there about twelve:fifty-nine to one p.m.
From the five hundred block of North Beckley, the walk would be a few minutes longer,
but in either event he would have been in the roominghouse at about one p.m.
This is the approximate time he entered the roominghouse, according to Earlene Roberts, the housekeeper there.
Arrival and departure from roominghouse.
Earlene Roberts, housekeeper for Mrs. A. C. Johnson at ten twenty-six North Beckley
knew Lee Harvey Oswald under the alias of O. H. Lee.
She first saw him the day he rented a room at that address on October fourteen, nineteen sixty-three.
He signed his name as O. H. Lee on the roominghouse register.
Mrs. Roberts testified that on Thursday, November twenty-one, Oswald did not come home.
On Friday, November twenty-two, about one p.m., he entered the house in unusual haste.
She recalled that it was subsequent to the time the President had been shot.
After a friend had called and told her, "President Kennedy has been shot," she turned on the television.
When Oswald came in she said, quote, Oh, you are in a hurry, end quote, but Oswald did not respond.
He hurried to his room and stayed no longer than three or four minutes.
Oswald had entered the house in his shirt sleeves, but when he left, he was zipping up a jacket.
Mrs. Roberts saw him a few seconds later standing near the bus stop in front of the house on the east side of Beckley.
Oswald was next seen about nine-tenths of a mile away
at the southeast corner of tenth Street and Patton Avenue, moments before the Tippit shooting.
If Oswald left his roominghouse shortly after one p.m. and walked at a brisk pace,
he would have reached tenth and Patton shortly after one:fifteen p.m.
Tippit's murder was recorded on the police radio tape at about one:sixteen p.m.
Patrolman J. D. Tippit joined the Dallas Police Department in July nineteen fifty-two.
He was described by Chief Curry as having the reputation of being "a very fine, dedicated officer."
Tippit patroled district Number seventy-eight in the Oak Cliff area of Dallas during daylight hours.
He drove a police car painted distinctive colors with Number ten prominently displayed on each side.
Tippit rode alone, as only one man was normally assigned to a patrol car in residential areas during daylight shifts.
At about twelve:forty-four p.m. on November twenty-two,
the radio dispatcher on channel one ordered all downtown patrol squads to report to Elm and Houston, code three (emergency).
At twelve:forty-five p.m. the dispatcher ordered Number seventy-eight (Tippit) to, quote, move into central Oak Cliff area, end quote.
At twelve:fifty-four p.m., Tippit reported that he was in the central Oak Cliff area at Lancaster and Eighth.
The dispatcher ordered Tippit to be, quote, at large for any emergency that comes in, end quote.
According to Chief Curry, Tippit was free to patrol the central Oak Cliff area.
Tippit must have heard the description of the suspect wanted for the President's shooting; it was broadcast over channel one at twelve:forty-five p.m.,
again at twelve:forty-eight p.m., and again at twelve:fifty-five p.m.
The suspect was described as a, quote,
white male, approximately thirty, slender build, height five foot ten inches, weight one hundred sixty-five pounds, end quote.
A similar description was given on channel two at twelve:forty-five p.m.
At approximately one:fifteen p.m., Tippit, who was cruising east on tenth Street,
passed the intersection of tenth and Patton, about eight blocks from where he had reported at twelve:fifty-four p.m.
About one hundred feet past the intersection Tippit stopped a man walking east along the south side of Patton.
The man's general description was similar to the one broadcast over the police radio.
Tippit stopped the man and called him to his car.
He approached the car and apparently exchanged words with Tippit through the right front or vent window.
Tippit got out and started to walk around the front of the car
As Tippit reached the left front wheel the man pulled out a revolver and fired several shots.
Four bullets hit Tippit and killed him instantly.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter four. The Assassin: Part six.
At least twelve persons saw the man with the revolver in the vicinity of the Tippit crime scene at or immediately after the shooting.
By the evening of November twenty-two, five of them had identified Lee Harvey Oswald in police lineups as the man they saw.
A sixth did so the next day.
Three others subsequently identified Oswald from a photograph.
Two witnesses testified that Oswald resembled the man they had seen.
One witness felt he was too distant from the gunman to make a positive identification.
A taxi driver, William Scoggins,
was eating lunch in his cab which was parked on Patton facing the southeast corner of tenth Street and Patton Avenue a few feet to the north.
A police car moving east on tenth at about ten or twelve miles an hour passed in front of his cab.
About one hundred feet from the corner the police car pulled up alongside a man on the sidewalk. This man, dressed in a light-colored jacket, approached the car.
Scoggins lost sight of him behind some shrubbery on the southeast corner lot,
but he saw the policeman leave the car, heard three or four shots, and then saw the policeman fall.
Scoggins hurriedly left his seat and hid behind the cab as the man came back toward the corner with gun in hand.
The man cut across the yard through some bushes, passed within twelve feet of Scoggins, and ran south on Patton.
Scoggins saw him and heard him mutter either "Poor damn cop" or "Poor dumb cop."
The next day Scoggins viewed a lineup of four persons and identified Oswald as the man whom he had seen the day before at tenth and Patton.
In his testimony before the Commission,
Scoggins stated that he thought he had seen a picture of Oswald in the newspapers prior to the lineup identification on Saturday.
He had not seen Oswald on television and had not been shown any photographs of Oswald by the police.
Another witness, Domingo Benavides, was driving a pickup truck west on tenth Street.
As he crossed the intersection a block east of tenth and Patton, he saw a policeman standing by the left door of the police car parked along the south side of tenth.
Benavides saw a man standing at the right side of the parked police car. He then heard three shots and saw the policeman fall to the ground.
By this time the pickup truck was across the street and about twenty-five feet from the police car.
Benavides stopped and waited in the truck until the gunman ran to the corner.
He saw him empty the gun and throw the shells into some bushes on the southeast corner lot.
It was Benavides, using Tippit's car radio, who first reported the killing of Patrolman Tippit at about one:sixteen p.m.:
quote, We've had a shooting out here, end quote,
He found two empty shells in the bushes and gave them to Patrolman J. M. Poe who arrived on the scene shortly after the shooting.
Benavides never saw Oswald after the arrest.
When questioned by police officers on the evening of November twenty-two, Benavides told them that he did not think that he could identify the man who fired the shots.
As a result, they did not take him to the police station.
He testified that the picture of Oswald which he saw later on television bore a resemblance to the man who shot Officer Tippit.
Just prior to the shooting, Mrs. Helen Markham, a waitress in downtown Dallas, was about to cross tenth Street at Patton.
As she waited on the northwest corner of the intersection for traffic to pass, she noticed a young man as he was, quote, almost ready to get up on the curb, end quote.
at the southeast corner of the intersection, approximately fifty feet away.
The man continued along tenth Street. Mrs. Markham saw a police car slowly approach the man from the rear and stop alongside of him.
She saw the man come to the right window of the police car. As he talked, he leaned on the ledge of the right window with his arms.
The man appeared to step back as the policeman, quote, calmly opened the car door, end quote, and very slowly got out and walked toward the front of the car.
The man pulled a gun. Mrs. Markham heard three shots and saw the policeman fall to the ground near the left front wheel.
She raised her hands to her eyes as the man started to walk back toward Patton.
She peered through her fingers, lowered her hands, and saw the man doing something with his gun. Quote,
He was just fooling with it. I didn't know what he was doing. I was afraid he was fixing to kill me. End quote.
The man, quote, in kind of a little trot, end quote, headed down Patton toward Jefferson Boulevard, a block away.
Mrs. Markham then ran to Officer Tippit's side and saw him lying in a pool of blood.
Helen Markham was screaming as she leaned over the body.
A few minutes later she described the gunman to a policeman.
Her description and that of other eyewitnesses led to the police broadcast at one:twenty-two p.m.
describing the slayer as, quote, about thirty, five foot eight inches, black hair, slender, end quote.
At about four:thirty p.m., Mrs. Markham,
who had been greatly upset by her experience, was able to view a lineup of four men handcuffed together at the police station.
She identified Lee Harvey Oswald as the man who shot the policeman.
Detective L. C. Graves, who had been with Mrs. Markham before the lineup
testified that she was, quote, quite hysterical, end quote, and was, quote, crying and upset, end quote.
He said that Mrs. Markham started crying when Oswald walked into the lineup room.
In testimony before the Commission, Mrs. Markham confirmed her positive identification of Lee Harvey Oswald
as the man she saw kill Officer Tippit. In evaluating Mrs. Markham's identification of Oswald, the Commission considered certain allegations
That Mrs. Markham described the man who killed Patrolman Tippit as, quote, short, a little on the heavy side, end quote.
and having, quote, somewhat bushy, end quote, hair.
The Commission reviewed the transcript of a phone conversation in which Mrs. Markham is alleged to have provided such a description.
A review of the complete transcript has satisfied the Commission
that Mrs. Markham strongly reaffirmed her positive identification of Oswald and denied having described the killer
as short, stocky and having bushy hair. She stated that the man weighed about one hundred fifty pounds.
Although she used the words, quote, a little bit bushy, end quote, to describe the gunman's hair,
the transcript establishes that she was referring to the uncombed state of his hair, a description fully supported by a photograph of Oswald
taken at the time of his arrest.
Although in the phone conversation she described the man as, quote, short, end quote, on November twenty-second,
within minutes of the shooting and before the lineup, Mrs. Markham described the man to the police as five foot eight inches tall.
During her testimony Mrs. Markham initially denied that she ever had the above phone conversation.
She has subsequently admitted the existence of the conversation and offered an explanation for her denial.
Addressing itself solely to the probative value of Mrs. Markham's contemporaneous description of the gunman
and her positive identification of Oswald at a police lineup, the Commission considers her testimony reliable.
However, even in the absence of Mrs. Markham's testimony, there is ample evidence to identify Oswald as the killer of Tippit.
Barbara Jeanette Davis and Virginia Davis, were in an apartment of a multiple-unit house on the southeast corner of tenth and Patton
when they heard the sound of gunfire and the screams of Helen Markham.
They ran to the door in time to see a man with a revolver cut across their lawn and disappear around a corner of the house onto Patton.
Barbara Jeanette Davis assumed that he was emptying his gun as, quote, he had it open and was shaking it, end quote. She immediately called the police.
Later in the day each woman found an empty shell on the ground near the house. These two shells were delivered to the police.
On the evening of November twenty-two,
Barbara Jeanette and Virginia Davis viewed a group of four men in a lineup and each one picked Oswald as the man who crossed their lawn while emptying his pistol.
Barbara Jeanette Davis testified that no one had shown her a picture of Oswald before the identification and that she had not seen him on television.
She was not sure whether she had seen his picture in a newspaper on the afternoon or evening of November twenty-two prior to the lineup.
Her reaction when she saw Oswald in the lineup was that, quote,
I was pretty sure it was the same man I saw. When they made him turn sideways, I was positive that was the one I seen, end quote.
Similarly, Virginia Davis had not been shown pictures of anyone prior to the lineup and had not seen either television or the newspapers during the afternoon.
She identified Oswald, who was the Number two man in the lineup, as the man she saw running with the gun:
she testified, quote, I would say that was him for sure, end quote.
Barbara Jeanette Davis and Virginia Davis were sitting alongside each other when they made their positive identifications of Oswald.
Each woman whispered Oswald's number to the detective. Each testified that she was the first to make the identification.
William Arthur Smith was about a block east of tenth and Patton when he heard shots.
He looked west on tenth and saw a man running to the west and a policeman falling to the ground.
Smith failed to make himself known to the police on November twenty-two.
Several days later he reported what he had seen and was questioned by FBI agents.
Smith subsequently told a Commission staff member
that he saw Oswald on television the night of the murder and thought that Oswald was the man he had seen running away from the shooting.
On television Oswald's hair looked blond, whereas Smith remembered that the man who ran away had hair that was brown or brownish black.
Later, the FBI showed Smith a picture of Oswald. In the picture the hair was brown.
According to his testimony, Smith told the FBI, quote, It looked more like him than it did on television, end quote,
He stated further that from, quote, What I saw of him, end quote, the man looked like the man in the picture.
Two other important eyewitnesses to Oswald's flight were Ted Callaway,
manager of a used-car lot on the northeast corner of Patton Avenue and Jefferson Boulevard, and Sam Guinyard, a porter at the lot.
They heard the sound of shots to the north of their lot. Callaway heard five shots, and Guinyard three.
Both ran to the sidewalk on the east side of Patton at a point about a half a block south of tenth.
They saw a man coming south on Patton with a revolver held high in his right hand. According to Callaway, the man crossed to the west side of Patton.
From across the street Callaway yelled, quote, Hey, man, what the hell is going on? End quote.
He slowed down, halted, said something, and then kept on going to the corner, turned right, and continued west on Jefferson.
Guinyard claimed that the man ran down the east side of Patton and passed within ten feet of him before crossing to the other side.
Guinyard and Callaway ran to tenth and Patton and found Tippit lying in the street beside his car.
Apparently he had reached for his gun; it lay beneath him outside of the holster.
Callaway picked up the gun.
He and Scoggins attempted to chase down the gunman in Scoggin's taxicab, but he had disappeared.
Early in the evening of November twenty-two,
Guinyard and Callaway viewed the same lineup of four men from which Mrs. Markham had earlier made her identification of Lee Harvey Oswald.
Both men picked Oswald as the man who had run south on Patton with a gun in his hand.
Callaway told the Commission, quote, So they brought four men in.
I stepped to the back of the room, so I could kind of see him from the same distance which I had seen him before. And when he came out I knew him, end quote.
Guinyard said, quote, I told them that was him right there. I pointed him out right there, end quote.
Both Callaway and Guinyard testified that they had not been shown any pictures by the police before the lineup.
The Dallas Police Department furnished the Commission with pictures of the men who appeared in the lineups with Oswald,
and the Commission has inquired into general lineup procedures used by the Dallas police as well as the specific procedures in the lineups involving Oswald.
The Commission is satisfied that the lineups were conducted fairly.
As Oswald ran south on Patton Avenue toward Jefferson Boulevard he was moving in the direction of a used-car lot
located on the southeast corner of this intersection.
Four men -- Warren Reynolds, Harold Russell, Pat Patterson, and L. J. Lewis
were on the lot at the time, and they saw a white male with a revolver in his hands running south on Patton.
When the man reached Jefferson, he turned right and headed west.
Reynolds and Patterson decided to follow him.
When he reached a gasoline service station one block away he turned north and walked toward a parking area in the rear of the station.
Neither Reynolds nor Patterson saw the man after he turned off Jefferson at the service station.
These four witnesses were interviewed by FBI agents two months after the shooting.
Russell and Patterson were shown a picture of Oswald and they stated that Oswald was the man they saw on November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three.
Russell confirmed this statement in a sworn affidavit for the Commission.
Patterson, when asked later to confirm his identification by affidavit said he did not recall having been shown the photograph.
He was then shown two photographs of Oswald and he advised that Oswald was, quote, unquestionably, end quote, the man he saw.
Reynolds did not make a positive identification when interviewed by the FBI, but
he subsequently testified before a Commission staff member and, when shown two photographs of Oswald, stated that they were photographs of the man he saw.
L.J. Lewis said in an interview that because of the distance from which he observed the gunman he would hesitate to state whether the man was identical with Oswald.
When Oswald was arrested, he had in his possession a Smith and Wesson thirty-eight Special caliber revolver,
serial number V five one zero two one zero.
Two of the arresting officers placed their initials on the weapon and a third inscribed his name.
All three identified Exhibit Number one forty-three as the revolver taken from Oswald when he was arrested.
Four cartridge cases were found in the shrubbery on the corner of tenth and Patton by three of the eyewitnesses -- Domingo Benavides,
Barbara Jeanette Davis, and Virginia Davis.
It was the unanimous and unequivocal testimony of expert witnesses before the Commission that these used cartridge cases were fired from the revolver
in Oswald's possession to the exclusion of all other weapons.
Cortlandt Cunningham, of the Firearms Identification Unit of the FBI Laboratory, testified
that he compared the four empty cartridge cases found near the scene of the shooting with a test cartridge fired from the weapon in Oswald's possession when he was arrested.
Cunningham declared that this weapon fired the four cartridges to the exclusion of all other weapons.
Identification was effected through breech face marks and firing pin marks.
Robert A. Frazier and Charles Killion, other FBI firearms experts,
independently examined the four cartridge cases and arrived at the same conclusion as Cunningham.
At the request of the Commission, Joseph D. Nicol, superintendent of the Illinois Bureau of Criminal Identification Investigation,
also examined the four cartridge cases found near the site of the homicide and compared them with the test cartridge cases fired from the Smith and Wesson revolver
He concluded that all of these cartridges were fired from the same weapon.
Cunningham compared four lead bullets recovered from the body of Patrolman Tippit with test bullets fired from Oswald's revolver.
He explained that the bullets were slightly smaller than the barrel of the pistol which had fired them. This caused the bullets to have an erratic passage through the barrel
and impressed upon the lead of the bullets inconsistent individual characteristics which made identification impossible.
Consecutive bullets fired from the revolver by the FBI experts could not be identified as having been fired from that revolver.
Cunningham testified that all of the bullets were mutilated, one being useless for comparison purposes.
All four bullets were fired from a weapon
with five lands and grooves and a right twist which were the rifling characteristics of the revolver taken from Oswald.
He concluded, however, that he could not say whether the four bullets were fired from the revolver in Oswald's possession.
Quote: The only thing I can testify is they could have on the basis of the rifling characteristics -- they could have been, end quote,
Nicol differed with the FBI experts on one bullet taken from Tippit's body.
He declared that this bullet was fired from the same weapon that fired the test bullets to the exclusion of all other weapons.
But he agreed that because the other three bullets were mutilated, he could not determine if they had been fired from the same weapon as the test bullets.
The examination and testimony of the experts enabled the Commission to conclude that five shots may have been fired,
even though only four bullets were recovered.
Three of the bullets recovered from Tippit's body were manufactured by Winchester-Western, and the fourth bullet by Remington-Peters,
but only two of the four discarded cartridge cases found on the lawn at tenth Street and Patton Avenue were of Winchester-Western manufacture.
Therefore, one cartridge case of this type was not recovered.
And though only one bullet of Remington-Peters manufacture was recovered, two empty cartridge cases of that make were retrieved.
Therefore, either one bullet of Remington-Peters manufacture is missing
or one used Remington-Peters cartridge case, which may have been in the revolver before the shooting,
was discarded along with the others as Oswald left the scene.
If a bullet is missing, five were fired. This corresponds with the observation and memory of Ted Callaway, and possibly Warren Reynolds,
but not with the other eyewitnesses who claim to have heard from two to four shots.
By checking certain importers and dealers after the assassination of President Kennedy and slaying of Officer Tippit,
agents of the FBI determined that George Rose and Co. of Los Angeles was a major distributor of this type of revolver.
Records of Seaport Traders, Incorporated, a mail-order division of George Rose and Co.,
disclosed that on January three, nineteen sixty-three,
the company received from Empire Wholesale Sporting Goods, Ltd., Montreal, a shipment of ninety-nine guns in one case.
Among these guns was a thirty-eight Special caliber Smith and Wesson revolver, serial Number V five one zero two one zero,
the only revolver made by Smith and Wesson with this serial number. When first manufactured, it had a five-inch barrel.
George Rose and Co. had the barrel shortened by a gunsmith to two and one quarter inches.
Sometime after January twenty-seven, nineteen sixty-three,
Seaport Traders, Incorporated, received through the mail a mail-order coupon for one, quote, point three-eight
S T. W. two inch BBL, unquote, cost twenty-nine dollars, ninety-five cents.
Ten dollars in cash was enclosed.
The order was signed in ink by, quote,
A. J. Hidell, aged twenty-eight, end quote. The date of the order was January twenty-seven. No year shown.
and the return address was Post Office Box two nine one five, Dallas, Texas.
Also on the order form was an order, written in ink, for one box of ammunition and one holster, but a line was drawn through these items.
The mail-order form had a line for the name of a witness to attest that the person ordering the gun was a U.S. citizen and had not been convicted of a felony.
The name written in this space was D. F. Drittal.
Heinz W. Michaelis, office manager of both George Rose and Co., Incorporated and Seaport Traders, Incorporated.
identified records of Seaport Traders, Incorporated, which showed that a, quote, point three eight
S and W Special two-inch Commando, serial number V five one zero two one zero, end quote,
was shipped on March twenty, nineteen sixty-three, to A. J. Hidell, Post Office Box two nine one five, Dallas, Texas.
The invoice was prepared on March thirteen, nineteen sixty-three; the revolver was actually shipped on March twenty by Railway Express.
The balance due on the purchase was nineteen dollars, ninety-five cents.
Michaelis furnished the shipping copy of the invoice, and the Railway Express Agency shipping documents, showing that
nineteen dollars, ninety-five cents, plus one dollar, twenty-seven cents shipping charge, had been collected from the consignee, Hidell.
Handwriting experts, Alwyn Cole of the Treasury Department and James C. Cadigan of the FBI,
testified before the Commission that the writing on the coupon was Oswald's.
The signature of the witness, D. F. Drittal,
who attested that the fictitious Hidell was an American citizen and had not been convicted of a felony, was also in Oswald's handwriting.
Marina Oswald gave as her opinion that the mail-order coupon was in Oswald's handwriting.
When shown the revolver, she stated that she recognized it as the one owned by her husband.
She also testified that this appeared to be the revolver seen in Oswald's belt
in the picture she took in late March or early April nineteen sixty-three when the family was living on Neely Street in Dallas.
Police found an empty revolver holster when they searched Oswald's room on Beckley Avenue after his arrest.
Marina Oswald testified that this was the holster which contained the revolver in the photographs taken on Neely Street.
Approximately fifteen minutes before the shooting of Tippit, Oswald was seen leaving his roominghouse.
He was wearing a zipper jacket which he had not been wearing moments before when he had arrived home.
When Oswald was arrested, he did not have a jacket.
Shortly after Tippit was slain, policemen found a light-colored zipper jacket along the route taken by the killer as he attempted to escape.
At one:twenty-two p.m. the Dallas police radio described the man wanted for the murder of Tippit as, quote, a white male about thirty,
five foot eight inches, black hair, slender, wearing a white jacket, white shirt and dark slacks, end quote,
According to Patrolman Poe this description came from Mrs. Markham and Mrs. Barbara Jeanette Davis.
that the man was a, quote, white male, about twenty-five, about five feet eight, brown hair, medium, end quote, and wearing a, quote,
Mrs. Davis gave Poe the same general description: a, quote, white male in his early twenties, around five foot seven inches
or eight inches, about one hundred forty-five pounds, end quote, and wearing a white jacket.
As has been discussed previously,
two witnesses, Warren Reynolds and B. M. Patterson, saw the gunman run toward the rear of a gasoline service station on Jefferson Boulevard.
Mrs. Mary Brock, the wife of a mechanic who worked at the station, was there at the time and she saw a white male,
five feet, ten inches, wearing light clothing, a light-colored jacket" walk past her at a fast pace with his hands in his pocket.
She last saw him in the parking lot directly behind the service station.
When interviewed by FBI agents on January twenty-one, nineteen sixty-four,
she identified a picture of Oswald as being the same person she saw on November twenty-two.
She confirmed this interview by a sworn affidavit.
At one:twenty-four p.m., the police radio reported, quote,
The suspect last seen running west on Jefferson from four hundred East Jefferson.
Police Capt. W. R. Westbrook and several other officers concentrated their search along Jefferson Boulevard.
Westbrook walked through the parking lot behind the service station and found a light-colored jacket lying under the rear of one of the cars.
Westbrook identified Commission Exhibit Number one sixty-two as the light-colored jacket which he discovered underneath the automobile.
This jacket belonged to Lee Harvey Oswald. Marina Oswald stated that her husband owned only two jackets, one blue and the other gray.
The blue jacket was found in the Texas School Book Depository and was identified by Marina Oswald as her husband's.
Marina Oswald also identified Commission Exhibit Number one sixty-two, the jacket found by Captain Westbrook, as her husband's second jacket.
The eyewitnesses vary in their identification of the jacket.
Mrs. Earlene Roberts, the housekeeper at Oswald's roominghouse and the last person known to have seen him before he reached tenth Street and Patton Avenue,
said that she may have seen the gray zipper jacket but she was not certain.
It seemed to her that the jacket Oswald wore was darker than Commission Exhibit Number one sixty-two.
Ted Callaway, who saw the gunman moments after the shooting, testified that Commission Exhibit Number one sixty-two
looked like the jacket he was wearing but, quote, I thought it had a little more tan to it, end quote.
Two other witnesses, Sam Guinyard and William Arthur Smith,
testified that Commission Exhibit Number one sixty-two was the jacket worn by the man they saw on November twenty-two.
Mrs. Markham and Barbara Davis thought that the jacket worn by the slayer of Tippit was darker than the jacket found by Westbrook.
Scoggins thought it was lighter.
There is no doubt, however, that Oswald was seen leaving his roominghouse at about one p.m. wearing a zipper jacket,
that the man who killed Tippit was wearing a light-colored jacket,
that he was seen running along Jefferson Boulevard, that a jacket was found under a car in a lot adjoining Jefferson Boulevard
that the jacket belonged to Lee Harvey Oswald, and that when he was arrested at approximately one:fifty p.m., he was in shirt sleeves.
These facts warrant the finding that Lee Harvey Oswald disposed of his jacket as he fled from the scene of the Tippit killing.
The foregoing evidence establishes that (one) two eyewitnesses who heard the shots and saw the shooting of Dallas Police Patrolman J. D. Tippit
and seven eyewitnesses who saw the flight of the gunman with revolver in hand
positively identified Lee Harvey Oswald as the man they saw fire the shots or flee from the scene,
(two) the cartridge cases found near the scene of the shooting were fired from the revolver in the possession of Oswald at the time of his arrest,
to the exclusion of all other weapons,
(three) the revolver in Oswald's possession at the time of his arrest was purchased by and belonged to Oswald, and (four)
Oswald's jacket was found along the path of flight taken by the gunman as he fled from the scene of the killing.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter four. The Assassin: Part seven.
The Texas Theatre is on the north side of Jefferson Boulevard, approximately eight blocks from the scene of the Tippit shooting and six blocks
from where several witnesses last saw Oswald running west on Jefferson Boulevard. Shortly after the Tippit murder,
police sirens sounded along Jefferson Boulevard.
One of the persons who heard the sirens was Johnny Calvin Brewer, manager of Hardy's Shoestore, a few doors east of the Texas Theatre.
Brewer knew from radio broadcasts that the President had been shot and that a patrolman had also been shot in Oak Cliff.
When he heard police sirens, he, quote, looked up and saw the man enter the lobby, end quote.
a recessed area extending about fifteen feet between the sidewalk and the front door of his store.
A police car made a U-turn, and as the sirens grew fainter,
the man in the lobby, quote, looked over his shoulder and turned around and walked up West Jefferson towards the theatre, end quote.
The man wore a T-shirt beneath his outer shirt and he had no jacket.
Brewer said, quote, He just looked funny to me. His hair was sort of messed up and looked like he had been running, and he looked scared, and he looked funny, end quote.
Mrs. Julia Postal, selling tickets at the box office of the Texas Theatre,
heard police sirens and then saw a man as he, quote, ducked into, end quote, the outer lobby space of the theatre near the ticket office.
Attracted by the sound of the sirens, Mrs. Postal stepped out of the box office and walked to the curb.
Shortly thereafter, Johnny Brewer, who had come from the nearby shoestore, asked Mrs. Postal whether the fellow that had ducked in had bought a ticket.
She said, quote, No; by golly, he didn't, end quote, and turned around, but the man was nowhere in sight.
Brewer told Mrs. Postal that he had seen the man ducking into his place of business and that he had followed him to the theatre.
She sent Brewer into the theatre to find the man and check the exits, told him about the assassination, and said, quote,
I don't know if this is the man they want. But he is running from them for some reason, end quote, She then called the police.
At one:forty-five p.m., the police radio stated, quote, Have information a suspect just went in the Texas Theatre on West Jefferson, end quote.
Patrol cars bearing at least fifteen officers converged on the Texas Theatre.
Patrolman M. N. McDonald, with Patrolmen R. Hawkins, T. A. Hutson, and C. T. Walker, entered the theatre from the rear.
Other policemen entered the front door and searched the balcony.
Detective Paul L. Bentley rushed to the balcony and told the projectionist to turn up the house lights.
Brewer met McDonald and the other policemen at the alley exit door,
stepped out onto the stage with them and pointed out the man who had come into the theatre without paying.
The man was Oswald. He was sitting alone in the rear of the main floor of the theatre near the right center aisle.
About six or seven people were seated on the theatre's main floor and an equal number in the balcony.
McDonald first searched two men in the center of the main floor, about ten rows from the front.
He walked out of the row up the right center aisle.
When he reached the row where the suspect was sitting, McDonald stopped abruptly and told the man to get on his feet.
Oswald rose from his seat, bringing up both hands.
As McDonald started to search Oswald's waist for a gun, he heard him say, quote, Well, it's all over now, end quote.
Oswald then struck McDonald between the eyes with his left fist; with his right hand he drew a gun from his waist.
McDonald struck back with his right hand and grabbed the gun with his left hand. They both fell into the seats.
Three other officers, moving toward the scuffle, grabbed Oswald from the front, rear and side.
As McDonald fell into the seat with his left hand on the gun, he felt something graze across his hand and heard what sounded like the snap of the hammer.
McDonald felt the pistol scratch his cheek as he wrenched it away from Oswald.
Detective Bob K. Carroll, who was standing beside McDonald, seized the gun from him.
The other officers who helped subdue Oswald corroborated McDonald in his testimony
except that they did not hear Oswald say, quote, It's all over now, end quote.
Deputy Sheriff Eddy R. Walthers recalled such a remark but he did not reach the scene of the struggle
until Oswald had been knocked to the floor by McDonald and the others.
Some of the officers saw Oswald strike McDonald with his fist. Most of them heard a click which they assumed to be a click of the hammer of the revolver.
Testimony of a firearms expert before the Commission established that the hammer of the revolver never touched the shell in the chamber.
Although the witnesses did not hear the sound of a misfire,
they might have heard a snapping noise resulting from the police officer grabbing the cylinder of the revolver and pulling it away from Oswald while he was attempting to pull the trigger.
Two patrons of the theatre and John Brewer
testified regarding the arrest of Oswald, as did the various police officers who participated in the fight.
George Jefferson Applin, Jr., confirmed that Oswald fought with four or five officers before he was handcuffed.
He added that one officer grabbed the muzzle of a shotgun, drew back, and hit Oswald with the butt end of the gun in the back.
No other theatre patron or officer has testified that Oswald was hit by a gun.
Nor did Oswald ever complain that he was hit with a gun, or injured in the back.
Deputy Sheriff Walthers brought a shotgun into the theatre but laid it on some seats before helping subdue Oswald.
that there was no one near Oswald who had a shotgun and he saw no one strike Oswald in the back with a rifle butt or the butt of a gun.
John Gibson, another patron in the theatre, saw an officer grab Oswald, and he claims that he heard the click of a gun misfiring.
He saw no shotgun in the possession of any policeman near Oswald.
Johnny Brewer testified he saw Oswald pull the revolver and the officers struggle with him to take it away
but that once he was subdued, no officer struck him.
He further stated that while fists were flying he heard one of the officers say, quote, Kill the President, will you, end quote.
It is unlikely that any of the police officers referred to Oswald as a suspect in the assassination.
While the police radio had noted the similarity in description of the two suspects, the arresting officers were pursuing Oswald for the murder of Tippit.
As Oswald, handcuffed, was led from the theatre, he was, according to McDonald, quote,
cursing a little bit and hollering police brutality, end quote.
At one:fifty-one p.m., police car two reported by radio that it was on the way to headquarters with the suspect.
Captain Fritz returned to police headquarters from the Texas School Book Depository at two:fifteen after a brief stop at the sheriff's office.
When he entered the homicide and robbery bureau office, he saw two detectives standing there with Sgt. Gerald L. Hill,
who had driven from the theatre with Oswald.
Hill testified that Fritz told the detective to get a search warrant, go to an address on Fifth Street in Irving,
and pick up a man named Lee Oswald. When Hill asked why Oswald was wanted,
Fritz replied, quote, Well, he was employed down at the Book Depository and he had not been present for a roll call of the employees, end quote.
Hill said, quote, Captain, we will save you a trip. There he sits, end quote.
Statements of Oswald during Detention.
Oswald was questioned intermittently for approximately twelve hours between two:thirty p.m., on November twenty-two, and eleven a.m.,
Throughout this interrogation he denied that he had anything to do either with the assassination of President Kennedy or the murder of Patrolman Tippit.
Captain Fritz of the homicide and robbery bureau did most of the questioning, but he kept no notes and there were no stenographic or tape recordings.
Representatives of other law enforcement agencies were also present, including the FBI and the U.S. Secret Service.
They occasionally participated in the questioning.
The reports prepared by those present at these interviews are set forth in appendix eleven.
A full discussion of Oswald's detention and interrogation is presented in chapter five of this report.
During the evening of November twenty-two, the Dallas Police Department performed paraffin tests on Oswald's hands and right cheek
in an apparent effort to determine, by means of a scientific test, whether Oswald had recently fired a weapon.
The results were positive for the hands and negative for the right cheek.
Expert testimony before the Commission
was to the effect that the paraffin test was unreliable in determining whether or not a person has fired a rifle or revolver.
The Commission has, therefore, placed no reliance on the paraffin tests administered by the Dallas police.
Oswald provided little information during his questioning.
Frequently, however, he was confronted with evidence which he could not explain, and he resorted to statements which are known to be lies.
While Oswald's untrue statements during interrogation were not considered items of positive proof
by the Commission, they had probative value in deciding the weight to be given to his denials that he assassinated President Kennedy
and killed Patrolman Tippit. Since independent evidence revealed that Oswald repeatedly and blatantly lied to the police,
the Commission gave little weight to his denials of guilt.
From the outset, Oswald denied owning a rifle.
On November twenty-three, Fritz confronted Oswald with the evidence that he had purchased a rifle under the fictitious name of "Hidell."
Oswald said that this was not true. Oswald denied that he had a rifle wrapped up in a blanket in the Paine garage.
Oswald also denied owning a rifle and said that since leaving the Marine Corps he had fired only a small bore twenty-two rifle.
On the afternoon of November twenty-three, Officers H. M. Moore,
R. S. Stovall, and G. F. Rose obtained a search warrant and examined Oswald's effects in the Paine garage.
They discovered two photographs, each showing Oswald with a rifle and a pistol.
These photographs were shown to Oswald on the evening of November twenty-three and again on the morning of the twenty-fourth.
According to Fritz, Oswald sneered, saying that they were fake photographs, that he had been photographed a number of times the day before by the police,
that they had superimposed upon the photographs a rifle and a revolver. He told Fritz a number of times that the smaller photograph
was either made from the larger, or the larger photograph was made from the smaller and that at the proper time he would show that the pictures were fakes.
Fritz told him that the two small photographs were found in the Paine garage.
At that point, Oswald refused to answer any further questions.
As previously indicated, Marina Oswald testified that she took the two pictures with her husband's Imperial Reflex camera
when they lived on Neely Street.
Her testimony was fully supported by a photography expert who testified that in his opinion the pictures were not composites.
At the first interrogation, Oswald claimed that his only crime was carrying a gun and resisting arrest.
When Captain Fritz asked him why he carried the revolver, he answered, quote, Well, you know about a pistol. I just carried it, end quote.
He falsely alleged that he bought the revolver in Fort Worth, when in fact he purchased it from a mail-order house in Los Angeles.
The Aliases "Hidell" and "O. H. Lee"
The arresting officers found a forged selective service card with a picture of Oswald and the name "Alek J. Hidell"
in Oswald's billfold. On November twenty-two and twenty-three, Oswald refused to tell Fritz why this card was in his possession,
or to answer any questions concerning the card.
On Sunday morning, November twenty-four, Oswald denied that he knew A. J. Hidell.
Captain Fritz produced the selective service card bearing the name "Alek J. Hidell."
Oswald became angry and said, quote,
Now, I've told you all I'm going to tell you about that card in my billfolds -- you have the card yourself and you know as much about it as I do, end quote.
At the last interrogation in November Oswald admitted to Postal Inspector Holmes that he had rented post office box two nine one five, Dallas,
but denied that he had received a package in this box addressed to Hidell.
He also denied that he had received the rifle through this box.
Holmes reminded Oswald that A. J. Hidell was listed on post office box three zero zero six one, New Orleans,
as one entitled to receive mail.
Oswald replied, quote, I don't know anything about that, end quote.
When asked why he lived at his roominghouse under the name O. H. Lee,
Oswald responded that the landlady simply made a mistake, because he told her that his name was Lee, meaning his first name.
An examination of the roominghouse register revealed that Oswald actually signed the name O. H. Lee.
In concluding that Oswald was carrying a rifle in the paper bag on the morning of November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three,
the Commission found that Oswald lied when he told Frazier that he was returning to Irving to obtain curtain rods.
When asked about the curtain rod story, Oswald lied again.
He denied that he had ever told Frazier that he wanted a ride to Irving to get curtain rods for an apartment.
He explained that a party for the Paine children had been planned for the weekend and he preferred not to be in the Paine house at that time;
therefore, he made his weekly visit on Thursday night.
Actually, the party for one of the Paine's children was the preceding weekend, when Marina Oswald suggested that Oswald remain in Dallas.
When told that Frazier and Mrs. Randle had seen him carrying a long heavy package, Oswald replied, quote, Well, they was mistaken.
that must have been some other time he picked me up, end quote,
In one interview, he told Fritz that the only sack he carried to work that day
was a lunch sack which he kept on his lap during the ride from Irving to Dallas.
Frazier testified before the Commission that Oswald carried no lunch sack that day.
Actions During and After Shooting
During the first interrogation on November twenty-two, Fritz asked Oswald to account for himself at the time the President was shot.
Oswald told him that he ate lunch in the first-floor lunchroom and then went to the second floor for a Coke which he brought downstairs.
He acknowledged the encounter with the police officer on the second floor.
Oswald told Fritz that after lunch he went outside, talked with Foreman Bill Shelley for five or ten minutes and then left for home.
He said that he left work because Bill Shelley said that there would be no more work done that day in the building.
Shelley denied seeing Oswald after twelve noon or at any time after the shooting.
The next day, Oswald added to his story.
He stated that at the time the President was shot he was having lunch with "Junior" but he did not give Junior's last name.
The only employee at the Depository Building named "Junior" was James Jarman, Jr.
Jarman testified that he ate his lunch on the first floor around five minutes to twelve, and that he neither ate lunch with nor saw Oswald.
Jarman did talk to Oswald that morning: Quote,
he asked me what were the people gathering around on the corner for and I told him that the President was supposed to pass that morning,
and he asked me did I know which way he was coming, and I told him, yes, he probably come down Main and turn on Houston and then back again on Elm.
Then he said, "Oh, I see," and that was all.
The Attempt on the Life of Maj. Gen. Edwin A. Walker
At approximately nine p.m., on April ten, nineteen sixty-three, in Dallas, Texas, Maj. Gen. Edwin A. Walker,
an active and controversial figure on the American political scene since his resignation from the U.S. Army in nineteen sixty-one
narrowly escaped death when a rifle bullet fired from outside his home passed near his head as he was seated at his desk.
There were no eyewitnesses, although a fourteen-year-old boy in a neighboring house claimed that immediately after the shooting
he saw two men, in separate cars, drive out of a church parking lot adjacent to Walker's home. A friend of Walker's testified that
two nights before the shooting he saw, quote, two men around the house peeking in windows, end quote.
General Walker gave this information to the police before the shooting, but it did not help solve the crime.
Although the bullet was recovered from Walker's house, in the absence of a weapon it was of little investigatory value.
General Walker hired two investigators to determine whether a former employee might have been involved in the shooting.
Until December three, nineteen sixty-three, the Walker shooting remained unsolved.
The Commission evaluated the following evidence in considering whether Lee Harvey Oswald fired the shot which almost killed General Walker:
A note which Oswald left for his wife on the evening of the shooting,
(two) photographs found among Oswald's possessions after the assassination of President Kennedy,
(three) firearm identification of the bullet found in Walker's home, and (four)
admissions and other statements made to Marina Oswald by Oswald concerning the shooting. Note left by Oswald.
On December two, nineteen sixty-three, Mrs. Ruth Paine turned over to the police some of the Oswalds' belongings,
including a Russian volume entitled, quote, Book of Useful Advice, end quote. In this book was an undated note written in Russian.
In translation, the note read as follows: one.
This is the key to the mailbox which is located in the main post office in the city on Ervay Street.
This is the same street where the drugstore, in which you always waited is located.
You will find the mailbox in the post office which is located four blocks from the drugstore on that street.
I paid for the box last month so don't worry about it.
two. Send the information as to what has happened to me to the Embassy.
and include newspaper clippings (should there be anything about me in the newspapers). I believe that the Embassy will come quickly to your assistance on learning everything.
three. I paid the house rent on the second so don't worry about it. four. Recently I also paid for water and gas.
five. The money from work will possibly be coming. The money will be sent to our post office box. Go to the bank and cash the check.
six. You can either throw out or give my clothing, etc. away. Do not keep these.
However, I prefer that you hold on to my personal papers (military, civil, etc.).
seven. Certain of my documents are in the small blue valise.
ten. I left you as much money as I could,
sixty dollars on the second of the month. You and the baby can live for another two months using ten dollars per week.
eleven. If I am alive and taken prisoner,
the city jail is located at the end of the bridge through which we always passed on going to the city (right in the beginning of the city after crossing the bridge).
James C. Cadigan, FBI handwriting expert, testified that this note was written by Lee Harvey Oswald.
Prior to the Walker shooting on April ten, Oswald had been attending typing classes on Monday, Tuesday, and Thursday evenings.
He had quit these classes at least a week before the shooting, which occurred on a Wednesday night.
According to Marina Oswald's testimony, on the night of the Walker shooting, her husband left their apartment on Neely Street shortly after dinner.
She thought he was attending a class or was on his own business.
When he failed to return by ten or ten:thirty p.m., Marina Oswald went to his room and discovered the note. She testified: quote,
When he came back I asked him what had happened. He was very pale.
I don't remember the exact time, but it was very late. And he told me not to ask him any questions. He only told me he had shot at General Walker.
Oswald told his wife that he did not know whether he had hit Walker;
according to Marina Oswald when he learned on the radio and in the newspapers the next day that he had missed,
he said that he, quote, was very sorry that he had not hit him, end quote. Marina Oswald's testimony was fully supported by the note itself
which appeared to be the work of a man expecting to be killed, or imprisoned, or to disappear.
The last paragraph directed her to the jail
and the other paragraphs instructed her on the disposal of Oswald's personal effects and the management of her affairs if he should not return.
It is clear that the note was written while the Oswalds were living in Dallas before they moved to New Orleans in the spring of nineteen sixty-three.
The references to house rent and payments for water and gas
indicated that the note was written when they were living in a rented apartment; therefore it could not have been written while Marina Oswald was living with the Paines.
Moreover, the reference in paragraph three to paying, quote, the house rent on the second, end quote,
would be consistent with the period when the Oswalds were living on Neely Street since the apartment was rented on March three, nineteen sixty-three.
Oswald had paid the first month's rent in advance on March two, nineteen sixty-three,
and the second month's rent was paid on either April two or April three.
The main post office, quote, on Ervay Street, end quote, refers to the post office where Oswald rented box two nine one five
from October nine, nineteen sixty-two, to May fourteen, nineteen sixty-three.
Another statement which limits the time when it could have been written is the reference, quote, you and the baby, end quote,
which would indicate that it was probably written before the birth of Oswald's second child on October twenty, nineteen sixty-three.
Oswald had apparently mistaken the county jail for the city jail.
From Neely Street the Oswalds would have traveled downtown on the Beckley bus, across the Commerce Street viaduct
and into downtown Dallas through the Triple Underpass.
Either the viaduct or the underpass might have been the "bridge" mentioned in the last paragraph of the note.
The county jail is at the corner of Houston and Main Streets, quote, right in the beginning of the city, end quote, after one travels through the underpass.
In her testimony before the Commission in February nineteen sixty-four,
Marina Oswald stated that when Oswald returned home on the night of the Walker shooting, he told her that he had been planning the attempt for two months.
He showed her a notebook three days later containing photographs of General Walker's home and a map of the area where the house was located.
Although Oswald destroyed the notebook, three photographs found among Oswald's possessions after the assassination
were identified by Marina Oswald as photographs of General Walker's house.
Two of these photographs were taken from the rear of Walker's house.
The Commission confirmed, by comparison with other photographs, that these were, indeed, photographs of the rear of Walker's house.
An examination of the window at the rear of the house, the wall through which the bullet passed, and the fence behind the house
indicated that the bullet was fired from a position near the point where one of the photographs was taken.
The third photograph identified by Marina Oswald depicts the entrance to General Walker's driveway from a back alley.
Also seen in the picture is the fence on which Walker's assailant apparently rested the rifle.
An examination of certain construction work appearing in the background of this photograph revealed that the picture was taken between March eight
and twelve, nineteen sixty-three, and most probably on either March nine or March ten.
Oswald purchased the money order for the rifle on March twelve, the rifle was shipped on March twenty, and the shooting occurred on April ten.
A photography expert with the FBI
was able to determine that, this picture was taken with the Imperial Reflex camera owned by Lee Harvey Oswald.
A fourth photograph, showing a stretch of railroad tracks,
was also identified by Marina Oswald as having been taken by her husband, presumably in connection with the Walker shooting.
Investigation determined that this photograph was taken approximately seven-tenths of a mile from Walker's house.
Another photograph of railroad tracks found among Oswald's possessions was not identified by his wife,
but investigation revealed that it was taken from a point slightly less than half a mile from General Walker's house.
Marina Oswald stated that- when she asked her husband what be had done with the rifle,
he replied that he had buried it in the ground or hidden it in some bushes and that he also mentioned a railroad track in this connection.
She testified that several days later Oswald recovered his rifle and brought it back to their apartment.
In the room beyond the one in which General Walker was sitting on the night of the shooting the Dallas police recovered a badly mutilated bullet
which had come to rest on a stack of paper.
The Dallas City-County Investigation Laboratory tried to determine the type of weapon which fired the bullet.
The oral report was negative because of the battered condition of the bullet.
On November thirty, nineteen sixty-three, the FBI requested the bullet for ballistics examination;
the Dallas Police Department forwarded it on December two, nineteen sixty-three.
Robert A. Frazier, an FBI ballistics identification expert, testified that he was, quote, unable to reach a conclusion, end quote,
as to whether or not the bullet recovered from Walker's house had been fired from the rifle found on the sixth floor of the Texas School Book Depository Building.
He concluded that, quote, the general rifling characteristics of the rifle are of the same type as those found on the bullet
and, further, on this basis the bullet could have been fired from the rifle on the basis of its land and groove impressions, end quote.
Frazier testified further that the FBI avoids the category of "probable" identification.
Unless the missile or cartridge case can be identified as coming from a particular weapon to the exclusion of all others,
the FBI refuses to draw any conclusion as to probability.
Frazier testified, however, that he found no microscopic characteristics or other evidence
which would indicate that the bullet was not fired from the Mannlicher-Carcano rifle owned by Lee Harvey Oswald.
It was a six point five-millimeter bullet
and, according to Frazier, "relatively few" types of rifles could produce the characteristics found on the bullet.
superintendent of the Illinois Bureau of Criminal Identification and Investigation, conducted an independent examination of this bullet
and concluded, quote, that there is a fair probability, end quote, that the bullet was fired from the rifle used in the assassination of President Kennedy.
In explaining the difference between his policy and that of the FBI on the matter of probable identification, Nicol said, quote,
I am aware of their position. This is not, I am sure, arrived at without careful consideration.
However, to say that because one does not find sufficient marks for identification that it is a negative,
I think is going overboard in the other direction.
And for purposes of probative value, for whatever it might be worth,
in the absence of very definite negative evidence, I think it is permissible to say that in an exhibit such as five seven three
there is enough on it to say that it could have come, and even perhaps a little stronger, to say that it probably came from this,
without going so far as to say to the exclusion of all other guns. This I could not do, end quote.
Although the Commission recognizes that neither expert was able to state
that the bullet which missed General Walker was fired from Oswald's rifle to the exclusion of all others, this testimony was considered probative
when combined with the other testimony linking Oswald to the shooting.
The admissions made to Marina Oswald by her husband are an important element in the evidence that Lee Harvey Oswald fired the shot at General Walker.
As shown above, the note and the photographs of Walker's house and of the nearby railroad tracks
provide important corroboration for her account of the incident.
Other details described by Marina Oswald coincide with facts developed independently of her statements.
She testified that her husband had postponed his attempt to kill Walker
until that Wednesday because he had heard that there was to be a gathering at the church next door to Walker's house on that evening.
He indicated that he wanted more people in the vicinity at the time of the attempt so that his arrival and departure would not attract great attention.
An official of this church told FBI agents that services are held every Wednesday at the church except during the month of August.
Marina Oswald also testified that her husband had used a bus to return home.
A study of the bus routes indicates that
Oswald could have taken any one of several different buses to Walker's house or to a point near the railroad tracks where he may have concealed the rifle.
It would have been possible for him to take different routes in approaching and leaving the scene of the shooting.
Based on (one) the contents of the note which Oswald left for his wife on April ten, nineteen sixty-three,
(two) the photographs found among Oswald's possessions,
(three) the testimony of firearms identification experts, and (four) the testimony of Marina Oswald,
the Commission has concluded that Lee Harvey Oswald attempted to take the life of Maj. Gen. Edwin A. Walker (Resigned, U.S. Army)
on April ten, nineteen sixty-three.
The finding that Lee Harvey Oswald attempted to murder a public figure in April nineteen sixty-three
was considered of probative value in this investigation, although the Commission's conclusion concerning the identity of the assassin
For more information, or to volunteer, please visit librivox dot org.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter four. The Assassin: Part eight.
Another alleged threat by Oswald against a public figure involved former Vice President Richard M. Nixon.
In January nineteen sixty-four, Marina Oswald and her business manager, James Martin,
told Robert Oswald, Lee Harvey Oswald's brother, that Oswald had once threatened to shoot former Vice President Richard M. Nixon.
When Marina Oswald testified before the Commission on February three to six, nineteen sixty-four,
she had failed to mention the incident when she was asked whether Oswald had ever expressed any hostility
toward any official of the United States.
The Commission first learned of this incident when Robert Oswald related it to FBI agents on February nineteen, nineteen sixty-four,
and to the Commission on February twenty-one.
Marina Oswald appeared before the Commission again on June eleven, nineteen sixty-four,
and testified that a few days before her husband's departure from Dallas to New Orleans on April twenty-four, nineteen sixty-three,
he finished reading a morning newspaper, quote, and put on a good suit. I saw that he took a pistol.
I asked him where he was going, and why he was getting dressed. He answered Nixon is coming. I want to go and have a look, end quote.
He also said that he would use the pistol if the opportunity arose.
She reminded him that after the Walker shooting he had promised never to repeat such an act.
Marina Oswald related the events which followed, quote,
I called him into the bathroom and I closed the door and I wanted to prevent him and then I started to cry.
And I told him that he shouldn't do this, and that he had promised me.
I remember that I held him. We actually struggled for several minutes and then he quieted down. End quote.
She stated that it was not physical force which kept him from leaving the house. Quote, I couldn't keep him from going out if he really wanted to, end quote.
she stated that she might have been confused about shutting him in the bathroom, but that, quote, there is no doubt that he got dressed and got a gun, end quote,
was shipped from Los Angeles on March twenty, nineteen sixty-three, and he left for New Orleans on April twenty-four, nineteen sixty-three.
No edition of either Dallas newspaper during the period January one, nineteen sixty-three, to May fifteen, nineteen sixty-three,
mentioned any proposed visit by Mr. Nixon to Dallas.
Mr. Nixon advised the Commission that the only time he was in Dallas in nineteen sixty-three
was on November twenty to twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three.
An investigation failed to reveal any invitation extended to Mr. Nixon during the period when Oswald's threat reportedly occurred.
The Commission has concluded, therefore, that regardless of what Oswald may have said to his wife
he was not actually planning to shoot Mr. Nixon at that time in Dallas.
On April twenty-three, nineteen sixty-three,
Vice President Lyndon B. Johnson was in Dallas for a visit which had been publicized in the Dallas newspapers
throughout April. The Commission asked Marina Oswald whether she might have misunderstood the object of her husband's threat. She stated, quote,
there is no question that in this incident it was a question of Mr. Nixon, end quote.
When asked later whether it might have been Mr. Johnson, she said, quote, Yes, no.
I am getting a little confused with so many questions.
I was absolutely convinced it was Nixon and now after all these questions I wonder if I am right in my mind? End quote.
She stated further that Oswald had only mentioned Nixon's name once during the incident. Marina Oswald might have misunderstood her husband.
Mr. Johnson was the then Vice President and his visit took place on April twenty-third.
This was one day before Oswald left for New Orleans and Marina appeared certain that the Nixon incident, quote,
wasn't the day before. Perhaps three days before, end quote.
Marina Oswald speculated that the incident may have been unrelated to an actual threat.
She said, quote, It might have been that he was just trying to test me.
He was the kind of person who could try and wound somebody in that way. Possibly he didn't want to go out at all but was just doing this all as a sort of joke,
not really as a joke but rather to simply wound me, to make me feel bad, end quote.
In the absence of other evidence that Oswald actually intended to shoot someone at this time,
the Commission concluded that the incident, as described by Marina Oswald,
was of no probative value in the Commission's decision concerning the identity of the assassin of President Kennedy.
In deciding whether Lee Harvey Oswald fired the shots which killed President Kennedy and wounded Governor Connally,
the Commission considered whether Oswald, using his own rifle,
possessed the capability to hit his target with two out of three shots under the conditions described in chapter three.
The Commission evaluated (one) the nature of the shots, (two) Oswald's Marine training in marksmanship,
(three) his experience and practice after leaving the Marine Corps, and (four) the accuracy of the weapon and the quality of the ammunition.
The Nature of the Shots
For a rifleman situated on the sixth floor of the Texas School Book Depository Building
the shots were at a slow-moving target proceeding on a downgrade in virtually a straight line
with the alinement of the assassin's rifle, at a range of one hundred seventy-seven to two hundred sixty-six feet.
An aerial photograph of Dealey Plaza shows that Elm Street runs at an angle
so that the President would have been moving in an almost straight line away from the assassin's rifle.
In addition, the three degree downward slope of Elm Street was of assistance in eliminating at least some of the adjustment
which is ordinarily required when a marksman must raise his rifle as a target moves farther away.
Four marksmanship experts testified before the Commission.
Maj. Eugene D. Anderson, assistant head of the Marksmanship Branch of U.S. Marine Corps
testified that the shots which struck the President in the neck and in the head were, quote, not particularly difficult, end quote.
Robert A. Frazier, FBI expert in firearms identification and training, said, quote,
From my own experience in shooting over the years,
when you shoot at one hundred seventy-five feet or two hundred sixty feet, which is less than a hundred yards, with a telescopic sight,
you should not have any difficulty in hitting your target. I mean it requires no training at all to shoot a weapon with a telescopic sight
once you know that you must put the crosshairs on the target and that is all that is necessary.
Ronald Simmons, chief of the U.S. Army Infantry Weapons Evaluation Branch of the Ballistics Research Laboratory, said, quote,
Well, in order to achieve three hits, it would not be required that a man be an exceptional shot. A proficient man with this weapon, yes, end quote.
The effect of a four-power telescopic sight on the difficulty of these shots was considered in detail
by Master Sgt. James A. Zahm, noncommissioned officer in charge of the Marksmanship Training Unit in the Weapons Training Battalion
of the Marine Corps School at Quantico, Virginia.
Referring to a rifle with a four-power telescope, Sergeant Zahm said, quote,
this is the ideal type of weapon for moving targets
Using the scope, rapidly working a bolt and using the scope to relocate your target quickly and at the same time when you locate that target
you identify it and the crosshairs are in close relationship to the point you want to shoot at,
it just takes a minor move in aiming to bring the crosshairs to bear, and then it is a quick squeeze.
I consider it a real advantage, particularly at the range of one hundred yards, in identifying your target.
It allows you to see your target clearly, and it is still of a minimum amount of power that it doesn't exaggerate your own body movements.
It just is an aid in seeing in the fact that you only have the one element, the crosshair,
in relation to the target as opposed to iron sights with aligning the sights and then aligning them on the target, end quote.
Characterizing the four-power scope as, quote, a real aid, an extreme aid, end quote, in rapid fire shooting,
Sergeant Zahm expressed the opinion that the shot which struck President Kennedy in the neck at one hundred seventy-six point nine
to one hundred ninety point eight feet was, quote, very easy, end quote, and the shot which struck the President in the head
at a distance of two hundred sixty-five point three feet was, quote, an easy shot, end quote.
After viewing photographs depicting the alignment of Elm Street in relation to the Texas School Book Depository Building,
This is a definite advantage to the shooter, the vehicle moving directly away from him and the downgrade of the street, and he being in an elevated position
made an almost stationary target while he was aiming in, very little movement if any, end quote.
In accordance with standard Marine procedures, Oswald received extensive training in marksmanship.
During the first week of an intensive eight-week training period he received instruction in sighting, aiming, and manipulation of the trigger.
He went through a series of exercises called dry firing where he assumed all positions which would later be used in the qualification course.
After familiarization with live ammunition in the twenty-two rifle and the twenty-two pistol,
Oswald, like all Marine recruits, received training on the rifle range at distances up to five hundred yards,
firing fifty rounds each day for five days.
Following that training, Oswald was tested in December of nineteen fifty-six, and obtained a score of two hundred twelve,
which was two points above the minimum for qualifications as a "sharpshooter" in a scale of marksman, sharpshooter, expert.
In May of nineteen fifty-nine, on another range, Oswald scored one hundred ninety-one, which was one point over the minimum for ranking as a "marksman."
The Marine Corps records maintained on Oswald further show that he had fired and was familiar with the Browning Automatic rifle,
forty-five caliber pistol, and twelve-gauge riot gun.
Based on the general Marine Corps ratings, Lt. Col. A. G. Folsom, Jr.
head, Records Branch, Personnel Department, Headquarters U.S. Marine Corps,
evaluated the sharpshooter qualification as a, quote, fairly good shot, end quote, and a low marksman rating
as a, quote, rather poor shot, end quote.
When asked to explain the different scores achieved by Oswald on the two occasions when he fired for record,
Major Anderson said, quote, when he fired that two twelve
he had just completed a very intensive preliminary training period.
He had the services of an experienced highly trained coach.
He had high motivation. He had presumably a good to excellent rifle and good ammunition.
We have nothing here to show under what conditions the B course was fired. It might well have been a bad day for firing the rifle
windy, rainy, dark. There is little probability that he had good, expert coach,
and he probably didn't have as high a motivation because he was no longer in recruit training and under the care of the drill instructor.
There is some possibility that the rifle he was firing might not have been as good a rifle as the rifle that he was firing in his A course firing,
because he may well have carried this rifle for quite some time, and it got banged around in normal usage.
End quote. Major Anderson concluded, quote, I would say that as compared to other Marines receiving the same type of training,
that Oswald was a good shot, somewhat better than or equal to -- better than the average let us say.
As compared to a civilian who had not received this intensive training, he would be considered as a good to excellent shot. End quote.
When Sergeant Zahm was asked whether Oswald's Marine Corps training would have made it easier to operate a rifle with a four-power scope, he replied, quote,
Based on that training, his basic knowledge in sight manipulation and trigger squeeze and what not, I would say that he would be capable of sighting that rifle in well,
firing it, with ten rounds.
After reviewing Oswald's marksmanship scores,
Sergeant Zahm concluded, quote, I would say in the Marine Corps he is a good shot, slightly above average,
and as compared to the average male of his age throughout the civilian, throughout the United States, that he is an excellent shot, end quote.
Oswald's Rifle Practice Outside the Marines
During one of his leaves from the Marines, Oswald hunted with his brother Robert,
using a twenty-two caliber bolt-action rifle belonging either to Robert or Robert's in-laws.
After he left the Marines and before departing for Russia, Oswald, his brother, and a third companion went hunting for squirrels and rabbits.
On that occasion Oswald again used a bolt-action twenty-two caliber rifle; and according to Robert,
Lee Oswald exhibited an average amount of proficiency with that weapon.
Oswald obtained a hunting license, joined a hunting club and went hunting about six times, as discussed more fully in chapter six.
Soon after Oswald returned from the Soviet Union
he again went hunting with his brother, Robert, and used a borrowed twenty-two caliber bolt-action rifle.
After Oswald purchased the Mannlicher-Carcano rifle, he told his wife that he practiced with it.
Marina Oswald testified that on one occasion she saw him take the rifle, concealed in a raincoat, from the house on Neely Street.
Oswald told her he was going to practice with it.
According to George De Mohrenschildt, Oswald said that he went target shooting with that rifle.
Marina Oswald testified that in New Orleans in May of nineteen sixty-three, she observed Oswald sitting with the rifle on their screened porch at night,
sighting with the telescopic lens and operating the bolt.
Examination of the cartridge cases found on the sixth floor of the Depository Building
established that they had been previously loaded and ejected from the assassination rifle,
which would indicate that Oswald practiced operating the bolt.
It will be recalled from the discussion in chapter three
that the assassin in all probability hit two out of the three shots during the maximum time span of
four point eight to five point six seconds if the second shot missed,
or, if either the first or third shots missed, the assassin fired the three shots during a minimum time span of seven point one
to seven point nine seconds.
A series of tests were performed to determine whether the weapon and ammunition used in the assassination
were capable of firing the shots which were fired by the assassin on November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three.
The ammunition used by the assassin was manufactured by Western Cartridge Co. of East Alton, Illinois.
In tests with the Mannlicher-Carano C twenty-seven sixty-six rifle, over one hundred rounds of this ammunition were fired by the FBI
and the Infantry Weapons Evaluation Branch of the U.S. Army. There were no misfires.
In an effort to test the rifle under conditions which simulated those which prevailed during the assassination,
the Infantry Weapons Evaluation Branch of the Ballistics Research Laboratory had expert riflemen fire the assassination weapon
from a tower at three silhouette targets at distances of one hundred seventy-five, two hundred forty, and two hundred sixty-five feet.
The target at two hundred sixty-five feet was placed to the right of the two hundred forty-foot target
which was in turn placed to the right of the closest silhouette.
Using the assassination rifle mounted with the telescopic sight, three marksmen, rated as master by the National Rifle Association,
each fired two series of three shots.
In the first series the firers required time spans of four point six, six point seven five,
and eight point two five seconds respectively.
On the second series they required five point one five, six point four five, and seven seconds.
None of the marksmen had any practice with the assassination weapon except for exercising the bolt for two or three minutes on a dry run.
They had not even pulled the trigger because of concern about breaking the firing pin.
The marksmen took as much time as they wanted for the first target and all hit the target.
For the first four attempts, the firers missed the second shot by several inches.
The angle from the first to the second shot
was greater than from the second to the third shot and required a movement in the basic firing position of the marksmen.
This angle was used in the test because the majority of the eyewitnesses to the assassination
stated that there was a shorter interval between shots two and three than between shots one and two.
As has been shown in chapter three, if the three shots were fired within a period of from four point eight to five point six seconds,
the shots would have been evenly spaced and the assassin would not have incurred so sharp an angular movement.
Five of the six shots hit the third target where the angle of movement of the weapon was small.
On the basis of these results, Simmons testified that in his opinion the probability of hitting the targets at the relatively short range at which they were hit
Considering the various probabilities which may have prevailed during the actual assassination,
the highest level of firing performance which would have been required of the assassin and the C two seven six six rifle
would have been to fire three times and hit the target twice within a span of four point eight to five point six seconds.
In fact, one of the firers in the rapid fire test in firing his two series of three shots,
hit the target twice within a span of four point six and five point one five seconds.
The others would have been able to reduce their times if they had been given the opportunity to become familiar with the movement of the bolt and the trigger pull.
Simmons testified that familiarity with the bolt could be achieved in dry practice and, as has been indicated above,
Oswald engaged in such practice. If the assassin missed either the first or third shot,
he had a total of between four point eight and five point six seconds between the two shots which hit
and a total minimum time period of from seven point one to seven point nine seconds for all three shots.
All three of the firers in these tests
were able to fire the rounds within the time period which would have been available to the assassin under those conditions.
Three FBI firearms experts tested the rifle in order to determine the speed with which it could be fired.
The purpose of this experiment was not to test the rifle under conditions which prevailed at the time of the assassination
but to determine the maximum speed at which it could be fired.
The three FBI experts each fired three shots from the weapon at fifteen yards in six, seven, and nine seconds,
and one of these agents, Robert A. Frazier,
fired two series of three shots at twenty-five yards in four point six and four point eight seconds.
At fifteen yards each man's shots landed within the size of a dime.
The shots fired by Frazier at the range of twenty-five yards landed within an area of two inches and five inches respectively.
Frazier later fired four groups of three shots at a distance of one hundred yards in five point nine, six point two,
five point six, and six point five seconds.
Each series of three shots landed within areas ranging in diameter from three to five inches.
Although all of the shots were a few inches high and to the right of the target,
this was because of a defect in the scope which was recognized by the FBI agents and which they could have compensated for if they were aiming to hit a bull's-eye.
They were instead firing to determine how rapidly the weapon could be fired and the area within which three shots could be placed.
Frazier testified that while he could not tell when the defect occurred, but that a person familiar with the weapon could compensate for it.
Moreover, the defect was one which would have assisted the assassin aiming at a target which was moving away.
Frazier said, quote, The fact that the crosshairs are set high would actually compensate for any lead which had to be taken
So that if you aimed with this weapon as it actually was received at the laboratory, it would not be necessary to take any lead whatsoever
in order to hit the intended object. The scope would accomplish the lead for you, end quote,
Frazier added that the scope would cause a slight miss to the right.
It should be noted, however, that the President's car was curving slightly to the right when the third shot was fired.
Based on these tests the experts agreed that the assassination rifle was an accurate weapon.
Simmons described it as, quote, quite accurate, end quote, in fact, as accurate as current military rifles.
Frazier testified that the rifle was accurate, that it had less recoil than the average military rifle
and that one would not have to be an expert marksman to have accomplished the assassination with the weapon which was used.
The various tests showed that the Mannlicher-Carcano was an accurate rifle and that the use of a four-power scope
was a substantial aid to rapid, accurate firing.
Oswald's Marine training in marksmanship, his other rifle experience and his established familiarity with this particular weapon
show that he possessed ample capability to commit the assassination.
Based on the known facts of the assassination,
the Marine marksmanship experts, Major Anderson and Sergeant Zahm, concurred in the opinion that Oswald had the capability to fire three shots,
with two hits, within four point eight and five point six seconds.
Concerning the shots which struck the President in the back of the neck,
With the equipment he [Oswald] had and with his ability I consider it a very easy shot, end quote.
the assassin was then required to hit the target one more time within a space of from four point eight to five point six seconds.
On the basis of Oswald's training and the accuracy of the weapon as established by the tests,
the Commission concluded that Oswald was capable of accomplishing this second hit even if there was an intervening shot which missed.
The probability of hitting the President a second time would have been markedly increased if, in fact, he had missed either the first or third shots
thereby leaving a time span of four point eight to five point six seconds between the two shots which struck their mark.
The Commission agrees with the testimony of Marine marksmanship expert Zahm
that it was an easy shot to hit some part of the President's body, and that the range where the rifleman would be expected to hit
would include the President's head.
On the basis of the evidence reviewed in this chapter, the Commission has found that Lee Harvey Oswald (one)
owned and possessed the rifle used to kill President Kennedy and wound Governor Connally,
(two) brought this rifle into the Depository Building on the morning of the assassination,
(three) was present, at the time of the assassination, at the window from which the shots were fired
killed Dallas Police Officer J. D. Tippit in an apparent attempt to escape,
(five) resisted arrest by drawing a fully loaded pistol and attempting to shoot another police officer,
(six) lied to the police after his arrest concerning important substantive matters,
(seven) attempted, in April nineteen sixty-three, to kill Maj. Gen. Edwin A. Walker, and (eight)
possessed the capability with a rifle which would have enabled him to commit the assassination.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter seven. Lee Harvey Oswald: Background and Possible Motives, Part one.
The evidence reviewed above identifies Lee Harvey Oswald as the assassin of President Kennedy and indicates that he acted alone in that event.
There is no evidence that he had accomplices or that he was involved in any conspiracy directed to the assassination of the President.
There remains the question of what impelled Oswald to conceive and to carry out the assassination of the President of the United States.
The Commission has considered many possible motives for the assassination, including those which might flow from Oswald's commitment to Marxism or communism,
the existence of some personal grievance,
a desire to effect changes in the structure of society or simply to go down in history as a well publicized assassin.
None of these possibilities satisfactorily explains Oswald's act if it is judged by the standards of reasonable men.
The motives of any man, however, must be analyzed in terms of the character and state of mind of the particular individual involved.
For a motive that appears incomprehensible to other men may be the moving force of a man whose view of the world has been twisted,
possibly by factors of which those around him were only dimly aware.
Oswald's complete state of mind and character are now outside of the power of man to know.
He cannot, of course, be questioned or observed by those charged with the responsibility for this report or by experts on their behalf.
There is, however, a large amount of material available in his writings
and in the history of his life which does give some insight into his character and, possibly, into the motives for his act.
the Commission is not able to reach any definite conclusions as to whether or not he was, quote, sane, unquote, under prevailing legal standards.
Under our system of justice no forum could properly make that determination unless Oswald were before it.
It certainly could not be made by this Commission which, as has been pointed out above,
ascertained the facts surrounding the assassination but did not draw conclusions concerning Oswald's legal guilt.
may be obtained from a study of the events, relationships and influences which appear to have been significant in shaping his character and in guiding him.
Perhaps the most outstanding conclusion of such a study is that Oswald was profoundly alienated from the world in which he lived.
His life was characterized by isolation, frustration, and failure.
He had very few, if any, close relationships with other people and he appeared to have great difficulty in finding a meaningful place in the world.
He was never satisfied with anything.
When he was in the United States he resented the capitalist system which he thought was exploiting him and others like him.
He seemed to prefer the Soviet Union and he spoke highly of Cuba.
When he was in the Soviet Union, he apparently resented the Communist Party members,
who were accorded special privileges and who he thought were betraying communism, and he spoke well of the United States.
He accused his wife of preferring others to himself and told her to return to the Soviet Union without him but without a divorce.
At the same time he professed his love for her and said that he could not get along without her.
Marina Oswald thought that he would not be happy anywhere, quote, Only on the moon, perhaps, end quote.
While Oswald appeared to most of those who knew him as a meek and harmless person, he sometimes imagined himself as, quote, the Commander, end quote,
and, apparently seriously, as a political prophet -- a man who said that after twenty years he would be prime minister.
His wife testified that he compared himself with great readers of history.
Such ideas of grandeur were apparently accompanied by notions of oppression.
He had a great hostility toward his environment, whatever it happened to be,
which he expressed in striking and sometimes violent acts long before the assassination.
There was some quality about him that led him to act with an apparent disregard for possible consequences.
He defected to the Soviet Union, shot at General Walker, tried to go to Cuba and even contemplated hijacking an airplane to get there.
He assassinated the President, shot Officer Tippit, resisted arrest and tried to kill another policeman in the process.
Oswald apparently started reading about communism when he was about fifteen.
In the Marines, he evidenced a strong conviction as to the correctness of Marxist doctrine,
which one associate described as, quote, irrevocable, end quote, but also as, quote, theoretical, end quote,
That associate did not think that Oswald was a Communist.
Oswald did not always distinguish between Marxism and communism.
He stated several times that he was a Communist but apparently never joined any Communist Party.
His attachment to Marxist and Communist doctrine was probably, in some measure, an expression of his hostility to his environment.
While there is doubt about how fully Oswald understood the doctrine which he so often espoused, it seems clear
that his commitment to Marxism was an important factor influencing his conduct during his adult years.
It was an obvious element in his decision to go to Russia and later to Cuba and it probably influenced his decision to shoot at General Walker.
It was a factor which contributed to his character and thereby might have influenced his decision to assassinate President Kennedy.
The discussion below will describe the events known to the Commission which most clearly reveals the formation and nature of Oswald's character.
It will attempt to summarize the events of his early life, his experience in New York City and in the Marine Corps, and his interest in Marxism.
It will examine his defection to the Soviet Union in nineteen fifty-nine, his subsequent return to the United States and his life here
after June of nineteen sixty-two.
The review of the latter period will evaluate his personal and employment relations, his attempt to kill General Walker, his political activities,
and his unsuccessful attempt to go to Cuba in late September of nineteen sixty-three.
Various possible motives will be treated in the appropriate context of the discussion outlined above.
Significant in shaping the character of Lee Harvey Oswald was the death of his father, a collector of insurance premiums.
This occurred two months before Lee was born in New Orleans on October eighteen, nineteen thirty-nine.
That death strained the financial fortunes of the remainder of the Oswald family.
It had its effect on Lee's mother, Marguerite, his brother Robert, who had been born in nineteen thirty-four,
and his half-brother John Pic, who had been born in nineteen thirty-two during Marguerite's previous marriage.
It forced Marguerite Oswald to go to work to provide for her family.
Reminding her sons that they were orphans and that the family's financial condition was poor,
she placed John Pic and Robert Oswald in an orphans' home.
From the time Marguerite Oswald returned to work until December twenty-six, nineteen forty-two, when Lee too was sent to the orphans' home,
he was cared for principally by his mother's sister, by babysitters and by his mother, when she had time for him.
Marguerite Oswald withdrew Lee from the orphans' home and took him with her to Dallas when he was a little over four years old.
About six months later she also withdrew John Pic and Robert Oswald.
Apparently that action was taken in anticipation of her marriage to Edwin A. Ekdahl, which took place in May of nineteen forty-five.
In the fall of that year John Pic and Robert Oswald went to a military academy
where they stayed, except for vacations, until the spring of nineteen forty-eight.
Lee Oswald remained with his mother and Ekdahl, to whom he became quite attached.
John Pic testified that he thought Lee found in Ekdahl the father that he never had.
That situation, however, was short-lived,
for the relations between Marguerite Oswald and Ekdahl were stormy and they were finally divorced, after several separations and reunions,
in the summer of nineteen forty-eight.
After the divorce Mrs. Oswald complained considerably about how unfairly she was treated,
dwelling on the fact that she was a widow with three children.
John Pic, however, did not think her position was worse than that of many other people.
In the fall of nineteen forty-eight she told John Pic and Robert Oswald
that she could not afford to send them back to the military school and she asked Pic to quit school entirely to help support the family.
which he did for four months in the fall of nineteen forty-eight.
In order to supplement their income further she falsely swore that Pic was seventeen years old so that he could join the Marine Corps Reserves.
Pic did turn over part of his income to his mother,
but he returned to high school in January of nineteen forty-nine, where he stayed until three days before he was scheduled to graduate,
when he left school in order to get into the Coast Guard. Since his mother did not approve of his decision to continue school
he accepted the responsibility for that decision himself and signed his mother's name to all his own excuses and report cards.
Pic thought that his mother overstated her financial problems and was unduly concerned about money.
Referring to the period after the divorce from Ekdahl, which was apparently caused in part by Marguerite's desire to get more money from him,
Lee was brought up in this atmosphere of constant money problems, and I am sure it had quite an effect on him, and also Robert, end quote.
Marguerite Oswald worked in miscellaneous jobs after her divorce from Ekdahl.
When she worked for a time as an insurance saleslady,
she would sometimes take Lee with her, apparently leaving him alone in the car while she transacted her business.
When she worked during the school year, Lee had to leave an empty house in the morning,
return to it for lunch and then again at night, his mother having trained him to do that rather than to play with other children.
An indication of the nature of Lee's character at this time was provided in the spring of nineteen fifty,
when he was sent to New Orleans to visit the family of his mother's sister, Mrs. Lillian Murret, for two or three weeks.
Despite their urgings, he refused to play with the other children his own age.
It also appears that Lee tried to tag along with his older brothers
but apparently was not able to spend as much time with them as he would have liked, because of the age gaps of five and seven years,
which became more significant as the children grew older.
Whatever problems may have been created by Lee's home life in Louisiana and Texas,
he apparently adjusted well enough there to have had an average, although gradually deteriorating, school record
with no behavior or truancy problems.
That was not the case, however, after he and his mother moved to New York in August of nineteen fifty-two, shortly before Lee's thirteenth birthday.
They moved shortly after Robert joined the Marines; they lived for a time with John Pic who was stationed there with the Coast Guard.
Relations soon became strained, however, so in late September Lee and his mother moved to their own apartment in the Bronx.
Pic and his wife would have been happy to have kept Lee, however,
who was becoming quite a disciplinary problem for his mother, having struck her on at least one occasion.
The short-lived stay with the Pics was terminated after an incident in which Lee allegedly pulled out a pocket knife during an argument
and threatened to use it on Mrs. Pic.
When Pic returned home, Mrs. Oswald tried to play down the event but Mrs. Pic took a different view and asked the Oswalds to leave.
Lee refused to discuss the matter with Pic, whom he had previously idolized, and their relations were strained thereafter.
On September thirty, nineteen fifty-two, Lee enrolled in P.S. one seventeen
a junior high school in the Bronx, where the other children apparently teased him because of his, quote, western clothes and Texas accent.
He began to stay away from school, preferring to read magazines and watch television at home by himself.
This continued despite the efforts of the school authorities and, to a lesser extent, of his mother to have him return to school.
Truancy charges were brought against him alleging that he was, quote, beyond the control of his mother insofar as school attendance is concerned, end quote.
Oswald was remanded for psychiatric observation to Youth House, an institution in which children are kept for psychiatric observation
or for detention pending court appearance or commitment to a child-caring or custodial institution such as a training school.
He was in Youth House from April sixteen to May seven, nineteen fifty-three,
during which time he was examined by its Chief Psychiatrist, Dr. Renatus Hartogs,
and interviewed and observed by other members of the Youth House staff.
Marguerite Oswald visited her son at Youth House, where she recalled that she waited in line, quote,
with Puerto Ricans and Negroes and everything, end quote.
She said that her pocketbook was searched, quote, because the children in this home were such criminals, dope fiends, and had been in criminal offenses,
that anybody entering this home had to be searched in case the parents were bringing cigarettes or narcotics or anything, end quote.
She recalled that Lee cried and said, quote, Mother, I want to get out of here.
There are children in here who have killed people, and smoke. I want to get out, end quote,
Marguerite Oswald said that she had not realized until then in what kind of place her son had been confined.
On the other hand, Lee told his probation officer, John Carro, that, quote,
while he liked Youth House, he missed the freedom of doing what he wanted. He indicated that he did not miss his mother, end quote.
Mrs. Evelyn D Siegel, a social worker who interviewed both Lee and his mother while Lee was confined in Youth House,
reported that Lee, quote, confided that the worse thing about Youth House was the fact that he had to be with other boys all the time,
was disturbed about disrobing in front of them, taking showers with them etc., end quote.
Contrary to reports that appeared after the assassination, the psychiatric examination did not indicate that Lee Oswald was a potential assassin,
potentially dangerous, that, quote, his outlook on life had strongly paranoid overtones, end quote, or that he should be institutionalized.
Dr. Hartogs did find Oswald to be a tense, withdrawn, and evasive boy who intensely disliked talking about himself and his feelings.
He noted that Lee liked to give the impression that he did not care for other people but preferred to keep to himself,
so that he was not bothered and did not have to make the effort of communicating.
Oswald's withdrawn tendencies and solitary habits were thought to be the result of, quote,
intense anxiety, shyness, feelings of awkwardness and insecurity, end quote.
He was reported to have said, quote, I don't want a friend and I don't like to talk to people, end quote, and, quote, I dislike everybody, end quote.
He was also described as having a, quote, Vivid fantasy life,
turning around the topics of omnipotence and power, through which he tries to compensate for his present shortcomings and frustrations, end quote.
Dr. Hartogs summarized his report by stating:
Quote, this thirteen year old well built boy has superior mental resources and functions only slightly below his capacity level
in spite of chronic truancy from school which brought him into Youth House.
No finding of neurological impairment or psychotic mental changes could be made.
Lee has to be diagnosed as, quote, personality pattern disturbance with schizoid features and passive-aggressive tendencies, end quote.
Lee has to be seen as an emotionally, quite disturbed youngster
who suffers under the impact of really existing emotional isolation
and deprivation, lack of affection, absence of family life and rejection by a self involved and conflicted mother.
Dr. Hartogs recommended that Oswald be placed on probation on condition that he seek help and guidance through a child guidance clinic.
There, he suggested, Lee should be treated by a male psychiatrist who could substitute for the lack of a father figure.
He also recommended that Mrs. Oswald seek, quote, psychotherapeutic guidance through contact with a family agency, end quote.
The possibility of commitment was to be considered only if the probation plan was not successful.
Lee's withdrawal was also noted by Mrs. Siegel, who described him as a, quote, seriously detached, withdrawn youngster, end quote.
She also noted that there was, quote, a rather pleasant, appealing quality about this emotionally starved, affectionless youngster
which grows as one speaks to him, end quote.
She thought that he had detached himself from the world around him because, quote, no one in it ever met any of his needs for love, end quote.
She observed that since Lee's mother worked all day, he made his own meals and spent all his time alone
because he didn't make friends with the boys in the neighborhood. She thought that he, quote, withdrew into a completely solitary and detached existence
where he did as he wanted and he didn't have to live by any rules or come into contact with people, end quote.
Mrs. Siegel concluded that Lee, quote, just felt that his mother never gave a damn for him.
He always felt like a burden that she simply just had to tolerate, end quote.
Lee confirmed some of those observations by saying that he felt almost as if there were a veil between him and other people
through which they could not reach him, but that he preferred the veil to remain intact.
He admitted to fantasies about being powerful and sometimes hurting and killing people, but refused to elaborate on them.
He took the position that such matters were his own business.
A psychological human figure-drawing test corroborated the interviewer's findings that Lee was insecure and had limited social contacts.
Irving Sokolow, a Youth House psychologist reported that, quote,
The Human Figure Drawings are empty, poor characterizations of persons approximately the same age as the subject.
They reflect a considerable amount of impoverishment in the social and emotional areas.
He appears to be a somewhat insecure youngster exhibiting much inclination for warm and satisfying relationships to others.
There is some indication that he may relate to men more easily than to women in view of the more mature conceptualisation.
He appears slightly withdrawn and in view of the lack of detail within the drawings this may assume a more significant characteristic.
He exhibits some difficulty in relationship to the maternal figure suggesting more anxiety in this area than in any other.
Lee scored an I.Q. of one eighteen on the Wechsler Intelligence Scale for Children.
According to Sokolow, this indicated a, quote, present intellectual functioning in the upper range of bright normal intelligence, end quote.
Sokolow said that although Lee was, quote, presumably disinterested in school subjects he operates on a much higher than average level, end quote.
On the Monroe Silent Reading Test, Lee's score indicated no retardation in reading speed and comprehension;
he had better than average ability in arithmetical reasoning for his age group.
Lee told Carro, his probation officer, that he liked to be by himself because he had too much difficulty in making friends.
The reports of Carro and Mrs. Siegel also indicate an ambivalent attitude toward authority on Oswald's part.
Carro reported that Lee was disruptive in class after he returned to school on a regular basis in the fall of nineteen fifty-three.
He had refused to salute the flag and was doing very little, if any, work.
It appears that he did not want to do any of the things which the authorities suggested in their efforts to bring him out of the shell
into which he appeared to be retreating.
He told Mrs. Siegel that he would run away if sent to a boarding school.
On the other hand he also told her that he wished his mother had been more firm with him in her attempts to get him to return to school.
The reports of the New York authorities indicate that Lee's mother gave him very little affection and did not serve as any sort of substitute for a father.
Furthermore she did not appear to understand her own relationship to Lee's psychological problems.
After her interview with Mrs. Oswald,
Mrs. Siegel described her as a smartly dressed, gray haired woman, very self-possessed and alert and superficially affable,
but essentially a, quote, defensive, rigid, self-involved person
who had real difficulty in accepting and relating to people, end quote, and who had, quote, little understanding, end quote, of Lee's behavior
and of the, quote, protective shell he has drawn around himself, end quote. Dr. Hartogs reported that Mrs. Oswald did not understand
that Lee's withdrawal was a form of, quote, violent but silent protest against his neglect by her
and represents his reaction to a complete absence of any real family life, end quote.
Carro reported that when questioned about his mother Lee said, quote,
well I've got to live with her. I guess I love her, end quote.
It may also be significant that, as reported by John Pic, quote, Lee slept with my mother until I joined the service in nineteen fifty.
This would make him approximately ten, well, almost eleven years old. End quote.
The factors in Lee Oswald's personality which were noted by those who had contact with him in New York indicate
that he had great difficulty in adapting himself to conditions in that city.
His usual reaction to the problems which he encountered there was simply withdrawal.
Those factors indicated a severe inability to enter into relationships with other people.
In view of his experiences when he visited his relatives in New Orleans in the spring of nineteen fifty, and his other solitary habits,
Lee had apparently been experiencing similar problems before going to New York,
and as will be shown below, this failure to adapt to his environment was a dominant trait in his later life.
It would be incorrect, however, to believe that those aspects of Lee's personality which were observed in New York
could have led anyone to predict the outburst of violence which finally occurred.
Carro was the only one of Oswald's three principal observers who recommended that he be placed in a boy's home or similar institution.
But Carro was quite specific that his recommendation was based primarily on the adverse factors in Lee's environment
his lack of friends, the apparent unavailability of any agency assistance and the ineffectualness of his mother
and not on any particular mental disturbance, in the boy himself.
Carro testified that, quote, There was nothing that would lead me to believe when I saw him at the age of twelve that them would be seeds of destruction for somebody.
I couldn't in all honesty sincerely say such a thing.
Mrs. Siegel concluded her report with the statement that, quote,
Despite his withdrawal, he gives the impression that he is not so difficult to reach as he appears and patient, prolonged effort
in a sustained relationship with one therapist might bring results.
There are indications that he has suffered serious personality damage but if he can receive help quickly this might be repaired to some extent, end quote.
Lee Oswald never received that help.
Few social agencies even in New York were equipped to provide the kind of intensive treatment that he needed,
and when one of the city's clinics did find room to handle him,
for some reason the record does not show, advantage was never taken of the chance afforded to Oswald.
When Lee became a disciplinary problem upon his return to school in the fall of nineteen fifty-three,
and when his mother failed to cooperate in any way with school authorities,
authorities were finally forced to consider placement in a home for boys.
Such a placement was postponed, however, perhaps in part at least because Lee's behavior suddenly improved.
Before the court took any action, the Oswalds left New York in January of nineteen fifty-four,
and returned to New Orleans where Lee finished the ninth grade before he left school to work for a year.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter seven. Lee Harvey Oswald: Background and Possible Motives, Part two.
Return to New Orleans and Joining the Marine Corps
After his return to New Orleans Oswald was teased at school because of the northern accent which he had acquired.
He concluded that school had nothing to offer him.
His mother exercised little control over him and thought he could decide for himself whether to go on in school.
Neighbors and others who knew him at that time recall an introverted boy who read a great deal.
He took walks and visited museums, and sometimes rode a rented bicycle in the park on Saturday mornings.
Mrs. Murret believes that he talked at length with a girl on the telephone, but no one remembers that he had any dates.
A friend, Edward Voebel, testified that, quote, he was more bashful about girls than anything else, end quote.
Several witnesses testified that Lee Oswald was not aggressive. He was, however, involved in some fights.
Once a group of white boys beat him up for sitting in the Negro section of a bus, which he apparently did simply out of ignorance.
Another time, he fought with two brothers who claimed that he had picked on the younger of them, three years Oswald's junior.
Two days later, quote, some big guy, probably from a high school -- he looked like a tremendous football player, end quote,
accosted Oswald on the way home from school and punched him in the mouth, making his lip bleed and loosening a tooth.
Voebel took Oswald back to the school to attend to his wounds, and their, quote, mild friendship, end quote, stemmed from that incident.
Voebel also recalled that Oswald once outlined a plan to cut the glass in the window of a store on Rampart Street and steal a pistol,
but he was not sure then that Oswald meant to carry out the plan, and in fact they never did.
Voebel said that Oswald, quote, wouldn't start any fights, but if you wanted to start one with him, he was going to make sure that he ended it,
or you were going to really have one, because he wasn't going to take anything from anybody, end quote.
In a space for the names of, quote, close friends, end quote, on the ninth grade personal history record,
Oswald first wrote, quote, Edward Vogel, end quote, an obvious misspelling of Voebel's name,
and, quote, Arthor Abear, end quote, most likely Arthur Hebert, a classmate who has said that he did not know Oswald well.
Oswald erased those names, however, and indicated that he had no close friends.
It has been suggested that this misspelling of names, apparently on a phonetic basis, was caused by a reading-spelling disability
from which Oswald appeared to suffer.
Other evidence of the existence of such a disability is provided by the many other misspellings that appear in Oswald's writings, portions of which are quoted below.
Sometime during this period, and under circumstances to be discussed more fully below,
Oswald started to read Communist literature, which he obtained from the public library.
One of his fellow employees, Palmer McBride, stated that Oswald said he would like to kill President Eisenhower because he was exploiting the working class.
Oswald praised Khrushchev and suggested that he and McBride join the Communist Party, quote, to take advantage of their social functions, end quote.
Oswald also became interested in the New Orleans Amateur Astronomy Association, an organization of high school students.
The association's then president, William E. Wulf, testified that he remembered an occasion when Oswald, quote,
started expounding the Communist doctrine and saying that he was highly interested in communism, that communism was the only way of life for the worker, et cetera,
and then came out with a statement that he was looking for a Communist cell in town to join but he couldn't find any.
He was a little dismayed at this, and he said that he couldn't find any that would show any interest in him as a Communist,
and subsequently, after this conversation, my father came in and we were kind of arguing back and forth about the situation, and my father came in the room,
heard what we were arguing on communism, and that this boy was loud-mouthed, boisterous, and my father asked him to leave the house and politely put him out of the house,
and that is the last I have seen or spoken with Oswald. End quote.
Despite this apparent interest in communism, Oswald tried to join the Marines when he was sixteen years old.
This was one year before his actual enlistment and just a little over two point five years after he left New York.
He wrote a note in his mother's name to school authorities in New Orleans saying that he was leaving school because he and his mother were moving to San Diego.
In fact, he had quit school in an attempt to obtain his mother's assistance to join the Marines.
While he apparently was able to induce his mother to make a false statement about his age
he was nevertheless unable to convince the proper authorities that he was really seventeen years old.
There is evidence that Oswald was greatly influenced in his decision to join the Marines by the fact that his brother Robert had done so
approximately three years before. Robert Oswald had given his Marine Corps manual to his brother Lee,
who studied it during the year following his unsuccessful attempt to enlist until, quote, He knew it by heart, end quote.
According to Marguerite Oswald, quote, Lee lived for the time that he would become seventeen years old to join the Marines -- that whole year, end quote.
Oswald was motivated to join the Marines in large part by a desire, quote, to get from out and under the yoke of oppression from my mother, end quote.
Oswald's inability or lack of desire to enter into meaningful relationships with other people
continued during this period in New Orleans (nineteen fifty-four to nineteen fifty-six).
It probably contributed greatly to the general dissatisfaction which he exhibited with his environment,
a dissatisfaction which seemed to find expression at this particular point
in his intense desire to join the Marines and get away from his surroundings and his mother.
His study of Communist literature,
which might appear to be inconsistent with his desire to join the Marines, could have been another manifestation of Oswald's rejection of his environment.
His difficulty in relating to other people and his general dissatisfaction with the world around him continued while he was in the Marine Corps.
Kerry Thornley, a marine associate,
who, shortly after Oswald's defection, wrote an as yet unpublished novel based in considerable part on Oswald's life,
testified that, quote, definitely the Marine Corps was not what he had expected it to be when he joined, end quote,
He said that Oswald, quote, seemed to guard against developing real close friendships, end quote,
Daniel Powers, another marine who was stationed with Oswald for part of his marine career,
testified that Oswald seemed, quote, always to be striving for a relationship, but whenever he did
his general personality would alienate the group against him, end quote.
Other marines also testified that Oswald had few friends and kept very much to himself.
While there is nothing in Oswald's military records to indicate that he was mentally unstable or otherwise psychologically unfit for duty in the Marine Corps,
he did not adjust well to conditions which he found in that service.
He did not rise above the rank of private first class, even though he had passed a qualifying examination for the rank of corporal.
His Marine career was not helped by his attitude
that he was a man of great ability and intelligence and that many of his superiors in the Marine Corps were not sufficiently competent to give him orders.
While Oswald did not seem to object to authority in the abstract, he did think that he should be the one to exercise it.
John E. Donovan, one of his former officers, testified that Oswald thought, quote,
that authority, particularly the Marine Corps, ought to be able to recognize talent such as his own, without a given magic college degree,
and put them in positions of prominence, end quote. Oswald manifested this feeling about authority by baiting his officers.
He led them into discussions of foreign affairs about which they often knew less than he did, since he had apparently devoted considerable time to a study of such matters.
When the officers were unable to discuss foreign affairs satisfactorily with him, Oswald regarded them as unfit to exercise command over him.
Nelson Delgado, one of Oswald's fellow Marines, testified that Oswald tried to, quote, cut up anybody that was high ranking, end quote,
in those arguments, quote, and make himself come out top dog, end quote.
Oswald probably engaged his superiors in arguments on a subject that he had studied
in an attempt to attract attention to himself and to support his exaggerated idea of his own abilities.
Thornley also testified that he thought that Oswald's extreme personal sloppiness in the Marine Corps, quote,
fitted into a general personality pattern of his: to do whatever was not wanted of him, a recalcitrant trend in his personality, end quote,
Oswald, quote, seemed to be a person who would go out of his way to get into trouble, end quote,
and then used the, quote, special treatment, end quote, he received as an example of the way in which he was being picked on and, quote,
as a means of getting or attempting to get sympathy, end quote. In Thornley's view, Oswald labored under a persecution complex
which he strove to maintain and, quote, felt the Marine Corps kept a pretty close watch on him because of his subversive activities, end quote.
Thornley added, quote, I think it was kind of necessary to him to believe that he was being picked on.
It wasn't anything extreme. I wouldn't go as far as to call it, call him a paranoid, but a definite tendency there was in that direction, I think, end quote.
Powers considered Oswald to be meek and easily led
an, quote, individual that you would brainwash, and quite easy, but I think once he believed in something, he stood in his beliefs, end quote.
Powers also testified that Oswald was reserved and seemed to be, quote, somewhat the frail, little puppy in the litter, end quote.
He had the nickname, quote, Ozzie Rabbit, end quote.
Oswald read a good deal, said Powers, but, quote, he would never be reading any of the shoot-em-up westerns or anything like that.
Normally, it would be a good type of literature; and the one that I recall was "Leaves of Grass," by Walt Whitman, end quote.
According to Powers, Oswald said, quote,
All the Marine Corps did was to teach you to kill and after you got out of the Marines you might be good gangsters, end quote.
Powers believed that when Oswald arrived in Japan he acquired a girlfriend, quote,
finally attaining a male status or image in his own eyes, end quote. That apparently caused Oswald to become more self-confident,
aggressive and even somewhat pugnacious, although Powers, quote, wouldn't say that this guy is a troublemaker, end quote.
Powers said, quote, now he was Oswald the man rather than Oswald the rabbit, end quote.
Oswald once told Powers that he didn't care if he returned to the United States at all.
While in Japan, Oswald's new found apparent self confidence and pugnaciousness
led to an incident in which he spilled a drink on one of his sergeants and abusively challenged him to fight.
At the court-martial hearing which followed, Oswald admitted that he had been rather drunk when the incident occurred.
He testified that he had felt the sergeant had a grudge against him and that he had unsuccessfully sought a transfer from the sergeant's unit.
He said that he had simply wanted to discuss the question with the sergeant and the drink had been spilled accidentally.
The hearing officer agreed with the latter claim but found Oswald guilty of wrongfully using provoking words and sentenced him to twenty-eight days,
canceling the suspension of a twenty-day sentence that Oswald had received in an earlier court-martial
for possessing an unauthorized pistol with which he had accidentally shot himself.
Oswald was transferred from active duty to the Marine Corps Reserve under honorable conditions in September of nineteen fifty-nine,
three months prior to his regularly scheduled separation date, ostensibly to care for his mother who had been injured in an accident at her work.
He was undesirably discharged from the Marine Corps Reserve, to which he had been assigned on inactive status following his transfer from active duty,
after it was learned that he had defected to the Soviet Union.
In an attempt to have this discharge reversed,
Oswald wrote to then Secretary of the Navy Connally on January thirty, nineteen sixty-two,
stating that he would, quote, employ all means to right this gross mistake or injustice, end quote.
Governor Connally had just resigned to run for Governor of Texas, so he advised Oswald that he had forwarded the letter to his successor.
It is thus clear that Oswald knew that Governor Connally was never directly concerned with his discharge
and he must have known that President Kennedy had had nothing to do with it.
In that connection, it does not appear that Oswald ever expressed any dissatisfaction of any kind with either the President or Governor Connally.
Marina Oswald testified that she, quote, had never heard anything bad about Kennedy from Lee. And he never had anything against him, end quote.
Mrs. Oswald said that her husband did not say anything about Governor Connally after his return to the United States. She testified, quote,
But while we were in Russia he spoke well of him. Lee said that when he would return to the United States he would vote for him for Governor, end quote.
Oswald must have already learned that the Governor could not help him with his discharge because he was no longer Secretary of the Navy, at the time he made that remark.
Even though Oswald apparently did not express any hostility against the President or Governor Connally,
he continued to be concerned about his undesirable discharge. It is clear that he thought he had been unjustly treated.
Probably his complaint was due to the fact that his discharge was not related to anything he had done while on active duty
and also because he had not received any notice of the original discharge proceedings, since his whereabouts were not known.
He continued his efforts to reverse the discharge by petitioning the Navy Discharge Review Board,
which finally declined to modify the discharge and so advised him in a letter dated July nineteen sixty-three.
Governor Connally's connection with the discharge, although indirect, caused the Commission to consider whether he might have been Oswald's real target.
In that connection, it should be noted that Marina Oswald testified on September six, nineteen sixty-four, that she thought her husband, quote,
was shooting at Connally rather than President Kennedy, end quote.
In support of her conclusion Mrs. Oswald noted her husband's undesirable discharge
and that she could not think of any reason why Oswald would want to kill President Kennedy.
It should be noted, however, that at the time Oswald fired the shots at the Presidential limousine the Governor occupied the seat in front of the President,
and it would have been almost impossible for Oswald to have hit the Governor without hitting the President first.
Oswald could have shot the Governor as the car approached the Depository or as it was making the turn onto Elm Street.
Once it had started down Elm Street toward the Triple Underpass, however,
the President almost completely blocked Oswald's view of the Governor prior to the time the first shot struck the President.
Oswald would have had other and more favorable opportunities to strike at the Governor than on this occasion when, as a member of the President's party,
he had more protection than usual. It would appear, therefore, that to the extent Oswald's undesirable discharge affected his motivation,
it was more in terms of a general hostility against the government and its representatives rather than a grudge against any particular person.
As indicated above, Oswald started to read Communist literature after he and his mother left New York and moved to New Orleans.
He told Aline Mosby, a reporter who interviewed him after he arrived in Moscow, quote,
I'm a Marxist. I became interested about the age of fifteen. From an ideological viewpoint.
An old lady handed me a pamphlet about saving the Rosenbergs. I looked at that paper and I still remember it for some reason, I don't know why. End quote.
Oswald studied Marxism after he joined the Marines and his sympathies in that direction and for the Soviet Union appear to have been widely known,
at least in the unit to which he was assigned after his return from the Far East.
His interest in Russia led some of his associates to call him "comrade" or "Oswaldskovitch."
He always wanted to play the red pieces in chess because, as he said in an apparently humorous context,
he preferred the, quote, Red Army, end quote.
He studied the Russian language, read a Russian language newspaper and seemed interested in what was going on in the Soviet Union.
Thornley, who thought Oswald had an "irrevocable conviction" that his Marxist beliefs were correct, testified, quote,
I think you could sit down and argue with him for a number of years, and I don't think you could have changed his mind on that unless you knew why he believed it in the first place.
I certainly don't. I don't think with any kind of formal argument you could have shaken that conviction. And that is why I say irrevocable.
It was just -- never getting back to looking at things from any other way once he had become a Marxist, whenever that was, end quote.
Thornley also testified about an incident which grew
out of a combination of Oswald's known Marxist sympathies and George Orwell's book "nineteen eighty-four," one of Oswald's favorite books
which Thornley read at Oswald's suggestion.
Shortly after Thornley finished reading that book the Marine unit to which both men were assigned was required to take part in a Saturday morning parade
in honor of some retiring noncommissioned officers, an event which they both approached with little enthusiasm.
While waiting for the parade to start they talked briefly about "nineteen eighty-four"
even though Oswald seemed to be lost in his own thoughts. After a brief period of silence Oswald remarked on the stupidity of the parade
and on how angry it made him, to which Thornley replied, quote, Well, comes the revolution you will change all that, end quote.
Thornley testified, quote, At which time he looked at me like a betrayed Caesar and screamed, screamed definitely, "Not you, too, Thornley!"
And I remember his voice cracked as he said this. He was definitely disturbed at what I had said and I didn't really think I had said that much.
I never said anything to him again and he never said anything to me again, end quote.
Thornley said that he had made his remark only in the context of "nineteen eighty-four"
and had not intended any criticism of Oswald's political views which is the way in which, Thornley thought, Oswald took his remarks.
Lieutenant Donovan testified that Oswald thought that, quote, there were many grave injustices concerning the affairs in the international situation, end quote.
He recalled that Oswald had a specific interest in Latin America, particularly Cuba,
and expressed opposition to the Batista regime and sympathy for Castro, an attitude which, Donovan said, was, quote,
not unpopular, end quote, at that time. Donovan testified
that he never heard Oswald express a desire personally to take part in the elimination of injustices anywhere in the world and that he, quote,
never heard him in any way, shape or form confess that he was a Communist, or that he ever thought about being a Communist, end quote.
Delgado testified that Oswald was, quote, a complete believer that our way of government was not quite right, end quote.
and believed that our Government did not have, quote, too much to offer, end quote, but was not in favor of, quote, the Communist way of life, end quote.
Delgado and Oswald talked more about Cuba than Russia, and sometimes imagined themselves as leaders in the Cuban Army or Government,
who might, quote, lead an expedition to some of these other islands and free them too, end quote.
Thornley also believed that Oswald's Marxist beliefs led to an extraordinary view of history under which, quote, He looked upon the eyes of future people
as some kind of tribunal,
and he wanted to be on the winning side so that ten thousand years from-now people would look in the history books and say, "Well, this man was ahead of his time."
The eyes of the future became the eyes of God.
He was concerned with his image in history and I do think that is why he chose the particular method of defecting he chose and did it in the way he did.
It got him in the newspapers. It did broadcast his name out, end quote.
Thornley thought that Oswald not only wanted a place in history but also wanted to live comfortably in the present.
He testified that if Oswald could not have that, quote, degree of physical comfort that he expected or sought,
I think he would then throw himself entirely on the other thing he also wanted, which was the image in history.
I think he wanted both if he could have them. If he didn't, he wanted to die with the knowledge that, or with the idea that he was somebody, end quote.
Oswald's interest in Marxism led some people to avoid him,
even though as his wife suggested, that interest may have been motivated by a desire to gain attention. He used his Marxist and associated activities
as excuses for his difficulties in getting along in the world, which were usually caused by entirely different factors.
His use of those excuses to present himself to the world as a person who was being unfairly treated
is shown most clearly by his employment relations after his return from the Soviet Union. Of course, he made his real problems worse to the extent
that his use of those excuses prevented him from discovering the real reasons for and attempting to overcome his difficulties.
Oswald's commitment to Marxism contributed to the decisions which led him to defect to the Soviet Union in nineteen fifty-nine, and later
to engage in activities on behalf of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee in the summer of nineteen sixty-three,
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter seven. Lee Harvey Oswald:
Background and Possible Motives, Part three.
Defection to the Soviet Union
After Oswald left the Marine Corps in September of nineteen fifty-nine, ostensibly to care for his mother,
he almost immediately left for the Soviet Union where he attempted to renounce his citizenship.
At the age of nineteen, Oswald thus committed an act which was the most striking indication he had yet given
of his willingness to act on his beliefs in quite extraordinary ways.
While his defection resulted in part from Oswald's commitment to Marxism,
it appears that personal and psychological factors were also involved.
On August seventeen, nineteen sixty-three, Oswald told Mr. William Stuckey,
who had arranged a radio debate on Oswald's activities on behalf of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee,
that while he had begun to read Marx and Engels at the age of fifteen, the conclusive thing that made him decide that Marxism was the answer
was his service in Japan.
He said living conditions over there convinced him something was wrong with the system, and that possibly Marxism was the answer.
He said it was in Japan that he made up his mind to go to Russia
and see for himself how a revolutionary society operates, a Marxist society.
On the other hand, at least one person who knew Oswald after his return thought that his defection had a more personal and psychological basis.
The validity of the latter observation is borne out by some of the things Oswald wrote in connection with his defection
indicating that his motivation was at least in part a personal one. On November twenty-six, nineteen fifty-nine,
shortly after he arrived in the Soviet Union, and probably before Soviet authorities had given him permission to stay indefinitely,
he wrote to his brother Robert that the Soviet Union was a country which, quote, I have always considered to be my own, end quote,
and that he went there, quote, only to find freedom. I could never have been personally happy in the U.S., end quote.
He wrote in another letter that he would, quote, never return to the United States which is a country I hate, end quote.
His idea that he was to find, quote, freedom, end quote, in the Soviet Union was to be rudely shattered.
Whatever Oswald's reasons for going to the Soviet Union might have been, however, there can be little doubt that his desire to go was quite strong.
In addition to studying the Russian language while he was in the Marines,
Oswald had managed to save enough money to cover the expenses of his forthcoming trip.
While there is no proof that he saved fifteen hundred dollars, as he claimed,
it would have taken considerable discipline to save whatever amount was required to finance his defection out of the salary of a low ranking enlisted man.
The extent of Oswald's desire to go to the Soviet Union
and of his initial commitment to that country can best be understood, however, in the context
of his concomitant hatred of the United States, which was most clearly expressed in his November twenty-six,
and communist's would like to see the present capitalist government of the U.S. overthrown, end quote, Oswald stated
that that government supported an economic system, quote, which exploits all its workers, end quote,
and under which, quote, art, culture and the sprit of man are subjected to commercial enterprising,
and religion and education are used as a tool to suppress what would otherwise be a population questioning their government's unfair
economic system and plans for war, end quote.
He complained in his letter about segregation,
unemployment, automation, and the use of military forces to suppress other populations.
Asking his brother why he supported the American Government and what ideals he put forward, Oswald wrote, quote,
Ask me and I will tell you I fight for communism.
I will not say your grandchildren will live under communism, look for yourself at history, look at a world map! America is a dicing country,
I do not wish to be a part of it, nor do I ever again wish to be used as a tool in its military aggressions.
This should answer your question, and also give you a glimpse of my way of thinking. So you speak of advantages. Do you think that is why I am here?
For personal, material advantages? Happiness is not based on oneself, it does not consist of a small home, of taking and getting,
Happiness is taking part in the struggle, where there is no borderline between one's own personal world, and the world in general.
I never believed I would find more material advantages at this stage of development in the Soviet Union than I might of had in the U.S.
I have been a pro-communist for years and yet I have never met a communist, instead I kept silent and observed,
and what I observed plus my Marxist learning brought me here to the Soviet Union.
I have always considered this country to be my own. End quote.
Responding to Robert's statement that he had not "renounced" him,
Oswald told his brother, quote, on what terms I want this arrangement, end quote. He advised Robert that: one.
In the event of war I would kill any American who put a uniform on in defense of the American government -- any American.
two. That in my own mind I have no attachments of any kind in the U.S.
three. That I want to, and I shall, live a normal happy and peaceful life here in the Soviet Union for the rest of my life.
That my mother and you are (in spite of what the newspaper said) not objects of affection, but only examples of workers in the U.S.
Despite this commitment to the Soviet Union
Oswald met disappointments there just as he had in the past. At the outset the Soviets told him that he could not remain.
It seems that Oswald immediately attempted suicide -- a striking indication of how much he desired to remain in the Soviet Union.
It shows how willing he was to act dramatically and decisively when he faced an emotional crisis
with few readily available alternatives at hand. He was shocked to find that the Soviet Union did not accept him with open arms.
The entry in his self-styled, quote, Historic Diary, end quote, for October twenty-one, nineteen fifty-nine, reports, quote,
I am shocked! My dreams! I have waited for two years to be accepted.
My fondest dreams are shattered because of a petty official. I decide to end it.
Soak fist in cold water to numb the pain. Then slash my left wrist. Than plunge wrist into bathtub of hot water.
Somewhere, a violin plays, as I watch my life whirl away.
I think to myself "How easy to Die" and "A Sweet Death, (to violins), end quote.
Oswald was discovered in time to thwart his attempt at suicide.
He was taken to a hospital in Moscow where he was kept until October twenty-eight, nineteen fifty-nine.
Still intent, however, on staying in the Soviet Union,
Oswald went on October thirty-one, to the American Embassy to renounce his U.S. citizenship.
Mr. Richard E. Snyder, then Second Secretary and senior consular official at the Embassy,
testified that Oswald was extremely sure of himself and seemed, quote, to know what his mission was.
He took charge, in a sense, of the conversation right from the beginning, end quote. He presented the following signed note:
Quote, I Lee Harvey Oswald do hereby request that my present citizenship in the United States of America, be revoked.
I have entered the Soviet Union for the express purpose of applying for citizenship in the Soviet Union, through the means of naturalization.
My request for citizenship is now pending before the Supreme Soviet of the U.S.S.R. I take these steps for political reasons.
My request for the revoking of my American citizenship
is made only after the longest and most serious considerations. I affirm that my allegiance is to the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics.
End quote. As his, quote, principal reason, end quote, for renouncing his citizenship
Oswald stated, quote, I am a Marxist, end quote. He also alluded to hardships endured by his mother as a worker,
referring to them as experiences that he did not intend to have himself, even though he stated that he had never held a civilian job.
He said that his Marine service in Okinawa and elsewhere had given him, quote, a chance to observe American imperialism, end quote.
but he also displayed some sensitivity at not having reached a higher rank in the Marine Corps.
He stated that he had volunteered to give Soviet officials any information that he had concerning Marine Corps operations, and intimated
that he might know something of special interest. Oswald's "Historic Diary" describes the event in part as follows, quote,
I leave Embassy, elated at this showdown, returning to my hotel I feel now my energies are not spent in vain.
I'm sure Russians will accept me after this sign of my faith in them, end quote.
The Soviet authorities finally permitted Oswald to remain in their country.
No evidence has been found that they used him for any particular propaganda or other political or informational purposes.
They sent him to Minsk to work in a radio and television factory as a metal worker.
The Soviet authorities denied Oswald permission
to attend a university in Moscow, but they gave him a monthly allowance of seven hundred rubles a month
(old exchange rate) in addition to his factory salary of approximately equal amount
and considerably better living quarters than those accorded to Soviet citizens of equal age and station.
The subsidy, apparently similar to those sometimes given to foreigners allowed to remain in the Soviet Union, together with his salary,
gave Oswald an income which he said approximated that of the director of the factory in which he worked.
Even though he received more money and better living quarters than other Russians doing similar work,
he envied his wife's uncle, a colonel in the MVD, because of the larger apartment in which he lived.
Reminiscent of his attitude toward his superiors in the Marine Corps,
Oswald apparently resented the exercise of authority over him and the better treatment afforded to Communist Party officials.
After he returned to the United States
he took the position that the Communist Party officials in the Soviet Union were opportunists who were betraying their positions for personal gain.
He is reported to have expressed the conclusion that they had, quote, fat stinking politicians over there just like we have over here, end quote.
Oswald apparently continued to have personal difficulties while he was in Minsk.
Although Marina Oswald told the Commission that her husband had good personal relationships in the Soviet Union, Katherine Ford,
one of the members of the Russian community in Dallas with which the Oswalds became acquainted upon their arrival in the United States,
stated that Mrs. Oswald told her everybody in Russia, quote, hated him, end quote.
Jeanne De Mohrenschildt, another member of that group,
said that Oswald told her that he had returned because, quote, I didn't find what I was looking for, end quote.
George De Mohrenschildt thought that Oswald must have become disgusted with life in the Soviet Union as the novelty
of the presence of an American wore off and he began to be less the center of attention.
The best description of Oswald's state of mind, however, is set forth in his own "Historic Diary."
Under the entry for May one, nineteen sixty,
he noted that one of his acquaintances, quote, relates many things I do not know about the U.S.S.R.
I begin to feel uneasy inside, its true! End quote.
Under the entry for August to September of that year he wrote, quote,
As my Russian improves I become increasingly conscious of just what sort of a society I live in.
Mass gymnastics, compulsory afterwork meeting, usually political information meeting.
Compulsory attendance at lectures and the sending of the entire shop collective (except me) to pick potatoes on a Sunday, at a state collective farm
A "patriotic duty" to bring in the harvest. The opinions of the workers (unvoiced) are that it's a great pain in the neck:
they don't seem to be especially enthusiastic about any of the "collective" duties, a natural feeling.
I am increasingly aware of the presence, in all thing, of Lebizen, shop party secretary, fat, fortyish, and jovial on the outside.
He is a no-nonsense party regular.
Finally, the entry of January four to thirty-one of nineteen sixty-one, quote,
I am stating to reconsider my desire about staying. The work is drab. The money I get has nowhere to be spent.
No night clubs or bowling alleys, no places of recreation except the trade union dances. I have had enough.
Shortly thereafter, less than eighteen months after his defection, about six weeks before he met Marina Prusakova,
Oswald opened negotiations with the U.S. Embassy in Moscow looking toward his return to the United States.
Return to the United States. In view of the intensity of his earlier commitment to the Soviet Union,
a great change must have occurred in Oswald's thinking to induce him to return to the United States.
The psychological effects of that change must have been highly unsettling. It should be remembered
that he was not yet twenty years old when he went to the Soviet Union with such high hopes and not quite twenty-three when he returned bitterly disappointed.
His attempt to renounce his citizenship had been an open expression of hostility against the United States and a profound rejection of his early life.
The dramatic break with society in America now had to be undone.
His return to the United States publicly testified to the utter failure of what had been the most important act of his life.
Marina Oswald confirmed the fact that her husband was experiencing psychological difficulties at the time of his return.
She said that, quote, immediately after coming to the United States, Lee changed. I did not know him as such a man in Russia, end quote.
She added that while he helped her as he had done before, he became more of a recluse, that, quote,
He was very irritable, sometimes for a trifle, end quote, and that, quote, Lee was very unrestrained and very explosive, end quote.
during the period from November nineteen, nineteen sixty-two to March of nineteen sixty-three.
After the assassination she wrote that, quote,
In general, our family life began to deteriorate after we arrived in America.
Lee was always hot-tempered, and now this trait of character more and more prevented us from living together in harmony.
Lee became very irritable, and sometimes some completely trivial thing would drive him into a rage.
I myself do not have a particularly quiet disposition,
but I had to change my character a great deal in order to maintain a more or less peaceful family life. End quote.
Marina Oswald's judgment of her husband's state of mind may be substantiated by comparing material which he wrote in the Soviet Union
with what he wrote while on the way back to the United States and after his return.
While in the Soviet Union he wrote his longest and clearest piece of work, "The Collective."
This was a fairly coherent description of life in that country, basically centered around the radio and television factory in which he worked.
While it was apparently intended for publication in the United States, and is in many respects critical of certain aspects of life in the Soviet Union,
it appears to be the work of a fairly well organized person.
Oswald prefaced his manuscript with a short autobiographical sketch which reads in part as follows, quote,
Lee Harvey Oswald was born in October nineteen thirty-nine in New Orleans, Louisiana, the son of a Insurance Salesmen whose early death
left a far mean streak of independence brought on by neglect.
entering the US Marine corp at seventeen, this streak of independence was strengthened by exotic journeys to Japan,
the Philippines, and the scores of odd islands in the Pacific.
Immediately after serving out his three years in the U.S. Marine Corps, he abandoned his American life to seek a new life in the USSR.
Full of optimism and hope, he stood in Red Square in the Fall of nineteen fifty-nine, vowing to see his chosen course through,
After, however, two years and a lot of growing up, I decided to return to the USA.
The Collective contrasts sharply with material which Oswald seems to have written after he left the Soviet Union.
which appears to be more an expression of his own psychological condition than of a reasoned analysis.
The latter material expresses great hostility to both communism and capitalism. He wrote, that to a person knowing both of those systems, quote,
There can be no mediation between those systems as they exist today, and that person
He must be opposed to their basic foundations and representatives, end quote.
And yet, it is immature to take the sort of attitude which says, quote, a curse on both your houses! End quote.
There are two great representatives of power in the world,
simply expressed, the left and right, and their offspring factions and concerns. Any practical attempt at one alternative
must have as its nucleus the traditional ideological best of both systems, and yet be utterly opposed to both systems.
Such an alternative was to be opposed both to capitalism and communism because, quote,
No man, having known, having lived, under the Russian Communist and American capitalist system,
could possibly make a choice between them, there is no choice,
One offers oppression, the other poverty. Both offer imperialistic injustice, tinted with two brands of slavery, end quote.
Oswald actually did attempt to formulate such an alternative which he planned to, quote, put forward, end quote, himself.
He thought the new alternative would have its best chance to be accepted after, quote, conflict between the two world systems leaves the world country
without defense or foundation of government, end quote,
after which the survivors would, quote, seek an alternative opposed to those systems which have brought them misery, end quote.
Oswald realized that, quote, their thinking and education will be steeped in the traditions of those systems
and they would never accept a new order complete beyond their understanding, end quote.
As a result he thought it would be, quote, necessary to oppose the old systems but at the same time support their cherished traditions, end quote.
Expanding on his ideas on how his alternative to communism and capitalism might be introduced, he wrote of a, quote, readily foreseeable
economic, political, or military crisis, internal or external,
which will bring about the final destruction of the capitalist system, and indicated that
preparation in a special party could safeguard an independent course of action after the debacle, end quote.
which would achieve the goal, which was, quote, the emplacement of a separate, democratic, pure communist society
but one with union communes,
democratic socializing of production, and without regard to the twisting apart of Marxism Marxist Communism by other powers.
While, quote, resourcefulness and patient working towards the aforesaid goals
are preferred rather than loud and useless manifestations of protest, end quote, Oswald went on to note, quote,
But these preferred tactics now may prove to be too limited in the near future,
they should not be confused with slowness, indecision or fear. Only the intellectually fearless could even be remotely attracted to our doctrine,
and yet this doctrine requires the utmost, utmost restraint, a state of being in itself majestic in power, end quote.
Oswald's decided rejection of both capitalism and communism
seemed to place him in a situation in which he could not live with satisfaction either in the United States or in the Soviet Union.
The discussion above has already set forth examples of his expression of hatred for the United States.
He also expressed hatred of the Soviet Union and of the Communist Party, U.S.A.,
even though he later referred to the latter as, quote, trusted long time fighters for progress, end quote.
He wrote, quote, The Communist Party of the United States has betrayed itself!
It has turned itself into the traditional lever of a foreign power to overthrow the government of the United States;
not in the name of freedom or high ideals,
but in servile conformity to the wishes of the Soviet Union and in anticipation of Soviet Russia's complete domination of the American continent.
There can be no sympathy for those who have turned the idea of communism into a vile curse to Western man.
The Soviets have committed crimes unsurpassed even by their early day capitalist counterparts, the imprisonment of their own peoples,
with the mass extermination so typical of Stalin, and the individual suppression and regimentation under Khrushchev.
The deportations, the purposeful curtailment of diet in the consumer slighted population of Russia,
the murder of history, the prostitution of art and culture, end quote.
A suggestion that Oswald hated more than just capitalism and communism
is provided by the following, which was apparently written either on the ship coming back, or after his return from the Soviet Union, quote,
I have often wondered why it is that the communist, anarchist capitalist, and even the fascist and anarchist elements in American,
always profess patriotism toward the land and the people, if not the government; although their ideals movements must surely lead
to the bitter destruction of all and everything. I am quite sure these people must hate not only the government
but our, the people, culture, traditions, heritage, and very people itself, and yet
they stand up and piously pronounce themselves patriots, displaying their war medals that they gained in conflicts long past between themselves.
I wonder what would happen it somebody was to stand up and say he was utterly opposed not only to the governments, but to the people,
to the entire land and complete foundations of his society, end quote.
Oswald demonstrated his thinking in connection with his return to the United States by preparing two sets of identical questions of the type which he might have thought
he would be asked at a press conference when he returned.
With either great ambivalence, or cold calculation he prepared completely different answers to the same questions.
Judged by his other statements and writings, however, he appears to have indicated his true feelings in the set of answers first presented
and to have stated in the second what he thought would be least harmful to him as he resumed life in the United States.
For example, in response to his questions about his decision to go to the Soviet Union, his first draft answered, quote,
as a mark of discuss and protest against American political policies in foreign countries, my personal sign of discontent
and horror at the misguided line of reasoning of the United States Government, end quote.
His second answer was that he, quote, went as a citizen of the U.S. (as a tourist) residing in a foreign country which I have a perfect right to do.
I went there to see the land, the people and how their system works, end quote.
To the question of, quote, Are you a Communist? End quote, he first answered "Yes,"
basically, although I hate the USSR and socialist system I still think marxism can work under different circumstances, end quote.
His second answer to this question was, quote, No of course not,
I have never even know a communist, outside of the ones in the USSR but you can't help that, end quote.
His first set of questions and answers indicated his belief that there were no outstanding differences between the Soviet Union and the United States,
quote, except in the US, the living standard is a little higher.
Freedoms are about the same. Medical aid and the educational system in the USSR is better than in the USA, end quote.
In the second simulated transcript which ended with the statement, quote, Newspapers thank you, sir. You are a real patriot! End quote.
He apparently concluded that the United States offered, quote,
freedom of speech, travel outspoken opposition to unpopular policies, freedom to believe in god, end quote, while the Soviet Union did not.
Despite the hatred that Oswald expressed toward the Soviet Union after his residence there,
he continued to be interested in that country after he returned to the United States.
Soon after his arrival he wrote to the Soviet Embassy in Washington
requesting information on how to subscribe to Russian newspapers and magazines and asked for, quote,
Oswald subsequently did subscribe to several Soviet journals.
While Marina Oswald tried to obtain permission to return to the Soviet Union, she testified that she did so at her husband's insistence.
In July of nineteen sixty-three, Oswald also requested the Soviet Union to provide a visa for his return to that country.
In August of nineteen sixty-three, he gave the New Orleans police as a reason for refusing to permit his family to learn English,
that, quote, he hated America and he did not want them to become Americanized, and that his plans were to go back to Russia, end quote.
Even though his primary purpose probably was to get to Cuba,
He sought an immediate grant of visa on his trip to Mexico City in late September of nineteen sixty-three.
He also inquired about visas for himself and his wife
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter seven. Lee Harvey Oswald:
Background and Possible Motives, Part four.
Apart from his relatives, Oswald had no friends or close associates in Texas when he returned there in June of nineteen sixty-two,
and he did not establish any close friendships or associations, although it appears that he came to respect George De Mohrenschildt.
De Mohrenschildt was a peripheral member of the so-called Russian community, with which Oswald made contact through Mr. Peter Gregory,
a Russian-speaking petroleum engineer whom Oswald met as a result of his contact with the Texas Employment Commission office in Fort Worth.
Some of the members of that group saw a good deal of the Oswalds through the fall of nineteen sixty-three,
and attempted to help Mrs. Oswald particularly, in various ways. In general, Oswald did not like the members of the Russian community.
In fact, his relations with some of them, particularly George Bouhe, became quite hostile.
Part of the problem resulted from the fact that, as Jeanne De Mohrenschildt testified,
Oswald was, quote, very, very disagreeable and disappointed, end quote,
He also expressed considerable resentment at the help given to his wife by her Russian-American friends.
Jeanne De Mohrenschildt said, quote,
Marina had a hundred dresses given to her, and he objected to that lavish help, because Marina was throwing it into his face.
He was offensive with the people. And I can understand why, because that hurt him.
He could never give her what the people were showering on her no matter how hard he worked -- and he worked very hard, end quote.
The relations between Oswald and his wife became such that Bouhe wanted to "liberate" her from Oswald.
While the exact sequence of events is not clear because of conflicting testimony,
it appears that De Mohrenschildt and his wife actually went to Oswald's apartment early in November of nineteen sixty-two
and helped to move the personal effects of Marina Oswald and the baby.
Even though it appears that they may have left Oswald a few days before, it seems that he resisted the move as best he could.
He even threatened to tear up his wife's dresses and break all the baby things. According to De Mohrenschildt,
Oswald submitted to the inevitable, presumably because he was, quote, small, you know, and he was rather a puny individual, end quote,
De Mohrenschildt said that the whole affair made him nervous since he was, quote, interfering in other people's affairs, after all, end quote.
Oswald attempted to get his wife to come back and, over Bouhe's protest, De Mohrenschildt finally told him where she was.
De Mohrenschildt admitted that, quote,
If somebody did that to me, a lousy trick like that, to take my wife away, and all the furniture, I would be mad as hell, too.
I am surprised that he didn't do something worse, end quote.
After about a two-week separation, Marina Oswald returned to her husband.
Bouhe thoroughly disapproved of this and as a result almost all communication between the Oswalds and members of the Russian community ceased.
Contacts with De Mohrenschildt and his wife did continue and they saw the Oswalds occasionally until the spring of nineteen sixty-three.
Shortly after his return from the Soviet Union, Oswald severed all relations with his mother;
he did not see his brother Robert from Thanksgiving of nineteen sixty-two until November twenty-three, nineteen sixty-three.
At the time of his defection, Oswald had said that neither his brother, Robert,
nor his mother were objects of his affection, quote, but only examples of workers in the U.S., end quote.
He also indicated to officials at the American Embassy in Moscow that his defection was motivated at least in part
by so-called exploitation of his mother by the capitalist system.
He first told his wife that he did not have a mother, but later admitted that he did but that, quote, he didn't love her very much, end quote.
When they arrived from the Soviet Union, Oswald and his family lived at first with his brother Robert.
The latter testified that they, quote, were just together again, end quote, as if his brother, quote, had not been to Russia, end quote.
He also said that he and his family got along well with Marina Oswald and enjoyed showing her American things.
After about a month with his brother,
Oswald and his family lived for a brief period with his mother at her urging, but Oswald soon decided to move out.
Marguerite Oswald visited her son and his family at the first apartment which he rented after his return, and tried to help them get settled there.
After she had bought some clothes for Marina Oswald and a highchair for the baby, Oswald emphatically told her to stop.
As Marguerite Oswald testified, quote,
he strongly put me in my place about buying things for his wife that he himself could not buy, end quote.
Oswald objected to his mother visiting the apartment
and became quite incensed with his wife when she would open the door for her in spite of his instructions to the contrary.
Oswald moved to Dallas on about October eight, nineteen sixty-two, without telling his mother where he was going.
He never saw or communicated with her in any way again until she came to see him after the assassination.
Even though Oswald cut off relations with his mother,
he attempted for the first time to learn something about his family background when he went to New Orleans in April of nineteen sixty-three.
He visited some of his father's elderly relatives and the cemetery where his father was buried in an effort to develop the facts of his genealogy.
While it does not appear that he established any new relationships as a result of his investigation, he did obtain a large picture of his father
from one of the elderly relatives with whom he spoke. Oswald's interest in such things presents a sharp contrast with his attitude
at the time of his defection, when he evidenced no interest in his father and hardly mentioned him, even when questioned.
Oswald's defection, his interest in the Soviet Union, and his activities on behalf of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee
not only caused him difficulties in his employment relations, but they also provided him with excuses for employment failures
which were largely of his own making.
Oswald experienced some difficulty finding employment. Perhaps this was partially because of his lack of any specific skill or training.
Some of his acquaintances, feeling that Oswald tried to impress people with the fact that he had lived and worked in Russia, were led to the belief
that his employment difficulties were caused by his telling prospective employers that he had last been employed in Minsk.
While he might have expected difficulty from such an approach, in fact
the evidence indicates that Oswald usually told his prospective employers and employment counselors that he had recently been discharged from the Marine Corps.
Oswald obtained a job in July of nineteen sixty-two as a sheet metal worker with a company in Fort Worth.
His performance for that company was satisfactory.
Even though he told his wife that he had been fired, he voluntarily left on October eight, nineteen sixty-two, and moved to Dallas.
On October nine, nineteen sixty-two he went to the Dallas office of the Texas Employment Commission
where he expressed a reluctance to work in the industrial field.
He indicated an interest in writing. An employment counselor testified, on the basis of a general aptitude test Oswald had taken,
that he had some aptitude in that area, quote, because the verbal score is high and the clerical score is high, end quote,
While that counselor found that he was qualified to handle many different types of jobs,
because of his need for immediate employment she attempted to obtain for him any job that was available at the time. Oswald made qualifying marks
in nineteen of twenty-three categories included on the general aptitude examination and scored one hundred twenty-seven on the verbal test, as compared
with fifty percent of the people taking it who score less than one hundred.
The counselor testified that there was some indication that Oswald was capable of doing college work
and noted that Oswald's verbal and clerical potential was, quote, outstanding, end quote.
Employment Commission records concerning Oswald stated, quote, Well-groomed and spoken,
business suit, alert replies -- Expresses self extremely well, end quote.
Oswald said that he hoped eventually to develop qualifications for employment as a junior executive
through a work-study program at a local college.
He indicated, however, that he would have to delay that program because of his immediate financial needs and responsibilities.
On October eleven, nineteen sixty-two, the Employment Commission referred Oswald
to a commercial advertising photography firm in Dallas, where he was employed as a trainee starting October twelve, nineteen sixty-two.
Even though Oswald indicated that he liked photographic work, his employer found that he was not an efficient worker.
He was not able to produce photographic work
which adhered with sufficient precision to the job specifications and as a result too much of his work had to be redone.
He also had difficulty in working with the other employees.
This was at least in part because of the close physical confines in which some of the work had to be done.
He did not seem to be able to make the accommodations necessary when people work under such conditions and as a result
became involved in conflicts, some of which were fairly heated, with his fellow employees.
In February or March of nineteen sixty-three,
it began to appear that Oswald was having considerable difficulty doing accurate work and in getting along with the other employees.
It appears that his discharge was hastened by the fact that he brought a Russian language newspaper to work.
It is not possible to tell whether Oswald did this to provide an excuse for his eventual discharge,
or whether he brought the Russian language newspaper with him one day after his other difficulties became clear.
It is possible that his immediate supervisor noticed the newspaper at that time because his attention had otherwise been drawn more directly to Oswald.
In any event, Oswald was discharged on April six, nineteen sixty-three, ostensibly because of his inefficiency and difficult personality.
that while he did not fire Oswald because of the newspaper incident or even weigh it heavily in his decision, quote,
it didn't do his case any good, end quote.
Upon moving to New Orleans on April twenty-four, nineteen sixty-three,
Oswald's employment problems became more difficult. He left his wife and child at the home of a friend, Mrs. Ruth Paine, of Irving, Texas.
In New Orleans he obtained work as a greaser and oiler of coffee processing machines for the William B. Reily Co.,
beginning May ten, nineteen sixty-three.
After securing this job and an apartment, Oswald asked his wife to join him.
Mrs. Paine brought Oswald's family to New Orleans.
Refusing to admit that he could only get work as a greaser,
Oswald told his wife and Mrs. Paine that he was working as a commercial photographer.
He lost his job on July nineteen, nineteen sixty-three, because his work was not satisfactory
and because he spent too much time loitering in the garage next door, where he read rifle and hunting magazines.
Oswald apparently concluded that his Fair Play for Cuba Committee activities were not related to his discharge.
The correctness of that conclusion is supported by the fact that he does not seem to have been publicly identified with that organization until August nine,
nineteen sixty-three, almost a month after he lost his job.
His Fair Play for Cuba Committee activities, however, made it more difficult for him to obtain other employment.
A placement interviewer of the Louisiana Department of Labor
who had previously interviewed Oswald, saw him on television and heard a radio debate in which he engaged on August twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three.
He consulted with his supervisor and, quote, it was determined that we should not undertake to furnish employment references for him, end quote.
Ironically, he failed to get a job in another photographic firm after his return to Dallas in October of nineteen sixty-three,
because the president of the photographic firm for which he had previously worked
told the prospective employer that Oswald was, quote, kinda peculiar sometimes and that he had some knowledge of the Russian language, end quote.
and that he, quote, may be a damn Communist. I can't tell you. If I was you, I wouldn't hire him, end quote.
The plant superintendent of the new firm testified that, one of the employees of the old firm, quote,
implied that Oswald's fellow employees did not like him because he was propagandizing
and had been seen reading a foreign newspaper, end quote.
As a result Oswald was not hired.
He subsequently found a job with the Texas School Book Depository for which he performed his duties satisfactorily.
The Commission has concluded that on April ten, nineteen sixty-three,
Oswald shot at Maj. Gen. Edwin A. Walker (Resigned, U.S. Army),
demonstrating once again his propensity to act dramatically and, in this instance violently, in furtherance of his beliefs.
The shooting occurred two weeks before Oswald moved to New Orleans and a few days after he had been discharged by the photographic firm.
As indicated in chapter four, Oswald had been planning his attack on General Walker for at least one and perhaps as much as two months.
He outlined his plans in a notebook and studied them at considerable length before his attack.
He also studied Dallas bus schedules to prepare for his later use of buses to travel to and from General Walker's house.
Sometime after March twenty-seven, but according to Marina Oswald, prior to April ten, nineteen sixty-three,
Oswald posed for two pictures
with his recently acquired rifle and pistol, a copy of the March twenty-four, nineteen sixty-three, issue of the Worker,
and the March eleven, nineteen sixty-three, issue of the Militant.
He told his wife that he wanted to send the pictures to the Militant and he also asked her to keep one of the pictures for his daughter, June.
Following his unsuccessful attack on Walker, Oswald returned home.
He had left a note for his wife telling her what to do in case he were apprehended, as well as his notebook and the pictures of himself holding the rifle.
She testified that she was agitated because she had found the note in Oswald's room,
where she had gone, contrary to his instructions, after she became, worried about his absence.
She indicated that she had no advance knowledge of Oswald's plans,
that she became quite angry when Oswald told her what he had done, and that she made him promise never to repeat such a performance.
She said that she kept the note to use against him, quote, if something like that should be repeated again, end quote.
When asked if Oswald requested the note back she testified that, quote, He forgot about it. But apparently
after he thought that what he had written in his book might be proof against him, and he destroyed it (the book), end quote.
She later gave the following testimony. Question:
After he brought the rifle home, then, he showed you the book?
Answer: Yes. Question: And you said it was not a good idea to keep this book? Answer: Yes.
Question: And then he burned the book?
Question: Did you ask him why he had not destroyed the book before he actually went to shoot General Walker?
Answer: It never came to me, myself, to ask him that question.
Marina Oswald's testimony indicates that her husband was not particularly concerned about his continued possession of the most incriminating sort of evidence.
If he had been successful and had been apprehended even for routine questioning, his apartment would undoubtedly have been searched,
and his role would have been made clear by the evidence which he had left behind.
Leaving the note and picture as he did would seem to indicate that he had considered the possibility of capture.
Possibly he might have wanted to be caught, and wanted his involvement made clear if he was in fact apprehended.
Even after his wife told him to destroy the notebook
he removed at least some of the pictures which had been pasted in it and saved them among his effects, where they were found after the assassination.
His behavior was entirely consistent with his wife's testimony that, quote,
I asked him what for he was making all these entries in the book and he answered that he wanted to leave a complete record so that all the details would be in it.
I am guessing that perhaps he did it to appear to be a brave man in case he were arrested, but that is my supposition, end quote.
The attempt on General Walker's life deserves close attention in any consideration of Oswald's possible motive for the assassination
and the trail of evidence he left behind him on that occasion.
While there are differences between the two events as far as Oswald's actions and planning are concerned, there are also similarities that should be considered.
The items which Oswald left at home when he made his attack on Walker suggest a strong concern for his place in history.
If the attack had succeeded and Oswald had been caught, the pictures showing him with his rifle
and his Communist and Socialist Worker's Party newspapers would probably have appeared on the front pages of newspapers or magazines all over the country,
as, in fact, one of them did appear after the assassination.
The circumstances of the attack on Walker coupled with other indications that Oswald was concerned about his place in history
and with the circumstances surrounding the assassination, have led the Commission to believe
that such concern is an important factor to consider in assessing possible motivation for the assassination.
In any event, the Walker incident indicates that in spite of the belief among those who knew him that he was apparently not dangerous,
Oswald did not lack the determination and other traits required
to carry out a carefully planned killing of another human being and was willing to consummate such a purpose if he thought there was sufficient reason to do so.
Some idea of what he thought was sufficient reason for such an act may be found in the nature of the motive that he stated for his attack on General Walker.
Marina Oswald indicated that her husband had compared General Walker to Adolph Hitler.
She testified that Oswald said that General Walker, quote, was a very bad man, that he was a fascist,
that he was the leader of a fascist organization, and when I said that even though all of that might be true, just the same he had no right to take his life,
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter seven.
Lee Harvey Oswald: Background and Possible Motives, Part five.
Oswald's political activities after his return to the United States center around his interest in Cuba and in the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
Although, as indicated above, the Commission has been unable to find any credible evidence
that he was involved in any conspiracy, his political activities do provide insight into certain aspects of Oswald's character
and into his possible motivation for the assassination.
While it appears that he may have distributed Fair Play for Cuba Committee materials on one uneventful occasion in Dallas sometime during the period
April six to twenty-four, nineteen sixty-three Oswald's first public identification with that cause was in New Orleans.
There, in late May and early June of nineteen sixty-three, under the name Lee Osborne,
he had printed a handbill headed in large letters, quote,
Hands Off Cuba, end quote, an application form for, and a membership card in,
the New Orleans branch of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
He first distributed his handbills and other material uneventfully in the vicinity of the U.S.S. Wasp,
which was berthed at the Dumaine Street wharf in New Orleans, on June sixteen, nineteen sixty-three.
He distributed literature in downtown New Orleans on August nine, nineteen sixty-three,
and was arrested because of a dispute with three anti-Castro Cuban exiles, and again on August sixteen, nineteen sixty-three.
Following his arrest, he was interviewed by the police, and at his own request, by an agent of the FBI.
On August seventeen, nineteen sixty-three, he appeared briefly on a radio program and on August twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three,
he debated over radio station WDSU, New Orleans, with Carlos Bringuier,
one of the Cuban exiles who had been arrested with him on August nine. Bringuier claimed that on August five, nineteen sixty-three,
Oswald had attempted to infiltrate an anti-Castro organization with which he was associated.
While Oswald publicly engaged in the activities described above, his, quote, organization, end quote, was a product of his imagination.
The imaginary president of the nonexistent chapter was named A. J. Hidell, the name that Oswald used when he purchased the assassination weapon.
Marina Oswald said she signed that name, apparently chosen because it rhymed with "Fidel,"
to her husband's membership card in the New Orleans chapter.
She testified that he threatened to beat her if she did not do so. The chapter had never been chartered by the national FPCC organization.
It appears to have been a solitary operation on Oswald's part in spite of his misstatements to the New Orleans police that it had thirty-five members,
five of which were usually present at meetings which were held once a month.
Oswald's Fair Play for Cuba activities may be viewed as a very shrewd political operation
in which one man single handedly created publicity for his cause or for himself.
It is also evidence of Oswald's reluctance to describe events accurately
and of his need to present himself to others as well as to himself in a light more favorable than was justified by reality.
This is suggested by his misleading and sometime untruthful statements in his letters to Mr. V. T. Lee,
then national director of FPCC. In one of those letters, dated August one, nineteen sixty-three,
Oswald wrote that an office which he had previously claimed to have rented for FPCC activities had been, quote,
promptly closed three days later for some obscure reasons by the renters,
they said something about remodeling, etc. I'm sure you understand, end quote.
He wrote that, quote, thousands of circulars were distributed, end quote.
and that he continued to receive inquiries through his post office box which he endeavored, quote, to keep answering to the best of my ability, end quote.
In his letter to V. T. Lee,
he stated that he was then alone in his efforts on behalf of FPCC, but he attributed his lack of support
to an attack by Cuban exiles in a street demonstration and being, quote, officialy cautioned, end quote, by the police.
events which, quote, robbed me of what support I had leaving me alone, end quote.
that anyone ever attacked any street demonstration in which Oswald was involved, except for the Bringuier incident mentioned above,
which occurred eight days after Oswald wrote the above letter to V. T. Lee.
Bringuier, who seemed to be familiar with many anti-Castro activities in New Orleans, was not aware of any such incident.
Police reports also fail to reflect any activity on Oswald's part prior to August nine, nineteen sixty-three,
except for the uneventful distribution of literature at the Dumaine Street wharf in June.
Furthermore, the general tenor of Oswald's next letter to V. T. Lee,
in which he supported his report on the Bringuier incident with a copy of the charges made against him
and a newspaper clipping reporting the event, suggests that his previous story of an attack by Cuban exiles was at least greatly exaggerated.
While the legend, quote, FPCC, five four four Camp Street New Orleans, Louisiana, end quote,
was stamped on some literature that Oswald had in his possession at the time of his arrest in New Orleans,
extensive investigation was not able to connect Oswald with that address, although it did develop the fact
that an anti-Castro organization had maintained offices there for a period ending early in nineteen sixty-two.
The Commission has not been able to find any other indication that Oswald had rented an office in New Orleans.
In view of the limited amount of public activity on Oswald's part before August nine, nineteen sixty-three,
there also seems to be no basis for his claim that he had distributed, quote,
thousands, end quote, of circulars, especially since he had claimed to have printed only two thousand
and actually had only one thousand printed.
In addition, there is no evidence that he received any substantial amount of materials from the national headquarters.
In another letter to V. T. Lee, dated August seventeen, nineteen sixty-three,
Oswald wrote that he had appeared on Mr. William Stuckey's fifteen-minute television program over WDSU-TV called, quote,
Latin American Focus, end quote,
as a result of which he was, quote, flooded with callers and invitations to debates, etc. as well as people interested in joining the F.P.C.C.
New Orleans branch, end quote.
WDSU has no program of any kind called, quote, Latin American Focus, end quote.
Stuckey had a radio program called, quote, Latin Listening Post, end quote,
on which Oswald was heard for less than five minutes on August seventeen, nineteen sixty-three.
It appears that Oswald had only one caller in response to all of his FPCC activities,
an agent of Bringuier's attempting to learn more about the true nature
of the alleged FPCC, quote, organization, end quote, in New Orleans.
Oswald's statements suggest that he hoped to be flooded with callers and invitations to debate.
This would have made him a real center of attention as he must have been when he first arrived in the Soviet Union
and as he was to some extent when he returned to the United States.
The limited notoriety that Oswald received as a result of the street fracas and in the subsequent radio debate
was apparently not enough to satisfy him. He exaggerated in his letters to V. T. Lee in an apparent attempt
to make himself and his activities appear far more important than they really were.
His attempt to express himself through his Fair Play for Cuba activities, however,
was greatly impeded by the fact that the radio debate over WDSU on August twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three,
brought out the history of his defection to the Soviet Union.
The basic facts of the event were uncovered independently by William Stuckey, who arranged the debate, and Edward Butler,
executive director of the Information Council of the Americas, who also appeared on the program.
Oswald was confronted with those facts at the beginning of the debate and was so thrown on the defensive by this that he was forced to state that
Fair Play for Cuba was, quote, not at all Communist controlled regardless of the fact that I had the experience of living in Russia, end quote.
Stuckey testified that uncovering Oswald's defection was very important, quote,
I think that we finished him on that program because we had publicly linked the Fair Play for Cuba Committee
with a fellow who had lived in Russia for three years and who was an admitted Marxist.
The interesting thing, or rather the danger involved, was the fact that Oswald seemed like such a nice, bright boy
and was extremely believable before this. We thought the fellow could probably get quite a few members if he was really indeed serious about getting members.
We figured after this broadcast of August twenty-one, why, that was no longer possible, end quote.
In spite of the fact that Oswald had been surprised and was on the defensive throughout the debate, according to Stuckey, quote,
Mr. Oswald handled himself very well, as usual, end quote.
Stuckey thought Oswald, quote, appeared to be a very logical, intelligent fellow, end quote, and, quote, was arrested by his cleancutness, end quote.
He did not think Oswald looked like the, quote, type, end quote, that he would have expected to find associating with a group such as the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
Stuckey thought that Oswald acted very much as would a young attorney.
Following the disclosure of his defection, Oswald sought advice from the Communist Party, U.S.A., concerning his Fair Play for Cuba activity.
He had previously sent, apparently unsolicited, to the Party newspaper, the Worker,
samples of his photographic work, offering to contribute that sort of service without charge.
The Worker replied, quote, Your kind offer is most welcomed and from time to time we shall call on you, end quote.
He later wrote to another official of the Worker, seeking employment, and mentioning the praise he had received for submitting his photographic work.
He presented Arnold Johnson, Gus Hall,
and Benjamin J. Davis honorary membership cards in his nonexistent New Orleans chapter of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee,
and advised them of some of his activities on behalf of the organization.
Arnold Johnson, director of the information and lecture bureau of the Communist Party, U.S.A., replied stating, quote,
It is good to know that movements in support of fair play for Cuba has developed in New Orleans as well as in other cities.
We do not have any organizational ties with the Committee, and yet there is much material that we issue from time to time that is important
for anybody who is concerned about developments in Cuba, end quote,
Marina Oswald said that such correspondence from people he considered important meant much to Oswald.
After he had begun his Cuban activity in New Orleans, quote,
he received a letter from somebody in New York, some Communist -- probably from New York -- I am not sure from where -- from some Communist leader and he was very happy,
he felt that this was a great man that he had received the letter from, end quote.
Since he seemed to feel that no one else understood his political views, the letter was of great value to him for it, quote, was proof
that there were people who understood his activity, end quote.
He anticipated that the full disclosure of his defection would hinder him in, quote, the struggle for progress and freedom in the United States, end quote.
into which Oswald, in his own words, had, quote, thrown himself. He sought advice from the central committee of the Communist Party, U.S.A.,
in a letter dated August twenty-eight, nineteen sixty-three, about whether he could, quote, continue to fight,
handicapped as it were, by my past record and compete with anti-progressive forces, above-ground or whether in your opinion
I should always remain in the background, i.e. underground, end quote.
Stating that he had used his "position" with what he claimed to be the local branch of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee to, quote, foster communist ideals, end quote,
Oswald wrote that he felt that he might have compromised the FPCC and expressed concern lest, quote, Our opponents could use my background
of residence in the U.S.S.R. against any cause which I join, by association,
they could say the organization of which I am a member, is Russian controlled, etc, end quote.
In reply Arnold Johnson advised Oswald that, while as an American citizen he had a right to participate in such organizations as he wished, quote,
there are a number of organizations, including possibly Fair Play, which are of a very broad character,
and often it is advisable for some people to remain in the background, not underground, end quote.
By August of nineteen sixty-three, after a short three months in New Orleans, the city in which he had been born and had lived most of his early life,
Oswald had fallen on difficult times.
He had not liked his job as a greaser of coffee processing machinery and he held it for only a little over two months.
He had not found another job. His wife was expecting their second child in October and there was concern about the cost which would be involved.
His brief foray on behalf of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee had failed to win any support.
While he had drawn some attention to himself and had actually appeared on two radio programs, he had been attacked by Cuban exiles and arrested,
an event which his wife thought upset him and as a result of which, quote, he became less active, he cooled off a little, end quote.
More seriously, the facts of his defection had become known, leaving him open to almost unanswerable attack by those who opposed his views.
It would not have been possible to have followed Arnold Johnson's advice to remain in the background,
since there was no background to the New Orleans FPCC, quote, organization, end quote, which consisted solely of Oswald.
Furthermore, he had apparently not received any letters from the national headquarters of FPCC since May twenty-nine, nineteen sixty-three,
even though he had written four detailed letters since that time to Mr. V. T. Lee and had also kept the national headquarters informed
of each of his changes of mailing address.
Those events no doubt had their effects on Oswald.
By August of nineteen sixty-three, Oswald had for some time been considering the possibility of leaving the United States again.
On June twenty-four, nineteen sixty-three, he applied for a new passport
and in late June or early July he told his wife that he wanted to return to the Soviet Union with her. She said that he was extremely upset,
very unhappy, and that he actually wept when he told her that.
He said that nothing kept him in the United States, that he would not lose anything if he returned to the Soviet Union, that he wanted to be with her
and that it would be better to have less and not have to be concerned about tomorrow.
As a result of that conversation, Marina Oswald wrote the Soviet Embassy in Washington concerning a request she had first made
on February seventeen, nineteen sixty-three, for permission for herself and June to return to the Soviet Union.
While that first request, made according to Marina Oswald at her husband's insistence, specifically stated that Oswald was to remain in the United States,
she wrote in her letter of July nineteen sixty-three,
that things are improving due to the fact that my husband expresses a sincere wish to return together with me to the USSR. Unknown to his wife, however,
Oswald apparently enclosed a note with her letter of July in which
he requested the Embassy to rush his wife's entrance visa because of the impending birth of the second child but stated that, quote,
As for my return entrance visa please consider it separately. End quote.
Thus while Oswald's real intentions, assuming that they were known to himself, are not clear,
he may not have intended to go to the Soviet Union directly, if at all. It appears that he really wanted to go to Cuba.
In his wife's words, quote,
I only know that his basic desire was to get to Cuba by any means, and that all the rest of it was window dressing for that purpose. End quote.
Marina Oswald testified that her husband engaged in Fair Play for Cuba Committee activities, quote,
primarily for purposes of self-advertising.
He wanted to be arrested. I think he wanted to get into the newspapers, so that he would be known. End quote.
According to Marina Oswald, he thought that would help him when he got to Cuba.
He asked his wife to help him to hijack an airplane to get there, but gave up that scheme when she refused.
During this period Oswald may have practiced opening and closing the bolt on his rifle in a screened porch in his apartment.
In September he began to review Spanish.
He approved arrangements for his family to return to Irving, Texas, to live with Mrs. Ruth Paine.
On September twenty, nineteen sixty-three, Mrs. Paine and her two children arrived in New Orleans from a trip to the East Coast
and left for Irving with Marina Oswald and June and most of the Oswalds' effects three days later.
While Marina Oswald knew of her husband's plan to go to Mexico and thence to Cuba if possible, Mrs. Paine was told that Oswald was going to Houston
and possibly to Philadelphia to look for work.
Oswald left for Mexico City on September twenty-five, nineteen sixty-three, and arrived on September twenty-seven, nineteen sixty-three.
He went almost directly to the Cuban Embassy and applied for a visa to Cuba in transit to Russia.
Representing himself as the head of the New Orleans branch of the, quote, organization called Fair Play for Cuba, end quote,
he stated his desire that he should be accepted as a friend of the Cuban Revolution.
He apparently based his claim for a visa in transit to Russia
on his previous residence, his work permit for that country, and several unidentified letters in the Russian language.
The Cubans would not, however, give him a visa until he had received one from the Soviets, which involved a delay of several months.
When faced with that situation Oswald became greatly agitated, and although he later unsuccessfully attempted
to obtain a Soviet visa at the Soviet Embassy in Mexico City, he insisted that he was entitled to the Cuban visa because of his background,
partisanship, and personal activities on behalf of the Cuban government.
He engaged in an angry argument with the consul who finally told him that, quote, as far as he was concerned
he would not give him a visa, end quote, and that, quote,
a person like him (Oswald) in place of aiding the Cuban Revolution, was doing it harm, end quote.
Oswald must have been thoroughly disillusioned when he left Mexico City on October two, nineteen sixty-three.
In spite of his former residence in the Soviet Union and his Fair Play for Cuba Committee activities he had been rebuffed
by the officials of both Cuba and the Soviet Union in Mexico City.
Now there appeared to be no chance to get to Cuba, where he had thought he might find his communist ideal. The U.S. Government would not permit travel there
and as far as the performance of the Cubans themselves was concerned, he was, quote, disappointed at not being able to get to Cuba
and he didn't have any great desire to do so any more because he had run into, as he himself said -- into bureaucracy and red tape, end quote.
Oswald's attempt to go to Cuba
was another act which expressed his hostility toward the United States and its institutions as well as a concomitant attachment
to a country in which he must have thought were embodied the political principles to which he had been committed for so long.
It should be noted that his interest in Cuba seems to have increased along with the sense of frustration which must have developed
as he experienced successive failures in his jobs, in his political activity, and in his personal relationships.
In retrospect his attempt to go to Cuba or return to the Soviet Union may well have been Oswald's last escape hatch,
his last gambit to extricate himself from the mediocrity and defeat which plagued him throughout most of his life.
Oswald's activities with regard to Cuba raise serious questions as to how much he might have been motivated in the assassination
by a desire to aid the Castro regime, which President Kennedy so outspokenly criticized.
For example, the Dallas Times Herald of November nineteen, nineteen sixty-three,
prominently reported President Kennedy as having, quote, all but invited the Cuban people today to overthrow Fidel Castro's Communist regime
and promised prompt U.S. aid if they do, end quote.
The Castro regime severely attacked President Kennedy in connection with the Bay of Pigs affair, the Cuban missile crisis, the ban on travel to Cuba,
the economic embargo against that country, and the general policy of the United States with regard to Cuba.
An examination of the Militant, to which Oswald subscribed,
for the three-month period prior to the assassination reflects an extremely critical attitude toward President Kennedy and his administration
concerning Cuban policy in general as well as on the issues of automation and civil rights, issues which appeared to concern Oswald a great deal.
The Militant also reflected a critical attitude toward President Kennedy's attempts to reduce tensions between the United States and the Soviet Union.
It also dealt with the fear of the Castro regime that such a policy might result in its abandonment by the Soviet Union.
The October seven, nineteen sixty-three, issue of the Militant
reported Castro as saying Cuba could not accept a situation where at the same time the United States was trying to ease world tensions
it also was increasing its efforts to tighten the noose around Cuba.
was also reported in the October one, nineteen sixty-three, issue of the Worker, to which Oswald also subscribed.
In this connection it should be noted that in speaking of the Worker, Oswald told Michael Paine, apparently in all seriousness, that, quote,
you could tell what they wanted you to do by reading between the lines, reading the thing and doing a little reading between the lines, end quote.
The general conflict of views between the United States and Cuba was, of course, reflected in other media to such an extent
that there can be no doubt that Oswald was aware generally of the critical attitude that Castro expressed about President Kennedy.
Oswald was asked during the New Orleans radio debate in which he engaged on August twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three,
whether or not he agreed with Castro that President Kennedy was a, quote, ruffian and a thief, end quote. He replied that he, quote,
would not agree with that particular wording, end quote.
It should also be noted, however, that one witness testified that shortly before the assassination
Oswald had expressed approval of President Kennedy's active role in the area of civil rights.
Although Oswald could possibly have been motivated in part by his sympathy for the Castro government,
it should be remembered that his wife testified that he was disappointed with his failure to get to Cuba
and had lost his desire to do so because of the bureaucracy and red tape which he had encountered.
His unhappy experience with the Cuban consul seems thus to have reduced his enthusiasm for the Castro regime and his desire to go to Cuba.
While some of Castro's more severe criticisms of President Kennedy might have led Oswald to believe that he would be well received in Cuba
after he had assassinated the American President, it does not appear that he had any plans to go there.
Oswald was carrying only thirteen dollars, eighty-seven cents at the time of his arrest, although he had left, apparently by design,
one hundred seventy dollars in a wallet in his wife's room in Irving.
If there was no conspiracy which would help him escape, the possibility of which has been considered in chapter six,
it is unlikely that a reasoning person would plan to attempt to travel from Dallas, Texas to Cuba
with thirteen dollars, eighty-seven cents when considerably greater resources were available to him.
The fact that Oswald left behind the funds which might have enabled him to reach Cuba suggests the absence of any plan to try to flee there
and raises serious questions as to whether or not he ever expected to escape.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter seven. Lee Harvey Oswald: Background and Possible Motives, Part six.
Possible Influence of Anti-Kennedy Sentiment in Dallas
It has been suggested that one of the motivating influences operating on Lee Oswald was the atmosphere in the city of Dallas,
especially an atmosphere of extreme opposition to President Kennedy that was present in some parts of the Dallas community
and which received publicity there prior to the assassination.
Some of that feeling was expressed in the incident involving then vice-presidential candidate Johnson during the nineteen sixty campaign,
in the treatment of Ambassador Adlai Stevenson late in October of nineteen sixty-three
and in the extreme anti-Kennedy newspaper advertisement and handbills that appeared in Dallas at the time of the President's visit there.
The Commission has found no evidence that the extreme views expressed toward President Kennedy
by some rightwing groups centered in Dallas or any other general atmosphere of hate
or rightwing extremism which may have existed in the city of Dallas had any connection with Oswald's actions on November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three.
There is, of course, no way to judge what the effect of the general political ferment present in that city might have been, even though Oswald was aware of it.
His awareness is shown by a letter that he wrote to Arnold Johnson of the Communist Party U.S.A.,
which Johnson said he did not receive until after the assassination. The letter said in part, quote,
On October twenty-third, I had attended a ultra-right meeting headed by General Edwin A. Walker, who lives in Dallas.
This meeting preceded by one day the attack on A. E. Stevenson at the United Nations Day meeting at which he spoke
As you can see, political friction between "left" and "right" is very great here.
Could you advise me as to the general view we have on the American Civil Liberties Union? End quote.
In any event, the Commission has been unable to find any credible evidence that Oswald had direct contact or association with
any of the personalities or groups epitomizing or representing the so-called right wing,
even though he did, as he told Johnson, attend a meeting at which General Walker spoke to approximately thirteen hundred persons.
Oswald's writings and his reading habits indicate that he had an extreme dislike of the right wing, an attitude most clearly reflected by his attempt
The relations between Lee and Marina Oswald are of great importance in any attempt to understand Oswald's possible motivation.
During the period from Oswald's return from Mexico to the assassination,
he and his wife spent every weekend but one together at the Irving, Texas home of Mrs. Ruth Paine, who was then separated from her husband.
The sole exception was the weekend of November sixteen to seventeen, nineteen sixty-three, the weekend before the assassination,
when his wife asked Oswald not to come to Irving.
During the week, Oswald lived in a roominghouse in Dallas, but he usually called his wife on the telephone twice a day.
She testified that after his return from Mexico Oswald, quote, changed for the better.
He began to treat me better. He helped me more -- although he always did help. But he was more attentive, end quote.
Marina Oswald attributed that to their living apart and to the imminent birth of their second child.
She testified that Oswald, quote, was very happy, end quote, about the birth of the child.
While those considerations no doubt had an effect on Oswald's attitude toward his family it would seem that the need for support and sympathy
after his recent rebuffs in Mexico City
might also have been important to him. It would not have been the first time that Oswald sought closer ties with his family in time of adversity.
His past relationships with his wife had been stormy, however, and it did not seem that she respected him very much.
They had been married after a courtship of only about six weeks, a part of which Oswald spent in the hospital.
Oswald's diary reports that he married his wife shortly after his proposal of marriage to another girl had been rejected.
He stated that the other girl rejected him partly because he was an American, a fact that he said she had exploited. He stated that, quote,
In spite of fact I married Marina to hurt Ella (the girl that had rejected him) I found myself in love with Marina, end quote.
Many of the people with whom the Oswalds became acquainted after their arrival in the United States thought that Marina Oswald had married her husband primarily in the hope
that she would be able to leave the Soviet Union. Marina Oswald has denied this.
Marina Oswald expressed one aspect of her husband's attitude toward her when she testified that, quote, Lee wanted me to go to Russia.
and I told him that
if he wanted me to go then that meant that he didn't love me, and that in that case what was the idea of coming to the United States in the first place.
Lee would say that it would be better for me if I went to Russia. I did not know why. I did not know what he had in mind.
He said he loved me but that it would be better for me if I went to Russia, and what he had in mind I don't know. End quote.
On the other hand, Oswald objected to the invitation that his wife had received to live with Mrs. Ruth Paine,
which Mrs. Paine had made in part to give her an alternative to returning to the Soviet Union. Marina Oswald wrote to Mrs. Paine that, quote,
Many times Oswald has recalled this matter to me and said that I am just waiting for an opportunity to hurt him.
It has been the cause of many of our arguments. End quote. Oswald claimed that his wife preferred others to him.
He said this about members of the Russian-speaking group in the Dallas-Ft. Worth area, whom she said he tried to forbid her from seeing,
and also about Mrs. Paine.
He specifically made that claim when his wife refused to come to live with him in Dallas as he asked her to do on the evening of November twenty-one,
The instability of their relations was probably a function of the personalities of both people. Oswald was overbearing in relations with his wife.
He apparently attempted to be "the Commander" by dictating many of the details of their married life.
While Marina Oswald said that her husband wanted her to learn English,
he made no attempt to help her and there are other indications that he did not want her to learn that language.
Oswald apparently wished to continue practicing his own Russian with her. Lieutenant Martello of the New Orleans police testified
that Oswald stated that he did not speak English in his family because he did not want them to become Americanized.
Marina Oswald's inability to speak English also made it more difficult for her to have an independent existence in this country.
Oswald struck his wife on occasion,
did not want her to drink, smoke or wear cosmetics and generally treated her with lack of respect in the presence of others.
The difficulties which Oswald's problems would have caused him in any relationship were probably not reduced by his wife's conduct.
Katherine Ford, with whom Marina Oswald stayed during her separation from her husband in November of nineteen sixty-two,
thought that Marina Oswald was immature in her thinking and partly responsible for the difficulties that the Oswalds were having at that time.
Mrs. Ford said that Marina Oswald admitted that she provoked Oswald on occasion.
There can be little doubt that some provocation existed.
Oswald once struck his wife because of a letter which she wrote to a former boyfriend in Russia.
In the letter Marina Oswald stated that her husband had changed a great deal and that she was very lonely in the United States.
She was, quote, sorry that I had not married him (the Russian boyfriend) instead, that it would have been much easier for me, end quote.
The letter fell into Oswald's hands when it was returned to his post office box
because of insufficient postage, which apparently resulted from an increase in postal rates of which his wife had been unaware.
Oswald read the letter, but refused to believe that it was sincere, even though his wife insisted to him that it was.
As a result Oswald struck her, as to which she testified, quote,
Generally, I think that was right, for such things that is the right thing to do. There was some grounds for it. End quote.
Although she denied it in some of her testimony before the Commission,
it appears that Marina Oswald also complained that her husband was not able to provide more material things for her.
On that issue George De Mohrenschildt, who was probably as close to the Oswalds as anyone else during their first stay in Dallas,
said that, quote, She was annoying him all the time
Why don't you make some money? Poor guy was going out of his mind. We told her she should not annoy him -- poor guy, he is doing his best, "Don't annoy him so much."
The De Mohrenschildts also testified that, quote, right in front, end quote, of Oswald Marina Oswald complained about Oswald's inadequacy as a husband.
Mrs. Oswald told another of her friends that Oswald was very cold to her, that they very seldom had sexual relations
and that Oswald, quote, was not a man, end quote. She also told Mrs. Paine that she was not satisfied with her sexual relations with Oswald.
Marina Oswald also ridiculed her husband's political views, thereby tearing down his view of his own importance.
He was very much interested in autobiographical works of outstanding statesmen of the United States, to whom his wife thought he compared himself.
She said he was different from other people in, quote, At, least his imagination, his fantasy, which was quite unfounded,
as to the fact that he was an outstanding man, end quote.
She said that she, quote, always tried to point out to him that he was a man like any others who were around us. But he simply could not understand that? End quote.
Jeanne De Mohrenschildt, however, thought that Marina Oswald, quote, said things that will hurt men's pride, end quote.
She said that if she ever spoke to her husband the way Marina Oswald spoke to her husband, quote, we would not last long, end quote.
Mrs. De Mohrenschildt thought that Oswald,
whom she compared to, quote, a puppy dog that everybody kicked, end quote, had a lot of good qualities, in spite of the fact that, quote,
Nobody said anything good about him. End quote.
She had, quote, the impression that he was just pushed, pushed, pushed, and she Marina Oswald was probably nagging, nagging, nagging, end quote.
She thought that he might not have become involved in the assassination if people had been kinder to him.
In spite of these difficulties, however, and in the face of the economic problems that were always with them,
things apparently went quite smoothly from the time Oswald returned from Mexico until the weekend of November sixteen to seventeen, nineteen sixty-three.
Mrs. Paine was planning a birthday party for one of her children on that weekend and her husband, Michael, was to be at the house.
Marina Oswald said that she knew her husband did not like Michael Paine and so she asked him not to come out that weekend, even though he wanted to do so.
She testified that she told him, quote,
that he shouldn't come every week, that perhaps it is not convenient for Ruth that the whole family be there, live there, end quote.
She testified that he responded, quote, As you wish. If you don't want me to come, I won't, end quote.
Ruth Paine testified that she heard Marina Oswald tell Oswald about the birthday party.
On Sunday, November seventeen, nineteen sixty-three,
Ruth Paine and Marina Oswald decided to call Oswald at the place where he was living, unbeknownst to them, under the name of O. H. Lee.
They asked for Lee Oswald who was not called to the telephone because he was known by the other name.
When Oswald called the next day his wife became very angry about his use of the alias. He said that he used it because, quote,
he did not want his landlady to know his real name because she might read in the paper of the fact that he had been in Russia and that he had been questioned, end quote.
Oswald also said that he did not want the FBI to know where he lived, quote, Because their visits were not very pleasant for him
and he thought that he loses jobs because the FBI visits the place of his employment, end quote.
While the facts of his defection had become known in New Orleans as a result of his radio debate with Bringuier,
it would appear to be unlikely that his landlady in Dallas
would see anything in the newspaper about his defection, unless he engaged in activities similar to those
which had led to the disclosure of his defection in New Orleans.
Furthermore, even though it appears that at times Oswald was really upset by visits of the FBI,
it does not appear that he ever lost his job because of its activities, although he may well not have been aware of that fact.
While Oswald's concern about the FBI had some basis in fact, in that FBI agents had interviewed him in the past and had renewed their interest
to some extent after his Fair Play for Cuba Committee activities had become known, he exaggerated their concern for him.
Marina Oswald thought he did so in order to emphasize his importance.
For example, in his letter of November nine, nineteen sixty-three,
to the Soviet Embassy in Washington, he asked about the entrance visas for which he and his wife had previously applied.
He absolved the Soviet Embassy in Mexico City of any blame for his difficulties there. He advised the Washington Embassy
that the FBI was, quote, not now, end quote, interested in his Fair Play for Cuba Committee activities, but noted that the FBI, quote,
has visited us here in Dallas, Texas, on November one. Agent James P. Hasty
warned me that if I engaged in F.P.C.C. activities in Texas the F.B.I. will again take an interest in me, end quote.
Neither Hosty nor any other agent of the FBI spoke to Oswald on any subject from August ten, nineteen sixty-three,
to the time of the assassination.
The claimed warning was one more of Oswald's fabrications.
Hosty had come to the Paine residence on November one and five, nineteen sixty-three,
but did not issue any such warning or suggest that Marina Oswald defect from the Soviet Union and remain in the United States under FBI protection,
as Oswald went on to say. In Oswald's imagination, quote,
I and my wife strongly protested these tactics by the notorious F.B.I., end quote.
In fact, his wife testified that she only said that she would prefer not to receive any more visits from the Bureau
because of the, quote, very exciting and disturbing effect, end quote, they had upon her husband, who was not even present at that time.
The arguments he used to justify his use of the alias suggest that Oswald may have come to think that the whole world was becoming involved
in an increasingly complex conspiracy against him.
He may have felt he could never tell when the FBI was going to appear on the scene or who else was going to find out about his defection
and use it against him as had been done in New Orleans.
On the other hand, the concern he expressed about the FBI may have been just another story to support the objective he sought in his letter.
Those arguments, however, were not persuasive to Marina Oswald,
to whom, quote, it was nothing terrible if people were to find out that he had been in Russia, end quote.
After all, when will all your foolishness come to an end? All of these comedies. First one thing and then another. And now this fictitious name, end quote.
On Monday, November eighteen, nineteen sixty-three, he called several times, but after I hung up on him and didn't want to talk to him he did not call again.
He then arrived on Thursday, November twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three, end quote.
The events of that evening can best be appreciated through Marina Oswald's testimony
Question: Did your husband give any reason for coming home on Thursday?
Answer: He said that he was lonely because he hadn't come the preceding weekend, and he wanted to make his peace with me.
Question: Did you say anything to him then?
Answer: He tried to talk to me but I would not answer him, and he was very upset. Question: Were you upset with him?
Answer: I was angry, of course. He was not angry -- he was upset. I was angry. He tried very hard to please me.
He spent quite a bit of time putting away diapers and played with the children on the street.
Question: How did you indicate to him that you were angry with him? Answer: By not talking to him.
Question: And how did he show that he was upset?
He was upset over the fact that I would not answer him.
He tried to start a conversation with me several times, but I would not answer. And he said that he didn't want me to be angry at him because this upsets him.
On that day, he suggested that we rent an apartment in Dallas.
He said that he was tired of living alone and perhaps the reason for my being so angry was the fact that we were not living together.
That if I want to he would rent an apartment in Dallas tomorrow -- that he didn't want me to remain with Ruth any longer, but wanted me to live with him in Dallas.
He repeated this not once but several times, but I refused. And he said that once again I was preferring my friends to him, and that I didn't need him.
Question: What did you say to that?
Answer: I said it would be better if I remained with Ruth until the holidays, he would come, and we would all meet together.
That this was better because while he was living alone and I stayed with Ruth, we were spending less money. And I told him to buy me a washing machine, because two children
it became too difficult to wash by hand.
What did he say to that?
Answer: He said he would buy me a washing machine.
Question: What did you say to that? Answer:
Thank you. That it would be better if he bought something for himself -- that I would manage. End quote. That night Oswald went to bed before his wife retired.
She did not speak to him when she joined him there, although she thought that he was still awake.
The next morning he left for work before anyone else arose.
he left his wedding ring in a cup on the dresser in his room. He also left one hundred seventy dollars in a wallet in one of the dresser drawers.
He took with him thirteen dollars, eighty-seven cents and the long brown package that Frazier and Mrs. Randle saw him carry
and which he was to take to the School Book Depository. The Unanswered Questions.
No one will ever know what passed through Oswald's mind during the week before November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three.
Instead of returning to Irving on November fifteen for his customary weekend visit, he remained in Dallas at his wife's suggestion because of the birthday party.
He had argued with her over the use of an alias and had not called her after that argument, although he usually telephoned once or twice a day.
Then on Thursday morning, November twenty-one,
he asked Frazier for a ride to Irving that night, stating falsely that he wanted to pick up some curtain rods to put in an apartment.
He must have planned his attack at the very latest prior to Thursday morning when he spoke to Frazier.
There is, of course, no way to determine the degree to which he was committed to his plan at that time.
While there is no way to tell when he first began to think specifically of assassinating the President
it should be noted that mention of the Trade Mart as the expected site of the Presidential luncheon
appeared in The Dallas Times Herald on November fifteen, nineteen sixty-three.
The next day that paper announced the final approval of the Trade Mart as the luncheon site and stated that the motorcade, quote,
apparently will loop through the downtown area, probably on Main Street,
en route from Dallas Love Field, end quote, on its way to the Trade Mart on Stemmons Freeway.
Anyone who was familiar with that area of Dallas would have known that the motorcade would probably pass the Texas School Book Depository to get from Main Street
That fact was made precisely clear in subsequent news stories on November nineteen, twenty, and twenty-two.
On November fifteen, nineteen sixty-three, the same day that his wife told him not to come to Irving, Oswald could have assumed
that the Presidential motorcade would pass in front of his place of work.
Whether he thought about assassinating the President over the weekend can never be known, but it is reasonably certain
that over the weekend he did think about his wife's request that he not come to Irving, which was prompted by the birthday party being held at the Paine home.
Oswald had a highly exaggerated sense of his own importance, but he had failed at almost everything he had ever tried to do.
He had great difficulty in establishing meaningful relations with other people. Except for his family he was completely alone.
Even though he had searched -- in the Marine Corps, in his ideal of communism, in the Soviet Union and in his attempt to get to Cuba
he had never found anything to which he felt he could really belong.
After he returned from his trip to Mexico where his application to go to Cuba had been sharply rejected,
it must have appeared to him that he was unable to command even the attention of his family.
He could not keep them with him in Dallas, where at least he could see his children whom, several witnesses testified, he seemed to love.
His family lived with Mrs. Paine, ostensibly because Oswald could not afford to keep an apartment in Dallas,
but it was also, at least in part, because his wife did not want to live there with him.
Now it appeared that he was not welcome at the Paine home,
where he had spent every previous weekend since his return from Mexico and his wife was once again calling into question his judgment,
this time concerning his use of an alias.
The conversation on Monday, November eighteen, nineteen sixty-three,
ended when Marina Oswald hung up and refused to talk to him. Although he may long before have decided on the course he was to follow
and may have told his wife the things he did on the evening of November twenty-one,
nineteen sixty-three, merely to disarm her and to provide a justification of sorts,
both she and Mrs. Paine thought he had come home to make up after the fight on Monday.
Thoughts of his personal difficulties must have been at least partly on his mind when he went to Irving on Thursday night and told his wife that he was lonely,
that he wanted to make peace with her and bring his family to Dallas where they could live with him again.
The Commission does not believe that the relations between Oswald and his wife caused him to assassinate the President.
It is unlikely that the motivation was that simple.
The feelings of hostility and aggression which seem to have played such an important, part in Oswald's life
were part of his character long before he met his wife
and such a favorable opportunity to strike at a figure as great as the President would probably never have come to him again.
Oswald's behavior after the assassination throws little light on his motives.
The fact that he took so little money with him when he left Irving in the morning indicates that he did not expect to get very far from Dallas on his own
and suggests the possibility, as did his note to his wife just prior to the attempt on General Walker, that he did not expect to escape at all.
On the other hand, he could have traveled some distance with the money he did have and he did return to his room where he obtained his revolver.
He then killed Patrolman Tippit when that police officer apparently tried to question him after he had left his roominghouse and he vigorously resisted arrest
when he was finally apprehended in the Texas Theatre. Although it is not fully corroborated by others who were present,
two officers have testified that at the time of his arrest Oswald said something to the effect that, quote, it's all over now, end quote.
Oswald was overbearing and arrogant throughout much of the time between his arrest and his own death.
He consistently refused to admit involvement in the assassination or in the killing of Patrolman Tippit.
While he did become enraged at at least one point in his interrogation,
the testimony of the officers present indicates that he handled himself with considerable composure during his questioning.
He admitted nothing that would damage him but discussed other matters quite freely.
His denials under questioning, which have no probative value in view of the many readily demonstrable lies he told at that time
and in the face of the overwhelming evidence against him
which has been set forth above, only served to prolong the period during which he was the center of the attention of the entire world.
Many factors were undoubtedly involved in Oswald's motivation for the assassination, and the Commission does not believe
that it can ascribe to him any one motive or group of motives.
It is apparent, however, that Oswald was moved by an overriding hostility to his environment.
He does not appear to have been able to establish meaningful relationships with other people. He was perpetually discontented with the world around him.
Long before the assassination he expressed his hatred for American society and acted in protest against it.
Oswald's search for what he conceived to be the perfect society was doomed from the start.
He sought for himself a place in history -- a role as the "great man" who would be recognized as having been in advance of his times.
His commitment to Marxism and communism appears to have been another important factor in his motivation.
He also had demonstrated a capacity to act decisively and without regard to the consequences when such action would further his aims of the moment.
Out of these and the many other factors which may have molded the character of Lee Harvey Oswald
there emerged a man capable of assassinating President Kennedy.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By
The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter eight. The Protection of the President. Part one.
In the one hundred years since eighteen sixty-five
four Presidents of the United States have been assassinated
Abraham Lincoln, James A. Garfield, William McKinley, and John F. Kennedy.
During this same period there were three other attacks on the life of a President,
a President-elect, and a candidate for the Presidency, which narrowly failed:
on Theodore Roosevelt while campaigning in October of nineteen twelve; on President-elect Franklin Delano Roosevelt,
when visiting Miami on February fifteen, nineteen thirty-three; and on President Harry S. Truman on November one, nineteen fifty,
when his temporary residence, Blair House, was attacked by Puerto Rican Nationalists.
One out of every five Presidents since eighteen sixty-five has been assassinated;
there have been attempts on the lives of one out of every three.
Prompted by these dismaying statistics, the Commission has inquired into the problems and methods of Presidential protection in effect
at the time of President Kennedy's assassination.
This study has led the Commission to conclude that the public interest might be served by any contribution it can make to the improvement of protective arrangements.
The Commission has not undertaken a comprehensive examination of all facets of this subject;
rather, it has devoted its time and resources to those broader aspects of Presidential protection
to which the events of last November called attention.
In this part of its inquiry the Commission has had full access to a major study of all phases of protective activities
prepared by the Secret Service for the Secretary of the Treasury following the assassination. As a result of this study,
the Secretary of the Treasury has prepared a planning document dated August twenty-seven, nineteen sixty-four,
which recommends additional personnel and facilities to enable the Secret Service to expand its protection capabilities.
The Secretary of the Treasury submitted this planning document on August thirty-one, nineteen sixty-four,
to the Bureau of the Budget for review and approval.
This planning document has been made a part of the Commission's published record; the underlying staff and consultants' reports reviewed by the Commission have not,
since a disclosure of such detailed information relating to protective measures might undermine present methods of protecting the President.
However, all information considered by the Commission which pertains to the protective function as it was carried out in Dallas has been published as part of this report.
The protection of the President of the United States is an immensely difficult and complex task.
It is unlikely that measures can be devised to eliminate entirely the multitude of diverse dangers that may arise,
particularly when the President is traveling in this country or abroad.
The protective task is further complicated by the reluctance of Presidents to take security precautions which might interfere with the performance of their duties,
or their desire to have frequent and easy access to the people.
The adequacy of existing procedures can fairly be assessed only after full consideration of the difficulty of the protective assignment,
with particular attention to the diverse roles which the President is expected to fill.
After reviewing this aspect of the matter this chapter will set forth the Commission's conclusions
regarding certain protective measures in force at the time of the Dallas trip and propose recommendations for improvements.
The nature of the protective assignment.
The President is Head of State, Chief Executive, Commander in Chief, and leader of a political party.
As the ceremonial head of the Government the President must discharge a wide range of public duties, not only in Washington but throughout the land.
In this role he appears to the American people, in the words of William Howard Taft, as, quote,
the personal embodiment and representative of their dignity and majesty, end quote.
As Chief Executive, the President controls the exercise of the vast, almost incalculable powers of the executive branch of the Federal Government.
As Commander in Chief of the Armed Forces, he must maintain ultimate authority over the development and disposition of our military power.
in accordance with George Washington's maxim that Americans have a government, quote, of accommodation as well as a government of laws, end quote,
it is the President's right and duty to be the active leader of his party, as when he seeks to be reelected or to maintain his party in power.
In all of these roles the President must go to the people.
Exposure of the President to public view through travel among the people of this country is a great and historic tradition of American life.
Desired by both the President and the public, it is an indispensable means of communication between the two.
More often than not, Presidential journeys have served more than one purpose at the same time: ceremonial,
From George Washington to John F. Kennedy, such journeys have been a normal part of the President's activities.
To promote nationwide acceptance of his administration Washington made grand tours that served also to excite interest in the Presidency.
In recent years, Presidential journeys have been frequent and extensive,
partly because of the greater speed and comfort of travel and partly because of the greater demands made on the President.
It is now possible for Presidents to travel the length and breadth of a land far larger than the United States
in seventeen eighty-nine in less time than it took George Washington to travel from New York to Mount Vernon
or Thomas Jefferson from Washington to Monticello.
During his Presidency, Franklin D. Roosevelt made almost four hundred journeys and traveled more than three hundred fifty thousand miles.
Since nineteen forty-five, Roosevelt's successors have ranged the world,
and their foreign journeys have come to be accepted as normal rather than extraordinary.
John F. Kennedy's journey to Texas in November nineteen sixty-three was in this tradition.
His friend and Special Assistant Kenneth O'Donnell, who accompanied him on his last visit to Dallas,
stated the President's views of his responsibilities with simplicity and clarity, quote,
The President's views of his responsibilities as President of the United States were that he meet the people, that he go out to their homes and see them,
and allow them to see him, and discuss, if possible, the views of the world as he sees it, the problems of the country as he sees them.
And he felt that leaving Washington for the President of the United States was a most necessary -- not only for the people, but for the President himself,
that he expose himself to the actual basic problems that were disturbing the American people.
It helped him in his job here, he was able to come back here with a fresh view of many things.
I think he felt very strongly that the President ought to get out of Washington, and go meet the people on a regular basis. End quote.
Whatever their purposes Presidential journeys have greatly enlarged and complicated the task of protecting the President.
The Secret Service and the Federal, State, and local law enforcement agencies which cooperate with it,
have been confronted in recent years with increasingly difficult problems, created by the greater exposure of the President during his travels
and the greater diversity of the audiences he must face in a world torn by conflicting ideologies.
If the sole goal were to protect the life of the President, it could be accomplished with reasonable assurance despite the multiple roles he must play.
But his very position as representative of the people prevents him from effectively shielding himself from the people.
He cannot and will not take the precautions of a dictator or a sovereign.
Under our system, measures must be sought to afford security without impeding the President's performance of his many functions.
The protection of the President must be thorough but inconspicuous to avoid even the suggestion of a garrison state.
The rights of private individuals must not be infringed.
If the protective job is well done, its performance will be evident only in the unexceptional fact of its success.
The men in charge of protecting the President, confronted by complex problems and limited as they are in the measures they may employ,
must depend upon the utmost cooperation and understanding from the public and the President.
The problem and the reasonable approach to its solution were ably stated in a memorandum prepared by FBI Director J. Edgar Hoover
for the President soon after the assassination, quote,
The degree of security that can be afforded the President of the United States
is dependent to a considerable extent upon the degree of contact with the general public desired by the President.
Absolute security is neither practical nor possible. An approach to complete security would require the President
to operate in a sort of vacuum, isolated from the general public and behind impregnable barriers.
His travel would be in secret; his public appearances would be behind bulletproof glass. A more practical approach necessitates compromise.
Any travel, any contact with the general public, involves a calculated risk on the part of the President and the men responsible for his protection.
Such risks can be lessened when the President recognizes the security problem,
has confidence in the dedicated Secret Service men who are ready to lay down their lives for him
and accepts the necessary security precautions which they recommend.
Many Presidents have been understandably impatient with the security precautions which many years of experience dictate
because these precautions reduce the President's privacy and the access to him of the people of the country.
Nevertheless the procedures and advice should be accepted if the President wishes to have any security.
Evaluation Of Presidential Protection At The Time Of The Assassination Of President Kennedy
The history of Presidential protection shows growing recognition over the years that the job must be done by able, dedicated,
thoroughly professional personnel, using the best technical equipment that can be devised.
The assassination of President Kennedy demands an examination of the protective measures employed to safe guard him
and an inquiry whether improvements can be made which will reduce the risk of another such tragedy.
This section considers first the means used to locate potential sources of danger to the President in time to take appropriate precautions.
In this connection the information available to Federal agencies about Lee Harvey Oswald
is set out and the reasons why this information was not furnished to the Secret Service appraised.
Second, the adequacy of other advance preparations for the security of the President, during his visit to Dallas,
largely measures taken by the Secret Service, is considered.
Finally, the performance of those charged with the immediate responsibility of protecting the President on November twenty-two is reviewed.
Intelligence Functions Relating to Presidential Protection at the Time of the Dallas Trip
A basic element of Presidential protection
is the identification and elimination of possible sources of danger to the President before the danger becomes actual.
The Secret Service has attempted to perform this function through the activities of its Protective Research Section
and requests to other agencies, Federal and local, for useful information.
The Commission has concluded that at the time of the assassination
the arrangements relied upon by the Secret Service to perform this function were seriously deficient.
Adequacy of preventive intelligence operations of the Secret Service.
The main job of the Protective Research Section (PRS)
is to collect, process, and evaluate information about persons or groups who may be a danger to the President.
In addition to this function, PRS is responsible for such tasks
as obtaining clearance of some categories of White House employees and all tradesmen who service the White House,
the security processing of gifts sent to the President, and technical inspections against covert listening devices.
At the time of the assassination PRS was a very small group, comprised of twelve specialists and three clerks.
Many persons call themselves to the attention of PRS by attempting to visit, the President
for bizarre reasons or by writing or in some other way attempting to communicate with him in a threatening or abusive manner
Robert I. Bouck, special agent in charge of PRS,
estimated that most of the material received by his office originated in this fashion
or from the occasional investigations initiated by the Secret Service,
while the balance was furnished to PRS by other Federal agencies, with primary source being the FBI.
The total volume of information received by PRS has risen steadily.
In nineteen forty-three PRS received approximately nine thousand items of information;
in nineteen fifty-three this had increased to more than seventeen thousand items;
in nineteen sixty-three the total exceeded thirty-two thousand items.
Since many items may pertain to a single case, these figures do not show the caseload.
In the period from November nineteen sixty-one to November nineteen sixty-three,
PRS received items in eight thousand, seven hundred nine cases.
Before the assassination of President Kennedy,
PRS expressed its interest in receiving information on suspects in very general terms. For example,
PRS instructed the White House mailroom, a source of much PRS data,
to refer all communications on identified existing cases and, in addition,
any communication, quote, that in any way indicates anyone may have possible intention of harming the President, end quote.
Slightly more specific criteria were established for PRS personnel processing White House mail referred by the White House mailroom,
but again the standards were very general.
These instructions to PRS personnel appear to be the only instance where an effort was made to reduce the criteria to writing.
When requested to provide a specific statement of the standards employed by PRS in deciding what information to seek and retain,
The Secret Service responded, quote,
The criteria in effect prior to November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three, for determining whether to accept material for the PRS general files
were broad and flexible. All material is and was desired, accepted, and filed if it indicated or tended to indicate
that the safety of the President is or might be in danger, either at the present or in the future.
There are many actions, situations, and incidents that may indicate such potential danger. Some are specific, such as threats;
danger may be implied from others, such as membership or activity in an organization which believes in assassination as a political weapon.
All material received by PRS was separately screened
and a determination made as to whether the information might indicate possible harm to the President.
If the material was evaluated
as indicating some potential danger to the President -- no matter how small -- it was indexed in the general PRS files
under the name of the individual or group of individuals to whom that material related. End quote.
The general files of PRS consist of folders on individuals, card indexed by name.
The files are manually maintained, without use of any automatic data-processing techniques.
At the time of the assassination, the active PRS general files contained approximately fifty thousand cases
accumulated over a twenty-year period, some of which included more than one individual.
A case file was established if the information available suggested that the subject might be a danger to the President.
Many of these cases were not investigated by PRS.
The case file served merely as a repository for information until enough had accumulated to warrant an investigation.
During the period November nineteen sixty-one to November nineteen sixty-three,
PRS investigated thirty-four newly established or reactivated cases concerning residents of Texas.
Most of these cases involved persons who used threatening language in communications to or about the President.
An additional one hundred fifteen cases concerning Texas residents were established but not investigated.
When PRS learns of an individual whose conduct warrants scrutiny, it requests an investigation by the closest Secret Service field office,
of which there are sixty-five throughout the country.
If the field office determines that the case should be subject to continuing review, PRS establishes a file
which requires a checkup at least, every six months.
This might involve a personal interview or interviews with members of the person's household. Wherever possible,
the Secret Service arranges for the family and friends of the individual, and local law enforcement officials,
to advise the field office if the subject displays signs of increased danger or plans to leave his home area.
At the time of the assassination there were approximately four hundred persons throughout the country who were subject to periodic review.
If PRS concludes after investigation
that an individual presents a significant danger to the life of the President, his name is placed in a "trip index file"
which is maintained on a geographical field office basis.
At the time of the assassination the names of about one hundred persons were in this index, all of whom were included in the group of four hundred
PRS also maintains an album of photographs and descriptions of about twelve to fifteen individuals who are regarded as clear risks to the President
and who do not have a fixed place of residence. Members of the White House detail of the Secret Service have copies of this album.
Individuals who are regarded as dangerous to the President
and who are in penal or hospital custody are listed only in the general files of PRS,
but there is a system for the immediate notification of the Secret Service by the confining institution when a subject is released or escapes.
PRS attempts to eliminate serious risks by hospitalization or, where necessary,
the prosecution of persons who have committed an offense such as threatening the President.
In June nineteen sixty-four PRS had arrangements to be notified about the release or escape of approximately one thousand persons.
In summary, at the time of the assassination
PRS had received, over a twenty-year period, basic information on some fifty thousand cases;
it had arrangements to be notified about release from confinement in roughly one thousand cases;
it had established periodic regular review of the status of four hundred individuals;
it regarded approximately one hundred of these four hundred cases as serious risks
and twelve to fifteen of these cases as highly dangerous risks.
Members of the White House detail were expected to familiarize themselves with the descriptions and photographs of the highest risk cases.
The cases subject to periodic review and the one hundred or so cases in the higher risk category
were filed on a geographic basis, and could conveniently be reviewed by a Secret Service agent preparing for a Presidential trip
to a particular part of the country. These were the files reviewed by PRS on November eight, nineteen sixty-three,
at the request of Special Agent Lawson, advance agent for President Kennedy's trip to Dallas.
The general files of PRS were not indexed by geographic location and were of little use in preparing for a Presidential visit to a specific locality.
Secret Service requests to other agencies for intelligence information
were no more specific than the broad and general instructions its own agents and the White House mailroom.
The head of PRS testified that the Secret Service requested other agencies to provide, quote,
any and all information that they may come in contact with that would indicate danger to the President, end quote.
These requests were communicated in writing by the Secret Service; rather, the Service depended on the personal liaison maintained by PRS
with the headquarters of the Federal intelligence agencies, particularly the FBI,
and at the working level with personnel of the field offices of the various agencies. The Service frequently participated
in the training programs of other law enforcement agencies, and agents from other agencies attended the regular Secret Service training schools.
Presidential protection was an important topic in these training programs.
In the absence of more specific instructions, other Federal agencies interpreted the Secret Service's informal requests
to relate principally to overt threats to harm the President or other specific manifestations of hostility.
For example, at the time of the assassination, the FBI Handbook, which is in the possession of every Bureau special agent, provided, quote,
Threats against the President of the U.S.,
members of his immediate family, the President-elect, and the Vice-President. Investigation of threats against the President of the United States,
members of his immediate family, the President-Elect, and the Vice-President is within the exclusive jurisdiction of the U.S. Secret Service.
Any information indicating the possibility of an attempt against the person or safety of the President,
members of the immediate family of the President, the President-Elect or the Vice-President
must be referred immediately by the most expeditious means of communication to the nearest office of the U.S. Secret Service.
Advise the Bureau at the same time by teletype of the information so furnished to the Secret Service and the fact that it has been so disseminated.
The above action should be taken without delay in order to attempt to verify the information and no evaluation of the information should be attempted.
When the threat is in the form of a written communication, give a copy to local Secret Service and forward the original to the Bureau
where it will be made available to Secret Service headquarters in Washington.
The referral of the copy to local Secret Service should not delay the immediate referral of the information by the fastest available means of communication
to Secret Service locally, end quote.
The State Department advised the Secret Service of all crank and threat letter mail
or crank visitors and furnished reports concerning any assassination or attempted assassination of a ruler or other major official anywhere in the world.
The several military intelligence agencies reported crank mail and similar threats involving the President.
According to Special Agent in Charge Bouck,
the Secret Service had no standard procedure for the systematic review of its requests for and receipt of information from other Federal agencies.
The Commission believes that the facilities and procedures of the Protective Research Section of the Secret Service
prior to November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three, were inadequate.
Its efforts appear to have been too largely directed at the "crank" threat.
Although the Service recognized that its advance preventive measures must encompass more than these most obvious dangers,
it made little effort to identify factors in the activities of an individual
or an organized group, other than specific threats, which suggested a source of danger against which timely precautions could be taken.
Except for its special "trip index" file of four hundred names,
none of the cases in the PRS general files was available for systematic review on a geographic basis when the President planned a particular trip.
As reported in chapter two, when the special file was reviewed on November eight,
it contained the names of no persons from the entire Dallas-Fort Worth area,
notwithstanding the fact that Ambassador Stevenson had been abused by pickets in Dallas less than a month before.
Bouck explained the failure to try to identify the individuals involved in the Stevenson incident after it occurred on the ground that
PRS required a more direct indication of a threat to the President, and that there was no such indication until the President's scheduled visit to that area became known.
Such an approach seriously undermines the precautionary nature of PRS work;
if the presence in Dallas of the Stevenson pickets might have created a danger for the President on a visit to that city,
PRS should have investigated and been prepared to guard against it.
Other agencies occasionally provided information to the Secret Service concerning potentially dangerous political groups.
This was done in the case of the Nationalist Party of Puerto Rico, for example, but only after members of the group had resorted to political violence.
However, the vague requests for information which the Secret Service made
to Federal intelligence and law enforcement agencies were not well designed to elicit information from them
about persons other than those who were obvious threats to the President.
The requests shifted the responsibility for evaluating difficult cases from the Service, the agency most responsible for performing that task,
to the other agencies. No specific guidance was provided.
Although the CIA had on file requests from the Treasury Department for information on the counterfeiting of U.S. currency and certain smuggling matters,
it had no written specification of intelligence information collected by CIA abroad which was desired by the Secret Service
in advance of Presidential trips outside the United States.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter eight. The Protection of the President. Part two.
Information known about Lee Harvey Oswald prior to the assassination.
No information concerning Lee Harvey Oswald appeared in PRS files before the President's trip to Dallas.
Oswald was known to other Federal agencies with which the Secret Service maintained intelligence liaison.
The FBI had been interested in him, to some degree at least, since the time of his defection in October nineteen fifty-nine.
It had interviewed him twice shortly after his return to the United States, again a year later at his request
and was investigating him at the time of the assassination. The Commission has taken the testimony of Bureau agents
who interviewed Oswald after his return from the Soviet Union and prior to November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three,
the agent who was assigned his case at the time of the assassination, the Director of the FBI,
and the Assistant to the Director in charge of all investigative activities under the Director and Associate Director. In addition,
the Director and Deputy Director for Plans of the CIA testified concerning that Agency's limited knowledge of Oswald before the assassination.
Finally, the Commission has reviewed the complete files on Oswald, as they existed at the time of the assassination, of the Department of State,
the Office of Naval Intelligence, the FBI and the CIA. The information known to the FBI is summarized below.
From defection to return to Fort Worth.
The FBI opened a file on Oswald in October nineteen fifty-nine, when news reports appeared of his defection to the Soviet Union.
The file was opened, quote,
for the purpose of correlating information inasmuch as he was considered a possible security risk in the event he returned to this country, end quote.
Oswald's defection was also the occasion for the opening of files by the Department of State, CIA, and the Office of Naval Intelligence.
Until April nineteen sixty, FBI activity consisted of placing in Oswald's file
information regarding his relations with the U.S. Embassy in Moscow and background data relating largely to his prior military service,
In April nineteen sixty, Mrs. Marguerite Oswald and Robert Oswald were interviewed
in the course of a routine FBI investigation of transfers of small sums of money from Mrs. Oswald to her son in Russia.
During the next two years the FBI continued to accumulate information,
and kept itself informed on Oswald's status by periodic reviews of State Department and Office of Naval Intelligence files.
In this way, it learned that when Oswald had arrived in the Soviet Union
he had attempted to renounce his U.S. citizenship and applied for Soviet citizenship,
had described himself as a Marxist, had said he would give the Soviet Union any useful information he had acquired
as a marine radar technician and had displayed an arrogant and aggressive attitude at the U.S. Embassy;
it learned also that Oswald had been discharged from the Marine Corps Reserve as undesirable in August nineteen sixty.
In June nineteen sixty-two, the Bureau was advised by the Department of State of Oswald's plan to return to the United States.
The Bureau made arrangements to be advised by immigration authorities of his return,
and instructed the Dallas office to interview him when he got back to determine whether he had been recruited by a Soviet intelligence service.
Oswald's file at the Department of State Passport Office was reviewed in June nineteen sixty-two.
It revealed his letter of January thirty, nineteen sixty-two, to Secretary of the Navy Connally,
in which he protested his discharge and declared that he would use, quote, all means, end quote, to correct it.
The file reflected the Department's determination that Oswald had not expatriated himself.
From return to Fort Worth to move to New Orleans.
Oswald was first interviewed by FBI Agents John W. Fain and B. Tom Carter on June twenty-six, nineteen sixty-two,
Agent Fain reported to headquarters that Oswald was impatient and arrogant,
and unwilling to answer questions regarding his motive for going to the Soviet Union.
Oswald, quote, denied that he had ever denounced his U.S. citizenship, and that he had ever applied for Soviet citizenship specifically, end quote.
Oswald was, however, willing to discuss his contacts with Soviet authorities. He denied having any involvement with Soviet intelligence agencies
and promised to advise the FBI if he heard from them.
Agent Fain was not satisfied by this interview and arranged to see Oswald again on August sixteen, nineteen sixty-two.
According to Fain's contemporaneous memorandum and his present recollection,
while Oswald remained somewhat evasive at this interview, he was not antagonistic and seemed generally to be settling down.
Marina Oswald, however, recalled that her husband was upset by this interview.
Oswald again agreed to advise the FBI if he were approached under suspicious circumstances; however, he deprecated the possibility of this happening,
particularly since his employment did not involve any sensitive information.
Having concluded that Oswald was not a security risk or potentially dangerous or violent,
Fain determined that nothing further remained to be done at that time and recommended that the case be placed in a closed status.
This is an administrative classification indicating that no further work has been scheduled.
It does not preclude the agent in charge of the case from reopening it if he feels that further work should be done.
until March nineteen sixty-three, the FBI continued to accumulate information regarding Oswald but engaged in no active investigation.
Agent Fain retired from the FBI in October nineteen sixty-two, and the closed Oswald case was not reassigned.
However, pursuant to a regular Bureau practice of interviewing certain immigrants from Iron Curtain countries,
Fain had been assigned to see Marina Oswald at an appropriate time.
This assignment was given to Agent James P. Hosty, Jr. of the Dallas office upon Fain's retirement.
In March nineteen sixty-three, while attempting to locate Marina Oswald,
Agent Hosty was told by Mrs. M. F. Tobias, a former landlady of the Oswalds at six oh two Elsbeth Street in Dallas,
that other tenants had complained because Oswald was drinking to excess and beating his wife.
This information led Hosty to review Oswald's file, from which he learned that Oswald had become a subscriber to the Worker,
Hosty decided that the Lee Harvey Oswald case should be reopened because of the alleged personal difficulties and the contact with the Worker,
and his recommendation was accepted. He decided, however, not to interview Marina Oswald at that time, and merely determined
that the Oswalds were living at two one four Neely Street in Dallas.
On April twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three, the FBI field office in New York
was advised that Oswald was in contact with the Fair Play for Cuba Committee in New York, and that he had written to the committee
stating that he had distributed its pamphlets on the streets of Dallas. This information did not reach Agent Hosty in Dallas until June.
Hosty considered the information to be, quote, stale, unquote, by that time, and did not attempt to verify Oswald's reported statement.
Under a general Bureau request to be on the alert for activities of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee
Hosty had inquired earlier and found no evidence that it was functioning in the Dallas area.
In New Orleans. In the middle of May of nineteen sixty-three, Agent Hosty checked Oswald's last known residence and found that he had moved.
Oswald was tentatively located in New Orleans in June,
and Hosty asked the New Orleans FBI office to determine Oswald's address and what he was doing.
The New Orleans office investigated and located Oswald, learning his address and former place of employment on August five, nineteen sixty-three.
A confidential informant advised the FBI that Oswald was not known to be engaged in Communist Party activities in New Orleans.
On June twenty-four, Oswald applied in New Orleans for a passport, stating that he planned to depart by ship
for an extended tour of Western European countries, the Soviet Union, Finland, and Poland.
The Passport Office of the Department of State in Washington had no listing for Oswald requiring special treatment,
and his application was approved on the following day.
The FBI had not asked to be informed of any effort by Oswald to obtain a passport,
as it might have under existing procedures, and did not know of his application.
According to the Bureau, quote,
We did not request the State Department to include Oswald on a list which would have resulted in advising us of any application for a passport
inasmuch as the facts relating to Oswald's activities at that time did not warrant such action.
Our investigation of Oswald had disclosed no evidence that Oswald was acting under the instructions or on behalf of
any foreign government or instrumentality thereof. End quote.
On August nine, nineteen sixty-three,
Oswald was arrested and jailed by the New Orleans Police Department for disturbing the peace, in connection with a street fight which broke out when he was accosted
by anti-Castro Cubans while distributing leaflets on behalf of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
On the next day, he asked the New Orleans police to arrange for him to be interviewed by the FBI.
The police called the local FBI office and an agent, John L. Quigley, was sent to the police station.
Agent Quigley did not know of Oswald's prior FBI record when he interviewed him,
inasmuch as the police had not given Oswald's name to the Bureau when they called the office.
Quigley recalled that Oswald was receptive when questioned about his general background
but less than completely truthful or cooperative when interrogated about the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
When I began asking him specific details with respect to his activities in the Fair Play for Cuba Committee in New Orleans as to where meetings were held,
who was involved, what occurred, he was reticent to furnish information,
reluctant and actually as far as I was concerned, was completely evasive on them. End quote.
Oswald, quote, was probably making a self-serving statement in attempting to explain to me why he was distributing this literature, and for no other reason,
and when I got to questioning him further then he felt that his purpose had been served and he wouldn't say anything further, end quote.
During the interview Quigley obtained background information from Oswald which was inconsistent with information already in the Bureau's possession.
When Quigley returned to his office, he learned
that another Bureau agent, Milton R. Knack, had been conducting a background investigation of Oswald at the request of Agent Hosty in Dallas.
Quigley advised Knack of his interview and gave him a detailed memorandum.
Knack was aware of the facts known to the FBI and recognized Oswald's false statements.
For example, Oswald claimed that his wife's maiden name was Prossa
and that they had been married in Fort Worth and lived there until coming to New Orleans. He had told the New Orleans arresting officers that he had been born in Cuba.
Several days later, the Bureau received additional evidence that Oswald had lied to Agent Quigley.
On August twenty-two, it learned that Oswald had appeared on a radio discussion program on August twenty-one.
William Stuckey, who had appeared on the radio program with Oswald, told the Bureau on August thirty
that Oswald had told him that he had worked and been married in the Soviet Union.
Neither these discrepancies nor the fact that Oswald had initiated the FBI interview
was considered sufficiently unusual to necessitate another interview. Alan H. Belmont, Assistant to the Director of the FBI,
stated the Bureau's reasoning in this way, quote,
Our interest in this man at this point was to determine whether his activities constituted a threat to the internal security of the country.
It was apparent that he had made a self-serving statement to Agent Quigley. It became a matter of record in our files as a part of the case,
and if we determined that the course of the investigation required us to clarify or face him down with this information, we would do it at the appropriate time.
In other words, he committed no violation of the law by telling us something that wasn't true, and unless this required further investigation at that time,
we would handle it in due course, in accord with the whole context of the investigation. End quote.
On August twenty-one, nineteen sixty-three, Bureau headquarters instructed the New Orleans and Dallas field offices
to conduct an additional investigation of Oswald in view of the activities which had led to his arrest.
FBI informants in the New Orleans area, familiar with pro-Castro or Communist Party activity there,
advised the Bureau that Oswald was unknown in such circles.
In early September nineteen sixty-three
the FBI transferred the principal responsibility for the Oswald case from the Dallas office to the New Orleans office.
Soon after, on October one, nineteen sixty-three,
The FBI was advised by the rental agent for the Oswalds' apartment in New Orleans that they had moved again.
According to the information received by the Bureau
they had vacated their apartment, and Marina Oswald had departed with their child in a station wagon with Texas registration.
On October three, Hosty reopened the case in Dallas to assist the New Orleans office.
He checked in Oswald's old neighborhood and throughout the Dallas-Fort Worth area but was unable to locate Oswald.
The next word about Oswald's location was a communication from the CIA to the FBI on October ten,
advising that an individual tentatively identified as Oswald had been in touch with the Soviet Embassy in Mexico City
in early October of nineteen sixty-three.
The Bureau had no earlier information suggesting that Oswald had left the United States.
The possible contact with the Soviet Embassy in Mexico intensified the FBI's interest in learning Oswald's whereabouts.
The FBI representative in Mexico City arranged to follow up this information with the CIA and to verify Oswald's entry into Mexico.
The CIA message was sent also to the Department of State where it was reviewed by personnel of the Passport Office, who knew from Oswald's file
that he had sought and obtained a passport on June twenty-five, nineteen sixty-three.
The Department of State did not advise either the CIA or the FBI of these facts.
the New Orleans office of the FBI learned that in September Oswald had given a forwarding address of two five one five
West Fifth Street, Irving, Texas. After receiving this information on October twenty-nine, Agent Hosty attempted to locate Oswald.
On the same day Hosty interviewed neighbors on Fifth Street and learned that the address was that of Mrs. Ruth Paine.
He conducted a limited background investigation of the Paines, intending to interview Mrs. Paine and ask her particularly about Oswald's whereabouts.
Having determined that Mrs. Paine was a responsible and reliable citizen, Hosty interviewed her on November one.
The interview lasted about twenty to twenty-five minutes. In response to Hosty's inquiries, Mrs. Paine, quote,
readily admitted that Mrs. Marina Oswald and Lee Oswald's two children were staying with her.
She said that Lee Oswald was living somewhere in Dallas. She didn't know where. She said it was in the Oak Cliff area but she didn't have his address.
I asked her if she knew where he worked.
After a moment's hesitation, she told me that he worked at the Texas School Book Depository near the downtown area of Dallas.
She didn't have the exact address, and it is my recollection that we went to the phone book and looked it up,
found it to be four one one Elm  Street. End quote.
Mrs. Paine told Hosty also
that Oswald was living alone in Dallas because she did not want him staying at her house, although she was willing to let Oswald visit his wife and children.
According to Hosty, Mrs. Paine indicated that she thought she could find out where Oswald was living and would let him know.
At this point in the interview, Hosty gave Mrs. Paine his name and office telephone number on a piece of paper.
At the end of the interview, Marina Oswald came into the room. When he observed that she seemed, quote, quite alarmed, end quote, about the visit,
Hosty assured her, through Mrs. Paine as interpreter, that the FBI would not harm or harass her.
On November four, Hosty telephoned the Texas School Book Depository and learned that Oswald was working there
and that he had given as his address Mrs. Paine's residence in Irving.
Hosty took the necessary steps to have the Dallas office of the FBI, rather than the New Orleans office, reestablished as the office with principal responsibility.
On November five, Hosty was traveling near Mrs. Paine's home and took the occasion to stop by to ask whether she had any further information.
Mrs. Paine had nothing to add to what she had already told him, except that during a visit that past weekend,
Oswald had said that he was a, quote, Trotskyite Communist, end quote.
and that she found this and similar statements illogical and somewhat amusing. On this occasion Hosty was at the Paine residence for only a few minutes.
During neither interview did Hosty learn Oswald's address
or telephone number in Dallas. Mrs. Paine testified that she learned Oswald's telephone number at the Beckley Street roominghouse in the middle of October
shortly after Oswald rented the room on October fourteen.
As discussed in chapter six, she failed to report this to Agent Hosty
because she thought the FBI was in possession of a great deal of information and certainly would find it very easy to learn where Oswald was living.
Hosty did nothing further in connection with the Oswald case until after the assassination. On November one, nineteen sixty-three,
he had received a copy of the report of the New Orleans office which contained Agent Quigley's memorandum of the interview in the New Orleans jail on August ten,
and realized immediately that Oswald had given false biographic information. Hosty knew that he would eventually have to investigate this, and, quote,
was quite interested in determining the nature of his contact with the Soviet Embassy in Mexico City, end quote.
When asked what his next step would have been, Hosty replied, quote,
Well, as I had previously stated, I have between twenty-five and forty cases assigned to me at any one time. I had other matters to take care of.
I had now established that Lee Oswald was not employed in a sensitive industry.
I can now afford to wait until New Orleans forwarded the necessary papers to me to show me I now had all the information.
It was then my plan to interview Marina Oswald in detail concerning both herself and her husband's background. Question:
Had you planned any steps beyond that point?
Answer: No. I would have to wait until I had talked to Marina to see what I could determine, and from there I could make my plans.
Question: Did you take any action on this case between November five and November twenty-two? Answer: No, sir.
The official Bureau files confirm Hosty's statement that from November five until the assassination, no active investigation was conducted.
On November eighteen the FBI learned that Oswald recently had been in communication with the Soviet Embassy in Washington
and so advised the Dallas office in the ordinary course of business.
Hosty received this information on the afternoon of November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three.
Nonreferral of Oswald to the Secret Service.
The Commission has considered carefully the question whether the FBI,
in view of all the information concerning Oswald in its files, should have alerted the Secret Service to Oswald's presence in Dallas
prior to President Kennedy's visit.
The Secret Service and the FBI differ
as to whether Oswald fell within the category of, quote, threats against the President, end quote, which should be referred to the Service.
Robert I Bouck, special agent in charge of the Protective Research Section,
testified that the information available to the Federal Government about Oswald before the assassination would, if known to PRS,
have made Oswald a subject of concern to the Secret Service.
Bouck pointed to a number of characteristics besides Oswald's defection the cumulative effect of which would have been to alert the Secret Service
I would think his continued association with the Russian Embassy after his return,
his association with the Castro groups would have been of concern to us, a knowledge that he had, I believe,
been courtmartialed for illegal possession of a gun, of a handgun in the Marines,
that he had owned a weapon and did a good deal of hunting or use of it, perhaps in Russia, plus a number of items about his disposition and unreliability of character,
I think all of those, if we had them all together,
would have added up to pointing out a pretty bad individual, and I think that, together, had we known that he had a vantage point
would have seemed somewhat serious to us, even though I must admit, that none of these in themselves would be
would meet our specific criteria, none of them alone. But, it is when you begin adding them up to some degree that you begin to get criteria that, are meaningful.
End quote. Mr. Bouck pointed out, however, that he had no reason to believe that any one Federal agency had access to all this information,
including the significant fact that Oswald was employed in a building which overlooked the motorcade route.
Agent Hosty testified that he was fully aware of the pending Presidential visit to Dallas.
He recalled that the special agent in charge of the Dallas office of the FBI, J. Gordon Shanklin,
had discussed the President's visit on several occasions, including the regular biweekly conference on the morning of November twenty-two
Quote, Mr. Shanklin advised us, among other things,
that in view of the President's visit to Dallas, that if anyone had any indication of any possibility of any acts of violence or any demonstrations against the President,
or Vice President, to immediately notify the Secret Service and confirm it in writing.
He had made the same statement about a week prior at another special conference which we had held.
I don't recall the exact date. It was about a week prior. End quote.
In fact, Hosty participated in transmitting to the Secret Service two pieces of information pertaining to the visit.
Hosty testified that he did not know until the evening of Thursday, November twenty-one, that there was to be a motorcade, however,
and never realized that the motorcade would pass the Texas School Book Depository Building.
He testified that he did not read the newspaper story describing the motorcade route in detail, since he was interested only in the fact
that the motorcade was coming up Main Street, quote, where maybe I could watch it if I had a chance, end quote.
Even if he had recalled that Oswald's place of employment was on the President's route,
Hosty testified that he would not have cited him to the Secret Service as a potential threat to the President. Hosty interpreted his instructions as requiring, quote,
some indication that the person planned to take some action against the safety of the President of the United States or the Vice President. End quote.
In his opinion, none of the information in the FBI files -- Oswald's defection, his Fair Play for Cuba activities in New Orleans,
his lies to Agent Quigley, his recent visit to Mexico City -- indicated that Oswald was capable of violence.
Hosty's initial reaction on hearing that Oswald was a suspect in the assassination, was, quote, shock
complete surprise, end quote, because he had no reason to believe that Oswald, quote,
was capable or potentially an assassin of the President of the United States, end quote.
Shortly after Oswald was apprehended and identified, Hosty's superior sent him to observe the interrogation of Oswald.
Hosty parked his car in the basement of police headquarters and there met an acquaintance, Lt. Jack Revill of the Dallas police force.
The two men disagree about the conversation which took place between them.
They agree that Hosty told Revill
that the FBI had known about Oswald and, in particular, of his presence in Dallas and his employment at the Texas School Book Depository Building.
Revill testified that Hosty said also that the FBI had information that Oswald was, quote, capable of committing this assassination, end quote.
According to Revill, Hosty indicated that he was going to tell this to Lieutenant Wells of the homicide and robbery bureau.
Revill promptly made a memorandum of this conversation in which the quoted statement appears.
His secretary testified that she prepared such a report for him that afternoon and Chief of Police Jesse E. Curry
and District Attorney Henry M. Wade both testified that they saw it later that day.
Hosty has unequivocally denied, first by affidavit and then in his testimony before the Commission,
that he ever said that Oswald was capable of violence, or that he had any information suggesting this.
The only witness to the conversation was Dallas Police Detective V. J. Brian, who was accompanying Revill.
Brian did not hear Hosty make any statement concerning Oswald's capacity to be an assassin
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter eight. The Protection of the President. Part three.
Hosty's interpretation of the prevailing FBI instructions on referrals to the Secret Service was defended before the Commission by his superiors.
After summarizing the Bureau's investigative interest in Oswald prior to the assassination, J. Edgar Hoover concluded that, quote,
There was nothing up to the time of the assassination that gave any indication that this man was a dangerous character who might do harm to the President
or to the Vice President, end quote.
Director Hoover emphasized that the first indication of Oswald's capacity for violence
was his attempt on General Walker's life, which did not become known to the FBI until after the assassination.
Both Director Hoover and his assistant, Alan H. Belmont,
stressed also the decision by the Department of State that Oswald should be permitted to return to the United States.
Neither believed that the Bureau investigation of him up to November twenty-two revealed any information which would have justified referral to the Secret Service.
According to Belmont, when Oswald returned from the Soviet Union, quote,
he indicated that he had learned his lesson,
was disenchanted with Russia, and had a renewed concept -- I am paraphrasing, a renewed concept -- of the American free society.
We talked to him twice.
He likewise indicated he was disenchanted with Russia.
We satisfied ourselves that we had met our requirement, namely to find out whether he had been recruited by Soviet intelligence. The case was closed.
We again exhibited interest on the basis of these contacts with The Worker, Fair Play for Cuba Committee, which are relatively inconsequential.
His activities for the Fair Play for Cuba Committee in New Orleans, we knew, were not of real consequence as he was not connected with any organized activity there.
The interview with him in jail is not significant from the standpoint of whether he had a propensity for violence.
Question: This is the Quigley interview you are talking about?
Answer: Yes. It was a self-serving interview. The visits with the Soviet Embassy were evidently for the purpose of securing a visa,
and he had told us during one of the interviews that he would probably take his wife back to Soviet Russia some time in the future.
He had come back to Dallas. Hosty had established that he had a job, he was working,
and had told Mrs. Paine that when he got the money he was going to take an apartment, when the baby was old enough, he was going to take an apartment, and the family would live together.
He gave evidence of settling down.
Nowhere during the course of this investigation or the information that came to us from other agencies was there any indication of a potential for violence on his part.
Consequently, there was no basis for Hosty to go to Secret Service and advise them of Oswald's presence. End quote
As reflected in this testimony,
the officials of the FBI believed that there was no data in its files which gave warning that Oswald was a source of danger to President Kennedy.
While he had expressed hostility at times toward the State Department, the Marine Corps, and the FBI as agents of the Government,
so far as the FBI knew he had not shown any potential for violence.
Prior to November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three
no law enforcement agency had any information to connect Oswald with the attempted shooting of General Walker.
It was against this background and consistent with the criteria followed by the FBI prior to November twenty-two
that agents of the FBI in Dallas did not consider Oswald's presence in the Texas School Book Depository Building
overlooking the motorcade route as a source of danger to the President and did not inform the Secret Service of his employment in the Depository Building.
that the FBI took an unduly restrictive view of its responsibilities in preventive intelligence work, prior to the assassination.
The Commission appreciates the large volume of cases handled by the FBI
six hundred thirty-six thousand, three hundred seventy-one investigative matters during fiscal year nineteen sixty-three
There were no Secret Service criteria which specifically required the referral of Oswald's case to the Secret Service;
nor was there any requirement to report the names of defectors. However, there was much material in the hands of the FBI about Oswald:
the knowledge of his defection, his arrogance and hostility to the United States,
his pro-Castro tendencies, his lies when interrogated by the FBI,
his trip to Mexico where he was in contact with Soviet authorities,
his presence in the School Book Depository job and its location along the route of the motorcade.
All this does seem to amount to enough to have induced an alert agency, such as the FBI,
possessed of this information to list Oswald as a potential threat to the safety of the President.
This conclusion may be tinged with hindsight, but
it stated primarily to direct the thought of those responsible for the future safety of our Presidents to the need for a more imaginative
and less narrow interpretation of their responsibilities.
It is the conclusion of the Commission that, even in the absence of Secret Service criteria
which specifically required the referral of such a case as Oswald's to the Secret Service,
a more alert and carefully considered treatment of the Oswald case by the Bureau might have brought about such a referral.
Had such a review been undertaken by the FBI,
there might conceivably have been additional investigation of the Oswald case between November five and November twenty-two.
that several matters brought to his attention in late October and early November, including the visit to the Soviet Embassy in Mexico City,
Under proper procedures knowledge of the pending Presidential visit might have prompted Hosty
to have made more vigorous efforts to locate Oswald's roominghouse address in Dallas and to interview him regarding these unresolved matters.
The formal FBI instructions to its agents outlining the information to be referred to the Secret Service were too narrow at the time of the assassination.
While the Secret Service bears the principal responsibility for this failure,
the FBI instructions did not reflect fully the Secret Service's need for information regarding potential threats.
The handbook referred thus to, quote, the possibility of an attempt against the person or safety of the President, end quote.
It is clear from Hosty's testimony that this was construed, at least by him,
as requiring evidence of a plan or conspiracy to injure the President.
Efforts made by the Bureau since the assassination, on the other hand,
reflect keen awareness of the necessity of communicating a much wider range of intelligence information to the Service.
Most important, notwithstanding that both agencies have professed to the Commission that the liaison between them was close and fully sufficient,
the Commission does not believe that the liaison between the FBI and the Secret Service prior to the assassination was as effective as it should have been.
The FBI Manual of Instructions provided, quote, Liaison With Other Government Agencies
To insure adequate and effective liaison arrangements,
each SAC should specifically designate an Agent (or Agents) to be responsible for developing
and maintaining liaison with other Federal Agencies. This liaison should take into consideration
FBI-agency community of interests, location of agency head quarters, and the responsiveness of agency representatives.
In each instance, liaison contacts should be developed to include a close friendly relationship,
mutual understanding of FBI and agency jurisdictions, and an indicated willingness by the agency representative
to coordinate activities and to discuss problems of mutual interest.
Each field office should determine those Federal agencies which are represented locally and with which liaison should be conducted. End quote.
The testimony reveals that liaison responsibilities in connection with the President's visit
were discussed twice officially by the special agent in charge of the FBI office in Dallas. As discussed in chapter two,
some limited information was made available to the Secret Service. But there was no fully adequate liaison between the two agencies. Indeed,
the Commission believes that the liaison between all Federal agencies responsible for Presidential protection should be improved.
Other Protective Measures and Aspects of Secret Service Performance
The President's trip to Dallas called into play many standard operating procedures of the Secret Service in addition to its preventive intelligence operations.
Examination of these procedures shows that in most respects they were well conceived and ably executed by the personnel of the Service.
Against the background of the critical events of November twenty-two, however,
certain shortcomings and lapses from the high standards which the Commission believes should prevail in the field of Presidential protection are evident.
The advance preparations in Dallas by Agent Winston G. Lawson of the White House detail have been described in chapter two.
With the assistance of Agent in Charge Sorrels of the Dallas field office of the Secret Service,
Lawson was responsible for working out a great many arrangements for the President's trip.
The Service prefers to have two agents perform advance preparations.
In the case of Dallas, because President Kennedy had scheduled visits to five Texas cities
and had also scheduled visits to other parts of the country immediately before the Texas trip,
there were not enough men available to permit two agents to be assigned to all the advance work.
Agent Lawson did the advance work alone from November thirteen to November eighteen, when he was joined by Agent David B. Grant,
who had just completed advance work on the President's trip to Tampa.
The Commission concludes that the most significant advance arrangements for the President's trip were soundly planned.
In particular, the Commission believes that the motorcade route selected by Agent Lawson, upon the advice of Agent in Charge Sorrels
and with the concurrence of the Dallas police, was entirely appropriate, in view of the known desires of the President.
There were far safer routes via freeways directly to the Trade Mart,
but these routes would not have been in accordance with the White House staff instructions given the Secret Service for a desirable motorcade route.
Much of Lawson's time was taken with establishing adequate security over the motorcade route and at the two places where the President would stop,
Love Field and the Trade Mart.
by these Secret Service agents with the cooperation of the Dallas police and other local law enforcement agents, were carefully executed.
Since the President was to be at the Trade Mart longer than at any other location in Dallas and in view of the security hazards presented by the building,
the Secret Service correctly gave particular attention in the advance preparations to those arrangements.
The Commission also regards the security arrangements worked out by Lawson and Sorrels at Love Field as entirely adequate.
that the Secret Service has inadequately defined the responsibilities of its advance agents, who have been given broad discretion
to determine what matters require attention in making advance preparations and to decide what action to take.
Agent Lawson was not given written instructions concerning the Dallas trip or advice about any peculiar problems which it might involve;
all instructions from higher authority were communicated to him orally.
He did not have a checklist of the tasks he was expected to accomplish, either by his own efforts or with the cooperation of local authorities.
The only systematic supervision of the activities of the advance agent
has been that provided by a requirement that he file interim and final reports on each advance assignment.
The interim report must be in the hands of the agent supervising the protective group traveling with the President
long enough before his departure to apprise him of any particular problems encountered and the responsive action taken.
Agent Lawson's interim report was received by Agent Kellerman on November twenty, the day before departure on the Texas trip.
The Secret Service has advised the Commission that no unusual precautions were taken for the Dallas trip, and that, quote,
the precautions taken for the President's trip were the usual safeguards employed on trips of this kind in the United States during the previous year, end quote.
Special Agent in Charge Sorrels testified that the advance preparations followed on this occasion were, quote, pretty much the same, end quote,
as those followed in nineteen thirty-six during a trip to Dallas by President Roosevelt,
which was Sorrels' first important assignment in connection with Presidential work.
In view of the constant change in the nature of threats to the President and the diversity of the dangers which may arise in the various cities within the United States,
the Commission believes that standard procedures in use for many years and applied in all parts of the country may not be sufficient.
There is, for example, no Secret Service arrangement for evaluating before a trip particular difficulties that might be anticipated,
which would bring to bear the judgment and experience of members of the White House detail other than the advance agent.
Constant reevaluation of procedures, with attention to special problems and the development of instructions specific to particular trips
would be a desirable innovation.
Liaison with local law enforcement authorities.
In the description of the important aspects of the advance preparations,
there have been references to the numerous discussions between Secret Service representatives and the Dallas Police Department.
The wholehearted support of these local authorities was indispensable to the Service in carrying out its duties.
The Service had twenty-eight agents participating in the Dallas visit.
Agent Lawson's advance planning called for the deployment of almost six hundred members of the Dallas Police Department,
Fire Department, County Sheriff's Department, and the Texas Department of Public Safety.
Despite this dependence on local authorities, which would be substantially the same on a visit by the President to any large city,
the Secret Service did not at the time of the assassination have any established procedure governing its relationships with them.
It had no prepared checklist of matters to be covered with local police on such visits to metropolitan areas
and no written description of the role the local police were expected to perform.
Discussions with the Dallas authorities and requests made of them were entirely informal.
that a more formal statement of assigned responsibilities, supplemented in each case to reflect the peculiar conditions of each Presidential trip
is essential. This would help to eliminate varying interpretations of Secret Service instructions by different local law enforcement representatives. For example,
while the Secret Service representatives in Dallas
asked the police to station guards at each overpass to keep, quote, unauthorized personnel, end quote, off, this term was not defined.
At some overpasses all persons were excluded
while on the overpass overlooking the assassination scene railroad and yard terminal workmen were permitted to remain under police supervision,
as discussed in chapter three.
Assistant Chief Batchelor of the Dallas police noted the absence of any formal statement by the Secret Service of specific work assigned to the police
and suggested the desirability of such a statement.
Agent Lawson agreed that such a procedure would assist him and other agents in fulfilling their responsibilities as advance agents.
Check of buildings along route of motorcade.
Agent Lawson did not arrange for a prior inspection of buildings along the motorcade route,
either by police or by custodians of the buildings, since it was not the usual practice of the Secret Service to do so.
The Chief of the Service has provided the Commission a detailed explanation of this policy, quote,
Except for inauguration or other parades involving foreign dignitaries accompanied by the President in Washington,
it has not been the practice of the Secret Service to make surveys or checks of buildings along the route of a Presidential motorcade.
For the inauguration and certain other parades in Washington where the traditional route is known to the public long in advance of the event,
buildings along the route can be checked by teams of law enforcement officers, and armed guards are posted along the route as appropriate.
But on out-of-town trips where the route is decided on and made public only a few days in advance,
buildings are not checked either by Secret Service agents or by any other law enforcement officers at the request of the Secret Service.
With the number of men available to the Secret Service and the time available, surveys of hundreds of buildings and thousands of windows is not practical.
In Dallas the route selected necessarily involved passing through the principal downtown section between tall buildings.
While certain streets thought to be too narrow could be avoided and other choices made,
it was not practical to select a route where the President could not be seen from roofs or windows of buildings.
At the two places in Dallas where the President would remain for a period of time, Love Field and the Trade Mart,
arrangements were made for building and roof security by posting police officers where appropriate.
Similar arrangements for a motorcade of ten miles, including many blocks of tall commercial buildings is not practical.
Nor is it practical to prevent people from entering such buildings, or to limit access in every building to those employed or having business there.
Even if it were possible with a vastly larger force of security officers to do so, many observers have felt
that such a procedure would not be consistent with the nature and purpose of the motorcade to let the people see their President and to welcome him to their city.
In accordance with its regular procedures, no survey or other check was made by the Secret Service, or by any other law enforcement agency at its request,
of the Texas School Book Depository Building or those employed there prior to the time the President was shot. End quote.
This justification of the Secret Service's standing policy is not persuasive.
The danger from a concealed sniper on the Dallas trip was of concern to those who had considered the problem.
President Kennedy himself had mentioned it that morning, as had Agent Sorrels when he and Agent Lawson were fixing the motorcade route.
Admittedly, protective measures cannot ordinarily be taken with regard to all buildings along a motorcade route.
Levels of risk can be determined, however, as has been confirmed by building surveys made since the assassination for the Department of the Treasury.
An attempt to cover only the most obvious points of possible ambush along the route in Dallas might well have included the Texas School Book Depository Building.
Instead of such advance precautions, the Secret Service depended in part on the efforts of local law enforcement personnel stationed along the route.
In addition, Secret Service agents riding in the motorcade were trained to scan buildings as part of their general observation of the crowd of spectators.
These substitute measures were of limited value. Agent Lawson was unable to state whether he had actually instructed
the Dallas police to scan windows of buildings lining the motorcade route, although it was his usual practice to do so.
If such instructions were in fact given, they were not effectively carried out.
Television films taken of parts of the motorcade by a Dallas television station
show the foot patrolmen facing the passing motorcade, and not the adjacent crowds and buildings, as the procession passed.
Three officers from the Dallas Police Department were assigned to the intersection of Elm and Houston
during the morning of November twenty-two prior to the motorcade.
All received their instructions early in the morning from Capt. P. W. Lawrence of the traffic division.
According to Captain Lawrence, quote,
I then told the officers that their primary duty was traffic and crowd control and that they should be alert for any persons who might attempt to throw anything
and although it was not a violation of the law to carry a placard, that they were not to tolerate any actions such as the Stevenson incident
and arrest any person who might attempt to throw anything or try to get at the President and his party;
paying particular attention to the crowd for any unusual activity.
I stressed the fact that this was our President and he should be shown every respect due his position and that it was our duty to see that this was done.
End quote. Captain Lawrence was not instructed to have his men watch buildings along the motorcade route and did not mention the observation of buildings to them.
The three officers confirm that their primary concern was crowd and traffic control,
and that they had no opportunity to scan the windows of the Depository or any other building in the vicinity of Elm and Houston when the motorcade was passing.
They had, however, occasionally observed the windows of buildings in the area before the motorcade arrived, in accordance with their own understanding of their function.
As the motorcade approached Elm Street
there were several Secret Service agents in it who shared the responsibility of scanning the windows of nearby buildings.
Agent Sorrels, riding in the lead car, did observe the Texas School Book Depository Building as he passed by,
at least for a sufficient number of seconds to gain a, quote, general impression, end quote, of the lack of any unusual activity.
He was handicapped, however, by the fact that he was riding in a closed car whose roof at times obscured his view.
Lawson, also in the lead car, did not scan any buildings since an important part of his job was to look backward at the President's car.
Lawson stated that he, quote, was looking back a good deal of the time,
watching his car, watching the sides, watching the crowds, giving advice or asking advice from the Chief
and also looking ahead to the known hazards like overpasses, under-passes, railroads, et cetera, end quote.
Agent Roy H. Kellerman, riding in the front seat of the Presidential car,
stated that he scanned the Depository Building, but not sufficiently to be alerted by anything in the windows or on the roof.
The agents in the follow-up car also were expected to scan adjacent buildings.
However, the Commission does not believe that agents stationed in a car behind the Presidential car,
who must concentrate primarily on the possibility of threats from crowds along the route, provide a significant safeguard against dangers in nearby buildings.
Conduct of Secret Service agents in Fort Worth on November twenty-two.
In the early morning hours on November twenty-two, nineteen sixty-three,
in Fort Worth, there occurred a breach of discipline by some members of the Secret Service who were officially traveling with the President.
After the President had retired at his hotel,
nine agents who were off duty went to the nearby Fort Worth Press Club at midnight or slightly thereafter, expecting to obtain food;
they had little opportunity to eat during the day. No food was available at the Press Club.
All of the agents stayed for a drink of beer, or in several cases, a mixed drink.
According to their affidavits, the drinking in no case amounted to more than three glasses of beer or one and a half mixed drinks,
and others who were present say that no agent was inebriated or acted improperly.
The statements of the agents involved are supported by statements of members of the Fort Worth press who accompanied or observed them
and by a Secret Service investigation.
According to their statements, the agents remained at the Press Club for periods varying from thirty minutes to an hour and a half,
and the last agent left the Press Club by two a.m.
Two of the nine agents returned to their rooms. The seven others proceeded to an establishment called the Cellar Coffee House,
described by some as a beatnik place and by its manager as, quote, a unique showplace with continuous light entertainment all night
serving only coffee, fruit juices and no hard liquors or beer, end quote.
There is no indication that any of the agents who visited the Cellar Coffee House had any intoxicating drink at that establishment.
Most of the agents were there from about one:thirty or one:forty-five a.m. to about two:forty-five or three a.m.;
one agent was there from two until five a.m.
The lobby of the hotel and the areas adjacent to the quarters of the President were guarded during the night
by members of the midnight to eight a.m. shift of the White House detail.
These agents were each relieved for a half hour break during the night.
Three members of this shift separately took this opportunity to visit the Cellar Coffee House.
Only one stayed as long as a half hour, and none had any beverage there.
Chief Rowley testified that agents on duty in such a situation usually stay within the building during their relief,
but that their visits to the Cellar were, quote, neither consistent nor inconsistent, end quote, with their duty.
Each of the agents who visited the Press Club or the Cellar Coffee House (apart from the three members of the midnight shift)
had duty assignments beginning no later than eight a.m. that morning.
President Kennedy was scheduled to speak across the street from his hotel in Fort Worth at eight:thirty a.m.
and then at a breakfast, after which the entourage would proceed to Dallas.
In Dallas, one of the nine agents was assigned to assist in security measures at Love Field, and four had protective assignments at the Trade Mart.
The remaining four had key responsibilities as members of the complement of the follow-up car in the motorcade.
Three of these agents occupied positions on the running boards of the car, and the fourth was seated in the car.
The supervisor of each of the off-duty agents who visited the Press Club or the Cellar Coffee House
advised, in the course of the Secret Service investigation of these events, that each agent reported for duty on time,
with full possession of his mental and physical capabilities and entirely ready for the performance of his assigned duties. Chief Rowley testified that,
as a result of the investigation he ordered, he was satisfied that each of the agents performed his duties in an entirely satisfactory manner
and that their conduct the night before did not impede their actions on duty
or in the slightest way prevent them from taking any action that might have averted the tragedy.
However, Chief Rowley did not condone the action of the off-duty agents, particularly since it violated a regulation of the Secret Service,
which provides, quote, Liquor, use of
a. Employees are strictly enjoined to refrain from the use of intoxicating liquor
during the hours they are officially employed at their post of duty, or when they may reasonably expect that they may be called upon to perform an official duty.
During entire periods of travel status,
the special agent is officially employed and should not use liquor, until the completion of all of his official duties for the day,
after which time a very moderate use of liquor will not be considered a violation. However, all members of the White House Detail
and special agents cooperating with them on Presidential and similar protective assignments are considered to be subject to call for official duty
at any time while in travel status.
Therefore, the use of intoxicating liquor of any kind, including beer and wine, by members of the White House Detail
and special agents cooperating with them, or by special agents on similar assignments, while they are in a travel status, is prohibited. End quote.
The regulations provide further that, quote, violation or slight disregard, end quote, of these provisions, quote,
will be cause for removal from the Service, end quote.
that under ordinary circumstances he would have taken disciplinary action against those agents who had been drinking in clear violation of the regulation.
However, he felt that any disciplinary action might have given rise
to an inference that the violation of the regulation had contributed to the tragic events of November twenty-two.
Since he was convinced that this was not the case, he believed that it would be unfair to the agents and their families to take explicit disciplinary measures.
He felt that each agent recognized the seriousness of the infraction and that there was no danger of a repetition.
The Commission recognizes that the responsibilities of members of the White House detail of the Secret Service are arduous.
They work long, hard hours, under very great strain, and must travel frequently.
It might seem harsh to circumscribe their opportunities for relaxation.
Yet their role of protecting the President is so important to the well-being of the country
that it is reasonable to expect them to meet very high standards of personal conduct,
so that nothing can interfere with their bringing to their task the finest qualities and maximum resources of mind and body.
This is the salutary goal to which the Secret Service regulation is directed,
when it absolutely forbids drinking by any agent accompanying the President on a trip.
Nor is this goal served when agents remain out until early morning hours, and lose the opportunity to get a reasonable amount of sleep.
It is conceivable that those men who had little sleep, and who had consumed alcoholic beverages, even in limited quantities,
might have been more alert in the Dallas motorcade if they had retired promptly in Fort Worth.
However, there is no evidence that these men failed to take any action in Dallas within their power that would have averted the tragedy.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter eight. The Protection of the President. Part four.
Rigorous security precautions had been arranged at Love Field with the local law enforcement authorities by Agents Sorrels and Lawson.
These precautions included reserving a ceremonial area for the Presidential party,
stationing police on the rooftops of all buildings overlooking the reception area,
and detailing police in civilian clothes to be scattered throughout the sizable crowd.
When President and Mrs. Kennedy shook hands with members of the public along the fences surrounding the reception area, they were closely guarded by Secret Service agents
who responded to the unplanned event with dispatch.
As described in chapter two, the President directed that his car stop on two occasions during the motorcade so that he could greet members of the public.
At these stops, agents from the Presidential follow-up car stood between the President and the public,
and on one occasion Agent Kellerman left the front seat of the President's car to take a similar position.
The Commission regards such impromptu stops as presenting an unnecessary danger,
but finds that the Secret Service agents did all that could have been done to take protective measures.
The limousine used by President Kennedy in Dallas was a convertible with a detachable, rigid plastic "bubble" top
which was neither bulletproof nor bullet resistant.
The last Presidential vehicle with any protection against small-arms fire left the White House in nineteen fifty-three.
It was not then replaced because the state of the art did not permit the development of a bulletproof top of sufficiently light weight
to permit its removal on those occasions when the President wished to ride in an open car.
The Secret Service believed that it was very doubtful that any President would ride regularly in a vehicle with a fixed top, even though transparent.
Since the assassination, the Secret Service, with the assistance of other Federal agencies and of private industry,
has developed a vehicle for the better protection of the President.
Access to passenger compartment of Presidential car.
On occasion the Secret Service has been permitted to have an agent riding in the passenger compartment with the President.
Presidents have made it clear, however, that they did not favor this or any other arrangement which interferes with the privacy of the President and his guests.
The Secret Service has therefore suggested this practice only on extraordinary occasions.
Without attempting to prescribe or recommend specific measures which should be employed for the future protection of Presidents,
the Commission does believe that there are aspects of the protective measures employed in the motorcade at Dallas which deserve special comment.
The Presidential vehicle in use in Dallas, described in chapter two,
had no special design or equipment which would have permitted the Secret Service agent riding in the driver's compartment
to move into the passenger section without hindrance or delay. Had the vehicle been so designed it is possible that an agent riding in the front seat
could have reached the President in time to protect him from the second and fatal shot to hit the President.
However, such access to the President was interfered with both by the metal bar some fifteen inches above the back of the front seat
and by the passengers in the jump seats.
In contrast, the Vice Presidential vehicle, although not specially designed for that purpose,
had no passenger in a jump seat between Agent Youngblood and Vice President Johnson to interfere with Agent Youngblood's ability
to take a protective position in the passenger compartment before the third shot was fired.
The assassination suggests that it would have been of prime importance
in the protection of the President if the Presidential car permitted immediate access to the President by a Secret Service agent at the first sign of danger.
At that time the agents on the framing boards of the follow-up car were expected to perform such a function.
However, these agents could not reach the President's car when it was traveling at an appreciable rate of speed.
Even if the car is traveling more slowly, the delay involved in reaching the President may be crucial.
It is clear that at the time of the shots in Dallas, Agent Clinton J. Hill leaped to the President's rescue as quickly as humanly possible.
Even so, analysis of the motion picture films taken by amateur photographer Zapruder
reveals that Hill first placed his hand on the Presidential car at frame three forty-three, thirty frames
and therefore approximately one point six seconds after the President was shot in the head.
About three point seven seconds after the President received this wound,
Hill had both feet on the car and was climbing aboard to assist President and Mrs. Kennedy.
In response to inquiry by the Commission regarding the instructions to agents in a motorcade
of emergency procedures to be taken in a contingency such as that which actually occurred, the Secret Service responded, quote,
The Secret Service has consistently followed two general principles in emergencies involving the President.
All agents are so instructed.
The first duty of the agents in the motorcade is to attempt to cover the President as closely as possible and practicable
and to shield him by attempting to place themselves between the President and any source of danger.
Secondly, agents are instructed to remove the President as quickly as possible from known or impending danger.
Agents are instructed that it is not their responsibility to investigate or evaluate a present danger,
but to consider any untoward circumstances as serious and to afford the President maximum protection at all times.
No responsibility rests upon those agents near the President for the identification or arrest of any assassin or an attacker.
Their primary responsibility is to stay with and protect the President.
Beyond these two principles the Secret Service believes a detailed contingency or emergency plan is not feasible
because the variations possible preclude effective planning.
A number of steps are taken, however, to permit appropriate steps to be taken in an emergency.
For instance, the lead car always is manned by Secret Service agents familiar with the area and with local law enforcement officials;
the radio net in use in motorcades is elaborate and permits a number of different means of communication with various local points.
A doctor is in the motorcade.
This basic approach to the problem of planning for emergencies is sound.
Any effort to prepare detailed contingency plans might well have the undesirable effect of inhibiting quick and imaginative responses.
If the advance preparation is thorough, and the protective devices and techniques employed are sound,
those in command should be able to direct the response appropriate to the emergency. The Commission finds that the Secret Service agents in the motorcade
who were immediately responsible for the President's safety reacted promptly at the time the shots were fired.
Their actions demonstrate that the President and the Nation can expect courage and devotion to duty from the agents of the Secret Service.
The Commission's review of the provisions for Presidential protection at the time of President Kennedy's trip to Dallas demonstrates the need for substantial improvements.
Since the assassination, the Secret Service and the Department of the Treasury
have properly taken the initiative in reexamining major aspects of Presidential protection.
Many changes have already been made and others are contemplated, some of them in response to the Commission's questions and informal suggestions.
There was no Federal criminal jurisdiction over the assassination of President Kennedy.
Had there been reason to believe that the assassination was the result of a conspiracy, Federal jurisdiction could have been asserted;
it has long been a Federal crime to conspire to injure any Federal officer, on account of, or while he is engaged in, the lawful discharge of the duties of his office.
Murder of the President has never been covered by Federal law, however, so that once it became reasonably clear that the killing was the act of a single person,
the State of Texas had exclusive jurisdiction.
It is anomalous that Congress has legislated in other ways touching upon the safety of the Chief Executive or other Federal officers,
without making an attack on the President a crime. Threatening harm to the President is a Federal offense,
as is advocacy of the overthrow of the Government by the assassination of any of its officers.
The murder of Federal judges, U.S. attorneys and marshals, and a number of other specifically designated
Federal law enforcement officers is a Federal crime.
Equally anomalous are statutory provisions which specifically authorize the Secret Service to protect the President,
without authorizing it to arrest anyone who harms him. The same provisions authorize the Service to arrest without warrant
persons committing certain offenses, including counterfeiting and certain frauds involving Federal checks or securities.
The Commission agrees with the Secret Service that it should be authorized to make arrests without warrant
for all offenses within its jurisdiction, as are FBI agents and Federal marshals.
There have been a number of efforts to make assassination a Federal crime, particularly after the assassination of President McKinley
and the attempt on the life of President-elect Franklin D. Roosevelt.
In nineteen oh two bills passed both Houses of Congress but failed of enactment when the Senate refused to accept the conference report.
A number of bills were introduced immediately following the assassination of President Kennedy.
The Commission recommends to the Congress that it adopt legislation which would:
Punish the murder or manslaughter of, attempt or conspiracy to murder, kidnaping of and assault upon
the President, Vice President, or other officer next in the order of succession to the Office of President, the President-elect and the Vice-President-elect,
whether or not the act is committed while the victim is in the performance of his official duties or on account of such performance.
Such a statute would cover the President and Vice President or, in the absence of a Vice President, the person next in order of succession.
During the period between election and inauguration, the President-elect and Vice-President-elect would also be covered.
Restricting the coverage in this way would avoid unnecessary controversy over the inclusion or exclusion of other officials who are in the order of succession
or who hold important governmental posts.
In addition, the restriction would probably eliminate a need for the requirement which has been urged as necessary for the exercise of Federal power,
that the hostile act occur while the victim is engaged in or because of the performance of official duties.
The governmental consequences of assassination of one of the specified officials give the United States ample power to act for its own protection.
The activities of the victim at the time an assassination occurs and the motive for the assassination
bear no relationship to the injury to the United States which follows from the act.
This point was ably made in the nineteen oh two debate by Senator George F. Hoar, the sponsor of the Senate bill, quote,
what this bill means to punish is the crime of interruption of the Government of the United States and the destruction of its security by striking down the life
of the person who is actually in the exercise of the executive power, or
of such persons as have been constitutionally and lawfully provided to succeed thereto in case of a vacancy. It is important to this country
that the interruption shall not take place for an hour, end quote.
Enactment of this statute would mean that the investigation of any of the acts covered and of the possibility of a further attempt
would be conducted by Federal law enforcement officials, in particular, the FBI with the assistance of the Secret Service.
At present, Federal agencies participate only upon the sufferance of the local authorities.
While the police work of the Dallas authorities in the early identification and apprehension of Oswald was both efficient and prompt,
FBI Director J. Edgar Hoover, who strongly supports such legislation, testified that the absence of clear Federal jurisdiction
over the assassination of President Kennedy led to embarrassment and confusion in the subsequent investigation by Federal and local authorities.
In addition, the proposed legislation will insure
that any suspects who are arrested will be Federal prisoners, subject to Federal protection from vigilante justice and other threats.
Committee of Cabinet Officers. As our Government has become more complex,
agencies other than the Secret Service have become involved in phases of the overall problem of protecting our national leaders.
The FBI is the major domestic investigating agency of the United States,
while the CIA has the primary responsibility for collecting intelligence overseas to supplement information acquired by the Department of State.
The Secret Service must rely in large part
The Commission believes that it is necessary to improve the cooperation among these agencies
and to emphasize that the task of Presidential protection is one of broad national concern.
The Commission suggests that consideration might be given to assigning to a Cabinet-level committee or the National Security Council
(which is responsible for advising the President respecting the coordination
of departmental policies relating to the national security) the responsibility to review and oversee the protective activities of the Secret Service
and the other Federal agencies that assist in safeguarding the President. The Committee should include the Secretary of the Treasury and the Attorney General,
and, if the Council is used, arrangements should be made for the attendance of the Secretary of the Treasury
and the Attorney General at any meetings which are concerned with Presidential protection.
The Council already includes, in addition to the President and Vice President, the Secretaries of State and Defense and has a competent staff.
The foremost assignment of the Committee would be to insure that the maximum resources of the Federal Government are fully engaged in the job of protecting the President,
by defining responsibilities clearly and overseeing their execution.
Major needs of personnel or other resources might be met more easily on its recommendation than they have been in the past.
The Committee would be able to provide guidance in defining the general nature of domestic and foreign dangers to Presidential security.
As improvements are recommended for the advance detection of potential threats to the President, it could act as a final review board.
The expert assistance and resources which it could draw upon would be particularly desirable in this complex and sensitive area.
This arrangement would provide a continuing high-level contact for agencies that may wish to consult respecting particular protective measures.
For various reasons the Secret Service has functioned largely as an informal part of the White House staff, with the result
that it has been unable, as a practical matter, to exercise sufficient influence over the security precautions which surround Presidential activities.
A Cabinet-level committee which is actively concerned with these problems would be able to discuss these matters more effectively with the President.
The assignment of the responsibility of protecting the President to an agency of the Department of the Treasury was largely an historical accident.
The Secret Service was organized as a division of the Department of the Treasury in eighteen sixty-five, to deal with counterfeiting.
while investigating a plot to assassinate President Cleveland, the Service assigned a small protective detail of agents to the White House.
Secret Service men accompanied the President and his family to their vacation home in Massachusetts
and special details protected him in Washington, on trips, and at special functions.
These informal and part-time arrangements led to more systematic protection in nineteen oh two, after the assassination of President McKinley;
the Secret Service, then the only Federal investigative agency, assumed full-time responsibility for the safety of the President.
Since that time, the Secret Service has had and exercised responsibility for the physical protection of the President
and also for the preventive investigation of potential threats against the President.
Although the Secret Service has had the primary responsibility for the protection of the President,
the FBI, which was established within the Department of Justice in nineteen oh eight, has had in recent years an increasingly important role to play.
In the appropriations of the FBI there has recurred annually an item for the, quote, protection of the person of the President of the United States, end quote,
which first appeared in the appropriation of the Department of Justice in nineteen ten under the heading, quote, Miscellaneous Objects, end quote.
Although the FBI is not charged with the physical protection of the President, it does have an assignment, as do other Government agencies,
in the field of preventive investigation in regard to the President's security.
As discussed above, the Bureau has attempted to meet its responsibilities in this field by spelling out in its Handbook
the procedures which its agents are to follow in connection with information received, quote,
indicating the possibility of an attempt against the person or safety of the President, end quote, or other protected persons.
With two Federal agencies operating in the same general field of preventive investigation,
questions inevitably arise as to the scope of each agency's authority and responsibility.
As the testimony of J. Edgar Hoover and other Bureau officials revealed, the FBI did not believe that its directive required the Bureau
to notify the Secret Service of the substantial information about Lee Harvey Oswald which the FBI had accumulated
before the President reached Dallas.
On the other hand, the Secret Service had no knowledge whatever of Oswald, his background, or his employment at the Book Depository,
and Robert I. Bouck, who was in charge of the Protective Research Section of the Secret Service, believed that the accumulation of the facts known to the FBI
should have constituted a sufficient basis to warn the Secret Service of the Oswald risk.
The Commission believes that both the FBI and the Secret Service have too narrowly construed their respective responsibilities.
The Commission has the impression
that too much emphasis is placed by both on the investigation of specific threats by individuals and not enough on dangers from other sources.
In addition, the Commission has concluded that the Secret Service particularly tends to be the passive recipient of information
regarding such threats and that its Protective Research Section is not adequately staffed or equipped
to conduct the wider investigative work that is required today for the security of the President.
During the period the Commission was giving thought to this situation,
the Commission received a number of proposals designed to improve current arrangements for protecting the President.
These proposals included suggestions to locate exclusive responsibility for all phases of the work
in one or another Government agency, to clarify the division of authority between the agencies involved, and to retain the existing system
but expand both the scope and the operations of the existing agencies, particularly those of the Secret Service and the FBI.
It has been pointed out that the FBI, as our chief investigative agency,
is properly manned and equipped to carry on extensive information gathering functions within the United States.
It was also suggested that it would take a substantial period of time for the Secret Service to build up the experience and skills necessary to meet the problem.
Consequently the suggestion has been made, on the one hand, that all preventive investigative functions relating to the security of the President
should be transferred to the FBI,
leaving with the Secret Service only the responsibility for the physical protection of the President, that is, the guarding function alone.
On the other hand, it is urged that all features of the protection of the President and his family should be committed to an elite and independent corps.
It is also contended that the agents should be intimately associated with the life of the Presidential family
in all its ramifications and alert to every danger that might befall it,
and ready at any instant to hazard great danger to themselves in the performance of their tremendous responsibility.
It is suggested that an organization shorn of its power to investigate all the possibilities of danger to the President
and becoming merely the recipient of information gathered by others would become limited solely to acts of physical alertness and personal courage
So circumscribed, it could not maintain the esprit de corps or the necessary alertness for this unique and challenging responsibility.
While in accordance with its mandate
this Commission has necessarily examined into the functioning of the various Federal agencies concerned with the tragic trip of President Kennedy to Dallas
and while it has arrived at certain conclusions in respect thereto, it seems clear
that it was not within the Commission's responsibility to make specific recommendations as to the long-range organization of the President's protection,
except as conclusions flowing directly from its examination of the President's assassination can be drawn.
The Commission was not asked to apply itself as did the Hoover Commission in nineteen forty-nine,
for examples to a determination of the optimum organization of the President's protection.
It would have been necessary for the Commission to take considerable testimony, much of it extraneous to the facts of the assassination of President Kennedy,
to put it in a position to reach final conclusions in this respect.
There are always dangers of divided responsibility,
duplication, and confusion of authority where more than one agency is operating in the same field; but on the other hand
the protection of the President is in a real sense a Government-wide responsibility which must necessarily assumed by the Department of State,
the FBI, the CIA, and the military intelligence agencies as well as the Secret Service.
Moreover, a number of imponderable questions have to be weighed if any change in the intimate association now established
between the Secret Service and the President and his family is contemplated.
These considerations have induced the Commission to believe
that the determination of whether or not there should be a relocation of responsibilities and functions should be left to the Executive and the Congress,
perhaps upon recommendations based on further studies by the Cabinet-level committee recommended above or the National Security Council.
Pending any such determination, however, this Commission is convinced of the necessity of better coordination
and direction of the activities of all existing agencies of Government which are in a position to and do, furnish information
and services related to the security of the President.
The Commission feels the Secret Service and the FBI, as well as the State Department and the CIA when the President travels abroad,
could improve their existing capacities and procedures so as to lessen the chances of assassination.
Without, therefore, coming to final conclusions respecting the long-range organization of the President's security,
the Commission believes that the facts of the assassination of President Kennedy point to certain measures which,
while assuming no radical relocation of responsibilities,
can and should be recommended by this Commission in the interest of the more efficient protection of the President.
For more information, or to volunteer, please visit librivox dot org. Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter eight. The Protection of the President. Part five.
General Supervision of the Secret Service
The intimacy of the Secret Service's relationship to the White House
and the dissimilarity of its protective functions to most activities of the Department of the Treasury
have made it difficult for the Treasury to maintain close and continuing supervision.
The Commission believes that the recommended Cabinet-level committee will help to correct many of the major deficiencies of supervision
disclosed by the Commission's investigation. Other measures should be taken as well to improve the overall operation of the Secret Service.
Daily supervision of the operations of the Secret Service within the Department of the Treasury should be improved.
The Chief of the Service now reports to the Secretary of the Treasury
through an Assistant Secretary whose duties also include the direct supervision of the Bureau of the Mint
and the Department's Employment Policy Program, and who also represents the Secretary of the Treasury on various committees and groups.
The incumbent has no technical qualifications in the area of Presidential protection.
The Commission recommends that the Secretary of the Treasury appoint a special assistant with the responsibility of supervising the Service.
This special assistant should be required to have sufficient stature and experience in law enforcement, intelligence, or allied fields
to be able to provide effective continuing supervision
and to keep the Secretary fully informed regarding all significant developments relating to Presidential protection.
This report has already pointed out several respects
in which the Commission believes that the Secret Service has operated with insufficient planning or control.
Actions by the Service since the assassination indicate its awareness of the necessity for substantial improvement in its administration.
A formal and thorough description of the responsibilities of the advance agent is now in preparation by the Service.
toward the preparation of formal understandings of the respective roles of the Secret Service and other agencies with which it collaborates
or from which it derives assistance and support.
The Commission urges that the Service continue this effort to overhaul and define its procedures.
While manuals and memoranda are no guarantee of effective operations,
no sizable organization can achieve efficiency without the careful analysis and demarcation of responsibility
that is reflected in definite and comprehensive operating procedures.
that the Secret Service consciously set about the task of inculcating and maintaining the highest standard of excellence and esprit, for all of its personnel.
This involves tight and unswerving discipline as well as the promotion of an outstanding degree of dedication and loyalty to duty.
The Commission emphasizes that it finds no causal connection between the assassination
and the breach of regulations which occurred on the night of November twenty-one at Fort Worth.
Nevertheless, such a breach, in which so many agents participated,
is not consistent with the standards which the responsibilities of the Secret Service require it to meet.
In attempting to identify those individuals who might prove a danger to the President,
the Secret Service has largely been the passive recipient of threatening communications to the President
and reports from other agencies which independently evaluate their information for potential sources of danger.
This was the consequence of the Service's lack of an adequate investigative staff,
its inability to process large amounts of data, and its failure to provide specific descriptions of the kind of information it sought.
The Secret Service has embarked upon a complete overhaul of its research activities. The staff of the Protective Research Section (PRS)
has been augmented, and a Secret Service inspector has been put in charge of this operation. With the assistance of the President's Office of Science and Technology,
and of the Advanced Research Projects Agency of the Department of Defense,
it has obtained the services of outside consultants, such as the Rand Corporation,
International Business Machines Corporation, and a panel of psychiatric and psychological experts.
It has received assistance also from data processing experts at the CIA
and from a specialist in psychiatric prognostication at Walter Reed Hospital.
As a result of these studies, the planning document submitted by the Secretary of the Treasury to the Bureau of the Budget on August thirty-one,
nineteen sixty-four, makes several significant recommendations in this field.
Based on the Commission's investigation, the following minimum goals for improvements are indicated:
Broader and more selective criteria
Since the assassination, both the Secret Service and the FBI have recognized
that the PRS files can no longer be limited largely to persons communicating actual threats to the President.
On December twenty-six, nineteen sixty-three, the FBI circulated additional instructions to all its agents,
specifying criteria for information to be furnished to the Secret Service in addition to that covered by the former standard,
which was the possibility of an attempt against the person or safety of the President.
he new instructions require FBI agents to report immediately information concerning, quote,
Subversives, ultrarightists, racists and fascists (a) possessing emotional instability or irrational behavior,
(b) who have made threats of bodily harm against officials or employees of Federal, state or local government or officials of a foreign government,
(c) who express or have expressed strong or violent anti-U.S. sentiments
and who have been involved in bombing or bomb-making or whose past conduct indicates tendencies toward violence, and (d)
whose prior acts or statements depict propensity for violence and hatred against organized government, end quote.
Alan H. Belmont, Assistant to the Director of the FBI, testified that this revision was initiated by the FBI itself.
The volume of references to the Secret Service has increased substantially since the new instructions went into effect;
more than five thousand names were referred to the Secret Service in the first four months of nineteen sixty-four.
According to Chief Rowley, by mid-June nineteen sixty-four,
the Secret Service had received from the FBI some nine thousand reports on members of the Communist Party.
The FBI now transmits information on all defectors, a category which would, of course, have included Oswald.
Both Director Hoover and Belmont expressed to the Commission the great concern of the FBI, which is shared by the Secret Service,
that referrals to the Secret Service under the new criteria might, if not properly handled,
result in some degree of interference with the personal liberty of those involved.
They emphasized the necessity that the information now being furnished be handled with judgment and care.
The Commission shares this concern.
The problem is aggravated by the necessity that the Service obtain the assistance of local law enforcement officials in evaluating the information which it receives
and in taking preventive steps.
In June nineteen sixty-four, the Secret Service sent to a number of Federal law enforcement and intelligence agencies
guidelines for an experimental program to develop more detailed criteria.
The suggestions of Federal agencies for revision of these guidelines were solicited.
The new tentative criteria are useful in making clear that
the interest of the Secret Service goes beyond information on individuals or groups threatening to cause harm or embarrassment to the President.
Information is requested also concerning individuals or groups who have demonstrated an interest in the President
or, quote, other high government officials in the nature of a complaint coupled with an expressed or implied determination to use a means,
other than legal or peaceful, to satisfy any grievance, real or imagined.
Under these criteria, whether the case should be referred to the Secret Service depends on the existence of a previous history of mental instability,
propensity toward violent action, or some similar characteristic, coupled with some evaluation of the capability of the individual or group
to further the intention to satisfy a grievance by unlawful means.
While these tentative criteria are a step in the right direction,
they seem unduly restrictive in continuing to require some manifestation of animus against a Government official.
It is questionable whether such criteria would have resulted in the referral of Oswald to the Secret Service.
Chief Rowley believed that they would,
because of Oswald's demonstrated hostility toward the Secretary of the Navy in his letter of January thirty, nineteen sixty-two. Quote,
I shall employ all means to right this gross mistake or injustice to a bona fide U.S. citizen and ex-service man.
The U.S. government has no charges or complaints against me.
I ask you to look into this case and take the necessary steps to repair the damage done to me and my family. End quote.
Even with the advantage of hindsight, this letter does not appear to express or imply Oswald's, quote,
determination to use a means, other than legal or peaceful, to satisfy his grievance, end quote, within the meaning of the new criteria.
It is apparent that a good deal of further consideration and experimentation will be required before adequate criteria can be framed.
The Commission recognizes that no set of meaningful criteria will yield the names of all potential assassins. Charles J. Guiteau,
John Schrank, and Guiseppe Zangara -- four assassins or would-be assassins
were all men who acted alone in their criminal acts against our leaders. None had a serious record of prior violence.
Each of them was a failure in his work and in his relations with others, a victim of delusions and fancies which led to the conviction
that society and its leaders had combined to thwart him. It will require every available resource of our Government
to devise a practical system which has any reasonable possibility of revealing such malcontents.
Liaison with other agencies regarding intelligence.
The Secret Service's liaison with the agencies that supply information to it has been too casual.
Since the assassination, the Service has recognized that these relationships must be far more formal
and each agency given clear understanding of the assistance which the Secret Service expects.
Once the Secret Service has formulated its new standards for collection of information, it should enter into written agreements with each Federal agency
and the leading State and local agencies that might be a source of such information.
Such agreements should describe in detail the information which is sought, the manner in which it will be provided to the Secret Service,
and the respective responsibilities for any further investigation that may be required.
This is especially necessary with regard to the FBI and CIA,
which carry the major responsibility for supplying information about potential threats,
particularly those arising from organized groups, within their special jurisdiction.
Since these agencies are already obliged constantly to evaluate the activities of such groups,
they should be responsible for advising the Secret Service if information develops indicating the existence of an assassination plot
and for reporting such events as a change in leadership or dogma which indicate that the group may present a danger to the President.
Detailed formal agreements embodying these arrangements should be worked out between the Secret Service and both of these agencies.
It should be made clear that the Secret Service will in no way seek to duplicate the intelligence
and investigative capabilities of the agencies now operating in this field but will continue
to use the data developed by these agencies to carry out its special duties.
Once experience has been gained in implementing such agreements with the Federal and leading State and local agencies,
the Secret Service, through its field offices,
should negotiate similar arrangements with such other State and local law enforcement agencies as may provide meaningful assistance.
Much useful information will come to the attention of local law enforcement agencies in the regular course of their activities,
and this source should not be neglected by undue concentration on relationships with other Federal agencies.
Finally, these agreements with Federal and local authorities will be of little value
unless a system is established for the frequent formal review of activities thereunder. In this regard
the Commission notes with approval several recent measures taken and proposed by the Secret Service to improve its liaison arrangements.
In his testimony Secretary of the Treasury C. Douglas Dillon informed the Commission
that an interagency committee has been established to develop more effective criteria.
the Committee will include representatives of the President's Office of Science and Technology, Department of Defense, CIA,
FBI, and the Secret Service.
In addition, the Department of the Treasury has requested five additional agents for its Protective Research Section
to serve as liaison officers with law enforcement and intelligence agencies. On the basis of the Department's review during the past several months,
Secretary Dillon testified that the use of such liaison officers is the only effective way to insure that adequate liaison is maintained.
As a beginning step to improve liaison with local law enforcement officials, the Secret Service on August twenty-six, nineteen sixty-four,
directed its field representatives to send a form request for intelligence information to all local,
county, and State law enforcement agencies in their districts.
Each of these efforts appears sound,
and the Commission recommends that these and the other measures suggested by the Commission be pursued vigorously by Secret Service.
Unless the Secret Service is able to deal rapidly and accurately with a growing body of data,
the increased information supplied by other agencies will be wasted.
PRS must develop the capacity to classify its subjects on a more sophisticated basis than the present geographic breakdown.
Its present manual filing system is obsolete;
it makes no use of the recent developments in automatic data processing which are widely used in the business world and in other Government offices.
The Secret Service and the Department of the Treasury now recognize this critical need.
In the planning document currently under review by the Bureau of the Budget, the Department recommends that it be permitted to hire five qualified persons, quote,
to plan and develop a workable and efficient automated file and retrieval system, end quote.
Also the Department requests the sum of one hundred thousand dollars to conduct a detailed feasibility study;
this money would be used to compensate consultants, to lease standard equipment or to purchase specially designed pilot equipment.
On the basis of such a feasibility study,
the Department hopes to design a practical system which will fully meet the needs of the Protective Research Section of the Secret Service.
The Commission recommends that prompt and favorable consideration be given to this request.
The Commission further recommends that the Secret Service coordinate its planning as closely as possible with all of the Federal agencies from which it receives information.
The Secret Service should not and does not plan to develop its own intelligence gathering facilities to duplicate the existing facilities of other Federal agencies.
In planning its data processing techniques,
the Secret Service should attempt to develop a system compatible with those of the agencies from which most of its data will come. Note:
In evaluating data processing techniques of the Secret Service,
the Commission had occasion to become informed, to a limited extent, about the data processing techniques of other Federal intelligence and law enforcement agencies.
The Commission was struck by the apparent lack of effort, on an interagency basis,
to develop coordinated and mutually compatible systems, even where such coordination would not seem inconsistent
with the particular purposes of the agency involved. The Commission recognizes that this is a controversial area
and that many strongly held views are advanced in resistance to any suggestion that an effort be made to impose any degree of coordination.
This matter is obviously beyond the jurisdiction of the Commission,
but it seems to warrant further study before each agency becomes irrevocably committed to separate action.
The Commission, therefore, recommends that the President consider ordering an inquiry into the possibility
that coordination might be achieved to a greater extent than seems now to be contemplated, without interference with the primary mission of each agency involved.
Protective Research participation in advance arrangements.
Since the assassination, Secret Service procedures have been changed to require that a member of PRS accompany each advance survey team
to establish liaison with local intelligence gathering agencies and to provide for the immediate evaluation of information received from them.
This PRS agent will also be responsible for establishing an informal local liaison committee
to make certain that all protective intelligence activities are coordinated.
Based on its experience during this period, the Secret Service now recommends that additional personnel be made available to PRS
so that these arrangements can be made permanent without adversely affecting the operations of the Service's field offices.
The Commission regards this as a most useful innovation and urges that the practice be continued.
Liaison With Local Law Enforcement Agencies
Advice by the Secret Service to local police in metropolitan areas relating to the assistance expected in connection with a Presidential visit
has hitherto been handled on an informal basis.
The Service should consider preparing formal explanations of the cooperation anticipated during a Presidential visit to a city,
in formats that can be communicated to each level of local authorities.
Thus, the local chief of police could be given a master plan, prepared for the occasion, of all protective measures to be taken during the visit;
each patrolman might be given a prepared booklet of instructions explaining what is expected of him. The Secret Service has expressed concern
that written instructions might come into the hands of local newspapers, to the prejudice of the precautions described.
However, the instructions must be communicated to the local police in any event and can be leaked to the press whether or not they are in writing.
More importantly, the lack of carefully prepared and carefully transmitted instructions for typical visits to cities
can lead to lapses in protection, such as the confusion in Dallas about whether members of the public were permitted on overpasses.
Such instructions will not fit all circumstances, of course,
and should not be relied upon to the detriment of the imaginative application of judgment in special cases.
Since the assassination of President Kennedy, the Secret Service has been experimenting with new techniques in the inspection of buildings along a motorcade route.
the studies indicate that there is some utility in attempting to designate certain buildings as involving a higher risk than others.
The Commission strongly encourages these efforts to improve protection along a motorcade route.
The Secret Service should utilize the personnel of other Federal law enforcement offices
in the locality to assure adequate manpower for this task, as it is now doing.
Lack of adequate resources is an unacceptable excuse for failing to improve advance precautions
in this crucial area of Presidential protection.
Secret Service Personnel and Facilities
Testimony and other evidence before the Commission
suggest that the Secret Service is trying to accomplish its job with too few people and without adequate modern equipment.
Although Chief Rowley does not complain about the pay scale for Secret Service agents,
salaries are below those of the FBI and leading municipal police forces.
The assistant to the Director of the FBI testified that
the caseload of each FBI agent averaged twenty to twenty-five, and he felt that this was high.
Chief Rowley testified that the present workload of each Secret Service agent averages one hundred ten point one cases.
While these statistics relate to the activities of Secret Service agents stationed in field offices and not the White House detail,
field agents supplement those on the detail, particularly when the President is traveling.
Although the Commission does not know whether the cases involved are entirely comparable,
these figures suggest that the agents of the Secret Service are substantially overworked.
In its budget request for the fiscal year beginning July one, nineteen sixty-four,
the Secret Service sought funds for twenty-five new positions, primarily in field offices. This increase has been approved by the Congress.
Chief Rowley explained that this would not provide enough additional manpower to take all the measures which he considers required.
However, the nineteen sixty-four to sixty-five budget request was submitted in November nineteen sixty-three
and requests for additional personnel were not made because of the studies then being conducted.
The Secret Service has now presented its recommendations to the Bureau of the Budget. The plan proposed by the Service
would take approximately twenty months to implement and require expenditures of approximately three million dollars during that period.
The plan provides for an additional two hundred five agents for the Secret Service. Seventeen of this number are proposed for the Protective Research Section;
one hundred forty-five are proposed for the field offices to handle the increased volume of security investigations
and be available to protect the President or Vice President when they travel;
eighteen agents are proposed for a rotating pool which will go through an intensive training cycle and also be available to supplement the White House detail
in case of unexpected need; and twenty-five additional agents are recommended to provide the Vice President full protection.
The Commission urges that the Bureau of the Budget review these recommendations with the Secret Service and authorize a request for the necessary supplemental appropriation,
as soon as it can be justified. The Congress has often stressed that it will support any reasonable request for funds for the protection of the President.
Manpower and Technical Assistance From Other Agencies
Before the assassination the Secret Service infrequently requested other Federal law enforcement agencies to provide personnel
to assist in its protection functions.
Since the assassination, the Service has experimented with the use of agents borrowed for short periods from such agencies.
It has used other Treasury law enforcement agents on special experiments in building and route surveys in places to which the President frequently travels.
It has also used other Federal law enforcement agents during Presidential visits to cities in which such agents are stationed.
Thus, in the four months following the assassination,
the FBI, on sixteen separate occasions, supplied a total of one hundred thirty-nine agents to assist in protection work during a Presidential visit,
which represents a departure from its prior practice.
From February eleven through June thirty, nineteen sixty-four,
the Service had the advantage of nine thousand, five hundred hours of work by other enforcement agencies.
The FBI has indicated that it is willing to continue to make such assistance available,
even though it agrees with the Secret Service that it is preferable for the Service to have enough agents to handle all protective demands.
The Commission endorses these efforts to supplement the Service's own personnel by obtaining, for short periods of time,
the assistance of trained Federal law enforcement officers.
In view of the ever-increasing mobility of American Presidents, it seems unlikely that the Service could or should increase its own staff to a size
which would permit it to provide adequate protective manpower for all situations.
The Commission recommends that the agencies involved determine how much periodic assistance they can provide, and that each such agency
and the Secret Service enter into a formal agreement defining such arrangements.
It may eventually be desirable to codify the practice in an Executive order.
The Secret Service will be better able to plan its own long-range personnel requirements if it knows with reasonable certainty
the amount of assistance that it can expect from other agencies.
The occasional use of personnel from other Federal agencies to assist in protecting the President has a further advantage. It symbolizes the reality
that the job of protecting the President has not been and cannot be exclusively the responsibility of the Secret Service.
The Secret Service in the past has sometimes guarded its right to be acknowledged as the sole protector of the Chief Executive.
This no longer appears to be the case.
Protecting the President is a difficult and complex task which requires full use of the best resources of many parts of our Government.
Recognition that the responsibility must be shared increases the likelihood that it will be met.
Much of the Secret Service work requires the development and use of highly sophisticated equipment,
some of which must be specially designed to fit unique requirements. Even before the assassination, and to a far greater extent thereafter,
the Secret Service has been receiving full cooperation in scientific research and technological development
from many Government agencies including the Department of Defense and the President's Office of Science and Technology.
Even if the manpower and technological resources of the Secret Service are adequately augmented,
it will continue to rely in many respects upon the greater resources of the Office of Science and Technology and other agencies.
The Commission recommends that the present arrangements
with the Office of Science and Technology and the other Federal agencies that have been so helpful to the Secret Service be placed on a permanent and formal basis.
The exchange of letters dated August thirty-one, nineteen sixty-four,
between Secretary Dillon and Donald F. Hornig, Special Assistant to the President for Science and Technology, is a useful effort in the right direction.
The Service should negotiate a memorandum of understanding with each agency that has been assisting it and from which it can expect to need help in the future.
The essential terms of such memoranda might well be embodied in an Executive order.
This Commission can recommend no procedures for the future protection of our Presidents which will guarantee security.
The demands on the President in the execution of His responsibilities in today's world are so varied and complex
and the traditions of the office in a democracy such as ours are so deep-seated as to preclude absolute security.
The Commission has, however, from its examination of the facts of President Kennedy's assassination
made certain recommendations which it believes would, if adopted,
materially improve upon the procedures in effect at the time of President Kennedy's assassination and result in a substantial lessening of the danger.
As has been pointed out, the Commission has not resolved all the proposals which could be made. The Commission nevertheless is confident that,
with the active cooperation of the responsible agencies and with the understanding of the people of the United States in their demands upon their President,
the recommendations we have here suggested would greatly advance the security of the office without any impairment of our fundamental liberties.
The birch canoe slid on the smooth planks.
Glue the sheet to the dark blue background.
It's easy to tell the depth of a well.
These days a chicken leg is a rare dish.
Rice is often served in round bowls.
The juice of lemons makes fine punch.
The box was thrown beside the parked truck.
The hogs were fed chopped corn and garbage.
Four hours of steady work faced us.
A large size in stockings is hard to sell.
The boy was there when the sun rose.
A rod is used to catch pink salmon.
The source of the huge river is the clear spring.
Kick the ball straight and follow through.
Help the woman get back to her feet.
A pot of tea helps to pass the evening.
Smoky fires lack flame and heat.
The soft cushion broke the man's fall.
The salt breeze came across from the sea.
The girl at the booth sold fifty bonds.
The small pup gnawed a hole in the sock.
The fish twisted and turned on the bent hook.
Press the pants and sew a button on the vest.
The swan dive was far short of perfect.
The beauty of the view stunned the young boy.
Two blue fish swam in the tank.
Her purse was full of useless trash.
The colt reared and threw the tall rider.
It snowed, rained, and hailed the same morning.
Read verse out loud for pleasure.
Hoist the load to your left shoulder.
Take the winding path to reach the lake.
Note closely the size of the gas tank.
Wipe the grease off his dirty face.
Mend the coat before you go out.
The wrist was badly strained and hung limp.
The stray cat gave birth to kittens.
The young girl gave no clear response.
The meal was cooked before the bell rang.
What joy there is in living.
A king ruled the state in the early days.
The ship was torn apart on the sharp reef.
Sickness kept him home the third week.
The wide road shimmered in the hot sun.
The lazy cow lay in the cool grass.
Lift the square stone over the fence.
The rope will bind the seven books at once.
Hop over the fence and plunge in.
The friendly gang left the drug store.
Mesh wire keeps chicks inside.
The frosty air passed through the coat.
The crooked maze failed to fool the mouse.
Adding fast leads to wrong sums.
The show was a flop from the very start.
A saw is a tool used for making boards.
The wagon moved on well oiled wheels.
March the soldiers past the next hill.
A cup of sugar makes sweet fudge.
Place a rosebush near the porch steps.
Both lost their lives in the raging storm.
We talked of the side show in the circus.
Use a pencil to write the first draft.
He ran half way to the hardware store.
The clock struck to mark the third period.
A small creek cut across the field.
Cars and busses stalled in snow drifts.
The set of china hit the floor with a crash.
This is a grand season for hikes on the road.
The dune rose from the edge of the water.
Those words were the cue for the actor to leave.
A yacht slid around the point into the bay.
The two met while playing on the sand.
The ink stain dried on the finished page.
The walled town was seized without a fight.
The lease ran out in sixteen weeks.
A tame squirrel makes a nice pet.
The horn of the car woke the sleeping cop.
The heart beat strongly and with firm strokes.
The pearl was worn in a thin silver ring.
The fruit peel was cut in thick slices.
The Navy attacked the big task force.
See the cat glaring at the scared mouse.
There are more than two factors here.
The hat brim was wide and too droopy.
The lawyer tried to lose his case.
The grass curled around the fence post.
Cut the pie into large parts.
Men strive but seldom get rich.
Always close the barn door tight.
He lay prone and hardly moved a limb.
The slush lay deep along the street.
A wisp of cloud hung in the blue air.
A pound of sugar costs more than eggs.
The fin was sharp and cut the clear water.
The play seems dull and quite stupid.
Bail the boat to stop it from sinking.
The term ended in late june that year.
A Tusk is used to make costly gifts.
Ten pins were set in order.
The bill was paid every third week.
Oak is strong and also gives shade.
Cats and Dogs each hate the other.
The pipe began to rust while new.
Open the crate but don't break the glass.
Add the sum to the product of these three.
Thieves who rob friends deserve jail.
The ripe taste of cheese improves with age.
Act on these orders with great speed.
The hog crawled under the high fence.
Move the vat over the hot fire.
The bark of the pine tree was shiny and dark.
Leaves turn brown and yellow in the fall.
The pennant waved when the wind blew.
Split the log with a quick, sharp blow.
Burn peat after the logs give out.
He ordered peach pie with ice cream.
Weave the carpet on the right hand side.
Hemp is a weed found in parts of the tropics.
A lame back kept his score low.
We find joy in the simplest things.
Type out three lists of orders.
The harder he tried the less he got done.
The boss ran the show with a watchful eye.
The cup cracked and spilled its contents.
Paste can cleanse the most dirty brass.
The slang word for raw whiskey is booze.
It caught its hind paw in a rusty trap.
The wharf could be seen at the farther shore.
Feel the heat of the weak dying flame.
The tiny girl took off her hat.
A cramp is no small danger on a swim.
He said the same phrase thirty times.
Pluck the bright rose without leaves.
Two plus seven is less than ten.
The glow deepened in the eyes of the sweet girl.
Bring your problems to the wise chief.
Write a fond note to the friend you cherish.
Clothes and lodging are free to new men.
We frown when events take a bad turn.
Port is a strong wine with a smoky taste.
The young kid jumped the rusty gate.
Guess the result from the first scores.
A salt pickle tastes fine with ham.
The just claim got the right verdict.
Those thistles bend in a high wind.
Pure bred poodles have curls.
The tree top waved in a graceful way.
The spot on the blotter was made by green ink.
Mud was spattered on the front of his white shirt.
The cigar burned a hole in the desk top.
The empty flask stood on the tin tray.
A speedy man can beat this track mark.
He broke a new shoelace that day.
The coffee stand is too high for the couch.
The urge to write short stories is rare.
The pencils have all been used.
The pirates seized the crew of the lost ship.
We tried to replace the coin but failed.
She sewed the torn coat quite neatly.
The sofa cushion is red and of light weight.
The jacket hung on the back of the wide chair.
At that high level the air is pure.
Drop the two when you add the figures.
A filing case is now hard to buy.
An abrupt start does not win the prize.
Wood is best for making toys and blocks.
The office paint was a dull, sad tan.
He knew the skill of the great young actress.
A rag will soak up spilled water.
A shower of dirt fell from the hot pipes.
Steam hissed from the broken valve.
The child almost hurt the small dog.
There was a sound of dry leaves outside.
The sky that morning was clear and bright blue.
Torn scraps littered the stone floor.
Sunday is the best part of the week.
The doctor cured him with these pills.
The new girl was fired today at noon.
They felt gay when the ship arrived in port.
Add the store's account to the last cent.
Acid burns holes in wool cloth.
Fairy tales should be fun to write.
Eight miles of woodland burned to waste.
The third act was dull and tired the players.
A young child should not suffer fright.
Add the column and put the sum here.
We admire and love a good cook.
There the flood mark is ten inches.
He carved a head from the round block of marble.
She has a smart way of wearing clothes.
The fruit of a fig tree is apple shaped.
Corn cobs can be used to kindle a fire.
Where were they when the noise started.
The paper box is full of thumb tacks.
Sell your gift to a buyer at a good gain.
The tongs lay beside the ice pail.
The petals fall with the next puff of wind.
Bring your best compass to the third class.
They could laugh although they were sad.
Farmers came in to thresh the oat crop.
The brown house was on fire to the attic.
The lure is used to catch trout and flounder.
Float the soap on top of the bath water.
A blue crane is a tall wading bird.
A fresh start will work such wonders.
The club rented the rink for the fifth night.
After the dance, they went straight home.
The hostess taught the new maid to serve.
He wrote his last novel there at the inn.
Even the worst will beat his low score.
The cement had dried when he moved it.
The loss of the second ship was hard to take.
The fly made its way along the wall.
Do that with a wooden stick.
Live wires should be kept covered.
The large house had hot water taps.
It is hard to erase blue or red ink.
Write at once or you may forget it.
The doorknob was made of bright clean brass.
The wreck occurred by the bank on Main Street.
A pencil with black lead writes best.
Coax a young calf to drink from a bucket.
Schools for ladies teach charm and grace.
The lamp shone with a steady green flame.
They took the axe and the saw to the forest.
The ancient coin was quite dull and worn.
The shaky barn fell with a loud crash.
Jazz and swing fans like fast music.
Rake the rubbish up and then burn it.
Slash the gold cloth into fine ribbons.
Try to have the court decide the case.
They are pushed back each time they attack.
He broke his ties with groups of former friends.
They floated on the raft to sun their white backs.
The map had an X that meant nothing.
Whitings are small fish caught in nets.
Some ads serve to cheat buyers.
Jerk the rope and the bell rings weakly.
A waxed floor makes us lose balance.
Madam, this is the best brand of corn.
On the islands the sea breeze is soft and mild.
The play began as soon as we sat down.
This will lead the world to more sound and fury.
Add salt before you fry the egg.
The rush for funds reached its peak Tuesday.
The birch looked stark white and lonesome.
The box is held by a bright red snapper.
To make pure ice, you freeze water.
The first worm gets snapped early.
Jump the fence and hurry up the bank.
Yell and clap as the curtain slides back.
They are men who walk the middle of the road.
Both brothers wear the same size.
In some form or other we need fun.
The prince ordered his head chopped off.
The houses are built of red clay bricks.
Ducks fly north but lack a compass.
Fruit flavors are used in fizz drinks.
These pills do less good than others.
Canned pears lack full flavor.
The dark pot hung in the front closet.
Carry the pail to the wall and spill it there.
The train brought our hero to the big town.
We are sure that one war is enough.
Gray paint stretched for miles around.
The rude laugh filled the empty room.
High seats are best for football fans.
Tea served from the brown jug is tasty.
A dash of pepper spoils beef stew.
A zestful food is the hot-cross bun.
The horse trotted around the field at a brisk pace.
Find the twin who stole the pearl necklace.
Cut the cord that binds the box tightly.
The red tape bound the smuggled food.
Look in the corner to find the tan shirt.
The cold drizzle will halt the bond drive.
Nine men were hired to dig the ruins.
The junk yard had a mouldy smell.
The flint sputtered and lit a pine torch.
Soak the cloth and drown the sharp odor.
The shelves were bare of both jam or crackers.
A joy to every child is the swan boat.
All sat frozen and watched the screen.
A cloud of dust stung his tender eyes.
To reach the end he needs much courage.
Shape the clay gently into block form.
A ridge on a smooth surface is a bump or flaw.
Hedge apples may stain your hands green.
Quench your thirst, then eat the crackers.
Tight curls get limp on rainy days.
The mute muffled the high tones of the horn.
The gold ring fits only a pierced ear.
The old pan was covered with hard fudge.
Watch the log float in the wide river.
The node on the stalk of wheat grew daily.
The heap of fallen leaves was set on fire.
Write fast if you want to finish early.
His shirt was clean but one button was gone.
The barrel of beer was a brew of malt and hops.
Tin cans are absent from store shelves.
Slide the box into that empty space.
The plant grew large and green in the window.
The beam dropped down on the workman's head.
Pink clouds floated with the breeze.
She danced like a swan, tall and graceful.
The tube was blown and the tire flat and useless.
It is late morning on the old wall clock.
Let's all join as we sing the last chorus.
The last switch cannot be turned off.
The fight will end in just six minutes.
The store walls were lined with colored frocks.
The peace league met to discuss their plans.
The rise to fame of a person takes luck.
Paper is scarce, so write with much care.
The quick fox jumped on the sleeping cat.
The nozzle of the fire hose was bright brass.
Screw the round cap on as tight as needed.
Time brings us many changes.
The purple tie was ten years old.
Men think and plan and sometimes act.
Fill the ink jar with sticky glue.
He smoke a big pipe with strong contents.
We need grain to keep our mules healthy.
Pack the records in a neat thin case.
The crunch of feet in the snow was the only sound.
The copper bowl shone in the sun's rays.
Boards will warp unless kept dry.
The plush chair leaned against the wall.
Glass will clink when struck by metal.
Bathe and relax in the cool green grass.
Nine rows of soldiers stood in a line.
The beach is dry and shallow at low tide.
The idea is to sew both edges straight.
The kitten chased the dog down the street.
Pages bound in cloth make a book.
Try to trace the fine lines of the painting.
Women form less than half of the group.
The zones merge in the central part of town.
A gem in the rough needs work to polish.
Code is used when secrets are sent.
Most of the news is easy for us to hear.
He used the lathe to make brass objects.
The vane on top of the pole revolved in the wind.
Mince pie is a dish served to children.
The clan gathered on each dull night.
Let it burn, it gives us warmth and comfort.
A castle built from sand fails to endure.
A child's wit saved the day for us.
Tack the strip of carpet to the worn floor.
Next Tuesday we must vote.
Pour the stew from the pot into the plate.
Each penny shone like new.
The man went to the woods to gather sticks.
The dirt piles were lines along the road.
The logs fell and tumbled into the clear stream.
Just hoist it up and take it away.
A ripe plum is fit for a king's palate.
Our plans right now are hazy.
Brass rings are sold by these natives.
It takes a good trap to capture a bear.
Feed the white mouse some flower seeds.
The thaw came early and freed the stream.
He took the lead and kept it the whole distance.
The key you designed will fit the lock.
Plead to the council to free the poor thief.
Better hash is made of rare beef.
This plank was made for walking on .
The lake sparkled in the red hot sun.
He crawled with care along the ledge.
Tend the sheep while the dog wanders.
It takes a lot of help to finish these.
Mark the spot with a sign painted red.
Take two shares as a fair profit.
The fur of cats goes by many names.
North winds bring colds and fevers.
He asks no person to vouch for him.
Go now and come here later.
A sash of gold silk will trim her dress.
Soap can wash most dirt away.
That move means the game is over.
He wrote down a long list of items.
A siege will crack the strong defense.
Grape juice and water mix well.
Roads are paved with sticky tar.
Fake stones shine but cost little.
The drip of the rain made a pleasant sound.
Smoke poured out of every crack.
Serve the hot rum to the tired heroes.
Much of the story makes good sense.
The sun came up to light the eastern sky.
Heave the line over the port side.
A lathe cuts and trims any wood.
It's a dense crowd in two distinct ways.
His hip struck the knee of the next player.
The stale smell of old beer lingers.
The desk was firm on the shaky floor.
It takes heat to bring out the odor.
Beef is scarcer than some lamb.
Raise the sail and steer the ship northward.
A cone costs five cents on Mondays.
A pod is what peas always grow in.
Jerk that dart from the cork target.
No cement will hold hard wood.
We now have a new base for shipping.
A list of names is carved around the base.
The sheep were led home by a dog.
Three for a dime, the young peddler cried.
The sense of smell is better than that of touch.
No hardship seemed to make him sad.
Grace makes up for lack of beauty.
Nudge gently but wake her now.
The news struck doubt into restless minds.
Once we stood beside the shore.
A chink in the wall allowed a draft to blow.
Fasten two pins on each side.
A cold dip restores health and zest.
He takes the oath of office each March.
The sand drifts over the sills of the old house.
The point of the steel pen was bent and twisted.
There is a lag between thought and act.
Seed is needed to plant the spring corn.
Draw the chart with heavy black lines.
The boy owed his pal thirty cents.
The chap slipped into the crowd and was lost.
Hats are worn to tea and not to dinner.
The ramp led up to the wide highway.
Beat the dust from the rug onto the lawn.
Say it slowly but make it ring clear.
The straw nest housed five robins.
Screen the porch with woven straw mats.
This horse will nose his way to the finish.
The dry wax protects the deep scratch.
He picked up the dice for a second roll.
These coins will be needed to pay his debt.
The nag pulled the frail cart along.
Twist the valve and release hot steam.
The vamp of the shoe had a gold buckle.
The smell of burned rags itches my nose.
New pants lack cuffs and pockets.
The marsh will freeze when cold enough.
They slice the sausage thin with a knife.
The bloom of the rose lasts a few days.
A gray mare walked before the colt.
Breakfast buns are fine with a hot drink.
Bottles hold four kinds of rum.
The man wore a feather in his felt hat.
He wheeled the bike past the winding road.
Drop the ashes on the worn old rug.
The desk and both chairs were painted tan.
Throw out the used paper cup and plate.
A clean neck means a neat collar.
The couch cover and hall drapes were blue.
The stems of the tall glasses cracked and broke.
The wall phone rang loud and often.
The clothes dried on a thin wooden rack.
Turn out the lantern which gives us light.
The cleat sank deeply into the soft turf.
The bills were mailed promptly on the tenth of the month.
To have is better than to wait and hope.
The price is fair for a good antique clock.
The music played on while they talked.
Dispense with a vest on a day like this.
The bunch of grapes was pressed into wine.
He sent the figs, but kept the ripe cherries.
The hinge on the door creaked with old age.
The screen before the fire kept in the sparks.
Fly by night and you waste little time.
Thick glasses helped him read the print.
Birth and death marks the limits of life.
The chair looked strong but had no bottom.
The kite flew wildly in the high wind.
A fur muff is stylish once more.
The tin box held priceless stones.
We need an end of all such matter.
The case was puzzling to the old and wise.
The bright lanterns were gay on the dark lawn.
We don't get much money but we have fun.
The youth drove with zest, but little skill.
Five years he lived with a shaggy dog.
A fence cuts through the corner lot.
The way to save money is not to spend much.
Shut the hatch before the waves push it in.
The odor of spring makes young hearts jump.
Crack the walnut with your sharp side teeth.
He offered proof in the form of a large chart.
Send the stuff in a thick paper bag.
A quart of milk is water for the most part.
They told wild tales to frighten him.
The three story house was built of stone.
In the rear of the ground floor was a large passage.
A man in a blue sweater sat at the desk.
Oats are a food eaten by horse and man.
Their eyelids droop for want of sleep.
A sip of tea revives his tired friend.
There are many ways to do these things.
Tuck the sheet under the edge of the mat.
A force equal to that would move the earth.
We like to see clear weather.
The work of the tailor is seen on each side.
Take a chance and win a china doll.
Shake the dust from your shoes, stranger.
She was kind to sick old people.
The square wooden crate was packed to be shipped.
The dusty bench stood by the stone wall.
We dress to suit the weather of most days.
Smile when you say nasty words.
A bowl of rice is free with chicken stew.
The water in this well is a source of good health.
Take shelter in this tent, but keep still.
That guy is the writer of a few banned books.
The little tales they tell are false.
The door was barred, locked, and bolted as well.
Ripe pears are fit for a queen's table.
A big wet stain was on the round carpet.
The kite dipped and swayed, but stayed aloft.
The pleasant hours fly by much too soon.
The room was crowded with a wild mob.
This strong arm shall shield your honor.
She blushed when he gave her a white orchid.
The beetle droned in the hot June sun.
Press the pedal with your left foot.
Neat plans fail without luck.
The black trunk fell from the landing.
The bank pressed for payment of the debt.
The theft of the pearl pin was kept secret.
Shake hands with this friendly child.
The vast space stretched into the far distance.
A rich farm is rare in this sandy waste.
His wide grin earned many friends.
Flax makes a fine brand of paper.
Hurdle the pit with the aid of a long pole.
A strong bid may scare your partner stiff.
Even a just cause needs power to win.
Peep under the tent and see the clowns.
The leaf drifts along with a slow spin.
Cheap clothes are flashy but don't last.
A thing of small note can cause despair.
Flood the mails with requests for this book.
A thick coat of black paint covered all.
The pencil was cut to be sharp at both ends.
Those last words were a strong statement.
He wrote his name boldly at the top of the sheet.
Dill pickles are sour but taste fine.
Down that road is the way to the grain farmer.
Either mud or dust are found at all times.
The best method is to fix it in place with clips.
If you mumble your speech will be lost.
At night the alarm roused him from a deep sleep.
Read just what the meter says.
Fill your pack with bright trinkets for the poor.
The small red neon lamp went out.
Clams are small, round, soft, and tasty.
The fan whirled its round blades softly.
The line where the edges join was clean.
Breathe deep and smell the piny air.
It matters not if he reads these words or those.
A brown leather bag hung from its strap.
A toad and a frog are hard to tell apart.
A white silk jacket goes with any shoes.
A break in the dam almost caused a flood.
Paint the sockets in the wall dull green.
The child crawled into the dense grass.
Bribes fail where honest men work.
Trample the spark, else the flames will spread.
The hilt of the sword was carved with fine designs.
A round hole was drilled through the thin board.
Footprints showed the path he took up the beach.
She was waiting at my front lawn.
A vent near the edge brought in fresh air.
Prod the old mule with a crooked stick.
It is a band of steel three inches wide.
The pipe ran almost the length of the ditch.
It was hidden from sight by a mass of leaves and shrubs.
The weight of the package was seen on the high scale.
Wake and rise, and step into the green outdoors.
The green light in the brown box flickered.
The brass tube circled the high wall.
The lobes of her ears were pierced to hold rings.
Hold the hammer near the end to drive the nail.
Next Sunday is the twelfth of the month.
Every word and phrase he speaks is true.
He put his last cartridge into the gun and fired.
They took their kids from the public school.
Drive the screw straight into the wood.
Keep the hatch tight and the watch constant.
Sever the twine with a quick snip of the knife.
Paper will dry out when wet.
Slide the catch back and open the desk.
Help the weak to preserve their strength.
A sullen smile gets few friends.
Stop whistling and watch the boys march.
Jerk the cord, and out tumbles the gold.
Slide the tray across the glass top.
The cloud moved in a stately way and was gone.
Light maple makes for a swell room.
Set the piece here and say nothing.
Dull stories make her laugh.
A stiff cord will do to fasten your shoe.
Get the trust fund to the bank early.
Choose between the high road and the low.
A plea for funds seems to come again.
He lent his coat to the tall gaunt stranger.
There is a strong chance it will happen once more.
The duke left the park in a silver coach.
Greet the new guests and leave quickly.
When the frost has come it is time for turkey.
Sweet words work better than fierce.
A thin stripe runs down the middle.
A six comes up more often than a ten.
Lush ferns grow on the lofty rocks.
The ram scared the school children off.
The team with the best timing looks good.
The farmer swapped his horse for a brown ox.
Sit on the perch and tell the others what to do.
A steep trail is painful for our feet.
The early phase of life moves fast.
Green moss grows on the northern side.
Tea in thin china has a sweet taste.
Pitch the straw through the door of the stable.
The latch on the back gate needed a nail.
The goose was brought straight from the old market.
The sink is the thing in which we pile dishes.
A whiff of it will cure the most stubborn cold.
The facts don't always show who is right.
She flaps her cape as she parades the street.
The loss of the cruiser was a blow to the fleet.
Loop the braid to the left and then over.
Plead with the lawyer to drop the lost cause.
Calves thrive on tender spring grass.
Post no bills on this office wall.
Tear a thin sheet from the yellow pad.
A cruise in warm waters in a sleek yacht is fun.
A streak of color ran down the left edge.
It was done before the boy could see it.
Crouch before you jump or miss the mark.
Pack the kits and don't forget the salt.
The square peg will settle in the round hole.
Fine soap saves tender skin.
Poached eggs and tea must suffice.
Bad nerves are jangled by a door slam.
Ship maps are different from those for planes.
Dimes showered down from all sides.
They sang the same tunes at each party.
The sky in the west is tinged with orange red.
The pods of peas ferment in bare fields.
The horse balked and threw the tall rider.
The hitch between the horse and cart broke.
Pile the coal high in the shed corner.
A gold vase is both rare and costly.
The knife was hung inside its bright sheath.
The rarest spice comes from the far East.
The roof should be tilted at a sharp slant.
A smatter of French is worse than none.
The mule trod the treadmill day and night.
The aim of the contest is to raise a great fund.
To send it now in large amounts is bad.
There is a fine hard tang in salty air.
Cod is the main business of the north shore.
The slab was hewn from heavy blocks of slate.
Dunk the stale biscuits into strong drink.
Hang tinsel from both branches.
Cap the jar with a tight brass cover.
The poor boy missed the boat again.
Be sure to set that lamp firmly in the hole.
Pick a card and slip it under the pack.
A round mat will cover the dull spot.
The first part of the plan needs changing.
A good book informs of what we ought to know.
The mail comes in three batches per day.
You cannot brew tea in a cold pot.
Dots of light betrayed the black cat.
Put the chart on the mantel and tack it down.
The night shift men rate extra pay.
The red paper brightened the dim stage.
See the player scoot to third base.
Slide the bill between the two leaves.
Many hands help get the job done.
We don't like to admit our small faults.
No doubt about the way the wind blows.
Dig deep in the earth for pirate's gold.
The steady drip is worse than a drenching rain.
A flat pack takes less luggage space.
Green ice frosted the punch bowl.
A stuffed chair slipped from the moving van.
The stitch will serve but needs to be shortened.
A thin book fits in the side pocket.
The gloss on top made it unfit to read.
The hail pattered on the burnt brown grass.
Seven seals were stamped on great sheets.
Our troops are set to strike heavy blows.
The store was jammed before the sale could start.
It was a bad error on the part of the new judge.
One step more and the board will collapse.
Take the match and strike it against your shoe.
The pot boiled but the contents failed to jell.
The baby puts his right foot in his mouth.
The bombs left most of the town in ruins.
Stop and stare at the hard working man.
The streets are narrow and full of sharp turns.
The pup jerked the leash as he saw a feline shape.
Open your book to the first page.
Fish evade the net and swim off.
Dip the pail once and let it settle.
Will you please answer that phone.
The big red apple fell to the ground.
The curtain rose and the show was on.
The young prince became heir to the throne.
He sent the boy on a short errand.
Leave now and you will arrive on time.
The corner store was robbed last night.
A gold ring will please most any girl.
The long journey home took a year.
She saw a cat in the neighbor's house.
A pink shell was found on the sandy beach.
Small children came to see him.
The grass and bushes were wet with dew.
The blind man counted his old coins.
A severe storm tore down the barn.
She called his name many times.
When you hear the bell, come quickly.
